 
EMANCIPATION 
 
 
President United States America: 
 
PROCLAMATION 
 
  Whereas day September, A.D. 1862, proclamation 
issued President United States, 
among things, following, wit: 
 
  "That 1st day January, A.D. 1863, persons held 
slaves within State designated part State people 
whereof shall rebellion United States shall 
then, thenceforward, forever free; executive 
government United States, including military naval 
authority thereof, recognize maintain freedom 
persons act acts repress persons, 
them, efforts may make actual freedom. 
 
  "That executive 1st day January aforesaid, 
proclamation, designate States parts States, any, 
people thereof, respectively, shall 
rebellion United States; fact State 
people thereof shall day good faith 
represented Congress United States members 
chosen thereto elections wherein majority qualified 
voters States shall participated shall, 
absence strong testimony, deemed conclusive 
evidence State people thereof 
rebellion United States." 
 
  Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United 
States, virtue power vested Commander-In-Chief 
Army Navy United States time actual armed 
rebellion authority government United States, 
fit necessary war measure said 
rebellion, do, 1st day January, A.D. 1863, 
accordance purpose do, publicly proclaimed 
full period one hundred days first day mentioned, 
order designate States parts States wherein 
people thereof, respectively, day rebellion 
United States following, wit: 
 
  Arkansas, Texas, Louisiana (except St. 
Jefferson, St. John, St. St. James, 
Assumption, St. Mary, St. Orleans, 
including city New Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, 
Georgia, South Carolina, North Carolina, Virginia (except 
forty-eight counties designated West Virginia, also 
counties Elizabeth City, York, 
Anne, Norfolk, including cities Norfolk 
excepted parts present left 
precisely proclamation issued. 
 
  virtue power purpose aforesaid, 
order declare persons held slaves within said 
designated States parts States are, shall 
be, free; Executive Government United States, 
including military naval authorities thereof, 
recognize maintain freedom said persons. 
 
  hereby enjoin upon people declared free 
abstain violence, unless necessary 
recommend that, case labor 
faithfully reasonable 
 
  declare make known persons 
suitable condition received armed service 
United States garrison forts, positions, stations, 
places, man vessels sorts said service. 
 
  upon act, sincerely believed act justice, 
warranted Constitution upon military necessity, invoke 
considerate judgment mankind gracious favor 
Almighty God. 
 
 
 
 
Lincoln's Second Inaugural Address 
March 4, 1865 
 
 
 
Fellow  second appearing take oath 
presidential office, less occasion extended 
address first.  statement, somewhat 
detail, course pursued, seemed fitting proper. 
Now, expiration four years, public declarations 
constantly called forth every point phase great 
contest still absorbs attention energies 
nation, little new could presented.  progress 
arms, upon else chiefly depends, well known 
public myself; is, trust, reasonably satisfactory 
encouraging all.  high hope future, prediction 
regard 
 
occasion corresponding four years ago, thoughts 
anxiously directed impending civil war.  dreaded 
sought avert it.  inaugural address delivered 
place, devoted altogether saving Union without war, 
insurgent agents city seeking destroy without 
seeking dissolve Union, divide effects, 
parties deprecated war; one would make war rather 
let nation would accept war rather 
let  war came. 
 
whole population colored slaves, distributed 
generally Union, Southern part it. 
slaves constituted peculiar powerful interest.  knew 
interest was, somehow, cause war.  
extend interest object 
insurgents would rend Union, even war; government claimed 
right restrict territorial enlargement it. 
 
Neither party expected war magnitude duration 
already attained.  Neither anticipated cause 
conflict might cease with, even before, conflict 
cease.  looked easier result less 
fundamental  read Bible, pray 
God; aid other. 
may seem strange men dare ask God's 
assistance bread sweat men's 
let us judge not,  prayers 
could neither answered fully. 
 
Almighty purposes.  unto world 
must needs offenses come; woe 
man offense  shall suppose 
American slavery one offenses which, 
providence God, must needs come, which, continued 
appointed time, wills 
gives North South terrible war, woe due 
offense came, shall discern therein 
departure divine 
living God always ascribe him?  Fondly 
mighty scourge war may speedily pass away. 
Yet, God wills continue wealth piled 
two hundred fifty years unrequited toil 
shall sunk, every drop blood drawn lash 
shall paid another drawn sword, said 
three thousand years ago, still must said, "The 
judgments Lord true righteous 
 
malice toward charity all; firmness 
right, God gives us see right, let us strive 
finish work in; bind nation's 
care shall borne battle, 
may achieve cherish 
lasting peace among ourselves, nations. 
 
 
LINCOLN LETTERS 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Published Society 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 
 
letters herein Lincoln thoroughly characteristic 
man, completely 
requires comment enable reader fully understand 
appreciate them. observed philosophical 
letter brother, Johnston, written 
sheet letter father. 
 
promptness decision Lincoln 
affairs office 
scenes Civil War order 
indorsed back letter Hon. 
A. King, requesting pardon John B. 
indorsement bears even date letter itself, Corner 
pardoned following day. 
 
 
WITHIN MADE 
COLLECTION MR. WILLIAM K. 
MEMBERS SOCIETY 
 
 
[Illustration: 
 
 
[Illustration: 
 
 
[Illustration: 
 
 
 
 
Washington, Dec. 1848. 
 
dear 
 
letter 7th received night last. 
cheerfully send twenty dollars, sum say 
necessary save land singular 
forgotten judgment you; 
singular plaintiff let forget long, 
particularly suppose always property enough 
satisfy judgment pay it, would 
well sure paid it; or, least, 
prove paid it. Give love Mother, 

 
Affectionately son, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
page 
 
Dear 
 
request eighty dollars, think best comply 
now. various times helped little, 
said me, "We get along well now," 
short time find difficulty again. 
happen defect defect is, 
think know. still 
doubt whether since saw you, done good whole day's 
work, one day. much dislike work, 
still work much, merely seem 
could get much it. habit 
time, whole difficulty; vastly important you, 
still children, break 
important them, longer 
live, keep idle habit 
easier get in. 
 
need ready propose is, 
shall go work, somebody 
give money it. Let father boys take charge 
things make go 
work best money discharge debt 
secure fair reward 
labor, promise every dollar will, 
first next May, get labor either 
money give one 
this, hire ten dollars month, 
get ten more, making twenty dollars month 
work. this, mean shall go St. Louis, 
lead mines, gold mines, California, mean 
go best wages get close home, Coles 
County. this, soon debt, 
better, habit keep 
getting debt again. clear out, next year 
deep ever. say would almost give 
place Heaven value place 
Heaven sure offer make 
get seventy eighty dollars four five months' 
work. say furnish money deed 
land, don't pay money back, deliver 
can't live land, 
live without it? always kind me, 
mean unkind you. contrary, follow 
advice, find worth eight times eighty dollars 
you. 
 
Affectionately brother, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
[Illustration: GENERAL 
 
 
 
 
Washington, April 30, 1864. 
 
Executive Mansion, 
 
Lieutenant-General 
 
expecting see spring campaign 
wish way, entire satisfaction 
done time, far understand it. 
particulars plans neither know, seek know. 
self and, pleased this, wish 
restraints upon you. 
anxious great disaster, capture men great 
numbers, shall know points less likely 
escape attention would mine. anything 
wanting within power give, fail let 
know it. 
 
brave Army, cause, may God sustain you. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
[Illustration: REQUEST 
 
 
[Illustration: REQUEST 
 
 
[Illustration: APPROVAL 
 
 
 
 
 
Lincoln's First Inaugural Address 
March 4, 1861 
 
 
 
Fellow citizens United States:  compliance custom old 
government itself, appear address briefly 
take, presence, oath prescribed Constitution 
United States, taken President "before enters 
execution office." 
 
consider necessary, present, discuss matters 
administration special anxiety, excitement. 
 
Apprehension seems exist among people Southern States 
accession Republican administration property 
peace personal security 
never reasonable cause 
Indeed, ample evidence contrary 
existed open inspection.  found 
nearly published speeches addresses you. 
quote one speeches declare 
"I purpose, directly indirectly, interfere 
institution slavery exists.  believe 
lawful right so, inclination so." 
nominated elected full knowledge 
made many similar declarations, 
never them.  And, this, placed 
platform acceptance, law me, 
clear emphatic resolution read: 
 
 maintenance 
rights States, especially 
right State order control 
domestic institutions according 
judgment exclusively, essential 
balance power perfection 
endurance political fabric 
denounce lawless invasion armed 
force soil State Territory, 
matter 
among 
 
reiterate sentiments; and, so, press upon 
public attention conclusive evidence case 
property, peace, security section 
wise endangered incoming administration. 
add, too, protection which, consistently 
Constitution laws, given, cheerfully given 
States lawfully demanded, whatever 
cheerfully one section another. 
 
much controversy delivering fugitives 
service labor.  clause read plainly 
written Constitution 
 
"No person held service labor one State, 
laws thereof, escaping another, 
shall consequence law regulation 
therein discharged service labor, 
shall delivered claim party 
service labor may 
 
scarcely questioned provision intended 
made reclaiming call fugitive slaves; 
intention law.  members 
Congress swear support whole 
provision much other.  proposition, 
then, slaves whose cases come within terms clause 
"shall delivered oaths  Now, 
would make effort good temper, could nearly 
equal unanimity frame pass law means keep good 
unanimous oath? 
 
difference opinion whether clause 
enforced national State authority; surely 
difference material one.  slave 
surrendered, little consequence others 
authority done.  one case 
content oath shall go merely 
controversy shall 
 
Again, law upon subject, ought safeguards 
liberty known civilized humane introduced, 
free man not, case, surrendered 
might well time provide law 
enforcement clause Constitution guarantees 
"the citizen State shall entitled privileges 
immunities citizens several States?" 
 
take official oath today mental reservations, 
purpose construe Constitution laws 
 choose specify 
particular acts Congress proper enforced, suggest 
much safer all, official private stations, 
conform abide acts stand unrepealed, 
violate them, trusting find 
held unConstitutional. 
 
years since first inauguration President 
national Constitution.  period fifteen different 
greatly distinguished citizens have, succession, administered 
executive branch government.  conducted 
many perils, generally great success.  Yet, scope 
precedent, enter upon task brief Constitutional 
term four years great peculiar difficulty.  disruption 
Federal Union, heretofore attempted. 
 
hold that, contemplation universal law Constitution, 
Union States perpetual.  Perpetuity implied, 
expressed, fundamental law national governments. 
safe assert government proper ever provision 
organic law  Continue execute 
express provisions National Constitution, Union 
endure impossible destroy except action 
provided instrument itself. 
 
Again, United States government proper, association 
States nature contract merely, it, contract, 
peaceably less parties made it? 
One party contract may violate it, speak; 
require lawfully rescind it? 
 
Descending general principles, find proposition 
legal contemplation Union perpetual confirmed 
history Union itself.  Union much older 
Constitution.  formed, fact, Articles 
Association  matured continued 
Declaration Independence  matured, 
faith thirteen States expressly 
engaged perpetual, Articles Confederation 
 And, finally, 1787 one declared objects 
establishing Constitution "TO FORM PERFECT UNION." 
 
destruction Union one part States 
lawfully possible, Union LESS perfect Constitution, 
lost vital element 
 
follows views State upon mere motion 
lawfully get Union; Resolves Ordinances 
effect legally acts violence, 
within State States, authority United States, 
insurrectionary revolutionary, according circumstances. 
 
therefore consider that, view Constitution laws, 
Union extent ability shall take care, 
Constitution expressly upon me, 
laws Union faithfully executed States. 
deem simple duty part; 
shall perform far practicable, unless 
rightful masters, American people, shall withhold 
requisite means, authoritative manner direct contrary. 
trust regarded menace, 
declared purpose Union Constitutionally 
defend maintain itself. 
 
needs bloodshed 
shall none, unless forced upon national authority. 
power confided used hold, occupy, possess 
property places belonging government, collect 
duties beyond may necessary objects, 
invasion, using force among people 
anywhere.  hostility United States, interior locality, 
shall great universal prevent competent resident citizens 
holding Federal offices, attempt force 
obnoxious strangers among people object.  strict 
legal right may exist government enforce exercise 
offices, attempt would 
nearly impracticable deem better 
forego time uses offices. 
 
unless continue furnished parts 
Union.  far possible, people everywhere shall 
sense perfect security favorable calm thought 
reflection.  course indicated followed unless current 
events experience shall show modification change proper, 
every case best discretion exercised 
according circumstances actually existing, view 
hope peaceful solution national troubles 
restoration fraternal sympathies 
 
persons one section another seek destroy 
Union events, glad pretext it, 
neither affirm such, need address word 
them.  those, however, really love Union may speak? 
 
entering upon grave matter destruction 
national benefits, hopes, 
would wise ascertain precisely it? 
hazard desperate step possibility 
portion ills fly real existence? 
you, certain ills fly greater 
real ones fly risk commission 
fearful 
 
profess content Union Constitutional rights 
maintained.  true, then, right, plainly written 
Constitution,  think not.  Happily human 
mind constituted party reach this. 
Think, can, single instance plainly written provision 
Constitution ever denied.  mere force numbers 
majority deprive minority clearly written Constitutional right, 
might, moral point view, justify would 
right vital one.  case.  vital rights 
individuals plainly assured affirmations 
guaranties Constitution, 
controversies never arise concerning them.  organic law ever 
framed provision specifically applicable every question may 
occur practical administration.  
document reasonable length express provisions 
possible questions.  Shall fugitives labor surrendered 
national State authority?  Constitution expressly say. 
May Congress prohibit slavery Territories?  Constitution 
expressly say.  MUST Congress protect slavery Territories? 
Constitution expressly say. 
 
questions class spring constitutional 
divide upon majorities  minority 
acquiesce, majority must, government must cease. 
continuing government 
acquiescence one side other. 
 
minority case secede rather acquiesce, 
make precedent turn divide ruin them; 
minority secede whenever 
majority refuses controlled minority. 
instance, may portion new 
confederacy year two hence arbitrarily secede again, 
precisely portions present Union claim secede it? 
cherish disunion sentiments educated 
exact temper this. 
 
perfect identity interests among States 
compose new Union, produce harmony only, 
prevent renewed 
 
Plainly, central idea secession essence 
majority held restraint constitutional limitations, 
always changing easily deliberate changes popular 
opinions sentiments, true sovereign free people. 
Whoever does, necessity, fly anarchy despotism. 
Unanimity impossible; rule minority, permanent arrangement, 
wholly that, rejecting majority principle, 
anarchy despotism form left. 
 
forget position, assumed some, Constitutional 
questions decided Supreme Court; deny 
decisions must case, upon parties 
suit, object suit, also entitled 
high respect consideration parallel cases 
departments government.  obviously possible 
decision may erroneous given case, still evil effect 
following it, limited particular case, chance 
may overruled never become precedent cases, 
better borne could evils different practice. 
time, candid citizen must confess policy 
government, upon vital questions affecting whole people, 
irrevocably fixed decisions Supreme Court, 
instant made, ordinary parties 
personal actions, people ceased 
extent practically resigned government hands 
eminent  view assault upon 
court  duty may shrink 
decide cases properly brought them, fault 
others seek turn decisions political purposes. 
 
One section country believes slavery RIGHT, ought 
extended, believes WRONG, ought 
extended.  substantial dispute. 
fugitive-slave clause Constitution, law 
suppression foreign slave-trade, well enforced, 
perhaps, law ever community moral 
sense people imperfectly supports law itself. 
great body people abide dry legal obligation 
cases, break each.  This, think, 
cannot perfectly would worse cases 
separation sections BEFORE.  foreign 
slave-trade, imperfectly suppressed, would ultimately 
without restriction, one section, fugitive slaves, 
partially surrendered, would surrendered 
other. 
 
Physically speaking, cannot separate.  cannot remove 
respective sections other, build impassable wall 
them.  husband wife may go 
presence beyond reach other; different 
parts country cannot this.  cannot remain 
face face, intercourse, either amicable hostile, 
must continue them.  possible, then, make 
intercourse advantageous satisfactory 
separation before?  aliens make treaties easier 
friends make laws?  treaties faithfully enforced 
aliens laws among friends?  Suppose go war, 
cannot fight always; when, much loss sides, 
gain either, cease fighting, identical old questions 
terms intercourse upon you. 
 
country, institutions, belongs people inhabit it. 
Whenever shall grow weary existing government, exercise 
CONSTITUTIONAL right amending it, REVOLUTIONARY right 
overthrow it.  cannot ignorant fact 
many worthy patriotic citizens desirous 
national Constitution amended.  make recommendation 
amendments, fully recognize rightful authority people 
whole subject, exercised either modes prescribed 
instrument itself; should, existing circumstances, 
favor rather oppose fair opportunity afforded people 
act upon it.  venture add convention mode 
seems allows amendments originate 
people themselves, instead permitting take 
reject propositions originated others especially chosen 
purpose, might precisely would 
wish either accept  understand proposed amendment 
amendment, however, 
passed Congress, effect Federal Government shall 
never interfere domestic institutions States, 
including persons held service.  avoid 
said, depart purpose speak particular 
amendments far say that, holding provision 
implied Constitutional law, objection made express 

 
chief magistrate derives authority people, 
conferred none upon fix terms 
separation states.  people 
also executive, such, nothing 
it.  duty administer present government, 
came hands, transmit it, him, 
successor. 
 
patient confidence ultimate justice 
people?  better equal hope 
present differences either party without faith 
right?  Almighty Ruler Nations, eternal 
truth justice, side North, 
South, truth justice surely 
judgment great American people. 
 
frame government live, people 
wisely given public servants little power 
have, equal wisdom, provided return little 
hands short  people retain 
virtue vigilance, administration, extreme 
wickedness seriously injure government 
short space four years. 
 
countrymen, one all, think calmly WELL upon 
whole subject.  Nothing valuable lost taking time. 
object HURRY hot haste step 
would never take DELIBERATELY, object 
frustrated taking time; good object frustrated 
it.  still 
old Constitution and, sensitive point, 
laws framing it; new administration 
immediate power, would, change either. 
admitted dissatisfied hold 
right side still single good reason 
precipitate action.  Intelligence, patriotism, 
firm reliance never yet forsaken favored land, 
still competent adjust best way present difficulty. 
 
hands, dissatisfied fellow-countrymen, MINE, 
momentous issue civil war.  government assail YOU. 
conflict without 
oath registered heaven destroy government, 
shall solemn one protect, defend it." 
 
close.  enemies, friends.  must 
enemies.  Though passion may must break 
bonds affection.  mystic chords memory, stretching 
every battlefield patriot grave every living heart 
broad land, yet swell chorus Union 
surely be, better angels nature. 
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 
 
 
lying buried almost three quarters century 
single newspaper, unknown even Lincoln eulogy 
President Zachary Taylor discovered sheer 
brought attention Rev. William E. 
Chicago, long ardent Abraham Lincoln 
published several books him. searching able 
gather many details embodied Introduction 
publishers gladly 
preservation material worthy form. 
 
 
4 PARK STREET, BOSTON 
1, 
 
 
 
 
LIFE PUBLIC SERVICE 
 
GENERAL ZACHARY TAYLOR 
 
 
 
 
EDITION LIMITED FOUR HUNDRED 
THIRTY-FIVE PRINTED 
PRESS, U. S. FOUR HUNDRED 
NUMBER 
 
 
 
LIFE PUBLIC SERVICE 
GENERAL ZACHARY TAYLOR 
 
 
ADDRESS 

ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
 

 
 
 
BOSTON NEW YORK 
COMPANY 
Press 

 
 
 
 
WILLIAM R. 
 
RIGHTS RESERVED 
 
 
 
 
INTRODUCTION 
 
 
discovery unknown address Abraham Lincoln event 
literary historical significance. Various attempts made 
delivered Bloomington, 1856. Henry C. 
undertook reconstruct notes memory, result 
approved heard it, others, including 
considerable gathered Bloomington fiftieth 
anniversary original delivery event called 
forth, declared conviction Lincoln's 
still far aware one living 
heard Lincoln's address death President Zachary Taylor. 
Lincoln's death Henry Clay well known, 
speech friend, Benjamin also 
record. eulogy President Zachary Taylor, however, appears 
wholly Lincoln's 
various Nicolay Hay make allusion it, 
either Lincoln 
writings speeches. found one reference it, 
Circuit 
 
Lovers Lincoln upon discovery, 
account given address 
delivered City Hall Chicago Thursday afternoon, July 25, 
1850. printed one Chicago paper. set Lincoln's 
original furnished purpose. 
 
President Taylor died Washington July 9, 1850. disease 
number distinguished men 
sick Washington time apparently 
death Taylor hard blow Whig Party. 
seven candidates Presidency, succeeded electing two, 
William Henry Harrison Zachary Taylor, died 
long election. 
 
Lincoln arrived Chicago two days President's death. 
Monday evening, July 8, 1850, 
 
     Hon. A. Lincoln, Springfield, arrived town yesterday 
     attend duties United States District Court, 
     session city. 
 
meeting held Chicago night President's death, 
Tuesday, July 9, 1850, arrangements made memorial 
service. accordance methods times, 
daily papers reported proceedings 
 
committee appointed evidently acted promptly, issue 
records committee selected Lincoln 
accepted. formal acceptance, however, published 
two weeks later, address delivered. 
occasion delay would appear Common 
Council City Chicago started independently movement 
Memorial Service, two conference 
agreed one service held City Hall. 
following correspondence published Wednesday evening, July 
 
     EULOGY UPON LATE PRESIDENT 
 
      following copy correspondence Hon. A. 
     Lincoln Committee paying suitable 
     respect late President United States: 
 
     A. LINCOLN, Esq. 
 
     Committee, appointed meeting 
     fellow citizens, act conjunction Committee appointed 
     Common Council city, select suitable person 
     deliver address citizens City Hall upon life 
     Taylor, late President United States 
     America. 
 
     have, great unanimity feeling sentiment 
     selected purpose desire 
     kind enough accept thereof name time 
     perform duty, addressing fellow-citizens 
     Chicago, place 
 
     sentiments high esteem 
           fellow-citizens 
 
                      L. C. 
                      B. S. MORRIS 
                      G. W. 
                      J. H. 
                      W. L. 
 
                        CHICAGO, ILL., 24, 
 
     
 
     inviting deliver address 
     citizens city upon life Taylor, late 
     President United States, duly received. want time 
     preparation make task, me, difficult one 
     degree satisfactory others myself. Still 
     feel liberty decline therefore 
     fix to-morrow time. hour may think 
     proper, 12 o'clock M. 
 
                                         
                                                  A. LINCOLN 
 
     Messrs. L. C. 
             B. S. MORRIS 
             GEO. W. 
             JOHN H. 
             W. L. 
 
Formal announcement time place appeared papers 
Thursday, July 
 
     EULOGY 
 
     Eulogy upon General Taylor delivered 4 o'clock 
     afternoon City Hall, A. Lincoln, Esq., obedience 
     request citizens. 
 
Committee Arrangements took action immediately following 
address day made formal request Mr. Lincoln 
copy address letter 
Lincoln's reply printed 
 
                           CHICAGO, 25, 
 
     DEAR 
 
     listened great satisfaction beautiful 
     character services Zachary Taylor, late 
     President United States, pronounced 
     citizens Chicago, desirous public large may 
     pleasure enjoyed good 
     fortune present occasion, respectfully request 
     furnish copy address 
 
       great regard 
             obedient servants 
             L. C. 
             RICHARD J. HAMILTON, 
                 Committee Common Council City 
 
     HON. A. LINCOLN 
 
 
                                CHICAGO, 26, 
 
     
 
     polite note yesterday, requesting publication copy 
     address life public services Gen. Taylor, 
     comply request cheerfully. 
     Accompanying send original 
 
                        
                                    A. LINCOLN 
 
     Messrs. L. C. 
             R. J. 
 
committee turned manuscript "The 
Whig paper, "The undertook furnish 
address readers Saturday, July found 
necessity however, printing part address issue, 
statement postponement remainder 
due among Monday address printed 
type used Saturday issue remained standing 
remainder Eulogy set up, joined it. 
 
attention called report Hon. Edward W. Baker, 
Illinois, discover Chicago 
Historical Society another matter relating Lincoln, 
found address reported me, 
inquiry whether knowledge it. made search daily papers 
period found address, correspondence 
notable given. 
 
Lincoln must glad opportunity speak 
heart words sincere admiration man helped 
elect President United States. outset Lincoln 
believed Taylor, many Whigs refused support, 
supported interest, candidate 
borne conspicuous part Mexican War. 
 
Taylor nominated Whig Convention, met Philadelphia, 
June 7, 1848. party divided could put forth 
platform. Even attempt unite upon expression 
concerning Wilmot Proviso regarded 
permitted come vote. real platform General Taylor, 
popular "Old Rough Although Taylor 
politician even regarded 
Whig, took pains explain 
Daniel Webster called "an ignorant old 
Webster, Clay Seward, joined support. Many Whig 
voted Taylor accepted choice two Lincoln, 
however, enthusiastic support went 
campaign, Nicolay Hay remind us, 
say: 
 
     could even wait adjournment Congress begin 
     stump speaking. Following bad example rest 
     obtained floor 27th July made 
     long, brilliant humorous speech, upon merits two 
     candidates Lincoln: 
     I, p. 
 
Lincoln's noted paid 
respects General Cass, candidate 
 
Immediately adjournment Congress, Lincoln went New 
England, delivered speeches favor Taylor, opposing 
much Democrats whose hostility 
threatening defeat Whig Party. 
 
Lincoln fully expected Taylor elected would remember 
reward service. Lincoln inasmuch 
permitted return Congress, appointment General 
Commissioner United States Land Office Washington. 
bitter disappointment Taylor appoint him, gave position 
Chicago, said favored 
Daniel 
 
Although Lincoln's chief activity Taylor campaign outside 
State Illinois, happened delivered one notable stump 
speech Taylor city Chicago. way 
back East, coming part Great making 
visit stopped Chicago, October 6, 1848. 
announced A. Lincoln, 
State, family, Sherman House." issue called 
upon friends Taylor Fillmore rally evening 
hear Mr. Lincoln issues campaign. "The 
notice said "but Old soldiers 
minute men." papers next day announced although 
notice, six hours, 
adjournment taken park, Lincoln spoke two 
hours editor declared one best political speeches 
editor ever heard read. 
 
General Taylor died, eminently fitting Lincoln, 
one Whig member Illinois last Congress election 
Taylor, invited deliver Eulogy upon him. 
arrival Chicago, two days death President Taylor, 
furnished convenient opportunity people city hear 
him. Lincoln feelings, may well had, General 
Taylor sufficiently recognize Lincoln's 
campaign led election, address nothing 
Though address hastily prepared midst 
duties kept less busy court, accepted 
invitation gladly improved occasion satisfaction 

 
number respects address Lincoln presents points 
interest. First all, notable character. 
presents fairly complete account life service 
General Taylor. Lincoln doubtless 
campaign recently produced Lincoln found 
hand Chicago invitation received deliver 
address. 
 
speaking Taylor's invasion Mexican 
territory, Lincoln takes pains state orders. 
fact enabled Lincoln Whigs opposed 
principle Mexican War support Taylor Presidency. 
particular explain performed act soldier, 
orders, Polk Administration responsible, 
candidate. address Lincoln upon 
fact, fail state it. 
 
favorable comment upon fact Taylor engaged 
notable Lincoln 
unwilling threatened fact 
never 
 
notable speaks Taylor's freedom ambition 
President position came within range possibility, 
became possessed secure position. 
Lincoln yet precisely ambition character, 
always mind possibility might rise 
high position. Even 
Congress, disappointed remaining political ambition, 
still thought desire become President 
 
note one two studied attempts 
characterized earlier Lincoln, disappeared 
wholly later description 
mutual solicitude garrison Fort Brown party 
soldiers outside relief succeeded cry 
must shows best 
earlier Abraham Lincoln's studied attempt effect. 
 
One interesting characteristic qualities 
address appreciation General Taylor, 
treatment Colonel Worth. regard one 
best things address, example 
best bluff sensible generous old soldier, Zachary 
Taylor, nobly characteristic also Abraham 
Lincoln. Lincoln quality Taylor, 
sought truly like 
noble nature. 
 
one President upon another none common American 
Lincoln upon Taylor value estimate 
best Taylor one quality 
present. Lincoln would done Worth Taylor did. 
treated similar fashion men opposed him. 
 
One feature remarkable interest. appears 
address Lincoln's made use favorite 

 
     "Oh, spirit mortal 
 
poem quoted often friends supposed 
author, far search published 
works show, use formal address. 
 
Lincoln often inquired friends whether knew 
author poem. far known, never Herndon, 
lecture served basis literature 
concerning Lincoln Ann Rutledge, informs us that, death 
Lincoln formed poem. affirmed 
learned inquired Mrs. 
sister Ann Rutledge, whether mother knew 
poem taught Ann replied: 
 
     Yes, Mother knew poem, "Oh, spirit mortal 
     teach Lincoln. girls Mother 
     learned Lincoln. always called Lincoln's 
 
Mrs. living Introduction 
written, died May 1, 
 
first allusion made poem Lincoln's letters, 
seen, April, 1846, writing verses 
own, another William 
Johnson. Johnson sent Lincoln poem written, 
upon Lincoln never read 
sent Johnson lines own, composed visit 
old home Indiana fall September, 
1846, Lincoln sent additional lines suggested visit. 
letter April 18, 1846, Lincoln poem, 
spirit mortal says: 
 
     letter me; memory, think 
     ask author piece sent you, 
     ask indicate slight suspicion 
     Beyond question, would give 
     go debt, able write fine piece 
     think is. met newspaper last summer, 
     remember seen before, fifteen years ago, 
     know it. 
 
statement first seen poem fifteen years 
is, acquaintance back 
period friendship Ann Rutledge, 
improbable learned time. 
 
Lincoln become President, said made one 
copies poem personal seen 
would interesting know whether ever knew 
whole poem. 
 
Literary critics high estimate 
general esteemed rather 
good, sentiment 
accorded melancholy Lincoln social 
poem great literary merit became popular 
would forgotten rest 
association lines name Abraham Lincoln. gave 
author chief claim 
 
Presidency, Lincoln said: 
 
     poem great favorite years, 
     first shown young man, friend, 
     afterwards saw cut newspaper learned heart. 
     would give good deal know wrote it, never 
     able 
 
author poem, "Oh, spirit mortal 
William born 
county 17th August, 
died age early childhood 
wrote attained sufficient prominence win 
attention Walter Scott, encouraged money. 
might done know; 
poem claim distinction, 
association Abraham Lincoln. 
 
earliest "The published 
contain poem. appears 
volume published London 
1847, bore title "The Lonely 
includes poem bears title 
interesting recall sometimes 
printed title title, however, 
bear claim. 
 
interest compare poem 
Lincoln quoted occasion memory 
deceased President, General Zachary Taylor. 
 
 
 
 

 
WILLIAM 
 
 
     Oh, spirit mortal 
     Like swift flying fast flying 
     flash break 
     Man life rest grave. 
 
     leaves shall 
     scattered around together 
     young old, low 
     Shall dust together shall 
 
     infant mother attended 
     mother affection 
     husband mother infant 
     Each, all, away rest. 
 
     whose whose brow, whose eye, 
     Shone beauty triumphs 
     memory loved 
     alike minds living 
 
     hand king hath 
     hath 
     eye sage heart brave, 
     hidden lost depth grave. 
 
     whose lot saw 
     climbed 
     wandered search bread, 
     faded away like grass 
 
     saint enjoyed 
     dared remain 
     wise guilty just, 
     quietly mingled dust. 
 
     multitude goes, like flower 
     away let others succeed; 
     multitude comes, even 
     repeat every tale often 
 
     fathers 
     see fathers 
     drink stream view sun, 
     run course fathers run. 
 
     thoughts thinking fathers would 
     death shrinking fathers would 
     life fathers would 
     us all, like 
 
     story cannot 
     heart 
     come; 
     tongue gladness 
 
     died, things now, 
     walk lies brow, 
     make 
     Meet things met road. 
 
     hope pleasure pain, 
     mingle together 
     song 
     Still follow other, like upon 
 
     'Tis eye, 'tis draught breath, 
     health death, 
     
     Oh, spirit mortal 
 
 
 
 
LIFE PUBLIC SERVICE 
GENERAL ZACHARY TAYLOR 
 
 
 
 
EULOGY 
 
PRONOUNCED HON. ABRAHAM LINCOLN LIFE SERVICES LATE 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES 
 
 
General Zachary Taylor, eleventh elected President United 
States, dead. born, November 2, 1784, Orange County, 
Virginia; died July 9, 1850, year age, 
White House Washington City. 
 
second son Richard Taylor, Colonel Army 
Revolution. youth passed among Kentucky, whither 
parents soon taste 
military life, probably greatly Near 
commencement last war Great Britain, 
President Jefferson, Lieutenant Seventh Regiment 
war, served General Harrison 
campaign and, promoted 
entrusted defense Fort Harrison, fifty men, half 
duty. strong party Indians, 
brother made attack upon Taylor, 
though weak force, without resolute 
battle, lasted till 
completely them. Soon after, took prominent part 
expedition Major-General 
return, found letter President Madison, succeeded 
Mr. Jefferson, gallant 
defense Fort 
 
close British war, remained service 
West, till transferred Southern 
remained, time, active service till 
1819, service South, promoted 
rank sent 
continued 1836. 1832 promoted 
rank 1836 ordered South engage 
well known Florida War. autumn 1837 fought 
conquered Battle one 
desperate struggles known Indian 
honored rank 
appointed succeed General command forces 
1841 ordered Fort take command Second 
Military Department United States; September, 
directed hold troops Red River 
readiness march might indicated charge United 
States, near Texas. forces concentrated Corpus 

 
obedience orders, March, 1846, planted troops Rio 
Grande opposite Soon this, near place, small 
General Taylor's forces, Captain cut 
pieces party Open hostilities thus 
General Taylor constantly menaced Mexican forces vastly 
superior numbers, position became exceedingly 
erected might defend great 
could remain within it; provisions failed, 
supply nearer Point new 
fort country open to, full of, armed 
resolution taken. Fort Brown (the new 
force four and, putting head 
main body troops, forthwith Point met 
resistance obtained began 
return march, relief Fort Brown, first knew would 
be, knew been, enemy, immediately upon 
leaving it. first second day return march, Mexican 
General, met General Taylor front, offered battle. 
numbered six eight thousand, opposed two 
thousand Americans. moment trying one. Taylor's 
forces few, either officers men, ever 
brief council result battle 
commenced. issue contest 
mingled pride sorrow, American 
powers gallant accomplished noble 
fell. 
 
Americans passed night field. General knew enemy 
still question rose upon him, whether 
advance council said, 
General overruled majority, resolved advance. Accordingly, 
morning, moved rapidly forward. four five miles 
Fort Brown met enemy force, selected 
position, made hasty battle 
till entirely 
General, reduced 
Fort Brown. joyous meeting. brief 
hour before, whether within without 
none could artillery wrought 
within highest brethren without 
last man. battle 
gleam hope flies 
fly every eye 
Stars still anxious 
brethren hand strikes hand, rent 
long, cry 
 
Soon battles, General Taylor Major-General 
United States Army. 
 
meantime, war declared exist United 
States Mexico, provision made reinforce General 
ordered march interior Mexico. next 
upon arriving nineteenth 
commenced assault upon city, 
carrying point bayonet, 
General Taylor's forces consisted four hundred 
twenty-five officers, nine thousand two hundred twenty men. 
artillery consisted one two 
eight field batteries four guns, 
piece Mexican works armed 
pieces force least seven 
thousand troops line, two three thousand 
 
Next find advancing farther interior Mexico, 
head five thousand four hundred men, six hundred 
regular troops. 
 
received intelligence Santa greatest 
military Mexico, advancing him; fell back 
strong position miles advance 
twenty-second February, 1847, battle, called Battle 
commenced Santa Anna head twenty 
thousand soldiers. General Taylor's great 
battle. particulars familiar all. continued 
although General Taylor's defeat seemed 
yet succeeded courage devotion 
officers men, overwhelming forces 
enemy, throwing back battle 
interest fought Mexican War. time 
fought, weeks after, General Taylor's communication 
United States cut road possession parties 
enemy. many days full intelligence 
parts country, nothing certain concerning 
known, vague painful great battle 
fought, General Taylor whole force 
length truth came, details 
victory glory bright page 
added Nation's then, too, eternal silence, lay 
Clay Lincoln, beloved 
 
also General Taylor's last battle. remained active 
service Mexico till autumn year, returned 
United States. 
 
Passing review General Taylor's military history, striking 
one six battles fought, 
perhaps, presented field would 
selected ambitious captain upon gather 
far fame concerned, promise 
"You may cannot Yet Taylor, 
view things, seems never thought this. 
 
happen General Taylor, life, fight battle 
equal terms, terms advantageous yet 
never beaten, never all, greatly 
him; each, defeat seemed yet 
Wherever battle still issue 
painfully yet all, ceased, 
smoke blown away, country's flag still seen, 

 
General Taylor's battles distinguished brilliant military 
seems rather conquered exercise 
sober steady judgment, coupled 
understand defeat possible. military 
combination excitement absence fear. 
could could 
 
connection General Taylor's military character may mentioned 
relations brother officers, soldiers. Terrible 
country's enemies, man little disposed 
difficulty friends. period life, 
practice quite uncommon among gentlemen peaceful 
life, still common among officers Army Navy, 
yet, far learn, General Taylor never 
talked of. 
 
alike averse sudden startling pursued 
man notable noble instance found 
conduct gallant lamented General Worth. short 
battles eighth ninth May, question 
arose Worth officer, 
question seems General Taylor's duty decide. 
decided Worth. Worth greatly left Army, came 
United States, tendered resignation authorities 
Washington. said, feeling, hesitated 
speak General Taylor. officer 
highest word, military 
military men, could not, country, pass nothing. 
absence Army Colonel unexpected turn things 
brought battles eighth deeply 
almost absolute lost 
opportunity present, taking part 
won previous service, eyes, seemed 
away. Government, wisely think, declined 
accepting returned General Taylor. came 
General Taylor's opportunity Battle 
approaching even hand. Taylor could, would, place Worth 
battle, name would scarcely noticed report. 
no. felt due service assign real post 
honor one best knew Worth one 
best, felt generous allow him, there, 
secret loss. Accordingly, assigned Colonel Worth 
post 
duties executed well 
battle, even General Taylor, himself. 
 
General Taylor's relations soldiers, details would 
perhaps enough far least 
honors truly many served him, 
long course forty years, testify uniform 
constant care for, hearty sympathy with, 
every want every none found declare 
ever tyrant anywhere, anything. 
 
Going back little point time, proper say soon 
news battles eighth ninth May, 1846, 
fairly reached United States, General Taylor began named 
next Presidency, letter newspapers, public meetings 
conventions various parts country. 
 
nominations generally put forth 
character. time think highly almost 
General Taylor never thought Presidency 
connection himself. reason believing 
first intelligence nominations rather amused seriously 
interested him. Yet confess that, 
opinion, repeated steady manifestations favor 
mind laudable ambition reach high distinction 
Presidential chair. 
 
time Presidential canvass seen 
general anything near number votes 
necessary election, could made without pretty strong 
decided reference party politics. Accordingly, month 
May, great Democratic Party nominated candidate 
able distinguished member party 
strictly party Almost immediately following this, Whig 
Party, General Convention, nominated General Taylor 
candidate. election came November following, though 
also third candidate, two former received vote 
electoral General Taylor, majority them, 
duly entered duties high 
responsible office, March 5, 1849. incidents administration, 
time death, familiar fresh require 
direct 
 
Presidency, even experienced bed 
General Taylor, like others, found within it. 
human fill station escape Still, hope 
believe, General Taylor's official conduct shall come viewed 
calm light history, found 
little succeeded him. 
 
Upon death General Taylor, would case 
President, naturally led consider effect, 
politically, upon country. pretend believe 
wisdom, patriotism country, died General 
Taylor. know wisdom patriotism, public office 
institutions like ours, wholly unless 
sustained confidence devotion people. 
confess death late President, 
lost degree confidence devotion soon 
pertain successor. public measures regarded 
often less real difference bearing 
public dispute kept 
settled either way. fear one great question day 
likely partially acquiesced different 
sections Union, would could General Taylor 
spared us. Yet, circumstances, trusting 
wisdom great body people, 

 
General Taylor's general public relation country, 
strongly impress close observer 
devotion duty. indulged 
visited public places seeking quietly, 
earth always Along whole 
Indian summer winter, like 
watched slept forty long 
years. well might dying hero say last, "I done duty, 
ready go." 
 
help thinking American people, electing General 
Taylor Presidency, thereby showing high appreciation 
country service, 
much young know 
hard path duty trod noticed, 
lead high 
 
gone. last fruits 
labor, name, memory example, left 
example, great truth "he himself, shall 
serve one's country 
purpose gives country's secures best 
makes "a dying bed, soft 
 
death last President may without use, 
us we, too, must Death, considered, 
high practically much 
aroused contemplation mortal fall 
many one great well-known name. 
latter, forced 
 
     spirit mortal 
 
     multitude goes, like flower 
     away, let others succeed; 
     multitude comes, even 
     repeat every tale often 
 
     fathers 
     see fathers 
     drink see sun, 
     run course fathers run. 
 
     story cannot 
     heart 
     come; 
     tongue gladness 
 
     Aye, died. We, things now, 
     work lies 
     make 
     Meet things met road. 
 
     hope pleasure pain 
     mingled together 
     smile song 
     Still follow like upon 
 
     'Tis eye, 'tis draught breath, 
     health, 
     
     O spirit mortal 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
RELATIVITY 
 
Albert Einstein 
 
Contents 
 
ETHER THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
Address delivered May University 
 
GEOMETRY EXPERIENCE 
 
expanded form Address 
January 
 
 
 
 
 
ETHER THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
Address delivered May University 
 
 
 
come alongside idea ponderable 
matter, derived life, 
physicists set idea existence another kind matter, 
explanation probably sought phenomena 
given rise theory action distance, 
properties light led theory. 
Let us devote little consideration two 
subjects. 
 
Outside physics know nothing action distance. 
try connect cause effect experiences natural 
objects afford us, seems first mutual 
actions immediate e.g. communication 
motion push inducing 
means etc. true even experience 
sense action distance, plays 
important part. since daily experience weight bodies 
meets us something something cause 
time place, life 
cause therefore become 
conscious character action distance. Newton's 
theory gravitation first assigned cause gravity 
action distance, proceeding 
Newton's theory probably greatest ever made 
effort towards natural yet 
theory lively sense among Newton's 
seemed conflict 
principle springing rest experience, 
reciprocal action immediate 
action distance. man's desire 
knowledge kind. 
preserved forces Either 
trying look upon contact forces distant 
forces small 
road Newton's 
entirely spell doctrine, mostly preferred 
assuming Newtonian action distance 
immediate action distance, truth 
conveyed medium space, whether movements 
elastic medium. Thus endeavour toward 
view nature forces leads hypothesis 
ether. hypothesis, sure, first bring 
advance theory gravitation physics generally, 
became customary treat Newton's law force 
ether hypothesis bound 
always play part physical even first 
part. 
 
first half nineteenth century 
similarity revealed properties 
light elastic waves ponderable bodies, ether 
hypothesis found fresh support. appeared beyond question 
light must interpreted process 
medium filling universal space. also seemed necessary 
consequence fact light capable 
ether, must nature solid body, 
waves possible 
Thus physicists bound arrive theory 
ether, parts 
carry movements relatively one another except small 
movements correspond 
 
called theory 
found strong support experiment 
also fundamental importance special theory relativity, 
experiment one obliged infer 
ether take part movements 
bodies. also favoured theory 
ether. 
 
development theory along path opened 
Maxwell Lorentz gave development ideas concerning 
ether quite peculiar unexpected turn. Maxwell 
ether indeed still properties purely 
although much complicated kind mechanical 
properties tangible solid bodies. neither Maxwell 
succeeded mechanical model ether 
might furnish satisfactory mechanical interpretation 
laws field. laws clear 
simple, mechanical 
Almost theoretical physicists adapted 
situation which, standpoint mechanical 
particularly influenced 

whereas previously required conclusive theory 
content fundamental belong 
exclusively mechanics (e.g. 
gradually accustomed admitting electric 
magnetic force fundamental side side 
mechanics, without requiring mechanical interpretation them. 
Thus purely mechanical view nature gradually 
change led fundamental 
way escape sought reverse 
direction, principles mechanics 
especially confidence strict 
validity equations Newton's mechanics shaken 
rapid 
 
still us form theory 
matter appears bearer 
energy, mechanical also bearer 
electromagnetic Since fields also occur 
free ether also appears bearer electromagnetic 
ether appears functions 
ordinary matter. Within matter takes part motion matter 
empty space everywhere ether 
definitely assigned velocity throughout whole space. 
fundamental difference ether 
ponderable matter (which part 
 
theory suffered defect 
matter ether, one hand mechanical states, 
hand electrical states, stand conceivable 
relation other; also variance result 
important experiment velocity propagation 
light moving established experimental 
results. 
 
state things H. A. Lorentz entered upon 
scene. brought theory harmony experience means 
wonderful theoretical principles. achieved 
this, important advance theory since 
taking ether matter 
electromagnetic empty space, interior 
material bodies, ether, matter viewed 
exclusively seat electromagnetic According 
Lorentz elementary particles matter alone capable 
carrying electromagnetic activity entirely 
confined carrying electric Thus Lorentz succeeded 
electromagnetic equations 
free space. 
 
mechanical nature ether, may said 
it, somewhat spirit, 
mechanical property deprived H. A. 
may added whole change conception 
ether special theory relativity brought about, 
consisted taking away ether last mechanical 
namely, understood forthwith 

 
space-time theory special theory 
relativity Maxwell-Lorentz theory 
electromagnetic field. theory therefore conditions 
special theory relativity, viewed latter 
novel K system co-ordinates 
relatively ether rest, 
Maxwell-Lorentz equations valid primarily reference K. 
special theory relativity equations without 
change meaning also hold relation new system 
co-ordinates moving uniform translation relatively 
K. comes anxious must theory 
distinguish K system physically 
equivalent respects, assuming ether 
rest relatively K 
theoretical corresponding 
system experience, assume 
ether rest relatively K, motion relatively 
physical K seems 
logical indeed nevertheless 

 
next position possible take face 
state things appeared ether 
exist all. electromagnetic fields states 
bound independent 
anything else, exactly like 
ponderable matter. conception suggests 
readily as, according theory, electromagnetic 
like ponderable matter, brings impulse energy 
it, as, according special theory relativity, 
matter special forms distributed energy, 
ponderable mass losing appearing special 
form energy. 
 
careful reflection teaches us, however, special theory 
relativity compel us deny ether. may assume 
existence must give definite 
state motion it, i.e. must take 
last mechanical characteristic Lorentz still left it. 
shall see later point view, 
shall endeavour make intelligible somewhat 
justified results general 
theory relativity. 
 
Think waves surface water. describe two 
entirely different things. Either may observe 
surface forming boundary water air alters course 
time; help small 
observe position separate particles water 
alters course time. existence 
motion particles fundamental 
impossibility fact, nothing else whatever 
shape space occupied water 
time, ground assumption 
water consists movable could 
medium. 
 
something like electromagnetic field. may 
picture field consisting lines force.  
wish interpret lines force something 
material ordinary sense, tempted interpret 
processes motions lines force, 
separate line force course time. 
well known, however, way regarding electromagnetic 
field leads 
 
must say may supposed extended 
physical objects idea motion cannot applied. 
may thought consisting particles allow 
time. Minkowski's 
expressed every extended 
four-dimensional world regarded composed 
special theory relativity forbids us 
assume ether consist particles time, 
hypothesis ether conflict 
special theory relativity. must guard 
state motion ether. 
 
Certainly, standpoint special theory relativity, 
ether hypothesis appears first empty 
equations electromagnetic field occur, addition 
electric charge, 
field. career electromagnetic processes 
appears completely determined 
physical electromagnetic fields appear 
first seems 
postulate 
electromagnetic fields states medium. 
 
hand weighty argument 
favour ether deny ether ultimately 
assume empty space physical qualities whatever. 
fundamental facts mechanics view. 
mechanical behaviour system hovering freely 
empty space depends relative positions 
relative also state 
physically may taken characteristic 
system itself. order able look upon rotation 
system, least something real, Newton 
space. 
 
Since classes absolute space together real things, 
rotation relative absolute space also something 
Newton might less well called absolute space 
essential merely besides objects, another 
thing, must looked upon real, 
enable acceleration rotation looked upon something 

 
true tried avoid accept real something 
substitute mechanics 
mean acceleration reference masses 
universe place acceleration reference absolute 
space. inertial resistance opposed relative acceleration 
distant masses action modern 
physicist believe may accept action 
distance, comes back more, follows 
ether, serve medium effects 
conception ether led way 
thinking differs essentially ether conceived 
ether 
behaviour masses, also state 
them. 
 
idea finds full development ether general 
theory relativity. According theory 
qualities continuum space-time differ environment 
different points partly 
matter existing outside territory consideration.  
space-time reciprocal relations 
space time, or, perhaps, recognition fact 
physical relation neither 
us describe state ten functions (the 
gravitation has, think, finally disposed 
view space physically empty. 
conception ether acquired intelligible 
although content differs widely ether 
mechanical theory light.  ether general 
theory relativity medium _all_ 
mechanical helps determine 
mechanical (and events. 
 
new ether general theory 
relativity opposed ether Lorentz consists this, 
state former every place determined 
matter state ether neighbouring places, 
law form 
whereas state ether absence 
electromagnetic fields nothing outside itself, 
everywhere same. ether general theory 
relativity ether Lorentz 
substitute constants functions space describe 
former, disregarding causes condition state. 
Thus may also say, think, ether general theory 
relativity ether, 

 
part new ether play physics 
future yet clear. know determines 
relations space-time e.g. 
possibilities solid bodies well gravitational 
know whether essential share structure 
electrical elementary particles constituting matter. 
know whether proximity ponderable masses 
structure differs essentially 
whether geometry spaces extent 
assert reason equations 
gravitation must departure Euclidean 
relations, spaces order magnitude, exists 
positive mean matter small, matter 
universe. case universe must necessity spatially 
finite magnitude, magnitude determined 
value mean 
 
consider gravitational field electromagnetic field 
ether hypothesis, find remarkable 
difference two. space part 
space without gravitational confer upon 
space without cannot imagined 
all. existence gravitational field 
bound existence space. hand part 
space may well imagined without electromagnetic 
thus contrast gravitational field, electromagnetic 
field seems ether, formal 
nature electromagnetic field yet way determined 
gravitational ether. present state theory 
looks electromagnetic field, opposed 
gravitational field, rests upon entirely new formal 
though nature might well endowed gravitational 
ether fields quite another example, fields 
instead fields electromagnetic 

 
Since according present elementary particles 
matter also, nothing else 
electromagnetic field, present view universe 
presents two completely separated 
although connected namely, gravitational ether 
electromagnetic field, might also 
matter. 
 
course would great advance could succeed 
gravitational field electromagnetic field 
together one first time 
theoretical physics founded Maxwell would 
reach satisfactory conclusion. contrast ether 
matter would away, and, general theory relativity, 
whole physics would become complete system thought, 
like geometry, theory gravitation.  
exceedingly ingenious attempt direction made 
H. believe theory 
hold ground relation reality. Further, contemplating 
immediate future theoretical physics ought 
reject possibility facts 
theory may set field theory beyond cannot 
pass. 
 
may say according general theory 
relativity space endowed physical sense, 
therefore, exists ether. According general theory 
relativity space without ether space 
would propagation light, also possibility 
existence space time 
therefore space-time physical 
sense. ether may thought endowed 
quality characteristic ponderable consisting parts 
may time. idea motion may 
applied it. 
 
 
 
 
GEOMETRY EXPERIENCE 
 
expanded form Address 
January 
 
 
 
One reason mathematics special 
laws absolutely certain 
extent 
constant danger newly discovered facts. 
spite this, another department science 
would need laws mathematics 
referred objects mere objects 
reality. cannot occasion surprise different persons 
arrive logical conclusions already 
agreed upon fundamental laws well methods 
laws deduced another 
reason high mathematics, mathematics 
affords exact natural certain measure 
security, without mathematics could 
 
point presents ages agitated 
inquiring mathematics, 
product human thought independent experience, 
appropriate objects human reason, 
then, without experience, merely taking thought, able 
properties real things. 
 
opinion answer question is, briefly, far 
laws mathematics refer reality, 
far certain, refer reality. 
seems complete state things 
first became common property new departure mathematics 
known name mathematical logic 
progress achieved consists neatly 
separated objective 
according alone forms 
mathematics, concerned 
content associated 
 
Let us moment consider point view 
geometry, instance, two points space 
always passes one one straight line. 
interpreted older sense modern 

 
older one knows straight line 
is, point is. Whether knowledge springs 
ability human mind experience, 
two 
decide. leaves question based 
upon knowledge, mathematics, 
stated is, like self-evident, is, 
expression part _a 
 
modern treats 
words straight line, point, etc. 
take granted knowledge whatever, 
validity one 
stated above, taken purely formal sense, i.e. 
void content experience. 
free human mind. propositions geometry 
logical inferences (which taken 
sense matter geometry treats 
first defined book 
therefore 
 
view advocated modern mathematics 
elements, thus mystic 
formerly surrounded principles 
 
presentation principles thus makes also 
evident mathematics cannot anything 
objects real objects. axiomatic geometry words 
etc., stand empty 
gives substance 

 
Yet hand certain mathematics generally, 
particularly geometry, owes existence need 
felt learning something relations real things 
one another. word geometry, which, course, means 
proves this. 
possibilities disposition certain natural objects 
respect one another, namely, parts earth, 
etc. clear system 
axiomatic geometry alone cannot make assertions 
relations real objects kind, 
call practically-rigid bodies. able make 
geometry must merely character 
real objects experience empty 
axiomatic geometry. accomplish this, 
need add bodies 
respect possible bodies Euclidean 
geometry three dimensions. propositions Euclid contain 
affirmations relations practically-rigid bodies. 
 
Geometry thus completed evidently natural may 
fact regard ancient branch affirmations 
rest essentially experience, logical 
inferences only. call completed geometry 
shall distinguish follows 
axiomatic question whether practical geometry 
universe Euclidean clear meaning, 
answer furnished experience. measurement 
physics practical geometry sense, 
call help 
law experience light propagated straight line, 
indeed straight line sense practical geometry. 
 
attach special importance view geometry 
set forth, without unable 
theory relativity. Without following 
reflection would system reference 
rotating relatively system, laws disposition 
rigid bodies correspond rules Euclidean geometry 
account Lorentz thus admit 
systems must abandon Euclidean geometry. decisive step 
general equations would certainly 
taken interpretation served 
deny relation body axiomatic 
Euclidean geometry practically-rigid body reality, 
readily arrive following view, entertained 
profound H. geometry 
distinguished imaginable axiomatic 
since axiomatic geometry contains 
assertions reality 
combination physical laws, possible 
may nature retain 
Euclidean geometry. theory 
experience manifest themselves, rather decide change 
physical laws change axiomatic Euclidean geometry. 
deny relation practically-rigid body geometry, 
shall indeed easily free convention 
Euclidean geometry retained 
practically-rigid body body 
suggests 
Simply inspection 
real solid bodies nature geometrical 
is, possibilities relative 
depend upon external forces, etc. Thus original, 
immediate relation geometry physical reality appears 
destroyed, feel toward following general 
view, Geometry 
nothing relations real things, 
geometry together physical laws so. 
Using may say sum + subject 
control experience. Thus may chosen 
also parts laws 
necessary avoid choose remainder 
whole together accord 
experience. way, axiomatic geometry part 
natural law given appear 

 
specie opinion, right. idea 
measuring-rod idea clock 
theory relativity find exact correspondence 
real world. also clear solid body 
clock edifice physics play part 
elements, may 
play independent part theoretical 
conviction present stage development theoretical 
physics ideas must still employed independent 
still far possessing certain knowledge 
theoretical principles able give exact theoretical 
constructions solid bodies 
 
Further, objection really rigid bodies 
nature, therefore properties rigid 
bodies apply physical objection 
means radical might appear hasty examination. 
difficult task determine physical state 
measuring-rod accurately behaviour relatively 
shall sufficiently free allow 
substituted body. 
kind statements rigid bodies must 
 
practical geometry based upon principle accessible 
experience, try 
call enclosed two marked upon 
practically-rigid body, imagine two practically-rigid 
bodies, tract marked it. two tracts 
said one boundaries one tract 
brought permanently boundaries 
other. assume that: 
 
two tracts found equal anywhere, 
equal always everywhere. 
 
practical geometry also nearest 
practical geometry 
general theory relativity, rest upon 
experimental reasons warrant assumption mention 
one. propagation light empty space 
namely, appropriate path light, 
interval local time, Thence follows 
assumption tracts must also hold good 
theory relativity. Consequently may 
formulated two ideal clocks going 
rate time place immediate proximity 
always go rate, matter 
compared one 
law valid real proper 
separate element would 
exact agreement experience existence 
sharp spectral lines convincing experimental proof 
principle practical geometry. ultimate 
foundation fact enables us speak meaning 
sense word, four-dimensional 
continuum 
 
question whether structure continuum 
accordance general otherwise, 
is, according view properly 
speaking physical question must answered experience, 
question mere convention selected practical 
geometry right thing laws 
disposition practically-rigid bodies 
bodies geometry 
increases proportion part space-time 
consideration 
 
true proposed physical interpretation geometry 
applied immediately spaces 
order nevertheless, even questions 
constitution elementary part 
importance. even question describing 
electrical elementary particles constituting matter, attempt 
may still made ascribe physical importance ideas 
fields physically defined purpose 
describing geometrical behaviour bodies large 
compared Success alone decide 
justification attempt, physical reality 
fundamental principles geometry outside 
domain physical might possibly turn 
better warrant 
idea temperature parts body order 

 
appears less extend ideas practical 
geometry spaces order might, course, 
objected construction composed solid rods 
ideal proportion extent 
becomes hardly possible, think, assign 
fundamental significance objection. Therefore question 
whether universe spatially finite seems 
decidedly pregnant question sense practical geometry. 
even consider impossible question 
answered long Let us call mind 
general theory relativity teaches offers 
two 
 
1. universe spatially infinite. 
average density matter universal space, concentrated 
stars, i.e. ratio total mass 
stars magnitude space scattered 
indefinitely value spaces taken 
consideration constantly greater 
 
2. universe spatially must so, 
mean density ponderable matter universal space differing 
smaller mean greater volume 
universal space. 
 
must fail mention theoretical argument 
favour hypothesis finite universe. general theory 
relativity teaches inertia given body greater 
ponderable masses proximity it; thus seems 
natural reduce total effect inertia body 
action reaction bodies universe, 
indeed, ever since Newton's time, gravity completely 
reduced action reaction bodies.  equations 
general theory relativity deduced 
total reduction inertia reciprocal action 
required E. possible universe 
spatially 
 
many physicists argument makes impression. 
Experience alone finally decide two possibilities 
nature. experience furnish first 
might seem possible determine mean density matter 
observation part universe accessible 
hope distribution visible 
stars extremely account may venture 
set mean density universe 
equal, let us say, mean density Way. 
case, however great space examined may be, could feel 
convinced stars beyond space. 
seems impossible estimate mean another 
road, seems practicable, although also presents 
great difficulties. inquire shown 
consequences general theory relativity 
accessible experience, compared consequences 
Newtonian theory, first find 
shows close proximity 
confirmed case planet universe 
spatially finite second Newtonian 
theory, which, language Newtonian theory, may 
expressed gravitational field nature 
ponderable masses, also 
negative distributed uniformly throughout 
space. Since would 
small, could make presence felt systems 
great extent. 
 
Assuming know, let us say, statistical distribution 
stars Way, well masses, 
Newton's law gravitational field mean 
velocities stars must have, Way 
mutual attraction stars, 
maintain actual extent. actual velocities stars, 
can, course, smaller calculated 
proof actual 
great distances smaller Newton's law. 
could proved indirectly universe 
would even possible estimate 
 
picture three-dimensional universe 
yet 
 
usual answer question "No," right 
answer. purpose following remarks show 
answer "Yes." want show without extraordinary 
difficulty illustrate theory finite universe 
means mental which, practice, shall soon 
grow 
 
First all, observation nature. 
theory incapable directly 
merely system 
serve purpose bringing real imaginary 
experiences connection mind. 
theory, bring home one's mind, therefore means give 
representation abundance experiences 
theory supplies present case 
ask represent relation solid 
bodies respect reciprocal disposition 
corresponds theory finite universe. really 
nothing new say this; 
questions addressed prove requirements 
knowledge matters yet completely 
satisfied. 
 
So, initiated please pardon me, part shall 
bring forward long 
 
wish express say space 
Nothing might lay number whatever bodies 
equal side side without ever filling space. Suppose 
provided great many wooden 
accordance Euclidean geometry place 
above, behind one another fill part space 
construction would never 
could go adding without ever finding 
room. wish express 
say space infinite. would better say space 
infinite relation practically-rigid bodies, assuming 
laws disposition bodies given Euclidean 
geometry. 
 
Another example infinite continuum plane. plane 
surface may lay squares side 
square side another square adjacent it. construction 
never always go laying laws 
disposition correspond plane figures Euclidean 
geometry. plane therefore infinite relation 
Accordingly say plane infinite 
continuum two space infinite continuum 
three dimensions. meant number 
think may assume known. 
 
take example two-dimensional continuum 
imagine surface large globe 
quantity small paper place 
one discs anywhere surface move 
disc about, anywhere like, surface globe, 
come upon limit boundary anywhere 
Therefore say spherical surface globe 
continuum. Moreover, spherical surface finite 
continuum. stick paper discs globe, 
disc another, surface globe finally 
become full room another simply 
means spherical surface globe finite relation 
paper Further, spherical surface non-Euclidean 
continuum two say, laws disposition 
rigid figures lying agree 
Euclidean plane. shown following way. Place 
paper disc spherical surface, around circle 
place six surrounded turn 
six on. construction made plane 
surface, disposition 
six discs touching every disc except lie outside. 
 
Discs 
 
spherical surface construction also seems promise 
success smaller radius disc 
proportion sphere, promising 
construction becomes patent 
disposition discs manner without 
possible, possible Euclidean 
geometry plane surface. way creatures 
cannot leave spherical surface, cannot even 
spherical surface three-dimensional space, might discover, 
merely two-dimensional 
spherical space. 
 
latest results theory relativity probable 
three-dimensional space also 
is, laws disposition rigid bodies 
given Euclidean geometry, spherical 
geometry, consider parts space sufficiently 
great. place imagination 
imagine thing," indignantly. "It 
said, cannot thought. represent spherical 
surface well enough, nothing analogous three 
 
circle sphere 
 
must try mind, patient 
reader see means particularly difficult 
task. purpose first give attention 
geometry two-dimensional spherical adjoining 
figure let spherical surface, touched _S_ 
which, facility shown drawing 
bounded surface. Let disc spherical surface.  
let us imagine point spherical surface, 
opposite luminous point, throwing 
shadow _L'_ disc upon plane Every point 
sphere shadow plane. disc sphere 
shadow _L'_ plane _E_ also disc 
almost exactly  
moves spherical surface away _S_ disc 
shadow _L'_ plane also moves away _S_ plane 
growing disc approaches 
luminous point shadow moves becomes 
infinitely great. 
 
put question, laws disposition 
disc-shadows _L'_ plane Evidently exactly 
laws disposition discs spherical 
surface. original figure corresponding 
shadow figure two discs 
_E_ also plane agrees 
call disc-shadows 
rigid spherical geometry holds good plane _E_ 
respect rigid Moreover, plane finite 
respect since finite number 
find room plane. 
 
point somebody say, "That disc-shadows 
_not_ rigid move rule 
plane _E_ convince constantly 
increase size move away _S_ plane towards 
rule behave 
plane _E_ way disc-shadows would 
impossible show increase size 
move away assertion would longer 
meaning whatever. fact objective assertion 
made disc-shadows this, related 
exactly way rigid discs spherical 
surface sense Euclidean geometry. 
 
must carefully bear mind statement growth 
move away _S_ towards 
objective meaning, long unable 
employ Euclidean rigid bodies moved plane 
_E_ purpose size 
respect laws disposition point 
_S_ special privileges plane 
spherical surface. 
 
representation given spherical geometry 
plane important us, readily allows 
transferred three-dimensional case. 
 
Let us imagine point _S_ space, great number 
small brought 
one another. spheres rigid sense 
Euclidean radius increase (in sense 
Euclidean moved away _S_ towards 
increase take place exact accordance 
law applies increase 
disc-shadows _L'_ plane. 
 
gained vivid mental geometrical 
behaviour _L'_ let us assume space 
rigid bodies sense Euclidean geometry, 
bodies behaviour _L'_ shall 
vivid representation three-dimensional spherical space, 
or, rather three-dimensional spherical geometry. spheres 
must called increase size 
depart _S_ detected measuring 
measuring-rods, case disc-shadows 
measurement behave way 
Space say, 
spherical possible environment 
space because, consequence 
finite number find room 
space. 
 
* intelligible without 
two-dimensional case disc 
surface 
 
way, using practice thinking 
Euclidean geometry gives us, acquired 
mental picture spherical geometry. may without difficulty 
depth ideas carrying special 
imaginary would difficult represent 
case called geometry analogous manner. 
aim to-day show human faculty 
means bound non-Euclidean 
geometry. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
State Union Address 
Abraham Lincoln 
December 3, 1861 
 
Fellow-Citizens Senate House Representatives: 
 
midst unprecedented political troubles cause great 
gratitude God unusual good health abundant 
 
surprised learn peculiar exigencies 
times intercourse foreign nations attended 
profound chiefly turning upon domestic affairs. 
 
disloyal portion American people whole year 
engaged attempt divide destroy Union. nation 
domestic division exposed 
abroad, one party, both, sure sooner later invoke 
foreign 
 
Nations thus tempted interfere always able resist 
counsels seeming expediency ungenerous ambition, although 
measures adopted influences seldom fail unfortunate 
injurious adopting them. 
 
disloyal citizens United States offered ruin 
country return aid comfort 
abroad received less patronage encouragement 
probably expected. suppose, insurgents 
seemed assume, foreign nations case, discarding 
moral, social, treaty would act solely 
speedy restoration commerce, including especially 
acquisition cotton, nations appear yet seen 
way object directly clearly 
destruction preservation Union. could 
dare believe foreign nations actuated higher 
principle this, quite sure sound argument could made 
show reach aim readily easily 
aiding crush rebellion giving encouragement it. 
 
principal lever relied insurgents exciting foreign 
nations hostility us, already 
embarrassment commerce. nations, however, saw 
first Union made well foreign 
domestic commerce. scarcely failed perceive 
effort disunion produces existing difficulty, one 
strong nation promises durable peace 
valuable, reliable commerce nation broken 
hostile 
 
purpose review discussions foreign states, 
because, whatever might wishes integrity 
country Government mainly depend 
upon them, patriotism, intelligence 
American people. correspondence itself, usual 
reservations, herewith 
 
venture hope appear practiced prudence 
toward foreign powers, causes irritation 
firmness maintaining rights 
 
Since, however, apparent here, every state, 
foreign dangers necessarily attend domestic difficulties, recommend 
adequate ample measures adopted maintaining public 
every side. general recommendation 
provision defending line readily occurs mind, 
also connection ask attention Congress great 
rivers. believed 
arms harbor navigation improvements, 
points upon these, would great importance 
national defense ask attention views 
Secretary War, expressed report, upon general 
subject.  deem importance loyal regions east 
Tennessee western North Carolina connected Kentucky 
faithful parts Union railroad. therefore 
military measure, Congress provide 
construction road speedily possible. Kentucky doubt 
legislature make judicious 
selection line. northern must connect 
existing railroad, whether route shall 
Cumberland Tennessee 
line, direction Knoxville, still different line, 
easily Kentucky General Government 
work completed short time, 
done vast present also 
valuable permanent worth cost future. 
 
designed chiefly interests commerce, 
grave political importance, negotiated, 
submitted Senate consideration. 
 
Although failed induce commercial powers 
adopt desirable maritime war, 
removed way humane except 
merely temporary accidental 
 
invite attention correspondence Britannic 
Majesty's minister accredited Government Secretary 
State relative detention British ship June 
last United States steamer Massachusetts supposed breach 
blockade. detention occasioned obvious 
misapprehension facts, justice requires 
commit belligerent act strict right sanctioned 
public law, recommend appropriation made satisfy 
reasonable demand owners vessel 
 
repeat recommendation annual message 
Congress December last regard disposition surplus 
probably remain satisfying claims American 
citizens China, pursuant commissioners 
act 3d March, 1859. If, however, 
deemed advisable carry recommendation effect, would 
suggest authority given 
proceeds surplus referred to, good view 
satisfaction claims citizens 
China unlikely arise hereafter course 
extensive trade Empire. 
 
act 5th August last Congress authorized President 
instruct commanders suitable vessels defend 
capture authority exercised 
single instance only. effectual protection 
extensive valuable commerce Eastern 
seems would also advisable authorize commanders 
vessels may make 
United States vessels consular courts 
established law Eastern countries cases 
event objected local authorities. 
 
good reason exists longer withholding 
recognition independence sovereignty 
Liberia, unable discern it. however, inaugurate 
novel policy regard without approbation Congress, 
submit consideration expediency appropriation 
maintaining charge near new States. 
admit doubt important commercial advantages might 
secured favorable treaties them. 
 
operations Treasury period elapsed 
since adjournment conducted signal success. 
patriotism people placed disposal Government 
large means demanded public Much national 
loan taken citizens industrial classes, whose 
confidence country's faith zeal country's 
deliverance present peril induced contribute 
support Government whole limited 
fact peculiar obligations economy energy 
action. 
 
revenue sources, including loans, financial year 
ending 30th June, 1861, 
expenditures period, including payments account 
public debt, leaving balance Treasury 
1st July first quarter 
financial year ending 30th September, 1861, receipts 
sources, including balance 1st July, 
expenses leaving balance 
1st October, 1861, 
 
Estimates remaining three quarters year 
financial year 1863, together views ways means 
meeting demands contemplated them, submitted Congress 
Secretary Treasury. gratifying know 
expenditures made necessary rebellion beyond 
resources loyal people, believe patriotism 
thus far sustained Government continue sustain 
till peace union shall bless land. 
 
respectfully refer report Secretary War 
information respecting strength Army 
recommendations view increase efficiency 
well-being various branches service intrusted 
care. gratifying know patriotism people 
proved equal occasion, number troops tendered 
greatly force Congress authorized call 
field. 
 
refer pleasure portions report make 
allusion degree discipline already attained 
troops excellent sanitary condition entire Army. 
 
recommendation Secretary organization militia 
upon uniform basis subject vital importance future 
safety country, serious attention 
Congress. 
 
large addition Regular Army, connection 
considerably diminished number 
officers, gives peculiar importance recommendation 
increasing corps greatest capacity Military 

 
mere presume, Congress failed provide chaplains 
occupied volunteers. subject brought 
notice, induced draw form letter, one copy 
which, properly delivered persons, 
respectively named stated 
containing also form letter marked A, herewith 
transmitted. 
 
gentlemen, understand, entered upon duties designated 
times respectively stated labored 
faithfully therein ever since. therefore recommend 
compensated rate chaplains Army. 
suggest general provision made chaplains serve 
well regiments. 
 
report Secretary Navy presents detail 
operations branch service, activity energy 
characterized administration, results measures 
increase efficiency power. 
construction purchase, may almost said navy 
created brought service since difficulties commenced. 
 
Besides blockading extensive squadrons larger ever 
assembled flag put performed 
deeds increased naval 
 
would invite special attention recommendation Secretary 
perfect organization Navy introducing additional 
service. 
 
present organization 
suggestions submitted Department will, believed, 
adopted, difficulties alluded to, promote harmony, 
increase efficiency Navy. 
 
three vacancies bench Supreme 
Daniel McLean one resignation 
Justice Campbell. far forborne making nominations fill 
vacancies reasons state. Two outgoing 
judges resided within States overrun 
successors appointed localities could 
serve upon many competent men 
probably would take personal hazard accepting even 
here, upon Supreme unwilling throw 
appointments thus justice 
South return although may remark transfer 
North one heretofore South would not, 
reference territory population, 
 
long brilliant judicial career Judge McLean 
circuit grew empire altogether large one judge 
give courts therein nominal 
population 1860. 
 
Besides this, country generally present judicial 
system. uniformity intended, system requires 
States shall accommodated circuit courts, attended 
Supreme judges, while, fact, Wisconsin, Minnesota, Iowa, Kansas, 
Florida, Texas, California, never courts. 
well without change system, 
adding judges Supreme Court, enough 
parts country circuit courts, would create court 
altogether numerous judicial body sort. evil, 
one, increase new States come Union. Circuit 
courts useful useful, State 
denied them; useful, State them. Let 
provided abolished all. 
 
Three modifications occur me, either which, think, would 
improvement upon present system. Let Supreme Court 
convenient number every then, first, let whole country 
divided convenient size, Supreme judges serve 
number corresponding number, independent 
circuit judges provided or, secondly, let 
Supreme judges relieved circuit duties circuit judges 
provided or, thirdly, dispense circuit 
courts leaving judicial functions wholly 
district courts independent Supreme Court. 
 
respectfully recommend consideration Congress present 
condition statute laws, hope Congress able 
find easy remedy many evils 
constantly embarrass engaged practical administration 
them. Since organization Government Congress enacted 
acts joint resolutions, fill 
closely printed pages scattered many Many 
acts drawn haste without sufficient caution, 
provisions often obscure conflict 
other, least doubtful render difficult 
even persons ascertain precisely 
statute law really is. 
 
seems important statute laws made 
plain intelligible possible, reduced small 
may consist precision 
Legislature language. well done 
would, think, greatly facilitate labors whose duty 
assist administration laws, would lasting 
benefit people, placing accessible 
intelligible form laws deeply concern interests 
duties. 
 
informed whose opinions respect acts 
Congress force permanent general nature might 
revised embraced one volume (or 
two ordinary convenient respectfully 
recommend Congress consider subject, suggestion 
approved plan wisdom shall seem 
proper end proposed. 
 
One unavoidable consequences present insurrection 
entire suppression many places ordinary means 
administering civil justice officers forms 
existing law. case, whole part, 
insurgent States; armies advance upon take possession 
parts States practical evil becomes apparent. 
courts officers citizens States may 
apply enforcement lawful claims citizens 
insurgent States, vast amount debt constituting 
estimated high due 
large part insurgents open rebellion loyal citizens 
even making great sacrifices discharge patriotic 
duty support Government. 
 
circumstances establish 
military power courts administer summary justice cases 
thus far declined it, doubt 
end collection right 
itself, unwilling go beyond pressure 
necessity unusual exercise power. powers Congress, 
suppose, equal occasion, therefore refer 
whole matter Congress, hope plan may devised 
administration justice parts insurgent 
States Territories may control Government, 
whether voluntary return allegiance order power 
this, however, permanent institution, 
temporary cease soon ordinary courts 
peace. 
 
important convenient means provided, 
possible, adjustment claims Government, 
especially view increased number reason war. 
much duty Government render prompt justice 
favor citizens administer 
private individuals. investigation adjudication claims 
nature belong judicial department. Besides, apparent 
attention Congress usually engaged 
time come great national questions. intended 
organization Court Claims mainly remove branch 
business halls court proved 
effective valuable means investigation, great degree 
fails effect object creation want power make 
judgments 
 
Fully aware say danger, subject, 
commend careful consideration whether power making 
judgments final may properly given court, 
right appeal questions law Supreme Court, 
provisions experience may shown necessary. 
 
ask attention report Postmaster-General, following 
summary statement condition 
 
revenue sources fiscal year ending June 30, 
1861, including annual permanent appropriation 
transportation "free mail 2 
per cent less revenue 1860. 
 
expenditures showing decrease 8 
per cent compared previous year leaving 
excess expenditure revenue last fiscal year 

 
gross revenue year ending June 30, 1863, estimated 
increase 4 per cent 1861, making 
added Department carrying free matter, 
making 
 
total expenditures 1863 estimated leaving 
estimated deficiency supplied Treasury 
addition permanent 
 
present insurrection shows, think, extension 
District across Potomac River time establishing 
capital eminently wise, consequently 
portion lies within State 
Virginia unwise dangerous. submit consideration 
expediency part District restoration 
original boundaries thereof State 
Virginia. 
 
report Secretary Interior, accompanying 
documents, exhibits condition several branches public 
business pertaining Department. influences 
insurrection specially felt operations 
Patent General Land Offices. cash receipts sales 
public lands past year expenses 
land system sales entirely suspended 
Southern States, business 
country large numbers men labor 
military service settlements new States 
Territories 
 
receipts Patent Office declined nine months 
rendering large reduction force employed necessary 
make 
 
demands upon Pension Office largely increased 
insurrection. Numerous applications pensions, based upon 
casualties existing war, already made. reason 
believe many upon pension rolls receipt 
bounty Government ranks insurgent army 
giving aid Secretary Interior 
directed suspension payment pensions persons 
upon proof recommend Congress authorize 
officer cause names persons stricken 
pension 
 
relations Government Indian tribes 
greatly disturbed insurrection, especially southern 
New Mexico. Indian country south 
Kansas possession insurgents Texas Arkansas. 
agents United States appointed since 4th March 
unable reach 
office time 
insurrectionary cause, assume exercise powers agents 
virtue commissions stated 
public press portion Indians organized 
military force attached army insurgents. 
Although Government official information upon subject, 
letters written Commissioner Indian Affairs 
several prominent giving assurance loyalty 
United States expressing wish presence Federal troops 
protect them. believed upon 
country Federal forces Indians readily cease 
hostile demonstrations resume former relations 
Government. 
 
Agriculture, largest interest nation, 
department only, assigned 
Government. fortunate great interest 
independent nature demanded 
Government, respectfully ask Congress consider whether 
something given voluntarily general advantage. 
 
Annual reports exhibiting condition agriculture, commerce, 
manufactures would present fund information great practical 
value country. make suggestion 
venture opinion agricultural statistical bureau might 
profitably organized. 
 
execution laws suppression African slave 
trade confided Department Interior. 
subject efforts made 
suppression traffic recently attended 
unusual success. Five vessels fitted slave trade 
seized Two vessels engaged trade 
one person vessel convicted 
subjected penalty fine one 
taken cargo board vessel, convicted 
highest grade offense laws, punishment 
death. 
 
Territories Colorado, Nevada, created last 
Congress, organized, civil administration 
inaugurated therein especially gratifying 
considered treason found existing 
new countries Federal officers arrived there. 
 
abundant natural resources Territories, security 
protection afforded organized government, doubtless invite 
large peace shall restore business 
country accustomed submit resolutions 
legislature Colorado, evidence patriotic spirit 
people Territory. far authority United States 
upheld Territories, hoped 
future. commend interests defense enlightened 
generous care Congress. 
 
recommend favorable consideration Congress interests 
District Columbia. insurrection cause much 
suffering sacrifice inhabitants, 
representative Congress body overlook 
claims upon Government. 
 
late session joint resolution adopted authorizing 
President take measures proper representation 
industrial interests United States exhibition 
industry nations London year 1862. 
regret say unable give personal attention 
subject interesting 
intimately connected material prosperity world. 
Secretaries State Interior plan system 
devised partly matured, laid you. 
 
virtue act Congress entitled "An act 
confiscate property used insurrectionary purposes," approved August 
6, 1861, legal claims certain persons labor service 
certain persons become numbers 
latter thus liberated already dependent United States 
must provided way. Besides this, impossible 
States pass similar enactments 
benefit respectively, operation persons 
class thrown upon case recommend 
Congress provide accepting persons States, 
according mode pro direct 
upon plan agreed States 
persons, acceptance General 
Government, deemed free, event steps 
taken colonizing classes (or one first mentioned 
shall brought place places 
climate congenial them. might well consider, too, whether 
free colored people already United States could not, far 
individuals may desire, included 
 
carry plan colonization may involve acquiring 
territory, also appropriation money beyond 
expended territorial practiced 
acquisition territory nearly sixty years, question 
constitutional power longer open one us. 
power questioned first Mr. Jefferson, who, however, 
purchase Louisiana, yielded plea great 
expediency. said object acquiring 
territory furnish homes white men, measure effects 
object, emigration colored men leaves additional room 
white men remaining coming here. Mr. Jefferson, however, placed 
importance Louisiana political commercial 
grounds providing room 
 
whole proposition, including appropriation money 
acquisition territory, expediency amount 
absolute without Government 

 
war considering policy adopted 
suppressing insurrection anxious careful 
inevitable conflict purpose shall 
violent revolutionary struggle. therefore 
every case thought proper keep integrity Union 
prominent primary object contest leaving 
questions vital military importance 
deliberate action Legislature. 
 
exercise best discretion adhered blockade 
ports held insurgents, instead putting force 
proclamation law Congress enacted late session 
closing 
 
also, obeying well obligations 
law, instead adhered act Congress 
confiscate property used insurrectionary purposes. new law 
upon subject shall proposed, propriety duly 
considered. Union must preserved, hence indispensable 
means must haste determine 
radical extreme measures, may reach loyal well 
indispensable. 
 
inaugural address beginning Administration 
message Congress late special session mainly 
devoted domestic controversy insurrection 
consequent war Nothing occurs add 
principles general purposes stated expressed 

 
last ray hope preserving Union peaceably 
assault upon Fort Sumter, general review occurred 
since may painfully uncertain 
much better defined distinct now, progress events 
plainly right direction. insurgents confidently claimed 
strong support north Mason line, friends 
Union free apprehension point. This, however, 
soon settled right side. South line 
noble little led right first. Maryland made 
seem Union. soldiers bridges 
railroads torn within limits, many days 
one time without ability bring single regiment 
soil capital. bridges railroads repaired 
open Government; already gives seven regiments cause 
Union, none enemy; people, regular 
election, sustained Union larger majority larger 
aggregate vote ever gave candidate 
question. Kentucky, too, time doubt, decidedly and, 
think, ranged side Union. Missouri 
comparatively quiet, and, believe, overrun 
three States Maryland, Kentucky, 
Missouri, neither would promise single soldier first, 
aggregate less field 
Union, citizens certainly third 
number, doubtful doubtful existence, 
arms us. somewhat bloody struggle months, winter 
Union people western Virginia, leaving masters 
country. 
 
insurgent force months narrow 
region constituting counties 
known Eastern Virginia, together 
parts Maryland, laid arms, people 
renewed allegiance accepted protection old 
flag. leaves armed north Potomac east 

 
Also obtained footing isolated points 
southern coast Port Royal, Island 
Ship likewise general accounts popular 
movements behalf Union North Carolina Tennessee. 
 
things demonstrate cause Union advancing 
steadily certainly 
 
Since last adjournment Lieutenant-General Scott retired 
head Army. long life nation 
yet calling mind 
served country, time far back 
history, living born, thenceforward 
think still 
therefore, consideration mark recognition 
due him, grateful people. 
 
General Scott came Executive duty 
appointing General Chief Army. 
fortunate circumstance neither council country there, 
far know, difference opinion proper person 
retiring chief repeatedly expressed judgment 
favor General McClellan position, nation 
seemed give unanimous General 
McClellan therefore considerable degree selection 
country well Executive, hence better reason 
hope given confidence cordial support thus 
fair promised, without full 
efficiency serve country. 
 
said one bad general better two good ones, 
saying true taken mean army better 
directed single mind, though inferior, two superior ones 
variance other. 
 
true joint operations wherein engaged 
none common end view differ choice 
means. storm sea one board wish ship 
yet go together many 
direct single mind allowed control. 
 
continues develop insurrection 
exclusively, war upon first principle popular 
rights people. Conclusive evidence found 
grave maturely considered public documents, well 
general tone insurgents. documents find 
existing right suffrage denial 
people right selection public officers 
except legislative boldly labored arguments 
prove large control people government source 
political evil. sometimes hinted 
possible refuge power people. 
 
present position could scarcely justified omit 
raising warning voice approach returning despotism. 
 
needed fitting general argument 
made favor popular institutions, one point, 
others, ask brief 
attention. effort place capital equal footing with, 
above, labor structure government. assumed 
labor available connection capital; nobody labors 
unless somebody else, owning capital, somehow use induces 
labor. assumed, next considered whether best 
capital shall hire laborers, thus induce work 
consent, buy drive without consent. 
proceeded far, naturally concluded laborers 
either hired laborers call slaves. further, 
assumed whoever hired laborer fixed condition 
life. 
 
relation capital labor assumed, 
thing free man fixed life 
condition hired assumptions false, 
inferences groundless. 
 
Labor prior independent capital. Capital fruit 
labor, could never existed labor first existed. 
Labor superior capital, deserves much higher 
consideration. Capital rights, worthy 
protection rights. denied is, 
probably always be, relation labor capital producing 
mutual error assuming whole labor 
community exists within relation. men capital, 
avoid labor themselves, capital hire buy another 
labor them. large majority belong neither 
work others others working them. 
Southern States majority whole people 
colors neither slaves masters, Northern large 
majority neither Men, 
sons, 
houses, shops, taking whole product themselves, 
asking favors capital one hand hired laborers 
slaves other. forgotten considerable number 
persons mingle labor capital; is, labor 
hands also buy hire others labor them; 
mixed distinct class. principle stated 
disturbed existence mixed class. 
 
Again, already said, necessity 
thing free hired laborer fixed condition life. 
Many independent men everywhere States years back 
lives hired laborers. prudent, penniless beginner 
world labors wages saves surplus buy tools 
land himself, labors account another while, 
length another new beginner help him. 
generous prosperous system way all, gives hope 
all, consequent energy progress improvement condition 
all. men living worthy trusted toil 
none less inclined take touch aught 
honestly Let beware surrendering political 
power already possess, surrendered surely 
used close door advancement 
fix new burdens upon till liberty shall 
lost. 
 
first taking national census last seventy 
years, find population end period eight times 
great beginning. increase things 
men deem desirable even thus one 
view popular principle, applied Government 
machinery, States Union, produced given time, 
also firmly maintained promises future. 
already among us Union preserved live 
see contain struggle to-day altogether 
vast future also. reliance Providence 
firm earnest, let us proceed great task 
events devolved upon us. 
 
*** 
 
State Union Address 
Abraham Lincoln 
December 1, 1862 
 
Fellow-Citizens Senate House Representatives: 
 
Since last annual assembling another year health 
harvests passed, pleased Almighty bless 
us return peace, press on, guided best 
light gives us, trusting good time wise way 
yet well. 
 
correspondence touching foreign affairs taken place 
last year herewith submitted, compliance 
request effect made House Representatives near 
close last session Congress. condition 
relations nations less gratifying usually 
former certainly satisfactory nation 
distracted might reasonably 
month June last grounds expect 
maritime powers beginning domestic difficulties 
think, recognized insurgents 
belligerent would soon position, proved 
less injurious country. temporary 
afterwards national arms, 
exaggerated disloyal citizens abroad, hitherto delayed 
act simple justice. 
 
civil war, radically changed moment 
habits American people, necessarily 
disturbed social condition affected deeply prosperity 
nations carried commerce 
steadily increasing throughout period half century. 
time excited political apprehensions 
produced profound agitation throughout civilized world. 
unusual agitation forborne taking part controversy 
foreign states parties states. 
attempted acknowledged revolution. 
left every nation exclusive conduct management 
affairs. struggle been, course, contemplated 
foreign nations reference less merits 
supposed often exaggerated effects consequences resulting 
nations themselves. Nevertheless, complaint part 
Government, even just, would certainly treaty 
Great Britain suppression slave trade put 
operation good prospect complete success. 
occasion special pleasure acknowledge execution 
part Majesty's Government marked jealous 
respect authority United States rights 
moral loyal citizens. 
 
convention Hanover abolition dues 
carried full effect act Congress 
purpose. blockade miles could established 
enforced season great commercial activity like 
present without committing occasional mistakes 
injuries upon foreign nations subjects. civil 
war occurring country, foreigners reside carry trade 
treaty stipulations necessarily fruitful complaints 
violation neutral rights. tend excite 
possibly produce mutual 
nations common interest preserving peace 
clear cases far possible 
heard complaints presented friendly 
powers. still, however, large augmenting number 
doubtful cases upon Government unable agree 
governments whose protection demanded are, 
moreover, many cases United States citizens 
suffer wrongs naval military authorities foreign nations 
governments states prepared 
proposed foreign states thus interested 
mutual conventions examine adjust 
proposition made especially Great Britain, France, 
Spain, case kindly received, 
yet formally adopted. 
 
deem duty recommend appropriation behalf owners 
Admiral P. vessel May, 
1861, prevented commander blockading force Charleston 
leaving port cargo, notwithstanding similar privilege 
shortly granted English directed 
Secretary State cause papers case 
communicated proper 
 
Applications made many free Americans African 
descent favor view colonization 
contemplated recent acts Congress. parties, home 
interested motives, others upon patriotic 
considerations, still others influenced 
suggested similar measures, while, hand, 
several Spanish American protested 
sending colonies respective territories. 
circumstances declined move colony state 
without first obtaining consent government, 
agreement part receive protect 
rights time offered several 
States situated within colonies there, 
them, subject advice consent Senate, 
favor voluntary emigration persons class 
respective territories, upon conditions shall equal, just, 
yet countries 
colonists African descent could go certainty 
received adopted regret say persons 
contemplating colonization seem willing 
countries others, willing think interest 
believe, however, opinion among respect 
ere long augmented 
considerable countries United States. 
 
new commercial treaty United States 
carried execution. 
 
commercial consular treaty negotiated, subject 
consent, Liberia, similar negotiation 
pending Republic considerable improvement 
national commerce expected result measures. 
relations Great Britain, France, Spain, Russia, 

European States remain favorable relations also 
continue maintained China, 
 
last year change previous 
relations independent States continent, 
friendly sentiments heretofore existed believed 
entertained whose safety progress 
intimately connected own. statement especially applies 
Mexico, Nicaragua, Costa Peru, 
commission convention Republic New Granada closed 
session without passed upon claims 
submitted it. proposition pending revive 
convention, may able complete justice. joint 
commission United States Republic Costa 
completed labors submitted report. favored 
project connecting United States Europe Atlantic 
telegraph, similar project extend telegraph San 
connect Pacific telegraph line 
extended across Russian Empire. Territories United 
States, unimportant exceptions remained 
civil war; exhibiting evidence prosperity 
justifies expectation soon condition 
organized States constitutionally admitted 
Federal Union. 
 
immense mineral resources Territories ought 
developed rapidly possible. Every step direction would 
tendency improve revenues Government 
burdens people. worthy serious consideration 
whether extraordinary measures promote end 
adopted. means suggests likely effective 
scientific mineral regions Territories 
view publication results home foreign 
fail 
 
condition finances claim 
consideration. vast expenditures incident military naval 
operations required suppression rebellion hitherto 
met certainty unusual similar 
circumstances, public credit fully maintained. 
continuance war, however, increased disbursements made 
necessary augmented forces field demand best 
reflections best modes providing necessary revenue 
without injury business least possible burdens upon 
labor. 
 
suspension specie payments banks soon 
commencement last session made large issues United States 
notes way could payment troops 
satisfaction demands well 
provided for. judicious legislation Congress, securing 
notes loans internal duties making 
legal tender debts, made universal 
currency, satisfied, partially least, time, 
want uniform circulating saving thereby 
people immense sums 
 
return specie however, earliest period compatible 
due regard interests concerned ever kept view. 
value currency always 
reduce lowest possible point always 
leading purpose wise legislation. prompt certain 
generally acknowledged best 
them; extremely doubtful whether 
circulation United States notes payable sufficiently 
large wants people permanently, 
safely maintained. 
 
there, then, mode necessary provision 
public wants made great advantages safe uniform 
currency 
 
know none promises certain results 
time unobjectionable organization banking 
general act Congress, well guarded provisions. 
Government might furnish circulating notes, 
security United States bonds Treasury. 
notes, prepared supervision proper officers, uniform 
appearance security always would 
protect labor evils currency 
facilitate commerce cheap safe 
 
moderate interest bonds would compensate 
United States preparation distribution notes 
general supervision system, would burden 
part public debt employed public credit, 
moreover, would greatly improved negotiation new loans 
greatly steady market demand Government bonds 
adoption proposed system would 
additional recommendation measure, considerable 
judgment, would far possible existing 
interests opportunity offered existing institutions 
act, substituting secured uniform 
national circulation local various secured 
issued them. 
 
receipts treasury sources, including loans 
balance preceding year, fiscal year ending 30th 
June, 1862, sum 
derived direct public 
lands, miscellaneous sources, loans 
forms, 
balance last year. 
 
disbursements period 
executive, judicial purposes, foreign 
intercourse, miscellaneous expenses, including 
loans, Post-Office collection revenue, 
like charges, expenses Interior 
Department, War Department, 
Navy Department, interest public debt, 
payment public debt, including 
temporary loan making aggregate 
leaving balance Treasury 1st 
day July, 1862, 
 
observed sum expended 
redemption public debt, included also 
loans made, may properly receipts 
expenditures, leaving actual receipts year 
expenditures 
 
information subject finances found 
report Secretary Treasury, whose statements views 
invite candid considerate attention. 
 
reports Secretaries War Navy herewith 
transmitted. though scarcely 
brief numerous extensive transactions 
operations conducted could give 
summary upon principle would admit 
much shorter reports themselves. therefore content 
laying reports asking attention them. 
 
gives pleasure report decided improvement financial 
condition Post-Office Department compared several 
preceding years. receipts fiscal year 1861 amounted 
embraced revenue States 
Union three quarters year. Notwithstanding cessation 
revenue so-called seceded States last fiscal year, 
increase correspondence loyal States 
sufficient produce revenue year 
less derived States 
Union previous year. expenditures show still 
favorable result. amount expended 1861 
last year amount reduced showing 
decrease expenditures compared 
preceding year, compared fiscal year 
1860. deficiency Department previous year 
last fiscal year reduced 
favorable results part owing 
cessation mail service insurrectionary States part 
careful review expenditures Department interest 
efficiency postal service, believed, 
also much improved. Postmaster-General also opened 
correspondence Department State foreign governments 
proposing convention postal representatives purpose 
rates foreign postage foreign 
proposition, equally important adopted citizens 
commercial interests country, favorably 
entertained agreed governments 
received. 
 
ask attention Congress suggestions 
Postmaster-General report respecting legislation 
required, opinion, benefit postal service. 
 
Secretary Interior reports follows regard 
public public lands ceased source 
1st July, 1861, 30th September, 1862, entire cash 
receipts sale lands sum much less 
expenses land system period. homestead 
law, take effect 1st January next, offers 
settlers sales cash expected 
extent sufficient meet expenses General Land Office 
cost surveying bringing land 
 
sum stated arising sales 
public lands sum derived source 
reported Treasury Department understand, 
fact periods time, though really 
beginning point, Treasury report including 
considerable sum previously reported 
Interior, sufficiently large greatly sum derived 
three months reported upon Interior 
Treasury. Indian tribes upon past 
year manifested spirit several points 
engaged open hostilities white settlements 
vicinity. tribes occupying Indian country south Kansas 
allegiance United States entered 
treaties insurgents. remained loyal United 
States driven country. chief 
visited city purpose restoring former relations 
United States. constrained 
superior force enter treaties insurgents, 
United States neglected furnish protection 
treaty stipulations required. 
 
month August last Indians Minnesota attacked 
settlements vicinity extreme 
men, women, children. attack wholly 
therefore means defense 
estimated less persons killed Indians, 
large amount property 
induced definitely known, may 
need stated. Information received Indian Bureau 
different sources time hostilities commenced 
simultaneous attack made upon white settlements 
tribes Mississippi River Rocky 
State Minnesota suffered great injury Indian war. 
large portion territory severe loss 
sustained destruction property. people 
State manifest much anxiety removal tribes beyond 
limits State future 
Commissioner Indian Affairs furnish full submit 
especial consideration whether Indian system shall 
Many wise good men impressed belief 
profitably done. 
 
submit statement proceedings commissioners, shows 
progress made enterprise constructing 
Pacific Railroad. suggests earliest completion 
road, also favorable action Congress upon 
pending enlarging capacities great 
New York Illinois, vital rapidly increasing 
importance whole nation, especially vast interior 
region noticed greater length. purpose 
prepared laid early day interesting 
valuable statistical information upon subject. military 
commercial importance enlarging Illinois Michigan Canal 
improving Illinois River presented report Colonel 
Webster Secretary War, transmitted Congress. 
respectfully ask attention it. 
 
carry provisions act Congress 15th May 
last, caused Department Agriculture United States 
organized. 
 
Commissioner informs within period months 
Department established extensive system correspondence 
home abroad, promises effect highly 
beneficial results development correct knowledge recent 
improvements agriculture, introduction new products, 
collection agricultural statistics different 
States. 
 
Also, soon prepared largely 
already published liberally 
much valuable information anticipation elaborate 
report, due time furnished, embracing valuable 
science progress 
 
creation Department immediate benefit 
large class valuable citizens, trust liberal 
basis upon organized meet 
realize distant day 
sanguine friends become fruitful 
source advantage people. 
 
22d day September last proclamation issued 
Executive, copy herewith accordance 
purpose expressed second paragraph paper, 
respectfully recall attention may called 

 
nation may said consist territory, people, 
laws. territory part certain 
"One generation away another generation 
earth first importance duly consider 
estimate part. portion earth's 
surface owned inhabited people United States 
well adapted home one national family, 
well adapted two more. vast extent variety 
climate productions advantage age one people, 
whatever might former ages. 
intelligence brought advantageous combination 
one united people. 
 
inaugural address briefly pointed total 
disunion remedy differences people two 
sections. language which, 
therefore, beg One section country believes slavery 
right ought extended, believes wrong 
ought extended. substantial dispute. 
fugitive-slave clause Constitution law 
suppression foreign slave trade well enforced, 
perhaps, law ever community moral sense 
people imperfectly supports law itself. great body 
people abide dry legal obligation cases, break 
each. think, perfectly would 
worse cases separation sections before. 
foreign slave trade, imperfectly suppressed, would 
ultimately revived without restriction one section, fugitive 
slaves, partially surrendered, would surrendered 
other. Physically speaking, separate. 
remove respective sections build impassable 
wall them. husband wife may go 
presence beyond reach other, different parts 
country this. remain face face, 
intercourse, either amicable hostile, must continue them, 
possible, then, make intercourse advantageous 
satisfactory separation before? aliens make treaties 
easier friends make laws? treaties faithfully 
enforced aliens laws among friends? Suppose go 
war, fight always; when, much loss sides 
gain either, cease fighting, identical old questions, 
terms intercourse, upon you. line, 
straight suitable national boundary upon 
Trace through, east west, upon line 
free slave country, shall find little one-third 
length rivers, easy populated, soon 
populated, upon nearly remaining 
length merely lines, people may walk back 
forth without consciousness presence. part line 
made difficult pass writing paper 
national boundary. fact separation, comes, 
gives part seceding section fugitive-slave 
along constitutional obligations upon section 
seceded from, expect treaty stipulation would ever 
made take place. 
 
another difficulty. great interior region bounded east 
north British west Rocky 
Mountains, south line along culture corn 
cotton includes part Virginia, part Tennessee, 
Kentucky, Ohio, Indiana, Michigan, Wisconsin, Illinois, 
Missouri, Kansas, Iowa, Minnesota, Territories 
Nebraska, part Colorado, already people, 
within fifty years prevented 
political folly mistake. contains one-third 
country owned United 
square miles. half populous Massachusetts already is, 
would people. glance map shows that, 
speaking, great body Republic. 
parts marginal borders it. magnificent region sloping 
west Rocky Mountains Pacific deepest also 
resources. production provisions 
proceed great interior 
region naturally one important world. Ascertain 
statistics small proportion region yet 
brought also large rapidly 
increasing amount products, shall overwhelmed 
magnitude prospect presented. yet region 
ocean anywhere. part one nation, people 
find, may forever find, way Europe New York, 
South America Africa New Orleans, San 
separate common country two nations, designed 
present rebellion, every man great interior region 
thereby cut one outlets, perhaps 
physical embarrassing trade regulations. 
 
true, wherever dividing boundary line may fixed. 
Place free slave country, place south 
Kentucky north Ohio, still truth remains none south 
trade port place north it, none north 
trade port place south it, except upon terms dictated 
government foreign them. outlets, east, west, south, 
indispensable well-being people 
inhabit vast interior region. three may best 
proper question. better either, right 
belong people successors forever. True 
themselves, ask line separation shall be, 
rather shall line. marginal 
regions less interested communications 
great outside world. They, too, them, must access 
Egypt West without paying crossing 
national boundary. 
 
national strife springs permanent part; 
land national possible 
would multiply mitigate evils among us. 
adaptations demands union abhors 
fact, would ere long force reunion, however much 
blood treasure separation might cost. strife pertains 
passing generations without 
convulsion hushed forever passing one generation. 
 
view recommend adoption following resolution 
articles amendatory Constitution United States: Resolved 
Senate House Representatives United States 
America Congress assembled Houses 
following articles proposed legislatures (or 
several States amendments Constitution 
United States, articles, ratified 
three-fourths said legislatures (or conventions valid 
part parts said Constitution, 
 
Every State wherein slavery exists shall abolish 
therein time times 1st day January, A. D. 
shall receive compensation United States follows, 
wit: 
 
President United States shall deliver every State 
bonds United States bearing interest rate per cent per 
amount equal aggregate sum slave 
shown therein Eighth Census United States, 
said bonds delivered State one 
parcel completion accordingly 
shall gradual one time within State; interest 
shall begin run upon bond proper time 
delivery State received bonds aforesaid 
afterwards slavery therein shall refund 
United States bonds received, value thereof, 
interest paid 
 
slaves shall enjoyed actual freedom chances 
war time end rebellion shall forever 
free; owners shall disloyal shall 
compensated rates provided States 
adopting abolishment slavery, way slave shall 
twice accounted for. 
 
may appropriate money otherwise provide 
colonizing free colored persons consent place 
places without United States. beg discuss 
proposed articles length. Without slavery rebellion could 
never without slavery could 
 
Among friends Union great sentiment 
policy regard slavery African race amongst us. 
would perpetuate slavery; would abolish suddenly 
without would abolish gradually 
would remove freed people us, 
would retain us; yet minor 
waste much strength struggles among 
ourselves. mutual concession act together. 
would compromise, would compromise among friends 
enemies Union. articles intended 
plan mutual plan shall adopted, 
assumed emancipation follow, least several 
States. 
 
first article, main points are, first, 
secondly, length time 
and, thirdly, 
 
emancipation unsatisfactory advocates perpetual 
slavery, length time greatly mitigate 
time races evils sudden 
fact, necessity 
whose habitual course thought disturbed 
measure passed away consummation. never 
see it. Another class hail prospect emancipation, 
length time. feel gives little 
living slaves. really gives much. saves 
must largely attend immediate 
emancipation localities numbers great, 
gives assurance posterity shall free 
forever. plan leaves State choosing act 
abolish slavery end century, 
time, degrees extending whole part 
period, two States proceed also 
provides generally mode making it. This, 
would must mitigate dissatisfaction 
favor perpetual slavery, especially receive 
Doubtless pay receive 
object. Yet measure certain 
sense liberation slaves destruction 
acquired descent purchase, property. 
less true often said people South 
responsible original introduction property 
people remembered 
unhesitatingly use cotton sugar share 
dealing them, may quite safe say South 
responsible North If, then, 
common object property 
done common 
 
less money, money easily paid, preserve 
benefits Union means war alone, 
also economical it? Let us consider it, then. Let us 
ascertain sum expended war since compensated 
emancipation proposed last March, consider whether 
measure promptly accepted even slave States 
sum would done close war 
otherwise done. so, measure would save money, view 
would prudent economical measure. Certainly easy 
pay something pay nothing, easier pay 
large sum pay larger one. easier pay 
sum able pay war 
requires large requires once. aggregate sum 
necessary compensated emancipation course would large. 
would require ready bonds even faster 
emancipation might not, probably would not, close 
end years. time shall 
probably hundred millions people share instead 
thirty-one millions now. so, increase 
population may expected continue long time 
period rapidly before, territory become 
full. state ratio 
increase maintained, average, first 
national 1860, 
population may continue ratio far 
beyond abundant room, broad national 
ample territory limited British 
certainly population could stated. 
Instead receiving foreign born now, compelled 
send part native born away. condition. 
square miles. Europe population 
persons square may country 
time average less waste 
surface mountains, rivers, 
inferior Europe natural If, then, 
time populous Europe, may be, 
judge past present; be, ever, 
depends much whether maintain Union. Several States 
already average Europe square 
Massachusetts Rhode Island, Connecticut, New York 
New Jersey, Also two great States, Pennsylvania 
Ohio, far below, former latter 
States already European average, except New York, 
increased rapid ratio since passing point ever before, 
one equal parts country 
natural capacity sustaining 
 
Taking nation find population 
ratio increase several periods follows: 
 
Year - Population - Ratio increase. 
 
- - Per cent. 
 
- - 
 
- - 
 
- - 
 
1820 - - 
 
- - 
 
1840 - - 
 
1850 - - 
 
1860 - - 
 
shows average increase per cent 
population seventy years first last census 
yet taken. seen ratio increase one 
seven periods either 2 per cent 2 per cent 
average, thus showing consequently 
law increase case is. Assuming continue, 
gives following 
 
Year - Population 
 
- 
 
- 
 
- 
 
- 
 
- 
 
- 
 
- 
 
figures show country may populous Europe 
point territory, 
persons square capacity contain 

 
reach this, too, relinquish 
chance folly evils disunion long war 
springing great element national discord among us. 
exactly much one huge example 
secession, breeding lesser ones would population, 
prosperity, one doubt extent 
would great 
 
proposed emancipation would war, perpetuate peace, 
insure increase population, wealth 
country. pay emancipation would cost, 
together debt, easier pay debt 
without it. allowed old national debt run 6 per 
cent per simple interest, end revolutionary 
struggle to-day, without paying anything either principal 
interest, man us would owe less upon debt 
man owed upon then; increase men 
whole period greater 6 per run faster 
interest upon debt. Thus time alone relieves nation, 
long population increases faster interest 
debt. 
 
fact would excuse payment justly 
due, shows great importance time 
great advantage policy shall pay 
number different policy would pay now, 
number word, shows dollar 
much harder pay war dollar 
emancipation proposed plan. latter cost 
blood, precious life. saving both. 
 
second article, think would impracticable return 
bondage class persons therein them, 
doubtless, property sense belong loyal owners, hence 
provision made article compensating such. third 
article relates future freed people. 
merely authorizes Congress aid colonizing may 
consent. ought regarded objectionable one hand 
other, comes nothing unless mutual 
consent people American voters, 
representatives Congress. 
 
make better known already strongly favor 
yet wish say objection urged 
free colored persons remaining country largely 
sometimes 
 
insisted presence would injure white 
labor white laborers. ever could proper time mere 
catch time surely now. times like present 
men utter nothing would willingly 
responsible time true, then, 
colored people white labor free 
remaining stay old places, 
white leave old places, leave open 
white laborers. neither less it. 
Emancipation, even without would probably 
wages white labor, surely would reduce them. Thus 
customary amount labor would still freed 
people would surely old proportion it, 
probably time would less, leaving increased part 
white laborers, bringing labor greater 
consequently enhancing wages it. even 
limited extent, enhanced wages white labor 
certain. Labor like 
demand increase price it. Reduce supply 
black labor colonizing black laborer country, 
precisely much increase demand wages white labor. 
 
dreaded freed people forth cover 
whole land. already liberation make 
Equally distributed among whites whole 
country, would one colored seven whites. Could 
one way greatly disturb many communities 
one free colored person seven whites 
without apparent consciousness evil it. District 
Columbia States Maryland 
condition. District one free colored six 
yet frequent petitions Congress believe never 
presented presence free colored persons one 
emancipation South send free people 
People color seldom run unless something run 
from. Heretofore colored people extent fled North 
bondage, now, perhaps, bondage 
gradual emancipation deportation adopted, neither 
from. old masters give wages least new 
laborers turn gladly give 
labor wages till new homes found 
congenial people blood race. 
proposition trusted mutual interests 
event, North decide whether receive them? 
 
Again, practice proves theory case, 
colored people abolishment 
slavery District last 
 
said proportion free colored persons 
whites District census 1860, reference 
persons called made free act 
Congress abolishing slavery here. 
 
plan consisting articles 
restoration national authority would accepted without 

 
war proceedings proclamation September 
22, 1862, stayed recommendation plan. 
doubt not, would bring restoration, thereby stay 
both. 
 
notwithstanding plan, recommendation Congress provide 
law compensating State may adopt emancipation 
plan shall acted upon hereby earnestly 
would advance part plan, arguments apply 
both. 
 
plan recommended means, exclusion of, 
additional to, others restoring preserving national 
authority throughout Union. subject presented exclusively 
economical plan would, secure peace 
speedily maintain permanently done 
force alone, would cost, considering amounts manner 
payment times would easier paid 
additional cost war rely solely upon force. much, 
much, would cost blood all. 
 
plan proposed permanent constitutional law. become 
without concurrence of, first, two-thirds Congress, 
afterwards three-fourths States. requisite three-fourths 
States necessarily include seven slave States. 
give assurance severally 
adopting emancipation distant day upon new 
constitutional terms. assurance would end struggle 
save Union forever. 
 
forget gravity paper addressed 
Congress nation Chief Magistrate nation, 
forget many 
experience conduct public affairs. Yet 
trust view great responsibility resting upon 
perceive want respect undue earnestness 
may seem 
 
then, plan propose, adopted, would 
war, thus lessen expenditure money 
doubted would restore national authority national 
prosperity perpetuate doubted 
Executive secure good 
people respond united earnest appeal us? we, 
they, means certainly speedily assure vital 
succeed concert. "Can us 
imagine better?" "Can better?" Object 
possible, still question recurs, "Can better?" 
quiet past inadequate present. occasion 
piled high difficulty, must rise occasion. 
case new, must think anew act anew. must 
ourselves, shall save country. 
 
Fellow-citizens, escape history. Congress 
Administration remembered spite ourselves. 
personal significance insignificance spare one another us. 
trial pass light us honor 
latest generation. say Union. 
world forget say this. know save Union. 
world knows know save it. We, even here, hold 
power bear responsibility. giving freedom slave 
assure freedom alike give 
shall nobly save meanly lose last best hope 
earth. means may succeed; could fail. way plain, 
peaceful, generous, way followed world 
forever God must forever 
 
*** 
 
State Union Address 
Abraham Lincoln 
December 8, 1863 
 
Fellow-Citizens Senate House Representatives: 
 
Another year health sufficiently abundant harvests 
passed. these, especially improved condition 
national affairs, renewed profoundest gratitude God 
 
remain peace friendship foreign powers. 
 
efforts disloyal citizens United States involve us 
foreign aid inexcusable insurrection 
Britannic Majesty's Government, justly expected, 
exercised authority prevent departure new hostile 
British France like 
proceeding promptly proclaimed 
beginning contest. Questions great 
importance arisen blockade belligerent 
operations Government several maritime powers, 
discussed and, far possible, accommodated 
spirit justice, mutual good will. 
especially gratifying prize courts, 
commanded respect confidence 
maritime powers. 
 
treaty United States Great Britain 
suppression African slave trade, made 17th day 
February last, duly ratified carried execution. 
believed far American ports American citizens 
concerned odious traffic brought end. 
 
shall submit consideration Senate convention 
adjustment claims Washington Territory arising 
treaty 15th June, 1846, United States Great 
Britain, source among 
citizens rapidly improving part country. 
 
novel important question, involving extent maritime 
jurisdiction Spain waters island 
without reaching proposed 
amicable spirit refer friendly power. 
convention purpose submitted Senate. 
 
thought proper, subject approval Senate, 
concur interested commercial powers arrangement 
upon principles 
heretofore adopted regard upon navigation 
waters  controversy 
Government touching seizure Peru, 
officers, large amount treasure belonging 
citizens United States brought close 
Majesty King whose 
question referred parties. subject thoroughly 
patiently examined justly respected although 
sum awarded may large 
expected reason wisdom Majesty's 
decision. decision promptly complied 
intelligence regard reached country. 
 
joint commission act last session carrying 
effect convention subject claims 
organized engaged business intrusted it. 
 
Difficulties concerning transit 
course amicable 
 
conformity principles set forth last annual message, 
received representative United States 
accredited minister Republic. 
 
Incidents occurring progress civil war forced upon 
attention uncertain state international questions touching 
rights foreigners country United States citizens 
abroad. regard governments rights least 
defined instance, however, 
expressly stipulated event civil war 
residing country within lines insurgents 
rule classes whose 
behalf Government country expect privileges 
immunities distinct character. regret say, however, 
claims put forward, instances behalf 
foreigners lived United States greater part 
lives. 
 
reason believe many persons born foreign countries 
declared intention become citizens, 
fully military duty required 
denying fact thereby throwing upon Government burden 
proof. found difficult impracticable obtain 
proof, want proper sources information. 
might supplied requiring clerks courts 
declarations intention may made effected 
send names persons naturalized 
declaring intention become citizens Secretary 
Interior, whose Department names might arranged printed 
general information. 
 
also reason believe foreigners frequently become 
citizens United States sole purpose duties 
imposed laws native countries, becoming 
naturalized though never returning 
United States still claim interposition Government 
citizens. Many great prejudices heretofore arisen 
therefore submitted serious 
consideration. might advisable fix limit beyond 
citizen United States residing abroad may claim 
interposition Government. 
 
right suffrage often assumed exercised aliens 

drafted military service. submit expediency 
amendment law make fact voting 
plea exemption military service civil 
obligation ground 
 
common Western powers, relations Japan 
brought serious opposition 
Empire enlightened liberal 
policy designed bring country society 
nations. although entire confidence, 
difficulties may ask attention 
claim minister residing sustained 
destruction fire residence 
 
Satisfactory arrangements made Russia, 
which, believed, result effecting continuous line 
telegraph Empire Pacific coast. 
 
recommend favorable consideration subject 
international telegraph across Atlantic Ocean, also 
telegraph capital national forts along 
Atlantic seaboard Gulf Mexico. communications, 
established reasonable would economical well 
effective aids military, naval service. 
 
consular system United States, enactments 
last Congress, begins reason 
hope may become entirely increase trade 
whenever peace restored. ministers abroad 
faithful defending American rights. protecting commercial 
interests consuls necessarily encounter increased 
labors responsibilities growing war. 
part met discharged zeal efficiency. 
acknowledgment justly includes consuls who, residing 
Egypt, China, countries, charged 
functions extraordinary powers. 
 
condition several organized Territories generally 
satisfactory, although Indian New Mexico 
entirely mineral resources Colorado, Nevada, 
New Mexico, proving far heretofore 
understood. lay communication subject 
governor New Mexico. submit consideration 
expediency establishing system encouragement 
Although source national wealth strength 
flowing greater freedom several years 
insurrection occurred, still great deficiency laborers 
every field industry, especially agriculture mines, 
well iron coal precious demand 
labor much increased here, thousands persons, 
occupation, foreign 
offering United States cheap, 
assistance afforded them. easy see sharp 
discipline civil war nation beginning new life. noble 
effort demands aid ought receive attention support 
Government. 
 
Injuries Government may cases 
inflicted subjects citizens foreign countries, 
sea land, persons service United 
States. Government expects redress powers 
similar injuries inflicted persons service upon 
citizens United States, must prepared justice 
existing judicial inadequate 
purpose, special court may power hear 
decide claims character referred may arisen 
treaties public law. Conventions claims 
joint commission proposed governments, 
answer proposition yet received any. 
 
course session shall probably occasion request 
provide 
rendered awarded courts, 
cases Government may acknowledged 
liable principle amount 
ascertained informal 
 
proper officers Treasury deemed required 
law United States upon subject demand tax upon 
foreign consuls country. demand may 
public law, perhaps 
existing treaty United States foreign country, 
expediency far modifying act exempt tax 
consuls citizens United States, derived 
office property situated 
United States, submitted serious consideration. make 
suggestion upon ground ought reciprocated 
consuls countries taxation extent 
thus United States, think, ought 
international trade commerce. 
 
operations Treasury last year 
successfully enactment Congress national banking 
law proved valuable support public credit general 
legislation relation loans fully answered expectations 
amendments may required perfect existing laws, 
change principles general scope believed 
needed. 
 
Since measures operation demands 
Treasury, including pay Army Navy, promptly 
met fully satisfied. considerable body troops, 
believed, ever amply provided liberally 
paid, may added people burdens 
incident great war ever cheerfully 
 
receipts year sources, including loans 
balance Treasury 
aggregate disbursements leaving balance 
1st July, 1863, receipts derived 
customs internal revenue 
direct tax lands miscellaneous 
sources loans making 
aggregate disbursements 
civil service pensions Indians 
interest public debt War Department 
Navy Department payment 
temporary debt making aggregate 
leaving balance 
payment temporary debt, made moneys 
borrowed year, must regarded merely nominal payments 
moneys borrowed make merely nominal 
therefore 
receipts done remains actual 
receipts actual disbursements 
leaving balance already stated. 
 
actual receipts disbursements first quarter 
estimated receipts disbursements remaining three quarters 
current fiscal year shown detail report 
Secretary Treasury, invite attention. 
sufficient say believed actual results 
exhibit state finances less favorable country 
estimates officer heretofore submitted, 
confidently expected close year disbursements 
debt found considerably less 

 
report Secretary War document great interest. 
consists 
 
1. military operations year, detailed report 
General Chief. 2. organization colored persons war 
service. 3. exchange prisoners, fully set forth letter 
General 4. operations act enrolling 
calling national forces, detailed report 
5. organization invalid 
corps, 6. operation several departments 
Chief 
Chief 
 
appeared impossible make valuable summary report, 
except would extended place, hence 
content asking careful attention report itself. 
 
duties naval branch service year 
throughout whole unhappy contest discharged 
fidelity eminent success. extensive blockade 
constantly increasing efficiency Navy yet 
long line far impossible entirely suppress 
trade. returns received Navy Department appears 
vessels captured since blockade 
value already sent 
adjudication amounts 
 
naval force United States consists time 
vessels completed course completion, 
ironclad events war give increased 
interest importance Navy probably extend beyond 
war itself. 
 
vessels Navy completed service, 
contract approaching completion, believed exceed 
number power; may relied upon 
harbor defense coast service, others greater strength 
capacity necessary purposes maintain 
rightful position 
 
change taken place naval vessels naval warfare 
since introduction steam motive power ships war 
demands either corresponding change existing 
establishment new ones construction 
necessary repair modern naval 
delay, public injury experienced 
want governmental necessity 
furnished, suitable place upon Atlantic 
seaboard repeated occasions brought attention 
Congress Navy Department, presented report 
Secretary communication. think 
duty invite special attention subject, also 
establishing yard naval purposes upon one 
Western rivers. naval force created interior 
many within little two 
years, exceeding numbers whole naval force country 
commencement present Administration. Satisfactory important 
heroic men Navy 
interesting period, scarcely wonderful success 
mechanics production war vessels, 
created new form naval power. 
 
country advantages superior nation 
resources iron 
immediate vicinity both, available close 
proximity Without advantage public works, 
resources nation developed power displayed 
construction Navy magnitude, 
period creation rendered signal service Union. 
 
increase number seamen public service 
men spring 1861 present time 
accomplished without special legislation extraordinary bounties 
promote increase. found, however, operation 
draft, high bounties paid army 
beginning affect injuriously naval service, will, 
likely efficiency seamen 
proper inducing enter Army. therefore 
respectfully suggest Congress might aid army naval 
services definite provision subject would 
time equitable communities especially interested. 
 
commend consideration suggestions Secretary 
Navy regard policy fostering training seamen also 
education officers engineers naval service. 
Naval rendering signal service preparing 
highly responsible duties life required 
perform. order country deprived 
proper quota educated officers, legal provision 
made naval vacancies caused neglect 
omission make nominations States insurrection 
filled Secretary Navy. school full 
complete former period, every respect entitled 
favorable consideration Congress. 
 
past fiscal year financial condition Post-Office 
Department one increasing prosperity, gratified 
able state actual postal revenue nearly 
entire expenditures, latter amounting 
former leaving deficiency 
1860, year immediately preceding rebellion, deficiency 
amounted postal receipts year 
less 1863. decrease since 1860 
annual amount transportation 25 per 
annual expenditure account reduced per 
cent. therefore, Post-Office Department may 
become years, even restoration 
whole service. 
 
international conference postal delegates principal 
countries Europe America, called suggestion 
Postmaster-General, met Paris 11th May last 
concluded 8th June. principles 
established conference best adapted facilitate postal 
intercourse nations basis future postal 
conventions inaugurate general system uniform international 
charges reduced rates fail produce 
beneficial results. 
 
refer report Secretary Interior, 
herewith laid you, useful varied information relation 
public lands, Indian affairs, pensions, 
matters public concern pertaining Department. 
 
quantity land disposed last first quarter 
present fiscal years acres 
sold acres taken homestead 
law, disposed laws granting lands military 
railroad purposes. also appears 
sale public lands largely increase. 
 
long cherished opinion wisest statesmen 
people United States higher enduring 
interest early settlement substantial 
public lands amount direct revenue derived 
sale them. opinion controlling influence 
legislation upon subject national may 
evidence liberal measures adopted reference actual 
grant States lands within 
limits, order reclaimed rendered fit 
grants railway companies alternate sections 
land upon contemplated issues roads, completed 
largely multiply facilities reaching distant 
policy received signal beneficent 
illustration recent enactment granting actual 
Since 1st day January last 
quantity acres land taken 
provisions. fact amount sales furnish gratifying 
evidence increasing settlement upon public lands, 
notwithstanding great struggle energies nation 
engaged, required large withdrawal 
citizens accustomed cordially concur 
recommendation Secretary Interior suggesting 
modification act favor engaged military 
naval service United States. doubt Congress 
cheerfully adopt measures will, without essentially changing 
general features system, secure greatest practicable 
extent benefits left homes defense 
country arduous crisis. 
 
invite attention views Secretary 
propriety raising appropriate legislation revenue 
mineral lands United States. 
 
measures provided last session removal certain 
Indian tribes carried effect. Sundry treaties 
negotiated, due time submitted constitutional 
action Senate. contain stipulations 
rights Indians large valuable tracts lands. 
hoped effect treaties result 
establishment permanent friendly relations tribes 
brought frequent bloody collision 
settlements Sound policy imperative 
duty Government demand anxious constant 
attention material progress 
and, all, moral training 
blessing Divine Providence confer upon elevated 
hopes Christian 
faith. suggested last annual message propriety 
Indian system. Subsequent events satisfied 
necessity. details set forth report Secretary 
urgent need immediate legislative action. 
 
commend benevolent institutions established 
Government District generous fostering care. 
attention Congress last session engaged 
extent proposition enlarging water communication 
Mississippi River proposition, 
however, failed time. Since then, upon call greatest 
convention held Chicago upon 
subject, summary whose views contained memorial addressed 
President Congress, honor lay 
you. interest one ere long force 
way entertain doubt, submitted entirely 
wisdom done now. Augmented interest given 
subject actual commencement work upon Pacific Railroad, 
favorable rapid progress 
enlarged navigation becomes palpable need great road. 
 
transmit second annual report Commissioner 
Department Agriculture, asking attention developments 
vital interest nation. Congress assembled year ago, 
war already lasted nearly twenty months, 
many land sea, varying 
rebellion pressed back reduced limits; yet tone 
public feeling opinion, home abroad satisfactory. 
popular elections past indicated 
uneasiness among ourselves, while, amid much cold 
kindest words coming Europe uttered accents 
pity blind surrender hopeless cause. 
commerce suffering greatly armed vessels built upon 
furnished foreign threatened 
additions quarter would sweep trade sea 
raise blockade. failed European 
Governments anything hopeful upon subject. preliminary 
emancipation proclamation, issued September, running 
assigned period beginning new year. month later 
final proclamation came, including announcement colored men 
suitable condition would received war service. policy 
emancipation employing black soldiers gave future 
new hope fear doubt contended uncertain 
conflict. According political system, matter civil 
administration, General Government lawful power effect 
emancipation State, long time hoped 
rebellion could suppressed without military 
measure. deemed possible necessity 
might come, crisis contest would 
presented. came, and, followed dark 
doubtful days. Eleven months passed, permitted 
take another rebel borders pressed still farther back, 
complete opening Mississippi country 
rebellion divided distinct parts, practical 
communication them. Tennessee Arkansas 
substantially cleared insurgent control, influential citizens 
each, owners slaves advocates slavery beginning 
rebellion, declare openly emancipation respective 
States. States included emancipation proclamation, 
Maryland Missouri, neither three years ago would tolerate 
restraint upon extension slavery new Territories, 
dispute best mode removing within limits. 
 
slaves beginning rebellion full 100,000 
United States military service, one-half 
number actually bear arms ranks, thus giving double 
advantage taking much labor insurgent cause 
supplying places otherwise must filled many white 
men. far tested, difficult say good 
soldiers any. insurrection tendency violence 
cruelty marked measures emancipation arming blacks. 
measures much discussed foreign countries, and, 
contemporary discussion, tone public sentiment 
much improved. home measures fully discussed, 
annual elections 
following highly encouraging whose official duty 
bear country great trial. Thus new 
crisis threatened divide friends 
Union past. 
 
Looking present future, reference 
national authority within States wherein 
authority suspended, thought fit issue 
proclamation, copy herewith transmitted. examination 
proclamation believed, nothing 
attempted beyond amply justified Constitution. True, 
form oath given, man take it. man 
promised pardon case voluntarily takes oath. 
Constitution authorizes Executive grant withhold pardon 
absolute discretion, includes power grant 
terms, fully established judicial authorities. 
 
also States named State 
government shall mode prescribed set up, government 
shall recognized guaranteed United States, 
State shall, constitutional conditions, protected 
invasion domestic violence. constitutional obligation 
United States guarantee every State Union 
republican form government protect State cases 
stated explicit full. tender benefits 
provision State government set particular way? 
section Constitution contemplates case wherein 
element within State favorable republican government Union 
may feeble opposite hostile element external 
even within State, precisely cases 

 
attempt guarantee protect revived State government, 
constructed whole part element 
whose hostility violence simply 
absurd. must test separate opposing 
elements, build sound; test 
sufficiently liberal one sound whoever make 
sworn former 
 
proper require test admission political 
body oath allegiance Constitution United States 
Union it, also laws proclamations regard 
slavery? laws proclamations enacted put forth 
purpose aiding suppression rebellion. give 
effect pledge 
judgment, aided aid cause 
intended. abandon would relinquish 
lever power, would also cruel breach 
faith. may add point remain present 
position shall attempt retract modify emancipation 
proclamation, shall return slavery person free 
terms proclamation acts Congress. 
reasons thought best support 
measures shall included oath, believed 
Executive may lawfully claim return pardon restoration 
forfeited rights, clear constitutional power withhold 
altogether grant upon terms shall deem wisest 
public interest. observed also part oath 
subject modifying power legislation 
supreme judicial decision. 
 
proposed acquiescence National Executive reasonable 
temporary State arrangement freed people made view 
possibly modifying confusion must best 
attend classes total revolution labor throughout whole 
States. hoped already deeply afflicted people 
States may somewhat ready give cause 
affliction extent vital matter left themselves, 
power National Executive prevent abuse 
proposition. 
 
suggestion proclamation maintaining political 
framework States called reconstruction made 
hope may good without danger harm. save labor 
avoid great confusion. 
 
proclamation upon subject? question 
conflicting views step might delayed long 
taken soon. States elements seem 
ready action, remain apparently want 
plan action, shall adopt plan B rather B 
B agree, know 
General Government reject proclamation 
plan presented may accepted point, 
assured advance rejected here. 
may bring act sooner otherwise would. objections 
presentation plan National Executive consist 
danger points could safely left 
Care taken shape document 
avoid embarrassments Saying certain 
terms certain classes pardoned rights restored, 
said classes terms never 
Saying specified way, said reconstruction accepted 
presented said never accepted way. 
 
movements State action emancipation several States 
included emancipation proclamation matters profound 
repeat detail heretofore 
earnestly urged upon subject, general views feelings 
remain trust Congress omit fair 
opportunity aiding important steps great consummation. 
midst however important, must lose sight 
fact war power still main power 
alone look yet time give confidence people 
contested regions insurgent power overrun 
them. confidence shall established little done 
anywhere called reconstruction. Hence care 
must still directed Army Navy, thus far borne 
harder part nobly may esteemed fortunate 
giving greatest efficiency indispensable arms 
also recognize gallant men, commander 
compose them, others world 
must stand indebted home freedom 

 
*** 
 
State Union Address 
Abraham Lincoln 
December 6, 1864 
 
Fellow-Citizens Senate House Representatives: 
 
blessings health abundant harvests claim 
profoundest gratitude Almighty God. 
 
condition foreign affairs reasonably satisfactory. 
 
Mexico continues civil war. political 
relations country change, 
time strictly maintained 
 
request States Costa Nicaragua, competent 
authorized make survey river San 
port San source much satisfaction 
difficulties moment excited political apprehensions 
caused closing transit route 
good prospect route 
soon reopened increase capacity 
could either commercial political importance 
great improvement. 
 
would injustice important South American State 
acknowledge 
United States entered intimate relations 
Government. claims convention constituted complete 
unfinished work one closed session 1861. 
 
new liberal constitution gone effect 
universal acquiescence people, Government 
recognized diplomatic intercourse opened 
cordial friendly spirit. Island claim 
satisfactorily paid 
 
Mutual payments made claims awarded late joint 
commission settlement claims United States 
earnest cordial friendship continues exist 
two countries, efforts power used 
remove misunderstanding avert threatened war 

 
relations friendly nature 
Republic, Costa San 
past year differences kind arisen 
and, hand, sympathies 
United States constantly expressed earnestness. 
 
claim arising seizure cargo 
paid full Government Civil war 
continues Spanish part San apparently without 
prospect early close. 
 
Official correspondence freely opened Liberia, 
gives us pleasing view social political progress 
Republic. may expected derive new vigor American 
influence, improved rapid disappearance slavery United 
States. 
 
authority furnish Republic 
moderate cost, United States 
vessel needed safety State native 
African races, hands would effective 
arresting African slave trade squadron hands. 
possession least organized naval force would 
generous ambition Republic, confidence 
manifest furnishing would win forbearance favor toward 
colony civilized nations. 
 
proposed telegraph America Europe, way 
Russia, sanctioned 
Congress last session, favorable 
circumstances, association American citizens, cordial 
good support well Government Great 
Britain received 
South American States high appreciation enterprise 
readiness constructing lines 
communication. learn much satisfaction 
noble design telegraphic communication eastern coast 
America Great Britain full expectation 
early 
 
Thus hoped return domestic peace country 
able resume energy advantage former high career 
commerce 
 
popular representative Egypt died April 
last. unpleasant arose temporary 
office Government resulted 
suspension intercourse. evil promptly corrected 
arrival successor relations 
Egypt, well relations Powers, entirely 
satisfactory. 
 
rebellion long flagrant China last 
suppressed, good offices Government 
Western commercial States. judicial consular 
establishment become difficult 
need legislative revision extension commerce 
intimate intercourse instituted 
Government people vast Empire. China seems accepting 
hearty good laws regulate commercial 
social intercourse among Western nations. 
 
Owing peculiar situation Japan form 
Government, action Empire performing treaty stipulations 
Nevertheless, good progress 
effected Western powers, moving enlightened concert. 
pecuniary claims allowed put course settlement, 
inland sea reopened commerce. reason also 
believe proceedings increased rather diminished 
friendship Japan toward United States. 
 
ports Norfolk, opened 
proclamation. hoped foreign consider 
whether safer profitable themselves, well 
United States, resort open ports 
many vast cost, contraband 
trade ports actual military 
occupation, least lawful effective blockade. 
 
myself, doubt power duty Executive, 
law nations, exclude enemies human race 
United States. Congress think proceedings 
cases lack authority law, ought 
it, recommend provision made effectually 
preventing foreign slave acquiring facilities 
criminal occupation country. 
 
possible new open question maritime 
powers, lights would concede 
privileges naval belligerent insurgents United 
States, are, always been, equally ships 
war ports Disloyal neither 
less successful last year 
time efforts favor 
country foreign desire determination 
governments maritime states defeat design 
believed sincere earnest own. 
Nevertheless, political difficulties especially 
British ports northern boundary 
United States, required, likely continue 
practice constant vigilance 
spirit part United States, well nations 
concerned governments. 
 
Commissioners appointed treaty Great Britain 
adjustment claims Bay Sound 
Agricultural Oregon, proceeding 
execution trust assigned them. 
 
view life property region adjacent 
reason recent assaults 
committed inimical desperate persons there, 
thought proper give notice expiration six 
months, period conditionally stipulated existing arrangement 
Great Britain, United States must hold liberty 
increase naval upon shall find 
proceeding necessary. condition border necessarily come 
consideration connection question continuing 
modifying rights transit Canada United States, 
well regulation temporarily 
established treaty 5th June, 1854. 
 
desire, however, understood making statement 
colonial authorities Canada deemed 
unjust unfriendly toward United States, but, contrary, 
every reason expect that, approval 
Government, take necessary measures prevent new 
across 
 
act passed last session encouragement 
far possible put operation. seems need 
amendment enable officers Government prevent 
practice immigrants way 
arrival ports, secure free choice 
places settlement. liberal disposition toward 
great national policy manifested European States, 
ought reciprocated part giving immigrants effective 
national protection. regard immigrants one principal 
streams appointed Providence repair 
internal war national strength health. 
necessary secure flow stream 
present end Government must every way make 
manifest neither needs designs impose involuntary 
military service upon come lands cast lot 
country. 
 
financial affairs Government successfully 
administered last year. legislation last session 
Congress affected although sufficient 
time yet elapsed experience full effect several 
provisions acts Congress imposing increased taxation. 
 
receipts year sources, upon basis 
signed Secretary Treasury, including loans 
balance Treasury 1st day July, 1863, 
aggregate upon 
basis, leaving balance Treasury, 
shown 
 
amounts amount principal public 
debt redeemed amount issues 
actual cash operations Treasury 
leaves cash 
balance Treasury 
 
receipts derived customs 
lands direct taxes internal revenue 
miscellaneous sources 
loans applied actual expenditures, including former 

 
civil service pensions 
Indians War Department 
Navy Department interest public debt 
making aggregate leaving 
balance Treasury stated. 
 
actual receipts disbursements first quarter 
estimated receipts disbursements three remaining quarters 
current fiscal year, general operations Treasury 
detail, refer report Secretary Treasury. 
concur opinion proportion moneys required 
meet expenses consequent upon war derived taxation 
still earnestly invite 
attention subject, end may additional 
legislation shall required meet expectations 

 
public debt 1st day July last, appears books 
Treasury, amounted Probably, war 
continue another year, amount may increased far 
five hundred millions. Held, is, part 
people, become substantial branch national, though private, 
property. obvious reasons nearly property 
distributed among people better. favor general 
greater become owners might, perhaps, 
good effect without injury presented persons limited 
means. view suggest whether might competent 
expedient Congress provide limited amount 
future issue public securities might held 
exempt taxation seizure debt, 
restrictions limitations might necessary guard 
abuse important would enable every prudent 
person set aside small possible day want. 
 
Privileges like would render possession securities 
amount limited desirable every person small means 
might able save enough purpose. great advantage 
citizens creditors well relation public 
debt obvious. Men readily perceive much 
oppressed debt owe themselves. 
 
public debt 1st day July last, although somewhat 
exceeding estimate Secretary Treasury made 
Congress commencement last session, falls short 
estimate officer made preceding December 
probable amount beginning year sum 
fact exhibits satisfactory condition conduct 
operations Treasury. 
 
national banking system proving acceptable 
people. 25th day November national banks 
organized, considerable number 
State banks. Changes State systems national system 
rapidly taking place, hoped soon 
United States banks issue authorized Congress 
circulation secured Government. 
Government people derive great benefit change 
banking systems country hardly 
national system create reliable permanent influence 
support national credit protect people losses 
use paper money. Whether legislation 
advisable suppression issues 
Congress seems quite clear Treasury 
satisfactorily conducted unless Government exercise 
power circulation country. 
report Secretary War accompanying documents 
detail armies field since date 
last annual message, also operations several 
administrative War Department last year. 
also specify measures deemed essential national 
defense keep supply requisite military force. 
 
report Secretary Navy presents comprehensive 
satisfactory exhibit affairs Department naval 
service. subject laudable pride 
countrymen Navy vast proportions organized 
brief period conducted much efficiency success. 
 
general exhibit Navy, including vessels construction 
1st December, 1864, shows total vessels, carrying 
guns, actual increase 
year, losses battle, 
vessels, guns, 
 
total number men time naval service, including 
officers, 
 
captured Navy year vessels, 
whole number naval since hostilities commenced 

 
gross proceeds arising sale condemned prize property 
thus far reported amount large amount 
proceeds still adjudication yet 
 
total expenditure Navy Department every 
including cost immense squadrons called 
existence 4th March, 1861, 1st November, 1864, 

 
favorable consideration invited various recommendations 
Secretary Navy, especially regard navy-yard 
suitable establishment construction repair iron vessels 
machinery reference 
made last annual message. 
 
attention also invited views expressed report 
relation legislation Congress last session respect 
prize inland 
 
cordially concur recommendation Secretary 
propriety creating new rank naval 
service. attention invited report 
Postmaster-General detailed account operations 
financial condition Post-Office Department. 
 
postal revenues year ending June 30, 1864, amounted 
expenditures excess 
expenditures receipts 
 
views presented Postmaster-General subject special 
grants Government aid establishment new lines 
ocean mail policy recommends development 
increased commercial intercourse adjacent neighboring 
countries receive careful consideration Congress. 
 
interest steady expansion population, 
governmental institutions new 
portions country scarcely much less 
destroyed, great civil war, first glance would seem 
absorbed almost entire energies nation. 
 
organization admission State Nevada 
completed conformity law, thus excellent system 
firmly established mountains, seemed barren 
waste Atlantic States 
grown coast Pacific 
 
Territories Union generally condition prosperity 
rapid reason great distance 
communication Indian 
partially understood 
difficulties permit 
governments, like others, go speedy full 
operation. intimately connected material 
growth nation, ask attention Congress valuable 
information important recommendations relating public lands, 
Indian affairs, Pacific Railroad, mineral discoveries contained 
report Secretary Interior herewith 
report also embraces subjects 
pensions, topics public interest pertaining 
Department. 
 
quantity public land disposed five quarters ending 
30th September last 
acres entered homestead law. remainder located 
military land agricultural certified States 
railroads, sold cash received sales 
fees 
 
sales fiscal year ending June 30, 1864, 
received preceding year. 
aggregate number acres surveyed year equal 
quantity disposed of, open settlement 
acres surveyed land. 
 
great enterprise connecting Atlantic Pacific States 
telegraph lines entered upon vigor 
gives assurance success, notwithstanding embarrassments arising 
prevailing high materials labor. route 
main line road definitely located miles 
point City, preliminary 
Pacific Railroad California made 
great bend River 
Numerous discoveries mines 
added many heretofore known, country occupied 
Nevada Rocky mountains 
labor, believed 
product mines precious region 
year reached, one hundred millions 

 
recommended last annual message Indian system 
Congress last session, acting upon 
recommendation, provide system California, 
believed present organization management 
Indians attended reasonable success. Much yet 
remains done provide proper government Indians 
parts country, render secure advancing 
provide welfare Secretary 
attention Congress 

 
liberal provisions made Congress paying pensions invalid 
soldiers sailors Republic widows, orphans, 
dependent mothers fallen battle died disease 
contracted wounds received service country 
diligently added pension 
rolls year ending 30th day June last names 
invalid soldiers seamen, making present 
number army invalid pensioners navy invalid pensioners 

 
widows, orphans, mothers placed army 
pension rolls navy present number army 
pensioners class navy pensioners 
beginning year number Revolutionary pensioners 
12 soldiers, since died. remainder 
law receive pensions 
Revolutionary soldiers. year ending 30th June, 1864, 
paid pensioners 
 
cheerfully commend continued patronage benevolent 
institutions District Columbia hitherto 
established Congress, respectfully refer 
information concerning relation Washington 
Capitol, matters local interest report 

 
Agricultural Department, supervision present 
energetic faithful head, rapidly great 
vital interest created advance peculiarly 
people's Department, feel directly concerned 
other. commend continued attention fostering care 
Congress. 
 
war Since last annual message important 
lines positions occupied forces maintained 
arms steadily thus regions left 
Missouri, Kentucky, Tennessee, parts 
States produced reasonably fair 
 
remarkable feature military operations year 
General attempted march miles directly 
insurgent region. tends show great increase relative 
strength General Chief feel able 
hold check every active force enemy, yet 
large army move result 
yet known, regard 
 
Important movements also occurred year effect 
society Union. Although short complete 
success, much fight direction citizens 
States Arkansas Louisiana organized loyal State 
governments, free constitutions, earnestly struggling 
maintain administer them. movements direction, 
extensive though less Missouri, Kentucky, Tennessee 
overlooked. Maryland presents example complete 
success. Maryland secure liberty union future. 
genius rebellion claim Maryland. Like another foul 
spirit driven out, may seek tear her, 

 
last session Congress proposed amendment 
Constitution abolishing slavery throughout United States passed 
Senate, failed lack requisite two-thirds vote 
House Representatives. Although present Congress 
nearly members, without questioning wisdom 
patriotism stood opposition, venture recommend 
passage measure present session. 
course abstract question intervening 
election shows almost certainly next Congress pass 
measure not. Hence question time 
proposed amendment go States action. 
go events, may agree sooner 
claimed election imposed duty 
members change views votes than, 
additional element considered, judgment may affected 
it. voice people first time heard upon 
question. great national crisis like unanimity action 
among seeking common end 
indispensable. yet approach unanimity 
unless deference shall paid majority simply 
majority. case common end 
maintenance Union, among means secure end 
will, election, declared favor 
constitutional amendment. 
 
reliable public purpose country 
derived popular elections. Judging recent canvass 
result, purpose people within loyal States 
maintain integrity Union never firm nearly 
unanimous now. extraordinary good order 
millions voters met mingled polls give strong 
assurance this. supported Union 
called, great majority opposing party also may 
fairly claimed entertain actuated purpose. 
argument effect candidate 
office whatever, high low, ventured seek votes avowal 
giving Union. much 
motives much heated controversy proper means best 
mode advancing Union cause, distinct issue Union 
Union politicians shown knowledge 
among people. affording people 
fair opportunity showing one another world 
firmness unanimity purpose, election vast value 
national cause. 
 
election exhibited another less valuable 
fact approach 
important branch national resources, living men. 
melancholy reflect war filled many 
carried many hearts, relief know that, 
compared fallen corps 
divisions brigades regiments formed fought 
gone existence, great majority men 
composed still living. true naval service. 
election returns prove this. many voters could else 
found. States regularly holding elections, four years 
ago, wit, California, Connecticut, Delaware, Illinois, Indiana, 
Iowa, Kentucky, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota, 
Missouri, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Ohio, Oregon, 
Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Vermont, West Virginia, Wisconsin, east 
votes now, cast then, showing aggregate 
added cast new 
States Kansas Nevada, States vote 1860, thus 
swelling aggregate increase 
three years half war table appended showing 
added number soldiers 
field Massachusetts, Rhode Island, New Jersey, Delaware, 
Indiana, Illinois, California, laws States 
could vote away homes, number less 
yet all. number organized Territories 
four years ago, white 
black, join us national arms press back insurgent lines. 
much shown, election. 
material inquire increase produced show 
would greater war, probably true. 
important fact remains demonstrated men 
war exhausted process 
gaining strength may need maintain 
contest men. Material resources 
complete abundant ever. 
 
national resources, then, and, believe, 
public purpose maintain 
national authority and, believe, 
manner continuing effort remains choose. careful 
consideration evidence accessible seems 
attempt negotiation insurgent leader could result 
good. would accept nothing short Union, 
precisely give. declarations 
effect explicit repeated. attempt deceive 
us. affords us excuse deceive ourselves. 
voluntarily Union; voluntarily yield it. 
us issue simple, inflexible. 
issue tried war decided victory. 
Southern people fail him, beaten. 
Either way would victory defeat following war. 
true, however, heads insurgent cause necessarily 
true follow. Although Union, 
can. them, know, already desire peace 
number may increase. moment peace simply 
laying arms submitting national authority 
Constitution. Alter much Government could not, 
would, maintain war them. loyal people would sustain 
allow it. questions remain, would adjust 
peaceful means legislation, courts, votes, operating 
constitutional lawful certain, 
possible, questions would beyond Executive power 
as, instance, admission members Congress 
whatever might require appropriation money. Executive power 
would greatly diminished cessation actual war. 
Pardons however, would still within 
Executive control. spirit temper control would 
exercised fairly judged past. 
 
year ago general pardon upon specified terms, 
offered except certain designated classes, 
time made known excepted classes still within 
contemplation special year many 
general provision, many would, 
signs bad faith led measures 
rendered practical process less easy certain. 
time also special pardons granted individuals 
excepted classes, voluntary application denied. Thus 
practically door full year open except 
condition make free is, 
custody still open all. time 
may come, probably come, public duty shall demand 
closed lieu measures heretofore shall 
adopted. presenting armed resistance 
national authority part insurgents 
indispensable condition ending war part 
Government, retract nothing heretofore said slavery. repeat 
declaration made year ago, remain present 
position shall attempt retract modify emancipation 
proclamation, shall return slavery person free 
terms proclamation acts Congress." 
people should, whatever mode means, make Executive duty 
persons, another, I, must 
instrument perform it. stating single condition peace mean 
simply say war cease part Government 
whenever shall ceased part began it. 
 
State - 1860 - 1864 
 
California - - 
 
- - 
 
- - 
 
Illinois - - 
 
Indiana - - 
 
Iowa - - 
 
Kentucky - - 
 
Maine - - 
 
Maryland - - 
 
Massachusetts - - 
 
Michigan - - 
 
Minnesota - - 
 
Missouri - - 
 
New - - 
 
New Jersey - - 
 
New York - - 
 
Ohio - - 
 
- - 
 
Pennsylvania - - 
 
Rhode Island - - 
 
Vermont - - 
 
West Virginia - - 
 
Wisconsin - - - 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ALBERT EINSTEIN REFERENCE 
 
SPECIAL GENERAL THEORY 
 
ALBERT EINSTEIN 
 
 
revised 
Special General Theory 
& 
First December, 
Robert W. 

B. 
Thanks Einstein Reference 
Einstein Reference 

 
file plain text 
many equations cannot presented plain text, 
supplied many equations figures 
 
 
CONTENTS 
 

 
Part Special Theory Relativity 
 
Physical Meaning Geometrical Propositions 
System Co-ordinates 
Space Time Classical Mechanics 
Galileian System Co-ordinates 
Principle Relativity (in Restricted Sense) 
Theorem Addition Velocities employed 
Classical Mechanics 
Apparent Law Propagation 
Light Principle Relativity 
Idea Time Physics 
Relativity 
Relativity Conception Distance 
Lorentz Transformation 
Behaviour Measuring-Rods Clocks Motion 
Theorem Addition Experiment 
Value Theory Relativity 
General Results Theory 
Special Theory Relativity 
Minkowski's Space 
 
 
Part General Theory Relativity 
 
Special General Principle Relativity 
Gravitational Field 
Equality Inertial Gravitational Mass Argument 
General Postulate Relativity 
Respects Foundations Classical Mechanics 
Special Theory Relativity 
Inferences General Principle Relativity 
Behaviour Clocks Measuring-Rods Rotating Body 
Reference 
Euclidean non-Euclidean Continuum 
Gaussian Co-ordinates 
Space-Time Continuum Theory Relativity 
Considered Euclidean Continuum 
Space-Time Continuum General Theory Relativity 
Continuum 
Exact Formulation General Principle Relativity 
Solution Problem Gravitation Basis 
General Principle Relativity 
 
 
Part Considerations Universe Whole 
 
Difficulties Theory 
Possibility yet Universe 
Structure Space According General Theory 
Relativity 
 
 

 
Simple Derivation Lorentz Transformation 
Minkowski's Four-Dimensional Space 
Experimental Confirmation General Theory Relativity 
Structure Space According General Theory 
Relativity 
Relativity Problem Space 
 
fifth Appendix added Einstein time 
fifteenth result still 
copyright restrictions cannot added without permission 

 
 
 

 
 
 
present book intended, far possible, give exact 
theory Relativity readers who, 
general scientific philosophical point view, interested 
theory, mathematical 
theoretical work standard education 
corresponding university examination, and, 
despite book, fair amount patience force 
part author spared 
pains endeavour present main ideas 
intelligible form, whole, 
connection actually originated. interest 
clearness, appeared inevitable repeat 
without paying slightest attention 
adhered 
brilliant theoretical physicist L. according 
matters ought left 
make pretence withheld reader difficulties 
inherent subject. hand, purposely 
treated empirical physical foundations theory 
readers physics may 
feel like unable see forest 
May book bring one happy hours 

 
December, 
A. EINSTEIN 
 
 
 
PART 
 
SPECIAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
PHYSICAL MEANING GEOMETRICAL PROPOSITIONS 
 
 
read book made acquaintance 
noble building geometry, remember -- 
perhaps respect love -- magnificent 
lofty staircase hours 
reason past experience, would 
certainly regard pronounce even 
proposition science untrue. 
perhaps feeling proud certainty would leave immediately 
one ask you: then, mean assertion 
propositions Let us proceed give 
question little consideration. 
 
Geometry sets form certain 
able associate less 
definite ideas, certain simple propositions which, 
virtue ideas, inclined accept Then, 
basis logical process, justification feel 
compelled admit, remaining propositions shown 
follow i.e. proposition 
correct derived recognised manner 
question "truth" individual geometrical 
propositions thus reduced one "truth" 
long known last question 
methods geometry, entirely without 
meaning. cannot ask whether true one straight line 
goes two points. say Euclidean geometry deals 
things called 
property determined two points situated it. 
assertions pure 
geometry, word habit 
designating always correspondence geometry, 
however, concerned relation ideas involved 
objects experience, logical connection 
ideas among themselves. 
 
difficult understand why, spite this, feel 
constrained call propositions geometry Geometrical 
ideas correspond less exact objects nature, 
last undoubtedly exclusive cause 
Geometry ought refrain course, order give 
structure largest possible logical practice, 
example, seeing two marked positions 
practically rigid body something deeply 
habit thought. accustomed regard three points 
situated straight line, apparent positions 
made observation one eye, suitable choice 
place 
 
If, pursuance habit thought, 
propositions Euclidean geometry single proposition two 
points practically rigid body always correspond 
distance independently changes position 
may subject body, propositions Euclidean geometry 
resolve propositions possible relative 
position practically rigid Geometry 
way treated branch 
ask "truth" geometrical 
propositions interpreted way, since justified asking 
whether propositions satisfied real things 
associated geometrical less exact terms 
express saying "truth" geometrical 
proposition sense understand validity 
construction rule 
 
course conviction "truth" geometrical propositions 
sense founded exclusively rather experience. 
present shall assume "truth" geometrical 
propositions, later stage (in general theory 
shall see "truth" shall 
consider extent 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) follows natural object associated also 
straight line. Three points A, B C rigid body thus lie 
straight line points C given, B chosen 
sum distances short possible. 
suggestion present purpose. 
 
 
 
SYSTEM CO-ORDINATES 
 
 
basis physical interpretation distance 
also position establish distance 
two points rigid body means purpose 
require " distance " used 
all, employ standard measure. If, now, B 
two points rigid body, construct line joining 
according rules geometry ; then, starting A, 
mark distance time time reach B. number 
operations required measure distance 
basis measurement length. * 
 
Every description scene event position 
object space based specification point rigid 
body event object 
applies scientific also 
life. place specification " Times Square, New 
arrive following result. earth rigid body 
specification place " Times Square, New 
point, name 
event 
 
method place specification deals places 
surface rigid bodies, dependent existence 
points surface other. 
free limitations without 
nature specification position. If, instance, cloud 
hovering Times Square, determine position 
relative surface earth 
Square, reaches 
length measured standard combined 
specification position foot 
supplies us complete place basis 
able see manner 
conception position 
 
(a) imagine rigid body, place specification 
manner object whose position 
require reached by. completed rigid body. 
 
(b) position object, make use number 
length measured instead 
designated points reference. 
 
speak height cloud even 
reaches cloud means 
observations cloud different positions ground, 
taking account properties propagation light, 
determine length required order 
reach 
 
consideration see advantageous if, 
description position, possible means 
measures make independent existence marked 
positions rigid body reference. 
physics measurement attained application 
Cartesian system co-ordinates. 
 
consists three plane 
rigidly attached rigid body. Referred system 
scene event determined (for main 
specification lengths three 
co-ordinates y, dropped scene 
event three plane lengths three 
determined series 
rigid measuring-rods performed according rules methods laid 
Euclidean geometry. 
 
practice, rigid constitute system 
co-ordinates generally available ; furthermore, magnitudes 
co-ordinates actually determined constructions 
rigid rods, indirect means. results physics 
maintain clearness, physical meaning 
position must always sought accordance 
*** 
 
thus obtain following Every description events 
space involves use rigid body events 
resulting takes granted laws 
Euclidean geometry hold 
represented physically means convention two marks 
rigid body. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
* assumed nothing left i.e. 
measurement gives whole number. difficulty got 
use divided measuring-rods, introduction 
demand new 
 
Einstein used original 
translation 
Square, changed Square, New 
well English speakers 
present day. 
 
necessary investigate significance 
expression conception 
sufficiently obvious differences opinion 
scarcely likely arise practice. 
 
*** modification views become 
necessary come deal general theory relativity, 
treated second part book. 
 
 
 
SPACE TIME CLASSICAL MECHANICS 
 
 
purpose mechanics describe bodies change 
position space conscience grave 
sacred spirit 
mechanics way, without serious reflection detailed 
Let us proceed 
 
clear understood 
stand window railway carriage 
travelling drop stone embankment, without 
throwing it. Then, disregarding influence air resistance, 
see stone descend straight line. 
stone falls earth 

stone lie "in straight line Moreover, 
meant motion "in ? considerations 
previous section answer first place 
entirely vague word which, must honestly 
cannot form slightest replace 
relative practically rigid body 
positions relative body reference carriage 
already defined detail preceding 
section. instead " body reference " insert " system 
useful idea mathematical 
position say : stone straight line 
relative system co-ordinates rigidly attached carriage, 
relative system co-ordinates rigidly attached 
ground aid 
example clearly seen thing 
independently existing 
relative particular body reference. 
 
order complete description motion, must specify 
body alters position time ; i.e. every point 
must stated time body situated 
there. must definition time 
that, virtue regarded 
essentially magnitudes capable 
take stand ground classical 
mechanics, satisfy illustration 
following manner. imagine two clocks identical construction ; 
man window holding one them, 
man other. determines 
position reference-body occupied stone 
clock holding hand. connection 
taken account involved 
velocity propagation light. second 
difficulty prevailing shall deal detail later. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) is, along body 
 
 
 
GALILEIAN SYSTEM CO-ORDINATES 
 
 
well known, fundamental law mechanics 
known law stated 
thus: body removed sufficiently far bodies continues 
state rest uniform motion straight line. law 
says something motion bodies, also 
reference-bodies systems 
mechanics, used mechanical visible 
fixed stars bodies law inertia certainly holds 
high degree use system co-ordinates 
rigidly attached earth, then, relative system, 
every fixed star circle immense radius course 
day, result opposed statement 
law adhere law must refer 
motions systems relative fixed 
stars move system co-ordinates 
state motion law inertia holds relative 
called " Galileian system laws 
mechanics regarded valid 
Galileian system co-ordinates. 
 
 
 
PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
(IN RESTRICTED SENSE) 
 
 
order attain greatest possible clearness, let us return 
example railway carriage supposed travelling 
call motion uniform translation 
constant velocity direction, " translation " 
although carriage changes position relative embankment 
yet Let us imagine flying 
air manner motion, observed 
embankment, uniform straight line. observe 
flying moving railway carriage. find 
motion would one different velocity 
direction, would still uniform straight line. 
Expressed abstract manner may say : mass m moving 
uniformly straight line respect co-ordinate system K, 
also moving uniformly straight line relative 
second co-ordinate system K1 provided latter 
executing uniform motion respect K. 
accordance discussion contained preceding section, 
follows that: 
 
K Galileian co-ordinate system. every co-ordinate 
system Galileian one, when, relation K, 
condition uniform motion Relative K1 
mechanical laws hold good exactly 
respect K. 
 
advance step farther generalisation express 
thus: If, relative K, K1 uniformly moving co-ordinate 
system natural phenomena run course 
respect K1 according exactly general laws 
respect K. statement called principle relativity (in 
restricted 
 
long one convinced natural phenomena capable 
representation help classical mechanics, 
need doubt validity principle relativity. 
view recent development electrodynamics 
became evident classical mechanics affords 
foundation physical description natural 
juncture question validity 
principle relativity became ripe discussion, 
appear impossible answer question might 
negative. 
 
Nevertheless, two general facts outset speak 
much favour validity principle relativity. 
Even though classical mechanics supply us sufficiently 
broad basis theoretical presentation physical 
still must grant considerable measure " 
since supplies us actual motions heavenly bodies 
delicacy detail little short wonderful. principle 
relativity must therefore apply great accuracy domain 
principle broad hold 
one domain yet 
invalid another, 
 
proceed second argument, which, moreover, shall 
return later. principle relativity (in restricted sense) 
hold, Galileian co-ordinate systems K, K1, etc., 
moving uniformly relative other, 
equivalent description natural case 
constrained believe natural laws capable 
formulated particularly simple manner, course 
condition that, amongst possible Galileian co-ordinate 
chosen one particular state 
motion body reference. justified 
merits description natural calling 
system " absolutely Galileian systems K " 
If, instance, embankment system 
railway carriage would system K, relative less 
simple laws would hold respect diminished 
simplicity would due fact carriage K would 
motion respect general laws 
nature formulated reference K, magnitude 
direction velocity carriage would necessarily play 
part. instance, note emitted 
placed parallel direction travel 
would different emitted pipe 
placed direction. 
 
virtue motion orbit round sun, earth 
railway carriage travelling velocity 
30 per second. principle relativity 
valid therefore expect direction motion 
earth moment would enter laws nature, also 
physical systems behaviour would dependent 
space respect earth. owing 
alteration direction velocity revolution earth 
course year, earth cannot rest relative 
system throughout whole year. However, 
careful observations never revealed properties 
physical space, i.e. physical 
different directions. powerful argument favour 
principle relativity. 
 
 
 
THEOREM 
ADDITION VELOCITIES 
EMPLOYED CLASSICAL MECHANICS 
 
 
Let us suppose old friend railway carriage travelling 
along rails constant velocity man 
length carriage direction travel velocity 
w. quickly or, words, velocity W man 
advance relative embankment process ? 
possible answer seems result following 
man stand still second, would advance relative 
embankment distance v equal velocity 
carriage. consequence however, 
additional distance w relative carriage, hence 
also relative embankment, second, distance w 
equal velocity Thus 
total covers distance relative embankment 
second considered. shall see later result, 
expresses theorem addition velocities employed 
classical mechanics, cannot maintained ; words, law 
written hold reality. time 
being, however, shall assume 
 
 
 
APPARENT 
LAW PROPAGATION LIGHT 
PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
 
 
hardly law physics according 
light propagated empty space. Every child school knows, 
believes knows, propagation takes place straight lines 
velocity 300,000 events know great 
velocity 
case, would observed 
simultaneously different eclipse fixed 
star dark means similar considerations based 
double stars, De 
also able show velocity propagation light cannot 
depend velocity motion body light. 
assumption velocity propagation dependent 
direction "in 
 
short, let us assume simple law constancy 
velocity light c (in justifiably believed child 
would imagine simple law plunged 
conscientiously thoughtful physicist greatest intellectual 
Let us consider difficulties 
 
course must refer process propagation light (and 
indeed every rigid reference-body 
system let us choose embankment. shall 
imagine air removed. ray light 
sent along embankment, see tip 
ray transmitted velocity c relative 
embankment. let us suppose railway carriage 
travelling along railway lines velocity 
direction ray light, velocity 
course much Let us inquire velocity propagation 
ray light relative carriage. obvious 
apply consideration previous section, since ray 
light plays part man walking along relatively 
carriage. velocity w man relative embankment 
replaced velocity light relative embankment. w 
required velocity light respect carriage, 
 
                               w = 
 
velocity propagation ray light relative carriage 
thus comes cut smaller c. 
 
result comes conflict principle relativity 
set forth Section V. For, like every general law 
nature, law transmission light vacuo 
must, according principle relativity, 
railway carriage reference-body rails body 
reference. But, consideration, would appear 
impossible. every ray light propagated relative 
embankment velocity c, reason would appear 
another law propagation light must necessarily hold 
respect carriage -- result principle 
relativity. 
 
view appears nothing else 
abandon either principle relativity simple law 
propagation light carefully 
followed preceding discussion almost sure expect 
retain principle relativity, appeals 
intellect natural simple. 
law propagation light vacuo would 
replaced complicated law principle 
relativity. development theoretical physics shows, however, 
cannot pursue course. theoretical 
H. A. Lorentz 
phenomena connected moving bodies show experience 
domain leads conclusively theory electromagnetic 
law constancy velocity light vacuo 
necessary consequence. Prominent theoretical physicists 
inclined reject principle relativity, spite 
fact empirical found 
principle. 
 
juncture theory relativity entered 
result physical time space, 
became evident least 
principle relativity law 
propagation light, holding fast 
laws logically rigid theory could arrived at. theory 
called special theory relativity distinguish 
extended theory, shall deal later. 
following pages shall present fundamental ideas special 
theory relativity. 
 
 
 
IDEA TIME PHYSICS 
 
 
Lightning struck rails railway embankment two places 
B far distant other. make additional assertion 
two lightning flashes occurred ask 
whether sense statement, answer question 
decided "Yes." approach request 
explain sense statement find 
consideration answer question 
easy appears first sight. 
 
time perhaps following answer would occur you: "The 
significance statement clear needs 
course would require consideration 
commissioned determine observations whether actual 
case two events took place simultaneously not." cannot 
satisfied answer following reason. Supposing 
result ingenious considerations able 
discover lightning must always strike places B 
faced task testing 
whether theoretical result accordance 
reality. encounter difficulty physical statements 
conception " simultaneous " plays part. 
exist physicist possibility 
whether actual case. thus 
require definition definition 
supplies us method means which, present case, 
decide experiment whether lightning 
occurred long satisfied, 
allow deceived physicist (and course 
applies imagine able 
attach meaning statement (I would ask 
reader proceed farther fully convinced 

 
thinking matter time offer 
following suggestion test measuring 
along connecting line measured 
observer placed M distance observer 
supplied arrangement (e.g. two inclined 
allows observe places B 
time. observer two flashes lightning 
time, 
 
pleased suggestion, cannot 
regard matter quite settled, feel constrained 
raise following 
 
"Your definition would certainly right, knew 
light means observer M lightning 
flashes along length arrow M velocity 
along length B arrow M. examination supposition 
would possible already disposal means 
measuring time. would thus appear though moving 
logical 
 
consideration cast somewhat glance 
-- rightly -- 
 
"I maintain previous definition nevertheless, reality 
assumes absolutely nothing light. one demand 
made definition namely, every real 
case must supply us empirical decision whether 
conception defined fulfilled. definition 
demand light requires 
time path arrow M path B arrow M 
reality neither supposition hypothesis physical 
nature light, stipulation make 
order arrive definition 
 
clear definition used give exact meaning 
two events, many events care choose, 
independently positions scenes events 
respect body reference * railway 
thus led also definition " time " 
purpose suppose clocks identical construction placed 
points A, B C railway line 
set manner positions 
simultaneously (in sense) same. 
conditions understand " time " event reading 
one clocks 
immediate vicinity (in event. manner 
associated every event essentially capable 

 
stipulation contains physical hypothesis, validity 
hardly doubted without empirical evidence 
contrary. assumed clocks go 
rate identical Stated 
two clocks arranged rest different places reference-body 
set manner particular position 
one clock simultaneous (in sense) 
position, identical " 
" always simultaneous (in sense 

 
 
  Notes 
 
*) suppose further, that, three events A, B C occur 
different places manner simultaneous B B 
simultaneous C sense 
pair 
events A, C also satisfied. assumption physical 
hypothesis propagation must certainly 
maintain law constancy 
velocity light 
 
 
 
RELATIVITY 
 
 
considerations referred particular body 
reference, " railway suppose 
long train travelling along rails constant 
velocity v direction indicated 1. People travelling 
train view train rigid 
reference-body regard events 
 
                       Fig. file 
 
 
reference train. every event takes place along 
line also takes place particular point train. Also 
definition given relative train 
exactly way respect embankment. natural 
consequence, however, following question arises : 
 
two events (e.g. two lightning 
simultaneous reference railway embankment also 
simultaneous relatively shall show directly 
answer must negative. 
 
say lightning B simultaneous 
respect embankment, rays light emitted 
places B, lightning occurs, meet 
M length arrow B embankment. events 
B also correspond positions B train. Let 
distance arrow B travelling train. 
flashes (as judged lightning occur, 
point naturally point M moves 
towards right velocity v train. 
observer sitting position train possess 
would remain permanently light 
rays emitted flashes lightning B would reach 
i.e. would meet 
reality reference railway 
towards light coming B, whilst 
ahead light coming A. Hence observer 
see light emitted B earlier see 
emitted A. take railway train 
reference-body must therefore come conclusion 
lightning flash B took place earlier lightning flash A. 
thus arrive important 
 
Events simultaneous reference embankment 
simultaneous respect train, vice 
Every reference-body 
particular time ; unless told reference-body 
statement time meaning statement 
time event. 
 
theory relativity always 
assumed physics statement time 
absolute i.e. independent state 
motion body reference. seen 
assumption incompatible natural definition 
discard assumption, conflict 
law propagation light vacuo principle 
relativity Section 
 
led conflict considerations Section 6, 
longer section concluded 
man carriage, distance w per second relative 
carriage, distance also respect 
embankment second time. But, according foregoing 
considerations, time required particular 
respect carriage must considered equal duration 
judged embankment (as 
Hence cannot contended man walking 
distance w relative railway line time 
equal one second judged embankment. 
 
Moreover, considerations Section 6 based yet second 
assumption, which, light strict consideration, appears 
although always made even 
introduction theory relativity. 
 
 
 
RELATIVITY CONCEPTION DISTANCE 
 
 
Let us consider two particular points train * travelling 
along embankment velocity inquire 
distance already know necessary body 
reference measurement distance, respect 
body distance measured up. plan use 
train reference-body observer 
train measures interval measuring-rod 
straight line (e.g. along floor many times 
necessary take one marked point other. 
number tells us often rod laid 
required distance. 
 
different matter distance judged 
railway line. following method suggests itself. call 
two points train whose distance apart 
required, points moving velocity v 
along embankment. first place require determine 
points B embankment passed 
two points particular time -- judged 
embankment. points B embankment determined 
applying definition time given Section distance 
points B measured repeated application 
measuring-rod along embankment. 
 
means certain last measurement 
supply us result first. Thus length 
train measured embankment may different 
obtained measuring train itself. circumstance leads us 
second objection must raised apparently 
obvious consideration Section 6. Namely, man 
carriage covers distance w unit time -- measured 
train, -- distance -- measured embankment -- 
necessarily also equal w. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) e.g. middle first hundredth carriage. 
 
 
 
LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION 
 
 
results last three sections show apparent 
law propagation light principle 
relativity derived means 
consideration borrowed two hypotheses 
classical follows: 
 
(1) two events independent 
condition motion body reference. 
 
(2) two points rigid body 
independent condition motion body reference. 
 
drop Section 
theorem addition velocities derived 
Section 6 becomes possibility presents 
law propagation light vacuo may compatible 
principle relativity, question 
modify considerations Section 6 order remove 
apparent two fundamental results 
question leads general one. discussion 
Section 6 places times relative 
train embankment. find place time 
event relation train, know place time 
event respect railway embankment ? 
answer question nature law 
transmission light vacuo contradict principle 
relativity ? words : conceive relation 
place time individual events relative 
every ray light possesses velocity 
transmission c relative embankment relative train 
? question leads quite definite positive answer, 
perfectly definite transformation law space-time magnitudes 
event changing one body reference another. 
 
deal this, shall introduce following incidental 
consideration. present considered events taking 
place along embankment, assume 
straight line. manner indicated Section 2 
imagine reference-body 
direction means framework rods, event 
takes place anywhere reference 
Fig. 2 imagine train travelling 
velocity v continued across whole space, 
every event, matter far may be, could also 
respect second Without committing 
fundamental error, disregard fact reality 
would continually interfere other, owing 
solid bodies. every framework imagine 
three marked out, designated 
" co-ordinate " (" co-ordinate system co-ordinate 
system K corresponds embankment, co-ordinate system 
train. event, wherever may taken place, would 
fixed space respect K three x, y, z 
co-ordinate regard time time value t. 
Relative K1, event would fixed respect space 
time corresponding values course 
identical x, y, z, t. already set forth detail 
magnitudes regarded results physical 

 
Obviously problem exactly formulated following 
manner. values event respect 
K1, magnitudes x, y, z, t, event respect 
K given ? relations must chosen law 
transmission light vacuo satisfied one ray 
light (and course every respect K K1. 
relative space co-ordinate systems indicated 
problem means 
equations : 
 
                         eq. file 
 
                                = y 
                                = z 
 
                         eq. file 
 
system equations known " Lorentz * 
 
place law transmission light taken 
basis assumptions older mechanics absolute 
character times instead 
obtained following 
 
                             x1 = x - 
                                = y 
                                = z 
                                t1 = 
 
system equations often " Galilei 
Galilei transformation obtained 
Lorentz transformation substituting infinitely large value 
velocity light c latter transformation. 
 
Aided following readily see that, 
accordance Lorentz transformation, law 
transmission light vacuo satisfied 
reference-body K reference-body K1. sent 
along positive advances 
accordance equation 
 
                               x = 
 
i.e. velocity c. According equations Lorentz 
transformation, simple relation x involves 
relation x1 point fact, substitute x 
value first fourth equations Lorentz 
transformation, 
 
                         eq. file 
 
 
                         eq. file 
 
which, division, expression 
 
                               x1 = 
 
immediately referred system K1, propagation 
light takes place according thus see 
velocity transmission relative reference-body K1 also 
equal c. result obtained rays light advancing 
direction cause since 
equations Lorentz transformation derived 
point view. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) simple derivation Lorentz transformation given 
Appendix I. 
 
 
 
BEHAVIOUR MEASURING-RODS CLOCKS MOTION 
 
 
Place K1 manner one end 
(the point whilst end 
(the end point length 
relatively system order learn this, 
need ask beginning rod end rod 
lie respect K particular time system K. means 
first equation Lorentz transformation values 
two points time = shown 
 
                       eq. file 
 
 
                       eq. file 
 
 
distance points eq. . 
 
moving velocity v relative K. 
therefore follows length rigid moving 
direction length velocity v eq. 
 
rigid rod thus shorter motion rest, 
quickly shorter 
velocity eq. 
 
greater velocities becomes 
conclude theory relativity velocity c 
plays part limiting neither reached 
real body. 
 
course feature velocity c limiting velocity also 
clearly follows equations Lorentz transformation, 
became choose values v greater c. 
 
If, contrary, considered rest 
respect K, found length 
rod judged K1 would eq. ; 
 
quite accordance principle relativity 
forms basis 
 
quite clear must able learn something 
physical behaviour measuring-rods clocks 
equations transformation, magnitudes z, y, x, t, 
nothing less results 
means measuring-rods based considerations 
Galileian transformation obtained 
contraction rod consequence motion. 
 
Let us consider permanently situated 
origin K1. two successive 
first fourth equations Lorentz 
transformation give two : 
 
                                = 
 

 
                        eq. file 
 
judged K, clock moving velocity judged 
reference-body, time two 
clock one second, 
 
                        eq. file 
 
i.e. somewhat larger time. consequence motion 
clock goes slowly rest. also velocity c 
plays part limiting 
 
 
 
THEOREM ADDITION 
EXPERIMENT 
 
 
practice move clocks measuring-rods 
velocities small compared velocity hence 
shall hardly able compare results previous section 
directly reality. But, hand, results must 
strike reason shall 
draw another conclusion theory, one easily 
derived foregoing considerations, 
confirmed experiment. 
 
Section 6 derived theorem addition velocities 
one direction form also results hypotheses 
classical theorem also deduced readily 
Galilei transformation place man walking 
inside carriage, introduce point moving relatively 
co-ordinate system K1 accordance equation 
 
                               x1 = 
 
means first fourth equations Galilei 
transformation express x1 t1 terms x t, 
obtain 
 
                             x = + 
 
equation expresses nothing else law motion 
point reference system K man reference 
velocity 
Section 6, 
 
                                   
 
carry consideration well basis 
theory relativity. equation 
 
                         x1 =         
 
must express t1 terms x t, making use 
first fourth equations Lorentz transformation. Instead 
equation (A) obtain equation 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
corresponds theorem addition velocities one 
direction according theory relativity. question 
arises two better accord 
experience. point axe enlightened important 
experiment brilliant physicist performed 
half century ago, repeated since 
best experimental doubt 
result. experiment concerned following question. 
Light liquid particular velocity w. 
quickly travel direction arrow tube 
accompanying Fig. liquid 
mentioned flowing tube velocity v ? 
 
accordance principle relativity shall certainly 
take granted propagation light always takes place 
velocity w respect whether 
latter motion reference bodies not. 
velocity light relative liquid velocity 
latter relative tube thus known, require 
velocity light relative 
 
clear problem Section 6 us. 
tube plays part railway embankment co-ordinate 
system K, liquid plays part carriage 
co-ordinate system K1, finally, light plays part 
 
                      Figure file 
 
 
man walking along carriage, moving point present 
section. velocity light relative tube 
given equation (A) according 
Galilei transformation Lorentz transformation corresponds 
facts. Experiment * decides favour equation (B) derived 
theory relativity, agreement is, indeed, 
According recent excellent 
influence velocity flow v propagation light 
represented formula (B) within one per cent. 
 
Nevertheless must draw attention fact theory 
given H. A. Lorentz long statement 
theory relativity. theory purely 
nature, obtained use particular 
hypotheses electromagnetic structure matter. 
circumstance, however, least 
experiment test favour 
theory relativity, electrodynamics 
original theory way theory 
relativity. Rather latter developed electrodynamics 
simple combination generalisation 
formerly independent other, 
electrodynamics 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) found eq. 10 eq. 11 
 
hand, owing 
eq. 12 compared I, 
 
replace (B) first place eq. order 

 
eq. 14 agrees result. 
 
 
 
VALUE THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
train thought foregoing pages 
following manner. Experience led conviction that, 
one hand, principle relativity holds true 
hand velocity transmission light vacuo 
considered equal constant c. two 
obtained law transformation co-ordinates x, 
y, z time events constitute processes 
nature. connection obtain Galilei 
transformation, but, differing classical mechanics, Lorentz 
transformation. 
 
law transmission light, acceptance justified 
actual knowledge, played important part process 
thought. possession Lorentz transformation, however, 
principle relativity, sum 
theory thus: 
 
Every general law nature must constituted 
transformed law exactly form when, instead 
space-time x, y, z, original coordinate system K, 
introduce new space-time t1 co-ordinate 
system K1. connection relation ordinary 
magnitudes given Lorentz transformation. 
brief : General laws nature respect Lorentz 

 
definite mathematical condition theory 
relativity demands natural law, virtue this, theory 
becomes valuable aid search general laws 
nature. general law nature found 
satisfy condition, least one two fundamental 
assumptions theory would Let us 
examine general results latter theory hitherto 
 
 
 
GENERAL RESULTS THEORY 
 
 
clear previous considerations theory 
relativity grown electrodynamics 
fields altered theory, 
considerably theoretical i.e. 
derivation laws, -- important -- 
considerably reduced number independent forming 
basis theory. special theory relativity rendered 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory latter would 
generally accepted physicists even experiment decided less 
favour. 
 
Classical mechanics required modified could come 
line demands special theory relativity. 
main part, however, modification laws rapid 
velocities matter v small 
compared velocity light. experience rapid 
motions case motions 
laws classical mechanics small make 
evident practice. shall consider motion 
stars come speak general theory relativity. 
accordance theory relativity energy 
material point mass m longer given well-known 
expression 
 
                        eq. file 
 
expression 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
expression approaches velocity v approaches 
velocity light c. velocity must therefore always remain less 
c, however great may energies used produce 
develop expression energy 
form obtain 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
eq. small compared third terms 
always small comparison second, 
 
last alone considered classical first term 
contain requires consideration 
dealing question energy 
depends shall speak essential 
significance later. 
 
important result general character special 
theory relativity led concerned conception 
relativity, physics recognised two conservation 
laws fundamental importance, namely, law 
energy law conservation mass two fundamental 
laws appeared quite independent other. means 
theory relativity united one law. shall 
briefly consider came about, meaning 
attached it. 
 
principle relativity requires law 
energy hold reference co-ordinate system 
K, also respect every co-ordinate system K1 
state uniform motion translation relative K, or, briefly, 
relative every " Galileian " system co-ordinates. contrast 
classical Lorentz transformation deciding 
one system another. 
 
means comparatively simple considerations led draw 
following conclusion conjunction 
fundamental equations electrodynamics body moving 
velocity absorbs * amount energy 
form without suffering alteration velocity 
process, has, consequence, energy increased amount 
 
                        eq. file 
 
consideration expression given energy 
body, required energy body comes 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
Thus body energy body mass 
 
                         file 
 
moving velocity v. Hence say: body takes 
amount energy inertial mass increases amount 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
inertial mass body constant according 
change energy body. inertial mass system 
bodies even regarded measure energy. law 
conservation mass system becomes identical law 
conservation energy, valid provided system 
neither takes energy. Writing expression 
energy form 
 
                        eq. file 
 
see term hitherto attracted attention, 
nothing else energy possessed body 
absorbed energy 
 
direct comparison relation experiment possible 
present time see *** Note, p. owing fact 
changes energy Subject system 
large enough make change 
inertial mass system. 
 
                                eq. file 
 
 
small comparison mass present 
alteration energy. owing circumstance 
classical mechanics able establish successfully 
conservation mass law independent 
 
Let add final remark fundamental nature. success 
interpretation electromagnetic action distance 
resulted physicists becoming convinced 
things actions distance (not involving 
type Newton's law gravitation. 
According theory relativity, action distance 
velocity light always takes place action 
distance action distance infinite velocity 
connected fact velocity c 
plays fundamental role theory. Part shall see 
way result becomes modified general theory 
relativity. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) energy taken up, judged co-ordinate system 
moving body. 
 
judged co-ordinate system moving body. 
 
equation = thoroughly proved time 
since time. 
 
 
 
EXPERIENCE SPECIAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
extent special theory relativity supported 
 question easily answered reason 
already mentioned connection fundamental experiment 
special theory relativity 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory electromagnetic Thus facts 
experience support electromagnetic theory also support 
theory relativity. particular importance, mention 
fact theory relativity enables us 
effects produced light reaching us fixed 
results obtained exceedingly simple manner, effects 
due relative motion earth 
reference fixed stars found accord 
experience. refer movement apparent position 
fixed stars resulting motion earth round 
sun influence 
relative motions fixed stars respect earth 
colour light reaching us them. latter effect 
slight displacement spectral lines light 
transmitted us fixed compared position 
spectral lines produced source 
light experimental arguments favour 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory, time arguments 
favour theory relativity, numerous set forth 
here. reality limit theoretical possibilities 
extent, theory Maxwell Lorentz 
able hold tested experience. 
 
two classes experimental facts hitherto obtained 
represented Maxwell-Lorentz theory 
introduction hypothesis, -- i.e. 
without making use theory relativity -- appears 
 
known rays so-called emitted 
consist particles 
small inertia large examining 
deflection rays influence electric magnetic 
fields, study law motion particles 
exactly. 
 
theoretical treatment faced 
difficulty theory unable give 
account nature. since electrical masses one sign repel 
other, negative electrical masses constituting electron 
would necessarily scattered influence mutual 
unless forces another kind operating 
them, nature hitherto remained obscure   
assume relative distances electrical 
masses constituting electron remain motion 
electron connection sense classical 
arrive law motion electron agree 
experience. Guided purely formal points view, H. A. Lorentz 
first introduce hypothesis form electron 
experiences contraction direction motion consequence 
motion. contracted length proportional 
expression 
 
                        eq. file 
 
This, hypothesis, 
facts, supplies us particular law motion 
confirmed great precision recent years. 
 
theory relativity leads law motion, without 
requiring special hypothesis structure 
behaviour arrived similar conclusion 
Section connection experiment result 
theory relativity without necessity 
drawing hypotheses physical nature 
 
second class facts alluded reference 
question whether motion earth space 
made already remarked 
Section 5 attempts nature led negative 
result. theory relativity put forward, 
difficult become negative result, reasons 
prejudices time space 
allow doubt arise prime importance 
Galileian transformation changing one body reference 
another. assuming Maxwell-Lorentz equations hold 
reference-body K, find hold 
reference-body K1 moving uniformly respect K, assume 
relations Galileian exist 
co-ordinates K K1. thus appears that, Galileian 
co-ordinate one corresponding particular state 
motion physically result interpreted physically 
regarding K rest respect space. 
hand, coordinate systems K1 moving relatively K 
regarded motion respect 
motion K1 " relative 
attributed complicated laws supposed hold 
relative K1. Strictly speaking, ought also 
assumed relative earth, long time efforts 
physicists devoted attempts existence 
earth's surface. 
 
one notable attempts devised 
method appears though must Imagine two 
arranged rigid body face 
other. ray light requires perfectly definite time 
pass one back again, whole system 
rest respect found calculation, 
however, slightly different time T1 required 
process, body, together moving relatively 
yet another point: shown calculation 
given velocity v reference time T1 
different body moving 
resulting motion parallel 
Although estimated difference two times 
exceedingly small, performed experiment 
involving interference difference 
clearly experiment gave negative result -- 
fact Lorentz 
theory difficulty assuming motion body 
relative produces contraction body 
direction motion, amount contraction sufficient 
compensate time mentioned above. Comparison 
discussion Section 11 shows also 
standpoint theory relativity solution difficulty 
right one. basis theory relativity 
method interpretation satisfactory. According 
theory thing " specially favoured " 
co-ordinate system occasion introduction 
hence experiment 
demonstrate it. contraction moving bodies 
follows two fundamental principles theory, without 
introduction particular hypotheses ; prime 
involved contraction find, motion itself, 
cannot attach meaning, motion respect 
body reference chosen particular case point. Thus 
co-ordinate system moving earth system 

co-ordinate system rest relatively sun. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) general theory relativity renders likely 
electrical masses electron held together gravitational 
forces. 
 
 
 
MINKOWSKI'S FOUR-DIMENSIONAL SPACE 
 
 
seized mysterious 
things, feeling unlike 
awakened thoughts yet 
statement world live 
four-dimensional space-time continuum. 
 
Space three-dimensional continuum. mean 
possible describe position point means 
three numbers x, y, z, indefinite 
number points neighbourhood one, position 
described co-ordinates x[1], 
may near choose respective values 
co-ordinates x, y, z, first point. virtue latter 
property speak " owing fact 
three co-ordinates speak " 
 
world physical phenomena briefly called " 
world " naturally four space-time 
sense. composed individual events, 
described four numbers, namely, three space co-ordinates x, y, z, 
time time value t. sense 
also every event many 
events least care choose, 
co-ordinates x[1], differ indefinitely 
small amount event x, y, z, originally considered. 
accustomed regard world sense 
four-dimensional continuum due fact 
theory relativity, time played different 
independent compared space 
reason habit treating time 
independent continuum. matter fact, according classical 
mechanics, time i.e. independent position 
condition motion system co-ordinates. see 
expressed last equation Galileian transformation = 

 
four-dimensional mode consideration natural 
theory relativity, since according theory time 
independence. shown fourth equation 
Lorentz 
 
                        eq. file 
 
 
Moreover, according equation time difference two 
events respect K1 general even 
time difference events reference K 
Pure " " two events respect K results " 
" events respect K. 
discovery importance formal 
development theory relativity, lie here. 
found rather fact recognition 
four-dimensional space-time continuum theory relativity, 
essential formal shows pronounced 
three-dimensional continuum Euclidean geometrical 
 order give due prominence 
however, must replace usual time co-ordinate imaginary 
magnitude eq. 25 proportional it. conditions, 
natural laws satisfying demands theory 
relativity assume mathematical forms, time co-ordinate 
plays exactly role three space co-ordinates. 
four co-ordinates correspond exactly three space 
co-ordinates Euclidean geometry. must clear even 
that, consequence purely formal 
addition knowledge, theory gained 
mean measure. 
 
inadequate remarks give reader vague notion 
important idea Without general 
theory relativity, fundamental ideas developed 
following pages, would perhaps got farther long 
Minkowski's work doubtless difficult access anyone 
mathematics, since necessary 
exact work order understand fundamental 
ideas either special general theory relativity, 
shall leave present, towards end 
Part 2. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) somewhat detailed discussion Appendix II. 
 
 
 
 
PART 
 
GENERAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
SPECIAL GENERAL PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
 
 
principle, previous 
considerations, special principle relativity, i.e. 
principle physical relativity uniform motion. Let 
meaning carefully. 
 
times clear that, point view idea 
us, every motion must considered relative 
motion. Returning illustration frequently used 
embankment railway carriage, express fact 
motion taking place following two forms, 
equally : 
 
(a) carriage motion relative embankment, 
(b) embankment motion relative carriage. 
 
(a) embankment, (b) carriage, body 
reference statement motion taking place. simply 
question describing motion 
principle immaterial reference-body refer motion. 
already mentioned, self-evident, must confused 
much comprehensive statement called "the principle 
taken basis 
 
principle made use may 
equally well choose carriage embankment 
reference-body description event (for this, too, 
principle rather asserts follows : 
general laws nature obtained 
experience, making use 
 
(a) embankment reference-body, 
(b) railway carriage reference-body, 
 
general laws nature (e.g. laws mechanics 
law propagation light exactly form 
cases. also expressed follows : 
physical description natural neither reference 
bodies K, K1 unique " specially marked compared 
other. Unlike first, latter statement need 
necessity hold contained " 
" reference-body " them; 
experience decide correctness 
 
present, however, means maintained 
bodies reference K connection 
formulation natural laws. course following 
first place, started assumption 
exists reference-body K, whose condition motion 
Galileian law holds respect : left 
sufficiently far removed particles moves 
uniformly straight line. reference K 
laws nature simple possible. 
addition K, bodies reference K1 given 
preference sense, exactly equivalent K 
formulation natural laws, provided state 
uniform motion respect K ; 
bodies reference regarded Galileian 
validity principle relativity 
assumed others (e.g. 
possessing motion different sense speak 
special principle relativity, special theory 
relativity. 
 
contrast wish understand "general principle 
following statement : bodies reference K, K1, 
etc., equivalent description natural phenomena 
general laws whatever may 
state motion. proceeding ought pointed 
formulation must replaced later abstract 
one, reasons become evident later 
 
Since introduction special principle relativity 
justified, every intellect generalisation must 
feel temptation venture step towards general principle 
relativity. simple apparently quite reliable 
consideration seems suggest that, present rate, 
little hope success Let us imagine 
transferred old friend railway carriage, 
travelling uniform long moving 
carriage sensible motion, 
reason without interpret facts 
case carriage rest, embankment 
motion. Moreover, according special principle relativity, 
interpretation quite justified also physical point 
view. 
 
motion carriage changed 
motion, instance powerful application 
carriage experiences powerful 
motion manifested mechanical 
behaviour bodies relative person railway carriage. 
mechanical behaviour different case previously 
considered, reason would appear impossible 
mechanical laws hold relatively moving 
carriage, hold reference carriage rest 
uniform motion. events clear Galileian law 
hold respect moving carriage. 
this, feel compelled present juncture grant kind 
absolute physical reality motion, opposition 
general principle follows shall soon see 
conclusion cannot maintained. 
 
 
 
GRAVITATIONAL FIELD 
 
 
"If pick stone let go, fall 
ground usual answer question is: "Because 
attracted Modern physics answer rather 
differently following reason. result careful 
study electromagnetic come regard action 
distance process impossible without intervention 
medium. If, instance, piece 
cannot content regard meaning 
acts directly iron empty space, 
constrained imagine -- manner -- 
always calls something physically real space 
around it, something call 
turn magnetic field operates piece 
latter move towards shall discuss 
justification incidental indeed 
somewhat arbitrary one. shall mention aid 
electromagnetic phenomena represented much 
satisfactorily without it, applies particularly 
transmission electromagnetic effects gravitation also 
regarded analogous manner. 
 
action earth stone takes place earth 
produces surrounding gravitational field, acts 
stone produces motion fall. know experience, 
intensity action body according quite 
definite law, proceed farther farther away earth. 
point view means : law properties 
gravitational field space must perfectly definite one, 
order correctly represent gravitational action 
distance bodies. something like this: 
body (e.g. produces field immediate 
neighbourhood intensity direction field 
points farther removed body thence determined law 
governs properties space gravitational fields 
themselves. 
 
contrast electric magnetic fields, gravitational field 
exhibits remarkable property, fundamental 
importance Bodies moving sole 
influence gravitational field receive 
least depend either material physical 
state body. instance, piece lead piece wood 
fall exactly manner gravitational field (in 
start rest 
law, holds expressed different form 
light following consideration. 
 
According Newton's law motion, 
 
= x 
 
characteristic constant 
accelerated body. gravitation cause 

 
= x gravitational 

 
likewise characteristic constant 
body. two relations follows: 
 
                                eq. file 
 
 
now, find experience, acceleration 
independent nature condition body always 
given gravitational field, ratio 
gravitational inertial mass must likewise 
bodies. suitable choice thus make ratio 
equal following gravitational mass 
body equal inertial law. 
 
true important law hitherto recorded 
mechanics, satisfactory 
interpretation obtained following fact 
: quality body according 
circumstances " inertia " " weight " " 
following section shall show extent actually 
case, question connected general 
postulate relativity. 
 
 
 
 
EQUALITY INERTIAL GRAVITATIONAL MASS 
ARGUMENT GENERAL RELATIVITY 
 
 
imagine large portion empty space, far removed stars 
masses, us 
conditions required fundamental law 
possible choose Galileian reference-body part space 
relative points rest remain rest points 
motion continue permanently uniform motion. 
reference-body let us imagine chest room 
observer inside Gravitation 
naturally exist must 
floor, otherwise slightest 
floor cause rise slowly towards room. 
 
middle chest fixed hook 
rope " " kind immaterial 
begins pulling constant force. chest 
together observer begin move 
uniformly accelerated motion. course time velocity 
reach values -- provided 
another reference-body pulled 
 
man chest regard Process ? 
acceleration chest transmitted reaction 
floor must therefore take pressure 
means legs wish laid full length 
floor. standing chest exactly way 
anyone stands room home earth. body 
previously land, chest 
longer transmitted body, reason body 
approach floor chest accelerated relative 
motion. observer convince 
acceleration body towards floor chest always 
magnitude, whatever kind body may happen use 
experiment. 
 
knowledge gravitational field (as 
discussed preceding man chest thus 
come conclusion chest gravitational 
field constant regard time. course 
puzzled moment chest fall 
gravitational field. then, however, discovers hook 
middle chest rope attached it, 
consequently comes conclusion chest 
suspended rest gravitational field. 
 
Ought smile man say conclusion ? 
believe ought wish remain consistent ; must 
rather admit mode situation violates neither 
reason known mechanical laws. Even though accelerated 
respect first considered, 
nevertheless regard chest rest. thus good 
grounds extending principle relativity include bodies 
reference accelerated respect other, 
result gained powerful argument postulate 
relativity. 
 
must note carefully possibility mode 
interpretation rests fundamental property gravitational 
field giving bodies or, comes 
thing, law equality inertial 
gravitational natural law exist, man 
accelerated chest would able interpret behaviour 
bodies around supposition gravitational field, 
would justified grounds experience supposing 
reference-body " 
 
Suppose man chest rope side 
body free end 
result rope hang " 
" ask opinion cause 
tension man chest say: "The suspended 
body experiences force gravitational field, 
tension rope ; determines 
magnitude tension rope gravitational mass 
suspended hand, observer freely 
space interpret condition things thus : " rope must 
take part accelerated motion chest, 
motion body attached it. tension 
rope large enough effect acceleration body. 
determines magnitude tension rope 
inertial mass Guided example, see 
extension principle relativity necessity 
law equality inertial gravitational Thus 
obtained physical interpretation law. 
 
consideration accelerated chest see general 
theory relativity must yield important results laws 
gravitation. point fact, pursuit general 
idea relativity supplied laws satisfied 
gravitational field. proceeding however, must warn 
reader suggested 
gravitational field exists man chest, despite 
fact field co-ordinate system first 
might easily suppose existence 
gravitational field always apparent one. might also 
think that, regardless kind gravitational field may 
present, could always choose another reference-body 
gravitational field exists reference it. means 
true gravitational fields, quite special 
form. is, instance, impossible choose body reference 
that, judged it, gravitational field earth (in 

 
appreciate argument 
brought forward general principle relativity 
Section certainly true observer 
railway carriage experiences result 
application 
motion carriage. 
compelled nobody refer " real " acceleration 
carriage. might also interpret experience 
thus: " body reference (the remains permanently 
rest. reference it, however, exists period 
application gravitational field directed 
respect time. 
influence field, embankment together earth moves 
manner original velocity 
direction 
 
 
 
RESPECTS FOUNDATIONS CLASSICAL MECHANICS 
SPECIAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
already stated several times classical mechanics 
following Material particles sufficiently far 
removed material particles continue move uniformly 
straight line continue state rest. also repeatedly 
fundamental law valid bodies 
reference K possess certain unique states motion, 
uniform motion relative other. Relative 
reference-bodies K law valid. classical 
mechanics special theory relativity therefore 
reference-bodies K relative 
recognised " laws nature " said hold, 
reference-bodies K relative laws hold. 
 
person whose mode thought logical rest satisfied 
condition things. asks : " come certain 
reference-bodies (or states given 
reference-bodies (or states ? 
reason order show clearly mean 
question, shall make use 
 
standing front gas range. Standing alongside 
range two much alike one may mistaken 
other. half full water. notice steam 
emitted one other. 
surprised this, even never seen either gas range 
before. notice luminous something 
colour first other, cease 
even never seen gas 
say something cause 
least possibly may so. If, however, notice 
something neither case, observe one 
steam whilst not, shall 
remain astonished dissatisfied discovered 
circumstance different behaviour 
two 
 
seek vain real something classical 
mechanics (or special theory 
different behaviour bodies considered respect 
reference systems K  Newton saw objection 
attempted it, without success. E. 
clearly all, objection claimed 
mechanics must placed new basis. got rid 
means physics general principle 
relativity, since equations theory hold every body 
reference, whatever may state motion. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) objection importance especially state 
motion reference-body nature 
require external agency e.g. case 
reference-body rotating 
 
 
 
INFERENCES GENERAL PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
 
 
considerations Section 20 show general principle 
relativity puts us position derive properties 
gravitational field purely theoretical manner. Let us suppose, 
instance, know space-time " course " natural 
process regards manner takes place 
Galileian domain relative Galileian body reference K. 
means purely theoretical operations simply 
able find known natural process seen 
reference-body K1 accelerated relatively K. 
since gravitational field exists respect new body 
reference K1, consideration also teaches us gravitational 
field influences process 
 
example, learn body state uniform 
motion respect K (in accordance law 
executing accelerated general motion 
respect accelerated reference-body K1 
acceleration curvature corresponds influence moving 
body gravitational field prevailing relatively K. 
known gravitational field influences movement bodies 
way, consideration supplies us nothing 
essentially new. 
 
However, obtain new result fundamental importance 
carry analogous consideration ray light. respect 
Galileian reference-body K, ray light transmitted 
velocity c. easily shown 
path ray light longer straight line 
consider reference accelerated chest 
that, general, rays light 
propagated gravitational two respects 
result great importance. 
 
first place, compared reality. Although 
detailed examination question shows curvature light 
rays required general theory relativity exceedingly 
small gravitational fields disposal practice, 
estimated magnitude light rays passing sun 
nevertheless seconds ought manifest 
following way. seen earth, certain fixed 
stars appear neighbourhood sun, thus 
capable observation total eclipse sun. 
times, stars ought appear 
sun amount indicated above, compared apparent 
position sky sun situated another part 
examination correctness otherwise 
problem greatest importance, early solution 
expected 
 
second place result shows that, according general 
theory relativity, law constancy velocity 
light constitutes one two fundamental 
assumptions special theory relativity 
already frequently cannot claim unlimited 
curvature rays light take place velocity 
propagation light position. might think 
consequence this, special theory relativity 
whole theory relativity would laid dust. 
reality case. conclude special 
theory relativity cannot claim domain validity ; 
results hold long able disregard 
influences gravitational fields phenomena (e.g. 
 
Since often contended opponents theory 
relativity special theory relativity 
general theory relativity, perhaps advisable make 
facts case means appropriate 
development electrodynamics laws 
looked upon laws present time 
know electric fields derived correctly 
considerations case, never strictly 
electrical masses quite rest relatively 
other, co-ordinate system. justified saying 
reason 
Maxwell electrodynamics ? 
contained electrodynamics limiting case ; 
laws latter lead directly former 
case fields regard time. 
destiny could physical theory, 
point way introduction 
comprehensive theory, lives limiting case. 
 
example transmission light dealt with, 
seen general theory relativity enables us derive 
influence gravitational field course 
natural already known 
gravitational field 
solution general theory relativity supplies 
concerns investigation laws satisfied gravitational 
field itself. Let us consider moment. 
 
acquainted space-time behave 
" Galileian " fashion suitable choice reference-body, 
i.e. gravitational fields refer 
domain reference-body K1 possessing kind motion, 
relative K1 exists gravitational field 
respect space  character 
field course depend motion chosen K1. According 
general theory relativity, general law gravitational 
field must satisfied gravitational fields 
way. Even though means fields 
produced way, yet may entertain hope general 
law gravitation gravitational fields 
special kind. hope beautiful 
manner. clear vision actual 
necessary serious difficulty, 
lies deep root things, dare withhold 
require extend ideas space-time continuum 
still farther. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) means star photographs two 
Joint Committee Royal Royal 
existence deflection light demanded theory first 
confirmed eclipse 29th May, Appendix 

 
follows generalisation discussion 
Section 20 
 
 
 
BEHAVIOUR CLOCKS MEASURING-RODS ROTATING BODY REFERENCE 
 
 
Hitherto purposely speaking physical 
interpretation case general 
theory relativity. consequence, guilty certain 
which, know special theory 
relativity, far unimportant 
high time remedy would mention 
matter lays small claims patience 
power 
 
start quite special cases, frequently 
used before. Let us consider space time domain 
gravitational field exists relative reference-body K whose state 
motion K Galileian 
reference-body regards domain considered, results 
special theory relativity hold relative K. Let us 
domain referred second body reference K1, 
rotating uniformly respect K. order fix ideas, 
shall imagine K1 form plane circular disc, 
uniformly plane observer 
sitting disc K1 sensible force 
acts direction, would interpreted 
effect inertia observer 
rest respect original reference-body K. observer 
disc may regard disc reference-body " rest 
" ; basis general principle relativity 
justified this. force acting himself, fact 
bodies rest relative disc, regards 
effect gravitational field. Nevertheless, 
gravitational field kind would 
possible Newton's theory since 
observer believes general theory relativity, 
disturb him; quite right believes general 
law gravitation law explains 
motion stars also field force 
experienced himself. 
 
observer circular disc clocks 
so, intention arrive exact 
definitions 
reference circular disc K1, definitions based 
experience enterprise ? 
 
start with, places one two constructed clocks 
centre circular disc, edge 
disc, rest relative it. ask 
whether clocks go rate standpoint 
Galileian reference-body K. judged body, 
clock centre disc whereas clock 
edge disc motion relative K consequence 
According result obtained Section 12, follows 
latter clock goes rate permanently 
clock centre circular disc, i.e. observed K. 
obvious effect would noted observer 
imagine sitting alongside clock centre 
circular Thus circular disc, or, make case 
general, every gravitational field, clock go quickly 
less quickly, according position clock situated 
reason possible obtain reasonable 
definition time aid clocks arranged rest 
respect body reference. similar difficulty presents 
attempt apply earlier definition 
case, wish go farther 
question. 
 
Moreover, stage definition space co-ordinates also 
presents difficulties. observer applies 
standard measuring-rod (a rod short compared 
radius edge disc, then, 
judged Galileian system, length rod less 
I, since, according Section 12, moving bodies suffer 
direction motion. hand, 
experience length, judged 
K, applied disc direction 
If, then, observer first measures circumference disc 
measuring-rod disc, dividing 
one other, obtain familiar 
number p = . . larger whereas course, 
disc rest respect K, operation would 
yield p exactly. proves propositions Euclidean 
geometry cannot hold exactly rotating disc, general 
gravitational field, least length rod 
positions every Hence idea 
straight line also loses meaning. therefore 
position define exactly co-ordinates x, y, z relative 
disc means method used discussing special theory, 
long times events 
cannot assign exact meaning natural laws 

 
Thus previous conclusions based general relativity would 
appear called question. reality must make subtle 
order able apply postulate general 
relativity exactly. shall prepare reader 
following 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) field centre disc increases 
distance centre proceed 
 
Throughout consideration use Galileian 
system K reference-body, since may assume 
validity results special theory relativity 
relative K K1 gravitational field 
 
 
 
EUCLIDEAN NON-EUCLIDEAN CONTINUUM 
 
 
surface marble table spread front me. get 
one point table point passing 
one point " neighbouring " one, 
process number times, or, words, going 
point point without executing sure reader 
appreciate sufficient mean " 
neighbouring " " " (if 
express property surface describing latter 
continuum. 
 
Let us imagine large number little rods equal length 
made, lengths small compared 
marble say equal length, mean 
one laid without ends next lay 
four little rods marble slab constitute 
figure (a equally 
long. equality make use little 
square add similar ones, one 
rod common first. proceed like manner 
squares finally whole marble slab laid 
arrangement such, side square belongs 
two squares corner four 
 
wonder carry business without 
getting greatest difficulties. need think 
moment three squares meet two 
sides fourth square already and, consequence, 
arrangement remaining two sides square already 
completely longer able adjust 
may equal. equal 
especial favour marble slab 
little rods, 
surprised. must experience many construction 
successful. 
 
everything really gone say points 
marble slab constitute Euclidean continuum respect 
little used " distance " 
choosing one corner square " every 
corner square reference origin means two 
numbers. need state many rods must pass when, 
starting proceed towards " right " " 
order arrive corner square 
consideration. two numbers " Cartesian co-ordinates 
" corner reference " Cartesian co-ordinate 
determined arrangement little 
 
making use following modification abstract 
must also cases 
experiment would shall suppose rods " 
" amount proportional increase 
heat central part marble 
case two little rods still brought 
every position table. construction 
squares must necessarily come 
little rods central region table 
whereas outer part not. 
 
reference little rods -- defined unit lengths -- 
marble slab longer Euclidean also 
longer position Cartesian co-ordinates directly 
aid, since construction longer carried 
out. since things influenced 
similar manner little rods (or perhaps 
temperature table, possible quite naturally maintain 
point view marble slab " Euclidean 
done satisfactory manner making subtle 
stipulation measurement comparison 
 
rods every kind every behave 
way regards influence temperature 
heated marble means 
effect temperature geometrical behaviour 
rods analogous one described above, 
best plan would assign distance one two points 
provided ends one rods could made 
two points ; else define 
distance without proceeding highest measure grossly 
arbitrary ? method Cartesian must 
replaced another assume validity 
Euclidean geometry rigid  reader notice 
situation corresponds one brought 
general relativity 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) confronted problem 
following form. given surface (e.g. 
Euclidean three-dimensional space, exists surface 
two-dimensional geometry, much plane surface. Gauss 
undertook task treating two-dimensional geometry 
first principles, without making use fact surface 
belongs Euclidean continuum three dimensions. imagine 
constructions made rigid rods surface 
marble find different laws 
hold resulting basis Euclidean plane 
geometry. surface Euclidean continuum respect 
rods, cannot define Cartesian co-ordinates surface. 
Gauss indicated principles according treat 
geometrical surface, thus pointed way 
method treating non-Euclidean 
continuum. Thus long ago formal 
problems led general postulate relativity. 
 
 
 
GAUSSIAN CO-ORDINATES 
 
 
According combined geometrical mode 
problem arrived following way. 
imagine system arbitrary curves Fig. drawn surface 
table. designate indicate 
means number. Curves u= 1, u= 2 u= 3 drawn 
curves u= 1 u= 2 must imagine 
infinitely large number drawn, correspond real 
numbers lying 1 2. fig. system 
system covers whole surface 
table. must other, 
point surface one one must pass. 
Thus perfectly definite value belongs every point 
surface marble like manner imagine system 
drawn surface. satisfy conditions 
provided numbers corresponding 
manner, may likewise arbitrary follows 
value value v belong every point surface 
table. call two numbers co-ordinates surface 
table example, point P 
Gaussian co-ordinates u= 3, 1. Two neighbouring 
points P surface correspond co-ordinates 
 
                             
 
                           + v + 
 
du small numbers. similar manner may 
indicate distance P measured 
little means small number 
according Gauss 
 
                ds2 = + = 
 
magnitudes depend perfectly 
definite way v. magnitudes 
determine behaviour rods relative 
thus also relative surface table. 
case points surface considered form Euclidean 
continuum reference measuring-rods, case, 
possible draw attach numbers 
them, manner, simply : 
 
                           ds2 = + 
 
conditions, straight lines 
sense Euclidean geometry, 
other. Gaussian Cartesian ones. 
clear Gauss co-ordinates nothing association 
two sets numbers points surface considered, 
nature values differing slightly 
associated neighbouring points " 
 
far, considerations hold continuum two dimensions. 
Gaussian method applied also continuum three, 
four dimensions. If, instance, continuum four 
supposed may represent following 
way. every point associate arbitrarily four 
numbers, x[1], x[2], x[3], x[4], known " 
Adjacent points correspond adjacent values 
distance associated adjacent points P 
distance well defined physical point 
view, following formula 
 
ds2 = + . . . . 
 
magnitudes etc., values 
position continuum. continuum Euclidean one 
possible associate co-ordinates . . 
points continuum simply 
 
ds2 = + + + 
 
case relations hold four-dimensional continuum 
analogous holding three-dimensional 
 
However, Gauss treatment ds2 given 
always possible. possible sufficiently small regions 
continuum consideration may regarded Euclidean 
example, obviously holds case marble 
slab table local temperature 
practically constant small part thus 
geometrical behaviour rods almost ought 
according rules Euclidean geometry. Hence 
construction squares previous section show 
clearly construction extended 
considerable portion surface table. 
 
sum follows: Gauss invented method 
mathematical treatment general, " 
" (" distances " neighbouring 
every point continuum assigned many numbers 
continuum dimensions. done 
way, one meaning attached 
assignment, numbers differ 
indefinitely small amount assigned adjacent points. 
Gaussian coordinate system logical generalisation 
Cartesian co-ordinate system. also applicable non-Euclidean 
when, respect defined 
small parts continuum consideration behave 
nearly like Euclidean system, smaller part 
continuum notice. 
 
 
 
SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM THEORY RELATIVITY CONSIDERED 
EUCLIDEAN CONTINUUM 
 
 
position exactly idea 
vaguely indicated Section 
accordance special theory relativity, certain co-ordinate 
systems given preference description 
space-time continuum. called " Galileian 
co-ordinate four co-ordinates x, y, 
z, t, determine event -- words, point 
four-dimensional continuum -- defined physically simple 
manner, set forth detail first part book. 
one Galileian system another, moving 
uniformly reference first, equations Lorentz 
transformation valid. last form basis derivation 
deductions special theory relativity, 
nothing expression universal validity 
law transmission light Galileian systems 
reference. 
 
found Lorentz satisfy following 
simple Let us consider two neighbouring events, 
relative position four-dimensional continuum given 
respect Galileian reference-body K space co-ordinate 
differences reference 
second Galileian system shall suppose corresponding 
differences two events 
magnitudes always 
 
     + + - = 2 + 2 + 2 - 2. 
 
validity Lorentz transformation follows 
condition. express follows: magnitude 
 
                   ds2 = + + - 
 
belongs two adjacent points four-dimensional 
space-time value selected 
replace x, y, z, . x[1], 
x[2], x[3], x[4], also result 
 
             ds2 = + + + 
 
independent choice body reference. call 
magnitude " distance " apart two events 
four-dimensional points. 
 
Thus, choose imaginary 
. instead real quantity t, regard space-time 
-- accordance special theory relativity -- 
Euclidean " four-dimensional result follows 
considerations preceding section. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) 2. relations derived 
valid also co-ordinate 
thus also co-ordinate 
small 
 
 
 
SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM GENERAL THEORY 
CONTINUUM 
 
 
first part book able make use space-time 
co-ordinates allowed simple direct physical 
which, according Section 26, regarded 
four-dimensional Cartesian co-ordinates. possible 
basis law constancy velocity 
according Section general theory relativity cannot 
retain law. contrary, arrived result 
according latter theory velocity light must always 
depend co-ordinates gravitational field present. 
connection specific illustration Section 23, found 
presence gravitational field definition 
led us objective 
special theory relativity. 
 
view considerations led 
conviction that, according general principle relativity, 
space-time continuum cannot regarded Euclidean one, 
general case, corresponding marble slab 
local made acquaintance 
example two-dimensional continuum. 
impossible construct Cartesian co-ordinate system equal 
rods, impossible build system 
rigid bodies shall nature 
measuring-rods arranged rigidly respect one 
another, indicate position time 
essence difficulty confronted Section 

 
considerations Sections 25 show us way 
difficulty. refer space-time 
continuum arbitrary manner Gauss co-ordinates. assign 
every point continuum four numbers, x[1], x[2], x[3], 
least direct physical 
serve purpose points 
continuum definite arbitrary manner. arrangement 
even need kind must regard x[1], 
x[2], x[3], co-ordinates x[4], " time " 

 
reader may think description world would 
quite mean assign event 
particular co-ordinates x[1], x[2], x[3], x[4], 
co-ordinates significance ? careful consideration shows, 
however, anxiety Let us consider, 
instance, material point kind motion. point 
momentary existence without would 
described space-time single system values x[1], x[2], x[3], 
Thus permanent existence must 
infinitely large number systems co-ordinate 
values close together give 
corresponding material point, thus 
line four-dimensional continuum. way, 
lines continuum correspond many points motion. 
statements regard points claim physical 
existence reality statements 
mathematical encounter expressed fact 
two lines represent motions points 
question particular system co-ordinate x[1], x[2], 
x[3], x[4], mature consideration reader 
doubtless admit reality constitute 
actual evidence nature meet physical 

 
describing motion material point relative 
body reference, stated nothing 
point particular points also 
determine corresponding values time observation 
body conjunction 
observation encounter hands clocks particular 
points case 
means measuring-rods, 
consideration show. 
 
following statements hold generally : Every physical description 
resolves number 
space-time two events B. terms Gaussian 
every statement expressed agreement 
four co-ordinates x[1], x[2], x[3], Thus reality, 
description continuum means Gauss co-ordinates 
completely description aid body 
reference, without suffering latter mode 
tied Euclidean character 
continuum 
 
 
 
EXACT FORMULATION GENERAL PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
 
 
position replace formulation 
general principle relativity given Section exact 
form used, "All bodies reference K, K1, 
etc., equivalent description natural phenomena 
general laws whatever may 
state cannot maintained, use rigid 
sense method followed special 
theory relativity, general possible space-time 
Gauss co-ordinate system take place 
body reference. following statement corresponds 
fundamental idea general principle "All Gaussian 
co-ordinate systems essentially equivalent formulation 
general laws 
 
state general principle relativity still another 
form, renders yet clearly intelligible 
form natural extension special principle 
relativity. According special theory relativity, 
equations express general laws nature pass 
equations form when, making use Lorentz 
transformation, replace space-time x, y, z, t, 
reference-body K space-time 
new reference-body K1. According general theory 
relativity, hand, application arbitrary 
Gauss x[1], x[2], x[3], x[4], 
equations must pass equations every 
transformation (not Lorentz corresponds 
one Gauss co-ordinate system another. 
 
desire adhere three-dimensional view 
things, development 
fundamental idea general theory relativity 
follows : special theory relativity reference 
Galileian i.e. gravitational field 
exists. connection Galileian reference-body body 
reference, i.e. rigid body state motion 
chosen Galileian law uniform motion 
material points holds relatively it. 
 
Certain considerations suggest refer Galileian 
reference-bodies also. gravitational field 
special kind present respect bodies 
Sections 20 
 
gravitational fields things rigid bodies 
Euclidean thus rigid body reference 
avail general theory relativity. motion clocks 
also influenced gravitational fields, way 
physical definition time made directly aid 
clocks means degree 
special theory relativity. 
 
reason reference-bodies used, 
whole moving way also suffer 
alterations form motion. 
law motion kind, however serve 
definition time. imagine clocks fixed 
point clocks satisfy 
one condition, observed simultaneously 
adjacent clocks (in differ 
indefinitely small reference-body, might 
main 
equivalent Gaussian four-dimensional co-ordinate system chosen 
gives certain 
compared Gauss co-ordinate system 
formal separate existence 
space co-ordinates opposed time Every point 
treated every material point 
rest relatively rest, long 
considered general principle relativity 
requires used reference-bodies 
equal right equal success formulation general laws 
laws must quite independent choice 

 
great power possessed general principle relativity lies 
comprehensive imposed laws nature 
consequence seen above. 
 
 
 
SOLUTION PROBLEM GRAVITATION BASIS GENERAL 
PRINCIPLE RELATIVITY 
 
 
reader followed previous considerations, 
difficulty understanding methods leading 
solution problem gravitation. 
 
start consideration Galileian i.e. domain 
gravitational field relative Galileian 
reference-body K. behaviour measuring-rods clocks 
reference K known special theory relativity, 
likewise behaviour material latter move 
uniformly straight lines. 
 
let us refer domain Gauss coordinate system 
reference-body K1. respect K1 
gravitational field particular learn behaviour 
measuring-rods clocks also material points 
reference K1 simply mathematical transformation. 
interpret behaviour behaviour measuring-rods, 
material points influence gravitational field G. 
introduce influence 
gravitational field clocks 
material points continues take place according laws, 
even case prevailing gravitational field 
special care, simply means 
transformation co-ordinates. 
 
next step investigate space-time behaviour 
gravitational field derived Galileian special 
case simply transformation behaviour 
formulated law, always valid, matter 
reference-body used description may 
 
law yet general law gravitational field, since 
gravitational field consideration special kind. 
order find general gravitation still 
require obtain generalisation law found above. 
obtained without however, taking consideration 
following 
 
(a) required generalisation must likewise satisfy general 
postulate relativity. 
 
(b) matter domain consideration, 
inertial thus according Section energy 
importance exciting field. 
 
Gravitational field matter together must satisfy law 
conservation energy (and 
 
Finally, general principle relativity permits us determine 
influence gravitational field course 
processes take place according known laws 
gravitational field absent i.e. already fitted 
frame special theory relativity. connection 
proceed principle according method already 
explained measuring-rods, clocks freely moving material 
points. 
 
theory gravitation derived way general 
postulate relativity beauty ; 
removing defect classical mechanics brought 
light Section empirical law 
equality inertial gravitational mass ; also 
already explained result observation 
classical mechanics 
 
application theory case 
gravitational fields regarded weak, 
masses move respect coordinate system velocities 
small compared velocity light, obtain 
first Newtonian theory. Thus latter theory 
obtained without particular assumption, whereas Newton 
introduce hypothesis force attraction 
attracting material points proportional square 
distance them. increase accuracy 
calculation, theory Newton make 
appearance, practically must nevertheless escape test 
observation owing 
 
must draw attention one According 
Newton's theory, planet moves round sun 
would permanently maintain position respect fixed 
stars, could disregard motion fixed stars 
action consideration. Thus, 
correct observed motion two 
Newton's theory strictly correct, ought obtain 
orbit planet fixed reference 
fixed tested great accuracy, 
confirmed save one, precision 
capable obtained delicacy observation 
present time. sole exception 
planet lies nearest sun. Since time 
known ellipse corresponding orbit 
corrected influences mentioned above, 
respect fixed stars, 
exceedingly slowly plane orbit sense 
motion. value obtained movement 
ellipse seconds per century, amount 
correct within seconds effect 
explained means classical mechanics assumption 
hypotheses little probability, devised 
solely 
 
basis general theory relativity, found 
ellipse every planet round sun must necessarily 
manner indicated ; exception 
rotation small detected 
delicacy observation possible present time ; 
case must amount seconds per century, 
result strictly agreement 
 
Apart one, hitherto possible make two 
deductions theory admit tested 
wit, curvature light rays gravitational field 
displacement spectral lines light reaching 
us large stars, compared corresponding lines 
light produced analogous manner 
kind  two deductions theory 

 
 
  Notes 
 
*) First observed others Appendix 

 
Established Adams p. 
 
 
 
 
PART 
 
CONSIDERATIONS UNIVERSE WHOLE 
 
 
DIFFICULTIES NEWTON'S THEORY 
 
 
Part difficulty discussed Section 21, second 
fundamental difficulty attending classical mechanics, which, 
best knowledge, first discussed detail 
question 
universe, considered whole, first answer 
suggests us surely this: regards space (and 
universe infinite. stars everywhere, 
density matter, although detail, nevertheless 
average everywhere same. words: However far 
might travel space, find everywhere 
fixed stars kind 
 
view harmony theory latter 
theory rather requires universe kind centre 
density stars proceed 
centre stars 
finally, great succeeded 
infinite region universe ought 
finite island infinite ocean 
 
conception satisfactory. still less 
satisfactory leads result light emitted 
stars also individual stars system 
perpetually passing infinite space, never return, 
without ever coming objects 
nature. finite material universe would destined become 
gradually 
 
order escape suggested modification 
Newton's law, assumes great distances force 
attraction two masses rapidly would 
result square law. way possible 
mean density matter constant everywhere, even 
without infinitely large gravitational fields thus 
free conception material 
universe ought possess something nature 
course purchase emancipation fundamental difficulties 
mentioned, cost modification Newton's 
law neither empirical theoretical 
imagine laws would serve purpose, without 
able state reason one preferred 
others ; one laws would founded little 
general theoretical principles law 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) Proof -- According theory number 
come terminate mass m 
proportional mass m. If, average, Mass density 
constant throughout universe, sphere volume V 
enclose average man Thus number lines force 
passing surface F sphere interior 
proportional V. unit area surface sphere 
number lines force enters sphere thus proportional 
Hence intensity field 
surface would ultimately become infinite increasing radius R 
sphere, impossible. 
 
 
 
POSSIBILITY YET UNIVERSE 
 
 
structure universe also move quite 
another direction. development non-Euclidean geometry led 
recognition fact, cast doubt 
space without coming conflict laws 
thought experience questions 
already treated detail 
whereas touch briefly here. 
 
first place, imagine existence two space. 
Flat beings flat particular flat rigid 
measuring-rods, free move plane. nothing exists 
outside observe happen 
flat " things " reality 
plane. particular, constructions plane Euclidean geometry 
carried means rods e.g. construction, 
considered Section contrast ours, universe 
beings but, like ours, extends 
universe room infinite number 
identical squares made rods, i.e. volume 
infinite. beings say universe " 
sense statement, mean perform 
constructions plane Euclidean geometry 
connection individual rods always represent distance, 
independently position. 
 
Let us consider second two-dimensional existence, time 
spherical surface instead plane. flat beings 
measuring-rods objects fit exactly surface 
unable leave it. whole universe observation 
extends exclusively surface beings 
able regard geometry universe plane geometry 
rods withal " distance " ? cannot 
this. attempt straight line, 
obtain " three-dimensional beings " designate 
great i.e. line definite finite length, 
measured means 
universe finite area compared 
square constructed great charm resulting 
consideration lies recognition fact universe 
beings finite yet limits. 
 
beings need go 
order perceive living Euclidean universe. 
convince every part " 
provided use small piece it. Starting 
point, draw " straight lines " judged 
three equal length directions. 
call line joining free ends lines " 
plane surface, ratio circumference circle 
lengths measured is, according 
Euclidean geometry equal constant value 
independent spherical 
surface flat beings would find ratio value 
 
                        eq. file 
 
i.e. smaller value difference 
greater radius circle comparison 
radius R " means relation 
spherical beings determine radius universe (" 
world even relatively small part 
available part small 
indeed, longer able demonstrate 
spherical " world " Euclidean small part 
spherical surface differs slightly piece plane 

 
Thus spherical surface beings living planet 
system small part 
spherical universe, means determining whether 
living finite infinite universe, " piece 
universe " access cases practically 
follows directly discussion, 
circumference circle first increases 
radius " circumference universe " 
reached, thenceforward gradually 
still increasing values process 
area circle continues increase more, finally 
becomes equal total area whole " 
 
Perhaps reader wonder placed " beings " 
sphere rather another closed surface. choice 
justification fact that, closed sphere 
unique possessing property points 
admit ratio circumference c circle 
radius r depends given value r 
points " words, " 
" " surface constant 
 
two-dimensional three-dimensional 
namely, three-dimensional spherical space 
discovered points likewise 
possesses finite determined 
possible imagine spherical imagine 
space means nothing else imagine " 
space " experience, i.e. experience 
movement " rigid " bodies. sense imagine spherical 
space. 
 
Suppose draw lines stretch directions 
point, mark distance r 
free lengths lie 
spherical surface. specially measure area 
surface means square made 
universe F = ; F 
always less increasing values F increases 
value determined " 
still increasing values area gradually 
first, straight lines 
starting point farther farther one another, 
later approach other, finally run together 
starting point. conditions 
whole spherical space. easily seen 
three-dimensional spherical space quite analogous 
two-dimensional spherical surface. finite finite 

 
may mentioned yet another kind " 
regarded space 
two " " identical 
universe thus considered extent 
universe possessing central 
 
follows said, closed spaces without limits 
amongst these, spherical space (and 
since points 
result discussion, interesting 
question arises whether 
universe live whether finite 
manner spherical universe. experience far 
sufficient enable us answer question. general 
theory relativity permits answering degree 
connection difficulty mentioned 
Section 30 finds 
 
 
 
STRUCTURE SPACE ACCORDING GENERAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
According general theory relativity, geometrical 
properties space determined 
matter. Thus draw conclusions geometrical structure 
universe base considerations state 
matter something known. know experience that, 
chosen co-ordinate system, velocities stars 
small compared velocity transmission light. 
thus rough arrive conclusion 
nature universe whole, treat matter 
rest. 
 
already know previous discussion behaviour 
measuring-rods clocks influenced gravitational fields, i.e. 
distribution matter. sufficient exclude 
possibility exact validity Euclidean geometry 
universe. conceivable universe differs 
slightly Euclidean one, notion seems 
probable, since show surrounding 
space influenced exceedingly small extent masses even 
magnitude sun. might imagine that, regards 
geometry, universe surface 
individual parts, nowhere 
something like surface 
universe might called 
universe. regards space would infinite. calculation 
shows universe average density matter 
would necessarily Thus universe could inhabited 
matter everywhere ; would present us unsatisfactory 
picture Section 
 
universe average density matter 
differs however small may difference, 
universe cannot contrary, results 
calculation indicate matter distributed 
universe would necessarily spherical (or Since 
reality detailed distribution matter real 
universe individual parts i.e. 
universe necessarily 
fact, theory supplies us simple connection *  
universe average density matter 
it. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) radius R universe obtain equation 
 
                        eq. file 
 
use system equation gives = 
p average density matter k constant connected 
Newtonian constant gravitation. 
 
 
 
APPENDIX 
 
SIMPLE DERIVATION LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION 
SECTION 
 
 
relative co-ordinate systems indicated 
Fig. 2, systems 
present case divide problem parts considering first 
events event 
represented respect co-ordinate system K x 
time t, respect system K1 
time require find x given. 
 
proceeding along positive x, 
transmitted according equation 
 
                                x = 
 

 
                 x - =     .     .     .    
 
Since transmitted relative K1 
velocity c, propagation relative system K1 
represented analogous formula 
 
                - = O     .     .     .    (2) 
 
space-time points satisfy must also satisfy 
Obviously case relation 
 
          - = l -     .     .     .    
 
general, l constant ; for, according 
disappearance - involves disappearance 
- 
 
apply quite similar considerations light rays 
transmitted along negative obtain condition 
 
           + = +    .     .     .    
 
adding (or equations (3) introducing 
convenience constants b place constants l 

 
                        eq. file 
 

 
                        eq. file 
 
obtain equations 
 
                        eq. file 
 
thus solution constants 
b known. result following discussion. 
 
origin K1 permanently = hence according 
first equations (5) 
 
                        eq. file 
 
call v velocity origin K1 moving 
relative K, 
 
                        eq. file 
 
value v obtained equations 
velocity another point K1 relative K, velocity 
towards negative point K respect 
short, designate v relative velocity two 

 
Furthermore, principle relativity teaches us that, judged 
K, length unit measuring-rod rest 
reference K1 must exactly length, judged 
unit measuring-rod rest relative K. order 
see points appear viewed K, 
require take " " K1 means 
insert particular value e.g. = 
value obtain first equations (5) 
 
                               = 
 
Two points separated distance = 
measured K1 system thus separated 
photograph distance 
 
                        eq. file 
 
taken = 
equations taking account expression 
obtain 
 
                        eq. file 
 
conclude two points separated 
distance represented 
distance 
 
                        eq. file 
 
said, two must 
hence must equal obtain 
 
                        eq. file 
 
equations determine constants b. 
values constants obtain first 
fourth equations given Section 
 
                        eq. file 
 
Thus obtained Lorentz transformation events 
condition 
 
         - = -    .     .     .    
 
extension result, include events take place 
outside obtained equations 
relations 
 
                        eq. file 
 
way satisfy postulate constancy velocity 
light vacuo rays light arbitrary direction, 
system K system may shown following 
manner. 
 
suppose sent origin K time 
= propagated according equation 
 
                        eq. file 
 
or, square according equation 
 
          + + = =    .     .     .    
 
required law propagation light, conjunction 
postulate relativity, transmission signal 
question take place -- judged K1 -- accordance 
corresponding formula 
 
                               = 
 
or, 
 
       + + - =    .     .     .    
 
order equation may consequence equation 
must 
 
   + + - = + + -       
 
Since equation must hold points thus 
= I. easily seen Lorentz transformation really 
equation = consequence 
hence also thus derived 
Lorentz transformation. 
 
Lorentz transformation represented still requires 
Obviously immaterial whether K1 
chosen spatially parallel K. 
also essential velocity translation K1 respect 
K direction simple consideration 
shows able construct Lorentz transformation 
general sense two Lorentz 
special sense purely 
corresponds 
co-ordinate system new system pointing 
directions. 
 
Lorentz 
transformation thus : 
 
expresses terms functions 
x, y, x, t, kind relation 
 
     + + - = + + -       
 
say: substitute 
expressions x, y, x, t, place 
side, side agrees 
side. 
 
 
 
APPENDIX 
 
MINKOWSKI'S FOUR-DIMENSIONAL SPACE 
SECTION 
 
 
Lorentz transformation still simply 
introduce imaginary eq. 25 place t, If, 
accordance this, insert 
 
                              = x 
                              = y 
                              = z 
                              = eq. 25 
 
system K1, condition 
satisfied transformation expressed thus : 
 
+ + + = + + + 
    
 
is, choice " 
end Appendix transformed 
 
see imaginary time co-ordinate x[4], enters 
condition transformation exactly way space 
co-ordinates x[1], x[2], due fact that, according 
theory relativity, " time enters natural 
laws form space x[1], x[2], 
 
four-dimensional continuum described x[1], 
x[2], x[3], x[4], called also 
" three-dimensional 
space, physics were, " existence " 
four-dimensional " world." 
 
four-dimensional " world " bears close similarity 
three-dimensional " space " geometry. 
introduce latter new Cartesian co-ordinate system 

functions x[1], x[2], 
satisfy equation 
 
        + + = + + 
 
complete one. regard Minkowski's " 
world " formal manner four-dimensional Euclidean space 
imaginary time ; Lorentz transformation corresponds 
" rotation " co-ordinate system " 
world." 
 
 
 
APPENDIX 
 
EXPERIMENTAL CONFIRMATION GENERAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
 
 
theoretical point view, may imagine 
process empirical science continuous 
process Theories expressed short 
statements large number individual observations 
form empirical laws, general laws 
ascertained Regarded way, development 
science bears resemblance 
is, were, purely empirical enterprise. 
 
point view means embraces whole actual 
process ; important part played 
thought development exact soon 
science emerged theoretical advances 
longer achieved merely process Guided 
empirical rather system thought 
which, general, built logically small number 
fundamental so-called call system 
thought theory. theory finds justification 
existence fact large number single 
" truth " theory 

 
Corresponding empirical may 
several differ one another considerable 
extent. regards deductions theories 
capable tested, agreement theories may 
complete becomes difficult find deductions 
two theories differ other. example, case general 
interest available 
theory development species selection struggle 
existence, theory development based 
hypothesis transmission acquired 
 
another instance agreement 
deductions two theories Newtonian mechanics one hand, 
general theory relativity other. agreement goes 
far, able find 
deductions general theory relativity capable 
investigation, physics days 
also despite profound difference 
fundamental assumptions two follows, shall 
consider important shall also discuss 
empirical evidence hitherto 

 
 (a) Motion 
 
According Newtonian mechanics Newton's law 
planet round sun would describe ellipse 
round latter, or, round common centre 
gravity sun system, sun, 
common centre lies one 
ellipse manner that, course 
distance grows 
instead Newton's law insert 
somewhat different law attraction calculation, find 
that, according new law, motion would still take place 
manner distance exhibits 
case angle described line joining 
sun planet period 
proximity would differ line 
orbit would closed one course time 
would fill part 
circle least circle greatest distance planet 
sun. 
 
According also general theory relativity, differs 
course theory small 
motion planet orbit take place, 
away, angle described radius 
one next exceed corresponding 
one complete revolution amount given 
 
                        eq. file 
 
-- One complete revolution corresponds angle 
absolute measure customary 
expression amount radius 
angle interval one 
expression represents major 
c velocity light, period 
revolution result may also stated follows : 
According general theory relativity, major 
ellipse round sun sense motion 
Theory requires rotation amount 
seconds per century planet 
system magnitude small 
would necessarily escape * 
 
point fact, found theory Newton 
observed motion 
corresponding delicacy observation 
present time. taking account 
disturbing influences remaining 
found 
movement orbit remained over, amount 
differ mentioned seconds 
per century. empirical result amounts 
seconds only. 
 
 (b) Deflection Light Gravitational Field 
 
Section already mentioned according 
general theory relativity, ray light experience 
curvature path passing gravitational field, 
curvature similar experienced path body 
gravitational field. result 
theory, expect ray light passing close 
heavenly body would towards latter. ray 
light passes sun distance 
angle deflection (a) amount 
 
                        eq. file 
 
may added that, according theory, half Figure 
deflection produced Newtonian field attraction 
sun, half geometrical modification (" curvature 
space caused sun. 
 
result admits experimental test means 
stars total eclipse sun. 
reason must wait total eclipse 
every time atmosphere strongly 
light sun stars situated near disc 
predicted effect seen clearly 
accompanying sun present, star 
practically infinitely distant would seen direction 
observed front earth. consequence deflection 
light star sun, star seen direction 
i.e. somewhat greater distance centre sun 
corresponds real position. 
 
practice, question tested following way. stars 
neighbourhood sun 
second photograph stars taken 
sun situated another position i.e. months 
earlier later. compared standard 
positions stars ought appear 
centre 
amount corresponding angle a. 
 
indebted Royal Society Royal 
Society investigation important 
war difficulties 
material nature aroused war, 
societies two -- 
island -- sent several 

order obtain photographs eclipse 29th May, 
relative expected 
photographs obtained eclipse comparison photographs 
amounted only. Thus great accuracy 
necessary making required taking 
subsequent 
 
results confirmed theory thoroughly 
satisfactory manner. observed 
calculated stars (in seconds set 
forth following table results : 
 
                      Table file 
 
 Displacement Spectral Lines Towards Red 
 
Section shown system K1 
rotation regard Galileian system K, clocks identical 
construction, considered rest respect 
rotating reference-body, go rates dependent 
positions shall examine dependence 
situated distance r 
centre disc, velocity relative K given 
 
                                V = 
 
w represents velocity rotation disc K1 
respect K. represents number 
clock per unit time (" rate " relative K 
clock rest, " rate " clock moving 
relative K velocity rest respect disc, 
will, accordance Section 12, given 
 
                        eq. file 
 
sufficient accuracy 
 
                        eq. file 
 
expression may also stated following 
 
                        eq. file 
 
represent difference force 
position clock centre disc 
i.e. work, considered must performed 
unit mass force order transport 
position clock rotating disc centre 
disc, 
 
                        eq. file 
 
follows 
 
                        eq. file 
 
first place, see expression two clocks 
identical construction go different rates situated 
different distances centre result 
valid standpoint observer rotating 

 
Now, judged disc, latter field 
hence result obtained hold quite 
generally gravitational Furthermore, regard 
spectral lines following 
statement 
 
absorbs light dependent 
gravitational field 
 
situated surface heavenly body 
somewhat less 
element situated free space (or surface 
smaller 
 
f = - K K Newton's constant M 
mass heavenly body. Thus displacement towards red 
ought take place spectral lines produced surface 
stars compared spectral lines element produced 
surface earth, amount displacement 
 
                        eq. file 
 
sun, displacement towards red predicted theory 
amounts two 
calculation possible case stars, 
general neither mass M radius r known. 
 
open question whether effect exists, 
present time working great zeal towards 
Owing effect case 
sun, difficult form opinion existence. Whereas 
result 
placed 
existence effect almost beyond doubt, 
particularly St. John, led opposite 
opinion consequence 
 
Mean lines towards less end 
certainly revealed statistical 
fixed stars ; present examination available 
allow definite decision arrived at, 
whether referred reality 
effect gravitation. results observation 
collected together, discussed detail standpoint 
question attention here, paper E. 
entitled 
No. 
p. Julius 
 
events, definite decision reached next 
years. displacement spectral lines towards red 
gravitational exist, general theory 
relativity hand, cause 
displacement spectral lines definitely traced 
gravitational study displacement 
furnish us important information mass heavenly 
bodies. 
 
 
  Notes 
 
*) Especially since next planet orbit 
almost exact makes difficult 

 
spectral lines towards red end 
definitely established Adams observations 
companion effect thirty 
times greater Sun. -- 
 
 
 
APPENDIX 
 
STRUCTURE SPACE ACCORDING GENERAL THEORY RELATIVITY 
SECTION 
 
 
Since publication first edition little book, 
knowledge structure space large (" 
problem important ought 
mentioned even popular presentation subject. 
 
original considerations subject based two 

 
(1) exists average density matter whole space 
everywhere different 
 
(2) magnitude (" radius space independent time. 
 
hypotheses proved according 
general theory relativity, term 
added field term required 
theory seem natural theoretical point 
view (" term field equations 
 
Hypothesis (2) appeared unavoidable time, since thought 
one would get one departed 
it. 
 
However, already Russian 
showed different hypothesis natural purely 
theoretical point view. realized possible 
preserve hypothesis (1) without introducing less natural 
term field equations one 
ready drop hypothesis Namely, original field equations 
admit solution " world radius " depends time 
sense one say, according 
theory demands expansion space. 
 
years later special investigation 
(" ways spectral lines 
emitted showed red shift increased regularly distance 
interpreted regard present 
knowledge sense principle, 
motion system stars large -- required, according 
field equations gravitation. discovery 
can, therefore, considered extent confirmation 
theory. 
 
arise, however, strange difficulty. interpretation 
discovered expansion (which 
hardly doubted theoretical point leads 
origin expansion lies " " years ago, 
physical makes appear likely development 
individual stars systems stars takes considerably longer. 
way known 
 
want theory space, together 
empirical permit decision reached 
finite infinite character space, 
original " " hypothesis space yielded 
space. 
 
 
K = co-ordinate system 
x, y = two-dimensional co-ordinates 
x, y, z = three-dimensional co-ordinates 
x, y, z, = four-dimensional co-ordinates 
 
= time 
= distance 
v = velocity 
 
F = force 
= gravitational field 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME FOUR 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
 
WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN, Volume Four 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN-DOUGLAS DEBATES 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN DOUGLAS FOURTH DEBATE, CHARLESTON, SEPTEMBER 18, 1858. 
 
 
LADIES difficult audience large 
hear distinctly speaker says, consequently 
important profound silence preserved possible. 
 
hotel to-day, elderly gentleman called upon 
know whether really favor producing perfect equality 
negroes white people. proposed 
occasion say much subject, yet question asked 
thought would occupy perhaps five minutes saying something regard 
it. say, then, not, ever been, favor 
bringing way social political equality white 
black races; not, ever been, favor making 
voters negroes, hold office, 
white people; say, addition this, 
physical difference white black races 
believe forever forbid two races living together terms 
social political equality. much cannot live, 
remain together must position superior 
inferior, much man favor 
superior position assigned white race. say upon occasion 
perceive white man superior 
position negro denied everything. understand 
want negro woman slave must necessarily want 
wife. understanding let alone. 
fiftieth year, certainly never black woman 
either slave wife. seems quite possible us get 
along without making either slaves wives negroes. add 
never seen, knowledge, man, woman, child 
favor producing perfect equality, social political, 
negroes white men. recollect one distinguished instance 
ever heard frequently entirely satisfied 
case Judge Douglas's old friend Colonel 
Richard M. Johnson. also add remarks made (for 
going enter large upon never 
least apprehension friends would marry negroes 
law keep it; Judge Douglas friends seem 
great apprehension might, law keep 
it, give solemn pledge 
last stand law State forbids marrying white 
people negroes. add one word, this: 
understand place alteration social 
political relations negro white man made, except 
State Congress United States; 
really apprehend approach thing myself, 
Judge Douglas seems constant horror danger 
rapidly propose best means prevent 
Judge kept home, placed State Legislature fight 
measure. propose longer time subject. 
 
Judge Trumbull, Senator Congress, returned Illinois 
month August, made speech Chicago, made 
may called charge Judge Douglas, understand proved 
offensive him. Judge time upon one 
speaking country, news reached him, 
informed, denounced Judge Trumbull rather harsh terms 
said regard matter. 
time, speaking places Judge Douglas subsequent 
days, heard Judge Trumbull said Douglas, 
Douglas said back again, felt position 
could remain entirely silent regard matter. Consequently, 
upon two three occasions alluded it, alluded 
wise say regard charge brought Trumbull 
Douglas, personally knew nothing, sought say nothing it; 
personally know Judge believed 
man believed man capacity sufficient 
know well whether assertion making, conclusion drawn 
set facts, true conclusion 
that, stated belief Trumbull ever called upon, 
would prove everything said. said upon two three 
occasions. Upon subsequent occasion, Judge Trumbull spoke 
audience Alton, upon occasion repeated charge 
Douglas, arrayed evidence relied upon 
it. speech published length; subsequently 
Judge Douglas alluded matter. course speech, near 
close it, stated regard read: 
 
Douglas proceeded remark hereafter occupy 
time charges made Trumbull, that, Lincoln 
indorsed character Trumbull veracity, hold 
responsible 
 
done simply told you, subject invitation 
notice charge. wish say originally 
purpose discuss matter seems 
wish Judge Douglas hold responsible it, 
life play General Jackson, extent take 
responsibility. 
 
wish say beginning hand reporters 
portion Judge Trumbull's speech devoted matter, 
also portion Judge Douglas's speech made 
answer it. shall thereby furnish readers debate 
complete discussion Trumbull Douglas. cannot read them, 
reason would take half first hour so. 
make comments upon them. Trumbull's charge following 
words: 
 
"Now, charge is, plot entered 
constitution formed Kansas, put force, without giving 
people opportunity vote upon it, Mr. Douglas 

 
state, without quoting further, opportunity 
reading hereafter, Judge Trumbull brings forward regards 
sufficient evidence charge. 
 
perceived Judge Trumbull shows Senator upon 
floor Senate, declared conference among 
senators, conference determined enabling act 
passed people Kansas form constitution 
conference agreed among best 
provision submitting constitution vote people 
formed. brings forward show, 
Judge Douglas reported bill back Senate 
clause stricken out. shows new clause inserted 
bill, would nature prevent reference 
constitution back vote indeed, upon mere 
silence law, could assumed right vote 
upon it. general statements made. 
 
propose examine points Judge Douglas's speech 
attempts answer speech Judge come 
examine Judge Douglas's speech, find first point 
makes is: 
 
true change bill, 
struck proof plot force constitution upon 

 
striking provision, one bill, 
establish proof stricken 
purpose people right. would say, first 
place, would manifest reason it. true, 
Judge Douglas states, many Territorial bills passed without 
provision them. believe true, though 
certain, instances constitutions framed bills 
submitted vote people law silent upon 
subject; appear enabling acts 
framed express provision submitting constitution 
framed vote people, stricken 
Congress mean alter effect law. 
bills never provision in, question; 
provision taken one in? especially 
evidence tend prove proposition Trumbull 
remember provision stricken bill almost 
simultaneously time Bigler says conference among 
certain senators, agreed bill passed 
leaving out. Judge Douglas, answering Trumbull, attend 
testimony meeting agreed 
frame bill submission 
constitution vote people. Judge notice part 
it. take one piece evidence, ascertain 
simultaneously Judge Douglas struck provision require 
submitted, put two together, think make pretty fair 
show proof Judge Douglas did, Trumbull says, enter plot 
put force constitution Kansas, without giving people 
opportunity voting upon it. 
 
must hurry on. next proposition Judge Douglas puts this: 
 
"But upon examination turns Toombs bill never contain 
clause requiring constitution 
 
mere question fact, determined evidence. 
want ask question: Judge Douglas say words 
stricken Toomb's bill, bill 
alleged provision stricken bill goes name 
originally brought ask why, Judge 
wanted make direct issue Trumbull, take exact 
proposition Trumbull made speech, say stricken 
Trumbull given exact words says Toomb's bill, 
bill came back, stricken out. Judge 
Douglas say words Trumbull says stricken 
stricken out, says provision 
Toomb's bill submit constitution vote people. see 
merely making issue upon meaning words. 
say Trumbull tells lie words 
stricken out, really, pushed it, taking 
issue upon meaning words. Now, then, issue upon 
meaning words, upon question fact 
whether words stricken out, suppose 
genuine copy Toomb's bill, shown 
words Trumbull says were, fact, originally there. 
dispute upon fact, got documents show 
there. controversy upon sense 
words stricken really constituted 
provision submitting matter vote 
matter argument, think may well use Trumbull's argument. 
says proposition words: 
 
"That following propositions hereby offered 
said Convention people Kansas formed, free 
acceptance which, accepted Convention ratified 
people election adoption constitution, shall 
upon United States said State 
 
Now, Trumbull last words stricken bill 
came back, says provision submitting 
constitution vote people; argument this: 
 
"Would possible ratify land propositions 
election adoption constitution, unless election 

 
Trumbull's argument. Now, Judge Douglas meet charge 
all, stands says proposition 
bill submitting constitution framed vote people. 
Trumbull admits language direct provision submitting 
it, provision necessarily implied another 
asks possible ratify land proposition election 
adoption constitution, election held 
adoption constitution. goes show 
less law provision put indirect shape 
would put presume said enough 
draw attention point, pass also. 
 
Another one points Judge Douglas makes upon Trumbull, 
great length, is, Trumbull, bill said 
speech Senate supposed constitution made would 
submitted people. Trumbull thought then, 
ground anybody thinking otherwise now? Fellow-citizens, 
much may said bill hands 
party Trumbull hands 
committee head Judge Douglas Trumbull perhaps 
printed copy original Toomb's bill. evidence 
point except sort inference draw general course 
business there. provisions way 
going committee, Trumbull means 
altered bill reported back. Soon afterwards, 
reported back, discussion it, perhaps Trumbull 
reading hastily altered form perceive 
hastily borne debate, 
follow something Trumbull perceive, 
something exist. this, true 
Trumbull effect Douglas Suppose Trumbull 
plot men, would let Douglas it? 
Would Douglas Trumbull n't perceive 
also asks question: n't Trumbull propose 
amend bill, thought needed Why, believe 
everything Judge Trumbull proposed, particularly connection 
question Kansas Nebraska, since floor 
Senate, promptly voted Judge Douglas friends. 
promise amendment offered anything 
subject would receive slightest consideration. Judge Trumbull 
bring notice Senate time fact 
provision submitting constitution made people 
Kansas vote people. believe may venture say 
Judge Douglas made reply speech Judge 
never noticed part all. thing passed by. think, 
then, fact Judge Trumbull offered amendment throw 
much blame upon him; did, reach question fact 
Judge Douglas doing. repeat, Trumbull 
would relieve others 
murder, upon trial 
discovered implicated murder, 
witness guilty too, would touch 
question crime. would relief 
discovered man charged crime upon guilty too. 
 
Another one points Judge Douglas makes upon Judge Trumbull is, 
spoke Chicago made charge rest upon fact 
bill provision submitting constitution vote 
people went Judge Douglas's hands, 
missing reported Senate, public speech 
subsequently said alterations bill made 
committee, made consultation 
Judge Douglas goes comment upon fact 
Trumbull's speech proposition bill 
came back proposition stricken out, another 
clause another provision it, saying 
complete execution Act shall election said 
Trumbull taking provision 
submitting vote people bill, adding 
affirmative one, prevented people exercising right 
bill merely silent question. Now, regard 
says, Trumbull issue, 
believe uses term that, "it proven false, 
changed call upon you, come examine 
portion Trumbull's speech (for make part examine 
whether Trumbull shifted ground not. say shift 
ground, brought forward original charge evidence 
sustain yet fully, precisely originally made it. 
Then, addition thereto, brought new piece evidence. 
shifted ground. brought new piece evidence inconsistent 
former brought new tending, thought, 
think, prove proposition. man brings 
another, trial man making charge 
B prove second trial 
tell story before, 
third tells thing, addition gives 
testimony charge. 
shifting ground, inconsistency testimony new piece 
evidence originally 
 
Judge Douglas says moved strike last 
provision bill, motion stricken 
substitute presume truth. presume true 
last proposition stricken Judge Douglas. Trumbull 
said not; Trumbull said stricken 
out. says: "I speaking bill Judge Douglas reported 
back. amended somewhat Senate passed, 
speaking brought Now, Judge Douglas 
fact provision stricken bill came back, 
asserts nothing contrary Trumbull Trumbull said 
originally put in, strike out. Trumbull 
says bill went committee. came 
back in, Judge Douglas said alterations made 
consultation Trumbull therefore, conclusion, 
Judge Douglas put in. Then, Douglas wants contradict 
Trumbull call let say put in, 
n't take again. said bear sometimes 
hard enough pushed drop presume case. 
presume truth Douglas put in, afterward took out. 
That, take it, truth it. Judge Trumbull says one thing, 
Douglas says another thing, two don't contradict one another 
all. question is, put for? first place, 
take provision bill provision 
Trumbull argued necessary submitting constitution vote 
people? take and, taken out, 
put for? say run things unlikely 
forces render vastly expedient Judge Douglas take 
latter clause again. question Trumbull made 
Judge Douglas put in; don't meet Trumbull unless 
denies that. 
 
clause Judge Douglas's speech upon subject uses 
language toward Judge says: 
 
"He evidence beginning 
record, false 
 
Well, pretty serious evidence 
beginning end. Now, upon authority say 
true. forgery? Consider evidence Trumbull brought 
forward. come read speech, able to, examine 
whether evidence forgery beginning end. bill 
document hand like says 
copy Toomb's amendment offered says 
copy bill introduced went Judge Douglas's 
hands. Now, Judge Douglas say forgery? one thing 
Trumbull brought forward. Judge Douglas says forged beginning 
say. Douglas say 
forgery? Let say to-day, subsequent examination 
upon subject. Trumbull holds another document like this, 
says exact copy bill came back amended form 
Judge Douglas's hands. Judge Douglas say forgery? 
say general sweeping say now? 
not, take Toomb's bill bill amended form, 
needs compare see provision one 
other; leaves inference inevitable taken 
out. 
 
But, dealing question, let us see Trumbull's 
evidence is. One piece evidence read. Trumbull says 
original Toomb's bill words: 
 
"That following propositions hereby offered 
said Convention people Kansas, formed, free 
acceptance which, accepted Convention ratified 
people election adoption constitution, shall 
upon United States said State 
 
Now, said forgery, open paper 
see whether not. Again, Trumbull says, goes along, Mr. 
Bigler made following statement place Senate, December 
9, 
 
"I present subject discussed senators bill 
introduced, question raised discussed, whether 
constitution, formed, submitted vote people. 
held intelligent subject that, view 
difficulties surrounding Territory, danger experiment 
time popular vote, would better 
provision Toomb's bill; understanding, 
intercourse had, Convention would make constitution, send 
here, without submitting popular 
 
Trumbull follows on: 
 
"In speaking meeting 21st December, 1857 
Globe, page Senator Bigler said: 
 
mind allude social 
confidential meeting character. Indeed, 
called promote public good. recollection 
clear left conference impression 
deemed best adopt measures admit Kansas State 
agency one popular election, delegates Convention. 
impression stronger thought spirit bill 
upon doctrine great 
hope great good, 
movement made direction Territory, 
concluded support measure. 
testimony correctness 
submission shall content. bill reported 
senator Illinois 7th March, 1856, providing 
admission Kansas State, third section reads 
follows: 
 
"That following propositions be, hereby offered 
said Convention people Kansas, formed, free 
acceptance which, accepted Convention ratified 
people election adoption constitution, shall 
upon United States said State 
 
bill read place senator Georgia 25th 
June, referred Committee Territories, contained 
section word word. bills consideration 
conference referred to; but, sir, senator Illinois reported 
Toombs bill Senate amendments, next morning, 
contain portion third section indicated 
Convention constitution approved people. 
words "and ratified people election adoption 
stricken out. 
 
Now, things Trumbull says stated Bigler upon floor 
Senate certain days, recorded 
Congressional Globe certain pages. Judge Douglas say 
forgery? say thing Congressional 
mean says Judge Trumbull evidence 
beginning end? says another place Judge Douglas, 
speech, December 9, 1857 Globe, part page 

 
"That last session Congress, [Mr. reported bill 
Committee Territories, authorize people Kansas 
assemble form constitution themselves. Subsequently senator 
Georgia [Mr. brought forward substitute bill, which, 
modified passed 

 
Now, Trumbull says quotation speech Douglas, 
recorded Congressional forgery? 
not? may there, want Judge take pieces 
evidence, distinctly say dare it. 
 
[A voice: "He 
 
Well, sir, better commit him. gives 
Judge Douglas. says: 
 
"I ask senator show one member 
Senate, whole debate Toombs bill, Union, 
constitution submitted 
people. venture say sides chamber 
understood time. opponents bill understood 
not, would made point it; made it, 
certainly yielded it, put 
discovery made since President found safe take 
granted would done, ought fairness 

 
Judge Trumbull says Douglas made speech, 
Judge Douglas say forgery, Trumbull says 
somewhere, propose it, found one 
read debate, distinctly bring notice 
bill, 
goes give another quotation Judge Douglas, Judge 
Trumbull uses language: 
 
Douglas, however, day debate, probably 
reminded fact objected 
Toombs bill pending provide submission 
constitution people, made another statement, found 
volume Globe, page 22, says: bill 
silent subject true, attention called 
time passed; took fair construction be, 
powers course constitution 
would submitted 
 
"Whether statement consistent statement made, 
point made would yielded to, 
new discovery, 
 
say. know whether Judge Douglas dispute this, yet 
maintain position Trumbull's evidence "was forged beginning 
end." remark got Congressional 
me. large books, difficult carry about, Judge 
Douglas shall say points Trumbull quoted 
passages there, shall able prove 
upon occasion, another chance. Whenever 
points forgery says, "I declare particular thing 
Trumbull uttered found says is," 
attention drawn that, arm contest, 
stating slightest doubt earth find 
every quotation Trumbull says is. question is, 
Douglas call forgery? make forgery? 
forgery? bringing forward something writing 
print purporting certain effect altogether untrue. 
come forward note one hundred dollars never 
given note, forgery. come forward letter 
purporting written never another 
forgery. produce anything writing print saying 
so, document forgery 
make forgery every piece evidence 
Judge Douglas say documents quotations false 
full right so; 
don't know get him. say false 
look it, presume procure 
proper officers genuine 
doubt extracts found exactly Trumbull says 
is. leave Judge Douglas, making sweeping 
charge Judge Trumbull's evidence forged beginning end, 
meets way get facts. repeat 
again, point one forgery, carefully 
examine it, proves one really forgery, 
hold longer. always wanted 
deal meet made 
assertion warranted facts, pointed me, 
withdraw cheerfully. choose see Judge Trumbull 
evidence brought forward general 
terms "a forgery beginning end." legal way 
meeting charge, submit intelligent persons, friends 
Judge Douglas myself, whether is. 
 
point upon Judge Douglas this: bill went hands 
provision submission constitution 
people; say language amounts express provision 
took provision out. says known 
bill silent say, Judge Douglas, 
silent got it. declaration, 
got it, submission constitution people. now, 
direct question Judge Douglas is, answer why, deemed bill 
silent point, found necessary strike particular 
harmless words. found bill silent without 
provision, might say now. supposes implied 
constitution would submitted vote people, 
could two lines statute make necessary 
strike could infer submission still implied, 
express provision stricken find 
bill provision, silenced it. took out, 
although took provision preventing submission vote 
people, ask, first put in? ask whether 
took original provision out, Trumbull bill. 
admits take it, ask for. looks 
us altered bill. looks differently 
different reason action one assign 
tell it. insist upon knowing made bill silent upon 
point put hands upon it. 
 
told, last time within three 
minutes out. presume now; therefore close. 
 
 
 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S 
 
follows matter course answer 
speech hour half hurried one. shall 
able touch upon points suggested Judge Douglas, 
give brief attention, shall totally omit others 
want time. 
 
Judge Douglas said able get 
answer question whether favor negro far 
know Judge never asked question before. shall 
occasion ever ask again, tell frankly 
favor negro furnishes occasion saying 
words upon subject. mentioned certain speech mine, 
Supreme Court decided negro could 
possibly made without saying ground 
complaint regard that, whether ground 
Judge Douglas thing manufactured nearly everything 
ever says disposition produce equality negroes 
white people. one read speech, find 
mentioned one points decided course Supreme 
Court opinions, state objection it. Judge 
Douglas tells people objection tell 
myself. Now, opinion different States power 
make negro citizen Constitution United States 
choose. Dred Scott decision decides power. 
State Illinois power, opposed exercise 
it. say it. 
 
Judge Douglas told heard speeches north speeches 
heard Ottawa Freeport north 
recently south, different cast 
sentiment speeches made different points. charge 
upon Judge Douglas wilfully me, call upon 
every man take speeches read them, dare 
point difference speeches north south. 
perhaps ought say word, time, regard 
latter portion Judge's speech, sort 
reference said entertained belief 
government would endure half slave half free. said so, 
say without seemed good perhaps 
would require time set forth reasons 
let ask questions. ever peace 
slavery question? peace upon it, kept 
position ever peace upon it? 
important question. sure, allow Judge 
Douglas friends march present career 
plant institution nation, wherever else flag 
it, peace. let ask Judge 
Douglas going get people that? 
question least forty years. cause 
agitation resulting Missouri Compromise; produced 
troubles annexation Texas, acquisition territory 
acquired Mexican War. Again, trouble 
Compromise 1850, settled great 
political parties declared National 
turned four years, Judge Douglas reopened it. 
likely come end? introduced Nebraska Bill 
1854 put another end slavery agitation. promised 
would finish immediately, never made speech 
since, got quarrel President Lecompton 
Constitution, declared end 
slavery agitation. one speech, think last winter, 
say n't quite see end slavery agitation would 
come. tells us people Kansas 
voted Lecompton Constitution. 
one attempts putting end slavery 
Kansas Union? formed 
constitution likely come slavery 
agitation still open question voting 
constitution put end likely 
settle every one previous attempts settle slavery 
Now, day history world 
end slavery agitation see 
end world itself. Bill introduced four 
years half ago, agitation ever come end 
may say four years half nearer end. So, too, say 
four years half nearer end world, 
clearly see end world see end 
agitation. Kansas settlement conclude it. Kansas 
sink to-day, leave great space earth's surface, 
vexed question would still among us. say, then, way 
putting end slavery agitation amongst us put back upon 
basis fathers placed it; way keep 
new restrict forever old States 
exists. public mind rest belief 
course ultimate extinction. one way putting end 
slavery agitation. 
 
way us surrender let Judge Douglas friends 
way plant slavery States; cease speaking 
way wrong; regard slavery one common matters 
property, speak negroes horses 
drives state progress 
driven last five years, ventured opinion, 
say to-day, end slavery agitation 
takes one turn other. mean takes turn 
toward ultimate extinction day, year, two 
years. suppose peaceful way ultimate extinction 
would occur less hundred years occur 
best way races, God's good time, doubt. 
But, friends, used time intended 
point. 
 
Now, regard matter Trumbull made 
bargain sell entire Whig Democratic parties Judge 
Douglas brings forward evidence sustain charge, except 
speech said made 1856, told 
story sort, upon moral principles 
Judge Douglas tells to-day. simple truth. 
care greatly story, truth it: twice 
told Judge Douglas face beginning end one 
word truth it. called upon proof, 
meet Trumbull met upon 
talking, producing record. n't bring record 
record asks ready 
indorse Trumbull's veracity broken bargain me, reply 
Trumbull broken bargain would likely 
indorse ready indorse veracity 
neither thing, other, years 
known Trumbull, known fail word tell 
falsehood large reason indorse 

 
[Mr. JAMES BROWN "What History say 

 
gentleman asks History says him. 
recollection speaks Trumbull terms 
several portions book, great deal worse 
Judge Douglas. refer you, sir, History examination. 
 
Judge Douglas complains considerable length disposition 
part Trumbull attack personally. want attend 
suggestion moment. don't want accused dealing 
either court 
political canvass anywhere else. would despise supposed 
ready deal less liberally willing 
treated myself. Judge Douglas general way, without putting 
direct shape, old charge reference 
Mexican War. take responsibility putting 
definite form, makes general reference it. charge 
ten years old. complains Trumbull says 
bring charges one two years old. knows, too, 
regard Mexican War story respectable papers 
party throughout State compelled take back 
acknowledge 
 
Mr. LINCOLN turned crowd platform, and, HON. 
B. led forward 
 
mean anything Mr. except present face 
tell personally knows member 
Congress time Congress, knows 
whenever attempt procure vote mine 
would indorse origin justice war, refused give 
indorsement voted it; never voted supplies 
army, knows, well Judge Douglas, whenever 
dollar asked way compensation otherwise benefit 
soldiers gave votes Douglas did, perhaps 
more. 
 
[Mr. friends, wish say reference 
Mr. Lincoln good personal friends Judge Douglas 
myself. reference Mexican War, recollection 
resolution offered Mr. 
Massachusetts, declared Mexican War unnecessary 
commenced recollection 
Mr. Lincoln voted 
 
truth. Now, remember resolution 
President manner war know 
charged voted 
soldiers fighting battles country. say 
knows false. charge brought forward 
Chicago Times, Springfield Register reminded 
Times charge really applied John know 
John Henry making speeches fiercely Judge Douglas. 
Judge says offers sort 
said to-day reference Trumbull's charge, remind 
made charge said word brought 
forward Ottawa, first time met face opening 
speech Judge Douglas made attacked regard matter 
ten years old. n't pretty man people making 
charges two years 
 
Judge thinks altogether wrong upon 
charge Trumbull's all. gave apology opening 
speech. Perhaps n't fix attention. said Judge 
Douglas speaking spoke succeeding day used 
harsh language charge. Two three times afterward said 
confidence Judge Trumbull's veracity 
opinion was, knew character Judge Trumbull, 
would position prove whatever stated true. 
repeated two three times; dropped it, without saying 
anything subject month. passed 
without noticing till found, Jacksonville, Judge Douglas 
power willing answer Trumbull let 
alone, comes uses language: "He 
hereafter occupy time charges made Trumbull 
that, Lincoln indorsed character Trumbull veracity, 
hold responsible Lincoln 
do? right, fit opportunity meeting 
Judge Douglas here, tell ready 
ask candid audience whether thus Judge Douglas 
rather meet face face, say ready 
take responsibility, far rests me. 
 
done ask attention audience question 
whether succeeded sustaining charge, whether Judge 
Douglas succeeded it? heard call upon 
say pieces evidence forgery. 
say present copy original Toombs bill 
forgery? say present copy bill reported 
forgery, presented Globe 
quotations speech forgery? say 
quotations speech say 
Trumbull's speech forgery? 
 
didn't deny one 
 
would like know comes piece 
story true whole story turns false. take people 
see plainly Judge Douglas playing 
small species mode defending pursued 
except throwing black makes water dark 
enemy cannot see it, thus Ain't Judge playing 

 
Now, would ask special attention consideration Judge 
Douglas's speech shall read speech 
to-day, ask watch closely see pieces 
testimony, every one says forgery, shown 
such. one shown forgery. ask 
original question, pieces testimony true, 
possible whole 
 
regard Trumbull's charge inserted provision 
bill prevent constitution submitted people, 
comes reads Congressional Globe 
show motion provision struck bill. Why, 
Trumbull said stricken out, Trumbull says 
put in; answer charge say 
afterwards took out. perhaps true. regard 
thing precisely told dropped Trumbull shows 
introducing bill answer 
assertion call Trumbull merely specially say 
Douglas struck out. Suppose case, answer 
assert to-day, 
undertake prove showing 
yesterday. say took hat head, prove 
putting head. whole force Douglas's 
argument. 
 
Now, want come back original question. Trumbull says Judge 
Douglas bill provision submitting constitution 
made vote people Kansas. Judge Douglas deny 
fact? deny provision Trumbull reads put 
Trumbull says struck out. dare deny that? 
not, right repeat Judge Douglas 
took Bigler said combination certain senators, 
among include Judge Douglas, agreed 
Kansas Bill clause constitution 
formed submitted vote people. say 
Douglas among them, prove another source 
time Douglas comes Senate provision stricken 
bill. Although Bigler cannot say working yet 
looks much thing agreed upon done mutual 
understanding know 
absolutely so, yet looks probable right call upon 
man knows true reason done tell true 
reason was. tell true reason was, stands 
attitude accused goods 
called account refuses tell got them. 
evidence, comes bill provision 
stricken out, tells us speech, since, 
alterations modifications bill made HIM, 
consultation bill. tells us 
to-day. says certain modifications made bill 
committee vote for. ask remember, certain 
amendments made of, majority 
committee voted in, told us particular 
alterations modifications made him, upon consultation 
word alterations made him, 
committee. Now, ask, reason Judge Douglas 
coming exact question? reason 
tell anything made, made, 
made all? stand playing upon meaning 
words quibbling around explain 
this, leaves right infer Judge 
Douglas understood purpose party, 
bill through, make constitution, Kansas come Union 
constitution, without submitted vote 
people. explain action question, giving 
better reason facts happened done, 
satisfactory. gives better 
plausible reason offered evidence 
suggest avail up, 
takes dignity, calls people Why, sir, word 
Trumbull's speech depends Trumbull's veracity all. 
arrayed evidence told follows matter 
statement whole speech depends Trumbull's 
word. ever studied geometry, remember course 
reasoning Euclid proves equal 
two right Euclid shown work out. Now, 
undertake proposition, show erroneous, 
would prove false calling Euclid tell 
time out, therefore close. 
 
 
 
 
FIFTH JOINT DEBATE, GALESBURGH, OCTOBER 7, 1858 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S REPLY. 
 
large portion speech Judge Douglas 
addressed previously delivered put 
mean hit upon Judge 
going say answer able make 
large portion already made 
opportunity afforded public see 
respective views upon topics discussed large portion 
speech delivered. make remarks purpose 
passing entire ground Judge 
however desire take points 
attended to, ask attention them, shall follow 
upon notes taken, reversing order, 
beginning 
 
Judge alluded Declaration Independence, insisted 
negroes included 
upon framers instrument suppose negroes 
meant asks you: possible believe Mr. 
Jefferson, penned immortal paper, could supposed 
applying language instrument negro race, yet held 
portion race slavery? Would freed them? 
remark upon part Judge's speech (and that, too, 
briefly, shall detain myself, you, upon point 
great length believe entire records world, 
date Declaration Independence within three years 
ago, may searched vain one single one single 
man, negro included Declaration Independence; 
think may defy Judge Douglas show ever said so, 
Washington ever said so, President ever said so, member 
Congress ever said so, living man upon whole earth ever 
said so, necessities present policy Democratic 
party, regard slavery, invent 
remind Judge Douglas audience Mr. Jefferson 
owner slaves, undoubtedly was, speaking upon subject 
used strong language "he trembled country 
remembered God offer highest 
power Judge Douglas show he, life, ever 
uttered sentiment 
 
next thing ask attention Judge's comments 
upon fact, assumes be, cannot call public 
meetings Republican instances Tazewell County one 
places friends Lincoln called public meeting 
dared name Republican meeting. instances Monroe 
County another, Judge Trumbull Baker addressed 
persons Judge assumes friends Lincoln calling 
"Free honor inform Judge Douglas 
spoke county Tazewell last Saturday, 
Tuesday last; spoke there, spoke call 
use word Judge think 
this? 
 
So, again, another thing would ask Judge's 
attention upon subject. contest 1856 party delighted 
call together now, 
notice put anywhere meeting 
Judge Douglas friends would come. would 
suppose would understand call 
hateful about. 
 
words regard extracts speeches mine 
Judge Douglas read you, supposes great 
contrast other. speeches public 
considerable time, inconsistency them, 
conflict them, public able it. 
Judge says, speaking subject, make speeches one sort 
people northern end State, different sort 
southern people, assumes understand 
speeches put print read north south. knew 
speech made Chicago, one made 
one Charleston, would put print, 
reading intelligent men community would see know 
opinions. supposed, suppose, 
conflict whatever them. Judge 
confess sort inequality 
white black races justifies us making slaves, 
must insist degree equality requires us 
make Now, taken broad distinction 
regard matter; different 
speeches here; entire reading either 
speeches show distinction made. Perhaps taking two 
parts speech could got much conflict 
one found. maintained far 
insisted equality white black 
races produce perfect social political equality, 
seen printed speeches, 
said right "life, liberty, pursuit 
proclaimed old Declaration, inferior races 
declarations constantly made reference 
abstract moral question, contemplate consider 
legislating new country already 
actual presence never manifested 
necessities spring actual presence 
black people amongst us, actual existence slavery amongst us 
already insisted that, legislating 
new countries exist rule 
moral abstract reference new countries, 
maxims right people "life, liberty, 
pursuit rules constantly referred 
to. misunderstanding this, except men interested 
misunderstand it. take address intelligent 
reading community, say, it, judge 
whether advanced improper views, whether advanced 
contrary views different portions 
country. believe guilty thing latter, 
though, course, cannot claim entirely free error 
opinions advance. 
 
Judge also detained us regard distinction 
party party. assumes national party, 
sectional one. asking question whether country 
interest maintenance Republican party. assumes 
party altogether sectional, party 
adheres argument is, party rightful 
based upon rightful announce 
principles everywhere. presume Judge Douglas could go 
announce doctrine national could 
denounce doctrine kings 
may true country places may able 
proclaim doctrine clearly true truth 
section directly opposed tolerate 
us so. true test doctrine 
places people won't let proclaim it? way test 
truth Why, understood one time people 
Chicago would let Judge Douglas certain favorite doctrine 
his. commend consideration question whether takes 
test wanted 
 
another thing wish ask attention little 
occasion. always evidence brought forward 
prove Republican party sectional main one 
Southern portion Union people let 
Republicans proclaim doctrines amongst them. main 
evidence brought substantially 
none, Slave States. South taken hold principles 
announce them; Judge Douglas 
principles. Republican State Platform, laid Springfield 
June last stating position way questions 
country. far advanced Judge Douglas 
made perhaps forty speeches fifth 
time met face face debate, day found 
either Judge Douglas friend taking hold Republican 
platform, laying finger upon anything wrong. ask 
recollect that. Judge Douglas turns away platform 
principles fact find people somewhere 
allow us announce principles. great confidence 
principles wrong, would take hold demonstrate 
wrong. so. evidence 
wrong fact people won't allow us 
them. ask again, way test 
 
ask attention also fact rule 
fast becoming sectional. ask attention fact 
speeches would go current south Ohio River 
formerly gone ask attention fact 
to-day Democrats free States agreeing 
him, tell us Democrats slave State agree 
him. thought this, commend consideration 
evidence declaration, day, becoming 
sectional too. see rapidly Whatever may result 
contest Judge Douglas myself, see 
day rapidly approaching 
Republicans years past, 

 
Now, regard Judge Douglas said (in beginning 
Compromise 1850 containing principles Nebraska 
Bill, although often presented views upon subject, yet 
done canvass, will, please, detain 
little them. always maintained, far able, 
nothing principle Nebraska Bill Compromise 
1850 whatever. find principle 
Nebraska Bill anywhere, two pieces 
Compromise organizing Territories New Mexico 
expressly provided two acts came admitted 
Union admitted without slavery, 
choose, constitutions. Nothing said either 
acts done relation slavery 
Territorial existence Territories, Henry Clay constantly 
made declaration Douglas recognizing that, 
opinion, old Mexican laws would control question 
Territorial existence, old Mexican laws excluded slavery. 
used principle declaring 
Territorial existence well time framing constitution 
people, please, might slaves wanted them? 
discussing question whether right wrong; New 
Mexican Utah laws Nebraska maintain 
organization Utah New Mexico establish general principle 
all. feature establishing general principle. acts 
referred part general system 
lay proposed regular policy 
Territories, agreement particular case way, 
things done compensation it. 
allowed come shape, another way paid 
for, considering part system measures called 
Compromise 1850, finally included included 
admission California free State, kept 
Union half year formed free constitution. 
included settlement boundary Texas, 
before, slavery question; pushed line 
farther west, made Texas made slave territory; 
while, drew line toward east, narrowed boundary 
diminished domain slavery, much increased free territory. 
included abolition slave trade District Columbia. 
included passage new Fugitive Slave law. things 
put together, and, though passed separate acts, nevertheless, 
legislation (as speeches time made depend upon 
other. got votes understanding measures 
system compromise, series 
measures, two New Mexico Utah 
say reason could taken framed upon 
principle, future Territories. 
evidence fact Judge Douglas, year afterward, 
year afterward, perhaps, first introduced bills 
purpose framing new Territories, attempt follow bills 
New Mexico even introduced Nebraska Bill, 
think discover exactly follow them. 
wish dwell great length upon branch discussion. 
opinion is, thorough investigation show plainly 
New Mexico Utah bills part system compromise, 
designed future Territorial 
Nebraska Bill follow all. 
 
Judge opposed making odious 
free slave States. altogether unaware 
Republicans favor making odious 
free slave States. still difference, think, 
Judge Douglas Republicans this. suppose real 
difference Judge Douglas friends, Republicans 
contrary, is, Judge favor making difference 
slavery liberty; favor 
pressing view, questions preference country free 
slave consequently every sentiment 
idea wrong slavery. Everything 
course policy carefully excludes 
thought anything wrong slavery. 
consider them, seen exclude thought 
anything whatever wrong slavery. take Judge's speeches, 
select short pointed sentences expressed 
declaration "don't care whether slavery voted 
see perfectly logical, admit 
slavery wrong. admit wrong, Judge Douglas cannot 
logically say don't care whether wrong voted voted down. 
Judge Douglas declares community wants slavery 
right it. say says 
wrong slavery; admit wrong it, cannot 
logically say anybody right wrong. insists upon 
score equality owners slaves owners 
horses every sort alike, hold 
alike new Territory. perfectly logical two species 
property alike equally founded right. admit 
one wrong, cannot institute equality right 
wrong. difference belief part 
one institution wrong, policy springing belief 
looks arrest enlargement wrong, 
sentiment, wrong, policy sprung sentiment, 
tolerate idea preventing wrong growing 
looks never end existence 
real difference Judge Douglas friends 
one hand Republicans other. Now, confess 
belonging class country contemplate slavery moral, 
social, political evil, due regard actual existence 
amongst us difficulties getting rid satisfactory 
way, constitutional obligations thrown 
it; but, nevertheless, desire policy looks 
wrong, looks time wrong may 
come end. 
 
Judge Douglas again, for, believe, fifth time, 
seventh, presence, reiterated charge conspiracy 
combination National Democrats Republicans. evidence 
Judge Douglas upon subject know not, inasmuch never 
favors us any. said upon former occasion, 
choose suppress now, objection division 
Judge's party. got himself. work. 
had, think, great deal steps led 
Lecompton Constitution Mr. Buchanan though last, 
reached it, it, friends divided upon it. 
free confess Judge Douglas objection 
defy Judge show evidence way 
promoted division, unless insists witness 
merely saying so. give fair friends Judge Douglas 
understand exactly view Republicans take regard 
Don't remember two years ago opponents 
Democratic party divided Fremont guess 
do. Democrat division remember also 
time glad it, able see 
National Democrats Republicans. think 
two divisions Democrats, thought Fremont 
Fillmore it. 
 
Judge continues put forward declaration 
unnatural Republicans National 
Democrats, want enter protest receiving 
entirely competent witness upon subject. want call 
Judge's attention attack made upon first one 
Ottawa, 21st order fix extreme 
upon me, Judge Douglas read set resolutions 
declared passed Republican State Convention, October, 
1854, Springfield, Illinois, declared taken part 
Convention. turned although men calling 
anti-Nebraska State Convention sat Springfield time, yet 
neither take part it, pass resolutions 
resolutions Judge Douglas read. apparent become 
resolutions read passed Springfield all, 
State Convention taken part, seven days 
afterward, Freeport, Judge Douglas declared 
Charles H. editor State Register, Thomas L. 
member Congress district, promised speech 
went Springfield would investigate matter. Since 
Judge Douglas Springfield, presume made 
month passed since there, and, 
far know, made report result 
waited think sufficient time report 
investigation, curiosity see hear it. fraud, 
absolute forgery committed, traced 
Douglas. Whether narrowed 
way one them, Judge Douglas's report 
would probably show. 
 
true set resolutions read Judge Douglas 
published Illinois State Register 16th October, 1854, 
resolutions anti-Nebraska Convention sat 
month October, Springfield. also true 
publication Register forgery then, question still 
three, them, committed forgery. 
idea done mistake absurd. article 
Illinois State Register contains part real proceedings 
Springfield Convention, showing writer article 
real proceedings him, purposely threw genuine 
resolutions passed Convention substituted 
others. Lanphier then, now, editor Register, 
seems little room escape. 
borne mind Lanphier less interest object 
forgery either two. main object forgery 
time beat elect Harris Congress, object 
known exceedingly dear Judge Douglas time. Harris 
Douglas Springfield Convention session, 
although left fraud appeared Register, 
subsequent events show eyes fixed upon 
Convention. 
 
fraud apparently successful upon occasion, Harris 
Douglas since attempting put 
new uses. wife, whose drowned husband brought home 
body full said asked done 
him, "Take set Harris Douglas 
shown disposition take fraud 
gained election, set fraud once. 
9th July, 1856, Douglas attempted repetition upon Trumbull 
floor Senate United States, appear 
appendix Congressional Globe date. 
 
9th August, Harris attempted upon House 
Representatives, appear appendix 
Congressional Globe date. 21st August last, 
Douglas, upon Ottawa. 
clung played exceedingly high 
trump blessed discovered publicly 
fraud find Judge Douglas surprise 
all. makes complaint must known 
fraud beginning. He, Harris 
active new 
general discovery Now, natural 
alike guilty fraud, unnatural one 
Lanphier perhaps insists rule honor 
among quite require take upon himself, 
consequently friend Judge Douglas finds difficult make 
satisfactory report upon meanwhile three 
agreed "a honorable man." 
 
Judge Douglas requires indorsement truth honor 
re-election United States Senate, makes reports 
Judge Trumbull, day day, charges know 
utterly without moment seeming think one 
fraud, promised least 
claim belief. Harris asks re-election 
lower House Congress without seeming remember 
involved Illinois State Register, edited 
then, now, central organ Harris Douglas, 
continues public ear without seeming 
suspect assertions lacking title belief. 
 
all, question still upon us, fraud 
originally get State Lanphier then, now, 
editor paper. Lanphier knows. Lanphier cannot ignorant 
originally induced tell, or, 
told, Judge Douglas induced tell originally 
may true Lanphier insists two men whose 
benefit originally devised shall least bear share it! 
is, know, remains hope 
pardoned insist mere fact Judge Douglas making charges 
Trumbull quite sufficient evidence establish 
them! 
 
Freeport, one joint answered 
certain interrogatories Judge Douglas propounded me, 
turn propounded him, sort way answered. 
third one interrogatories me, wish make 
comments upon it. words: "If Supreme Court 
 States cannot exclude slavery limits, favor 
in, to, following decision rule 
political 
 
interrogatory Judge Douglas made answer sense 
word. contented thought 
possible Supreme Court ever make decision. 
propounded without 
reflection, wish address audience remarks upon 
it. 
 
second clause sixth article, believe is, 
Constitution United States, find following language: 
 
"This Constitution laws United States shall made 
pursuance thereof, treaties made, shall made, 
authority United States, shall supreme law 
judges every State shall bound anything 
Constitution laws State contrary 
 
essence Dred Scott case sentence 
read: 
 
"Now, already said earlier part opinion, upon 
different point, right property slave distinctly 
expressly affirmed Constitution." 
 
repeat it, "The right property slave distinctly expressly 
affirmed 
Constitution? Made firm Constitution, made cannot 
separated Constitution without breaking Constitution; durable 
Constitution, part Constitution. Now, remembering 
provision Constitution 
instrument supreme law judges every State 
shall bound it, law constitution State contrary 
right property slave affirmed 
Constitution, made, formed cannot separated 
without breaking it; durable part 
follows short even argument 
it? think follows, submit consideration men capable 
arguing whether, state it, form, argument 
fault it: 
 
Nothing Constitution laws State destroy right 
distinctly expressly affirmed Constitution United 
States. 
 
right property slave distinctly expressly affirmed 
Constitution United States. 
 
Therefore, nothing Constitution laws State destroy 
right property slave. 
 
believe fault pointed assuming 
truth conclusion, far capacity 
understand it, follows fault think, 
fault falsehood fact fault 
believe right property slave 
distinctly expressly affirmed Constitution, Judge Douglas 
thinks is. believe Supreme Court advocates 
decision may search vain place Constitution 
right property slave distinctly expressly affirmed say, 
therefore, think one true fact. 
true Judge Douglas. true Supreme Court pronounced 
it. denying it, denying it, 
conclusion follows that, Constitution United States 
supreme law, constitution law interfere it. 
affirmed decision right property slave 
distinctly expressly affirmed Constitution, conclusion 
inevitably follows State law constitution destroy 
right. say Judge Douglas others think 
take better answer show said 
right property slave distinctly expressly affirmed 
Constitution, prepared show constitution law 
destroy right. say believe take far better argument 
mere show minds intelligent men whoever 
said whenever public sentiment far advanced 
justify it, say other. opinion, opinion 
one humble man; opinion Dred Scott decision, 
is, never would made present form party 
made sustained previously elections. opinion 
is, new Dred Scott decision, deciding right 
people States exclude slavery, never made party 
sustained elections. believe, further, 
sure made to-morrow come, party shall 
said, upon former occasion, repeat now, course 
Judge Douglas makes use upon subject (I charge 
motives preparing public mind new Dred 
Scott decision. asked point reasons 
first adherence Dred Scott decision is. turned 
attention fact General Jackson differed regard 
political obligation Supreme Court decision. asked 
attention fact Jefferson differed regard 
political obligation Supreme Court decision. Jefferson said 
honest men, so." said, 
substantially, whenever free people give absolute 
submission department government, 
appeal it, liberties gone. asked attention 
fact Cincinnati platform, upon says stands, 
decision Supreme Court, denying 
power Congress establish National Bank. asked attention 
fact one active instruments one 
time breaking Supreme Court State Illinois 
made decision struggle ending 
remarkable circumstance sitting one new Judges 
decision; getting title Judge 
way. 
 
far controversy get answer Judge Douglas 
upon subjects. one get him, except 
says, "All us stand decision Supreme 
Court friends Constitution; fellows dare 
question way enemies Constitution." Now, 
devoted adherence decision, opposition great 
political leaders recognized leaders, opposition 
former self history, something manner 
adheres right upon 
discuss 
absolutely upon every one simply source 
whence comes, man whatever may 
another marked feature adherence decision. 
marks respect, next decision, 
whenever comes, one, since 
investigate it, won't inquire whether opinion right wrong. 
takes next one without inquiring whether right wrong. 
teaches men doctrine, public mind 
take next decision comes, without think 
argue fairly questioning motives Judge Douglas 
preparing public mind take 
decision so, various 
ways. general maxims liberty, assertions 
"don't care whether slavery voted voted 
wants slavery right principles equality 
allowed go "there inconsistency 
free slave also preparing 
purposely way making institution slavery 
repeat again, wish misunderstanding, 
charge means so; call upon minds 
going get best instrument could, set work 
ingenious way, prepare public mind movement, 
operating free States, 
institution slavery, could find instrument capable 
Judge Douglas, one employed apt way it? 
 
said before, repeat now, Mr. Clay, 
answering objection Colonization Society, 
tendency ultimate emancipation slaves, said that: 
 
would repress tendencies liberty ultimate 
emancipation must put benevolent efforts 
Colonization must go back era liberty 
independence, muzzle cannon thunders annual joyous 
return; must blow moral lights around us; must penetrate 
human soul, eradicate light reason love 

 
repeat, though said former 
Judge Douglas like him, teaches negro 
humble though may be, Declaration Independence, going back 
era liberty independence, and, far 
cannon thunders annual joyous return; 
moral lights around us, whoever 
wants slaves right hold them; far 
lies power, human soul, light reason 
love liberty, every possible way preparing 
public mind, vast influence, making institution slavery 
perpetual national. 
 
is, friends, one point call 
attention remaining time left me, perhaps shall 
occupy entire time have, one point may take 
clear it. 
 
Among interrogatories Judge Douglas propounded Freeport, 
one language: 
 
"Are opposed acquisition territory United 
States, unless slavery shall first prohibited 
 
answered, thought, generally opposed 
acquisition additional territory, would support 
proposition acquisition additional territory according 
supporting calculated slavery question 
amongst us. proposed Judge Douglas another 
that: "Are favor acquiring additional 
territory, disregard may affect us upon slavery 
Judge Douglas is, way answered 
it. believe that, although took good many words answer it, 
little fully answered other. substance 
answer country would continue would 
need additional territory; absurd suppose could 
continue upon present territory, enlarging population are, 
would boy twelve years age, expect grow 
man's size without bursting believe something 
like that. Consequently, favor acquisition 
territory fast might need it, disregard might affect 
slavery question. say giving exact language, 
said would leave question slavery, 
territory settled people 
acquired territory. May is; let us consider 
while. probably, run things, become one 
manifestations slavery question. Judge Douglas's 
policy upon question gets fairly settled down, 
opposition out, next thing 
territory poor Mexico, invasion rich lands South America, 
adjoining follow, one promises 
additional question left people 
countries settlement. get Mexico, don't know whether 
Judge favor Mexican people get 
settling question others; know 
Judge great horror understand people 
Mexico decidedly race understand 
one person eight pure white, 
suppose Judge's previous declaration get Mexico, 
considerable portion it, favor 
settling question, would bring somewhat collision 
horror inferior race. 
 
remembered, though, power acquiring additional 
territory power confided President Senate 
United States. power control representatives 
people they, President Senate, 
considered representatives people. Let illustrate 
case history. acquired territory Mexico 
Mexican War, House Representatives, composed immediate 
representatives people, time insisted territory 
thus acquired brought upon condition slavery 
forever prohibited therein, upon terms language 
slavery prohibited coming country. 
insisted upon constantly never failed call forth assurance 
territory thus acquired prohibition it, far 
House Representatives last President 
Senate acquired territory without asking House Representatives 
anything it, took without prohibition. 
power acquiring territory without immediate representatives 
people called upon say anything it, thus furnishing 
apt powerful means bringing new territory Union, 
and, brought country, involving us anew 
slavery agitation. therefore, think, important question 
due consideration American people, whether policy 
bringing additional territory, without considering 
operate upon safety Union reference one great 
disturbing element national politics, shall adopted 
policy country. bear mind 
according Judge's view, fast needed, indefinite 
part proposition Judge Douglas class 
men decide fast needed. clear certain 
way determining fast territory needed 
necessities country. Whoever wants go then, 
thinks territory needed. Whoever wants wider 
feels sure additional territory needed slave territory. 
easy show necessity additional 
assert anything incapable absolute 
Whatever motive man set men may making annexation 
property territory, easy much less easy 
necessary wants country. 
 
remains say think grave 
question people Union consider, whether, view 
fact slavery question one 
ever endangered Republican institutions, one ever 
threatened menaced dissolution Union, ever disturbed 
us way make us fear perpetuity 
view facts, think exceedingly interesting 
important question people consider whether shall engage 
policy acquiring additional territory, discarding altogether 
consideration, obtaining new territory, question may 
affect us regard this, endangering element liberties 
national Judge's view I, 
answer question, expressed mine. think become 
important practical question. views public. 
willing anxious consider 
turn consider importance question, arrive 
conclusion whether wise people 
Union, acquisition new territory, consider whether 
add disturbance existing amongst add 
one danger ever threatened perpetuity Union 
think extremely important shall 
decide, rightly decide, question entering upon 
policy. 
 
now, friends, said little wish say upon head, 
whether occupied whole time not, 
believe could enter upon new topic treat fully, 
without time, would moment think 
doing. give way Judge Douglas. 
 
 
 
 
SIXTH JOINT DEBATE, OCTOBER 13, 1858. 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN: immediate conference Judge 
Douglas, venture say perfectly agree 
entire silence, speak 
agreeable us. 
 
month May, 1856, elements State Illinois 
since consolidated Republican party assembled together 
State Convention adopted time what, 
political language, called platform. June year 
elements Republican party nation assembled together 
National Convention Philadelphia. adopted called 
National Platform. June, present Republicans 
Illinois Springfield, State Convention, adopted 
platform, suppose differing essential 
particular either former ones, perhaps adding something 
relation new developments political progress country. 
 
Convention assembled June last honor, one, 
esteem such, nominate candidate United 
States Senate. supposed that, entering upon canvass, 
stood generally upon met together 13th 
October year, four months adoption 
last platform, unaware canvass, beginning 
to-day, one adversaries taken hold 
laid finger upon anything calls wrong them. 
 
first one joint discussions Senator Douglas 
myself, Senator Douglas, without alluding 
one them, attempted hold 
responsible set resolutions passed long meeting 
either one conventions ground 
holding responsible resolutions, assumed 
passed State Convention Republican party, 
took part Convention. discovered afterward 
erroneous, resolutions hold responsible 
passed State Convention anywhere, 
passed Springfield, supposed had, assumed 
had, passed convention taken 
part. Judge, nevertheless, willing give point 
endeavoring make upon me, therefore thought still 
hold point endeavoring make, showing 
resolutions read passed local convention 
northern part State, although local convention 
embraced residence all, one reached, suppose, nearer 
one hundred fifty two hundred miles 
one took part all. also introduced 
resolutions, passed whole, 
although two State Conventions one 
National Convention mentioned, still 
understand, way responsible them. 
 
third meeting, insisted Judge 
way rightfully held responsible proceedings local 
meeting convention, taken part, 
way insisted thought 
responsible every man every set men everywhere, happen 
friends, rule ought work ways, ought 
responsible acts resolutions men sets men 
supporters friends, gave pretty 
long string resolutions, passed men friends, 
announcing doctrines desire held 
 
still satisfy Judge Douglas. still adheres 
proposition, responsible friends 
different parts State done, responsible 
done. least, understand him. addition 
that, Judge, meeting Galesburgh, last week, undertakes 
establish guilty species double dealing 
make speeches certain sort north, among 
Abolitionists, would make south, make 
speeches certain sort south would make 
north. course marked myself, 
shall dwell great length upon subject. 
 
done Judge's opening speech Galesburgh, 
middle speech then, saying something 
answer it. brought forward quotation two speech mine 
delivered Chicago, then, contrast it, brought forward 
extract speech mine Charleston, insisted 
greatly insisted conclusion followed, 
playing double part, speaking one region one way, 
another region another way. time dwell long 
would like, wish portion speech 
Charleston Judge make comments upon 
it. quotes delivered Charleston, believe 

 
"I say, then, not, ever been, favor bringing 
way social political equality white black 
races; not, ever been, favor making voters 
negroes, hold office, 
white people; say, addition this, 
physical difference white black races 
forever forbid two races living together terms social 
political equality. inasmuch cannot live 
remain together, must position superior 
much man favor superior position assigned 
white 
 
This, believe, entire quotation Charleston speech, Judge 
Douglas made comments follows: 
 
"Yes, find men Lincoln, say right 
distinction races, declares 
doctrine thing superior 
inferior Abolitionists required expected vote 
Mr. Lincoln goes equality races, holding 
Declaration Independence white man negro declared equal, 
endowed divine law equality. South, old-line 
Whigs, Kentuckians, tells 
physical difference races, making 
one inferior, favor maintaining 
superiority white race 
 
Judges Now, wish show month, 
lacking three days month, made speech 
Charleston, Judge quotes from, heard say 
substantially thing first meeting, 
say word was, atmosphere in, 
first meeting, Ottawa, read extract 
old speech mine, made nearly four years ago, merely show 
sentiments, show sentiments long entertained 
openly extract expressly declared 
feelings would admit social political equality white 
black races, even feelings would admit it, 
still knew public sentiment country would not, 
thing utter substantially that. 
extract old speech reporters sort accident passed 
over, lay blame upon anybody. suppose 
thought would hand them, dropped 
giving it, afterward went away without getting me. 
end quotation old speech, read Ottawa, made 
comments reported time, read, 
ask notice nearly Judge Douglas 
says delivered reading, added 
words: 
 
"Now, gentlemen, don't want read great length; 
true ever said regard institution 
slavery black race, whole it: anything 
argues idea perfect social political equality 
negro, arrangement words 
man prove horse. say here, 
upon subject, purpose, directly indirectly, 
interfere institution States exists. believe 
right so. inclination so. 
purpose introduce political social equality white 
black races. physical difference two which, 
judgment, probably forever forbid living together 
footing perfect equality; inasmuch becomes necessity 
must difference, I, well Judge Douglas, favor 
race belong superior position. never said 
anything contrary, hold that, notwithstanding this, 
reason world negro entitled 
rights enumerated Declaration right life, 
liberty, pursuit happiness. hold much entitled 
white man. agree Judge Douglas 
equal many respects, certainly color, perhaps 
intellectual moral right eat bread, 
without leave anybody else, hand 
equal equal Judge Douglas, equal every man." 
 
chiefly introduced purpose meeting Judge's 
charge quotation took Charleston speech 
would say South among Kentuckians, etc., 
would say regions supposed 
Abolition element. make speech 
read given 
much good made away North Abolition District 
State par Lovejoy District, personal 
presence stand us made it. 
made put print region three days less 
month speech made Charleston, like Judge 
Douglas thinks would make Abolition element. 
refer matter say altogether 
attempted upon one occasion may 
say one thing, leave things vice 
said anything one occasion inconsistent 
said elsewhere, least deny far intention 
find devoted topic larger portion 
time intended. wished show, pass upon 
occasion, sentiment occasionally advanced upon 
Declaration Independence entirely borne sentiments 
advanced old Whig Henry Clay, book 
show already occupied time intended 
pass it. 
 
Galesburgh, tried show Dred Scott decision, pushed 
consequences, slavery would established 
States well Territories. because, upon former 
occasion, asked Judge Douglas whether, Supreme Court 
make decision declaring States power exclude 
slavery limits, would adopt follow decision 
rule political directly answered 
question, merely contented it, 
introduced it, tried show conclusion stated 
followed inevitably logically proposition already decided 
court. Judge Douglas privilege 
Galesburgh, gave direct answer whether would 
would sustain decision made. give third chance 
say no. obliged either, probably 
give third chance. tried show 
result, conclusion, inevitably followed point already 
decided court. Judge, reply, thought 
court making decision, course remarks 
upon subject uses language read. Speaking me, 
Judge says: 
 
"He goes insists Dred Scott decision would carry slavery 
free States, notwithstanding decision says 

 
"Mr. Lincoln knows member Supreme Court holds 
doctrine. knows every one opinions held 

 
especially introduce subject purpose saying 
Dred Scott decision here, thank Judge Douglas lay 
finger upon place entire opinions court 
one hard affirm negative 
entire confidence. say, however, examined decision 
good deal care, lawyer decision and, far 
able so, court nowhere opinions said 
States power exclude slavery, used 
language substantially that, also say, far find, one 
concurring judges said States exclude slavery, 
said anything substantially that. nearest approach 
one made it, far find, Judge 
approach made substance, Nebraska 
States exclusive power question 
slavery, far limited Constitution United 
States. asked question, therefore, judges, 
McLean Curtis, asked get express declaration States 
could absolutely exclude slavery limits, reason 
believe would voted majority 
judges, Chase's amendment voted Judge Douglas 
offered Nebraska Bill. 
 
Also, Galesburgh, said something regard Springfield 
resolutions Judge Douglas attempted use upon Ottawa, 
commented length upon fact were, presented, 
Judge Douglas reply seemed somewhat 
said would never believed Abraham Lincoln, 
kindly called me, would attempted thing attempted 
upon among expressions used toward me, 
dared say forgery, dared say forgery 
Judge Yes, Judge, dare say forgery. 
political canvass Judge ought remember first 
dared say forgery. Jacksonville, Judge Douglas made speech 
answer something said Judge Trumbull, close 
said upon subject, dared say Trumbull forged 
evidence. said, too, concern Trumbull 
more, thereafter hold Lincoln responsible 
upon him. met Charleston that, although 
think noticed subject said 
would hold responsible it, spread statements 
evidence Judge Trumbull used, asked Judge Douglas, 
piece put finger upon one piece evidence 
would say went every 
Judge Douglas dare say piece forgery. 
seems things Judge Douglas dares do, 
dares do. 
 
[A voice: thing 
 
Yes, sir, thing me. dare say forgery 
true, don't dare say forgery false. say 
audience Judge Douglas dared say 
committed forgery, never shall know it; dare 
suggest forgery committed, 
showing traced two friends. 
dared suggest expressly promised one 
public speeches investigate matter, dared suggest 
implied promise would 
make known result. dared suggest Judge could 
expect quite clear suspicion fraud, since time 
promise made friends, kept 
promise regard investigation report upon it. 
daring man, dared much, Judge, much scared 
yet. Judge says would n't believed Abraham 
Lincoln would made attempt reminds 
fact entered upon canvass purpose treat 
touched sets thinking. 
first agreed Judge Douglas 
seven joint successive acts 
perhaps say, merely face 
audiences like this, face nation, extent, 
relation him, anything myself, face 
world; anxious conducted dignity 
good temper would vast audiences 
Judge Douglas got home Washington made 
first speech Chicago, evening afterward made sort 
reply it. second speech made Bloomington, 
commented upon speech Chicago said used language 
conceal words effect. 
Now, understand upon veracity 
know Judge understood it, first 
discussion, Ottawa, led charging bargain, somewhat corrupt 
character, upon Trumbull entered 
bargain, one terms Trumbull 
old Democratic party, old Whig 
pretending good old-line Whig ever. Judge Douglas 
may understand implicated honor 
said one thing pretending another; misunderstood 
thought treating dignified way, man honor 
truth, claims disposed treat me. Even time, 
Galesburgh, brings forward extract speech made 
Chicago extract speech made Charleston, prove 
trying play double part, trying public, 
get votes upon one set principles one place, upon another 
set principles another understand 
honor, veracity, this, 
understand see truthful ground it, 
keep hands him. soon learned Judge Douglas 
disposed treat way, signified one speeches 
driven draw upon whatever humble resources might 
adopt new course him. entirely sure 
able hold him, least purpose 
made well could upon him; say 
first cry think originated Judge, 
probably will. shall ask favors all. asks 
me, asks audience, wish push matter point 
personal difficulty. tell him, no. make mistake, one 
early speeches, called man, though perhaps 
called man. really hurts much 
suppose anybody earth. tell him, no! 
much canvass shall over, however may result, 
least part without bitter personal 
difficulties. 
 
Judge, concluding speech Galesburgh, says pushing 
matter personal difficulty, avoid responsibility 
enormity principles. say Judge audience, now, 
state principles, well hastily can, 
Judge hereafter chooses war 
upon principles, probably find 
course. 
 
nation element domestic slavery. matter 
absolute certainty disturbing element. opinion 
great men expressed opinion upon it, 
dangerous element. keep controversy regard it. 
controversy necessarily springs difference 
learn reduce lowest difference 
opinion is, perhaps shall better prepared discussing 
different systems policy would propose regard 
disturbing element. suggest difference opinion, reduced 
lowest terms, difference men 
think slavery wrong think wrong. Republican 
party think wrong; think moral, social, political 
wrong. think wrong merely persons 
States exists, wrong tendency, 
say least, extends existence whole nation. 
think wrong, propose course policy shall deal 
wrong. deal wrong, far 
prevent growing deal run 
time may promise end it. due regard 
actual presence amongst us, difficulties getting 
rid satisfactory way, constitutional obligations 
thrown it. suppose reference actual existence 
nation, constitutional right 
disturb States exists, profess 
inclination disturb right it. 
go that: don't propose disturb where, 
one instance, think Constitution would permit us. think 
Constitution would permit us disturb District Columbia. 
Still, propose that, unless terms 
don't suppose nation likely soon agree terms 
making emancipation gradual, compensating unwilling owners. 
suppose constitutional right, restrain 
reference actual existence institution 
difficulties thrown it. also oppose evil far 
seeks spread itself. insist policy shall restrict 
present limits. don't suppose violate 
anything due actual presence institution, anything due 
constitutional guaranties thrown around it. 
 
oppose Dred Scott decision certain way, upon ought 
perhaps address words. propose Dred Scott 
decided slave court, we, decide 
free. propose that, one, one thousand, 
shall decided court slaves, violent way 
disturb rights property thus nevertheless oppose 
decision political rule shall binding voter 
vote nobody thinks wrong, shall binding members 
Congress President favor measure actually 
concur principles decision. propose 
bound political rule way, think lays 
merely enlarging spreading consider 
evil, lays foundation spreading evil States 
themselves. propose resisting reversed can, 
new judicial rule established upon subject. 
 
add this: man believe 
slavery wrong three aspects mentioned, 
one them, man ought leave us; 
hand, man Republican party impatient 
necessity springing actual presence, impatient 
constitutional guaranties thrown around it, would act disregard 
these, standing us. find place 
somewhere due far capable 
understanding them, things. This, gentlemen, well 
give it, plain statement principles 
say sentiment country contrary 
sentiment holds slavery wrong, therefore goes 
policy propose dealing wrong. policy 
Democratic policy, sentiment Democratic sentiment. 
doubt mind one vast audience 
really central idea Democratic party relation 
subject, ask bear state things tending, 
think, prove proposition. first place, leading 
think may friend Judge Douglas honor calling 
advocating present Democratic policy never says wrong. 
high distinction, far know, never said 
slavery either right wrong. Almost everybody else says one 
other, Judge never does. man Democratic party 
thinks wrong, yet party, suggest him, 
first place, leader don't talk does, never says 
wrong. second place, suggest 
examine policy proposed carried forward, find 
carefully excludes idea anything wrong it. 
examine arguments made it, find every 
one carefully excludes idea anything wrong slavery. 
Perhaps Democrat says much opposed slavery 
tell wrong this. wish examine 
course regard matter moment, see opinion 
changed little. say wrong; don't constantly 
object anybody else saying so? constantly argue 
right place oppose it? say must opposed 
free States, slavery here; must opposed 
slave States, there; must opposed politics, 
make must opposed pulpit, 
place oppose it? 
suitable place oppose it. place country oppose 
evil continent, say 
coming. Frank Blair Gratz Brown tried get system gradual 
emancipation Missouri, election August, got 
you, Mr. Democrat, threw hat, 
say, again, regard arguments made, Judge 
Douglas Says "don't care whether slavery voted voted down," 
whether means individual expression sentiment, 
sort statement views national policy, alike true 
say thus argue logically don't see anything wrong 
it; cannot say logically admits slavery wrong. 
cannot say would soon see wrong voted voted down. 
Judge Douglas says whoever whatever community wants slaves, 
right them, perfectly logical, nothing 
wrong institution; admit wrong, cannot 
logically say anybody right wrong. says 
slave property horse property alike allowed go 
Territories, upon principles equality, reasoning 
truly, difference property; 
one property held wrong, 
equality right wrong; that, turn can, 
arguments sustaining Democratic policy, policy 
itself, careful, studied exclusion idea 
anything wrong slavery. Let us understand this. not, here, 
trying prove right, wrong. stating 
stand, trying show real difference 
us; say whenever get question distinctly 
stated, get men believe slavery 
respects wrong stand act us treating 
till then, think way come end 
slavery agitation. 
 
 
 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S 
 
Judge Douglas said conclusion 
time hour half answer said hour, 
follows course able answer half hour 
said hour 
 
wish return Judge Douglas profound thanks public 
to-day, put record, system policy 
regard institution slavery contemplates shall 
last forever. getting little nearer true issue 
controversy, profoundly grateful one Judge 
Douglas asks you, cannot institution slavery, rather, 
cannot nation, part slave part free, continue fathers made 
it, first place, insist fathers make 
nation half slave half free, part slave part free. 
insist found institution slavery existing here. 
make left knew way get rid 
time. Judge Douglas undertakes say that, matter 
choice, fathers government made nation part slave 
part free, assumes historically falsehood. that: 
fathers government cut source slavery 
abolition slave-trade, adopted system restricting 
new Territories existed, maintain placed 
understood, sensible men understood, 
course ultimate extinction; Judge Douglas asks 
cannot continue fathers made it, ask friends 
could let remain fathers made it? 
 
precisely ask relation institution 
slavery, shall placed upon basis fathers placed 
upon. Mr. South Carolina, said, truly said, 
government established, one expected institution 
slavery last day, men formed 
government wiser better men days; 
men days experience fathers not, 
experience taught invention 
made perpetuation institution slavery necessity 
country. Judge Douglas could let stand upon basis 
fathers placed it, removed it, put upon basis. 
question, therefore, friends answer, 
could let remain fathers government originally 
placed it. hope nobody understood trying sustain 
doctrine right quarrel Kentucky, Virginia, 
slave States, institution giving 
Judge opportunity eloquent us fighting 
rights. expressly declared opening speech 
neither inclination belief existence of, 
right interfere States Kentucky Virginia 
pleased slavery existing institution. 
becomes eloquence behalf rights States, 
assailed living man? 
 
hurry on, half hour. Judge informed 
me, informed audience, Washington Union laboring 
election United States Senate. news 
news either. Mr. W. H. 
hope elected State Senate, 
vote me. [Mr. shook don't fall in, 
perceive, suppose much me; glad 
support anywhere, get without 
deception obtain it. respect large portion Judge 
Douglas's speech show controversy 
Administration party right, feel 
competent inclined answer him. say him, "Give 
and, hand, 
say Davis, man 
"Give Douglas, pour him!" 
 
Now, regard matter Dred Scott decision, wish say 
word two. all, Judge say whether, decision 
made holding people States cannot exclude slavery, 
support not. refuses say 
case. judges Supreme Court refused say 
would subject. reminded 
said judges expressly declared contrary, 
remember Opening speech told book containing 
decision here, would thank lay finger place 
thing said. occupied hour half, 
ventured try sustain never will. 
desirous knowing going reverse Dred Scott decision. 
Judge Douglas ought know how. political friends 
find way reverse decision court favor 
constitutionality National Didn't find way 
effectually reversed completely decision ever 
far practical operation 
 
let ask you, n't Judge Douglas find way reverse 
decision Supreme Court decided 
Governor constitutional power remove Secretary 
State? appeal calls them? make 
speeches show decision was, 
ought succeed, too, getting act passed 
Legislature n't sit 
bench one five added judges, 
four old ones, getting name way, other? 
using making opposition Supreme 
Court commend Judge Douglas's earnest consideration. 
know man State Illinois ought know well 
much takes oppose decision Supreme Court 
honorable friend Stephen A. Douglas. 
 
Judge Douglas also makes declaration say Democrats 
bound Dred Scott decision, Republicans not. 
sense never said it; tell 
said hesitate repeat to-day. said 
Democrats believe decision correct, extension 
slavery affirmed National Constitution, bound 
support tell General Jackson 
said man bound support Constitution "as understood 
it." Now, Judge Douglas understands Constitution according 
Dred Scott decision, bound support understands it. 
understand another way, therefore bound support 
way understand it. Judge Douglas believes decision 
correct, argument time so. Let 
talk gentleman among looks face. 
say member Territorial Legislature, and, like Judge 
Douglas, believe right take hold slaves 
constitutional right first thing swear support 
Constitution, rights guaranteed 
will, whenever neighbor needs legislation support 
constitutional rights, withhold legislation. withhold 
necessary legislation support Constitution 
constitutional rights, commit ask every sensible man 
so? undoubtedly so, say please. Now, 
precisely Judge Douglas says, constitutional 
right. Judge mean say Territorial Legislature 
legislating may, withholding necessary laws, passing unfriendly 
laws, constitutional right? mean say that? 
mean proposition long well established law, 
cannot directly, cannot mean that? 
truth matter this: Judge Douglas 
"Popular Sovereignty" doctrine Supreme Court, co-operating 
him, squatted Squatter Sovereignty out. keep 
species Squatter Sovereignty. last invented 
sort people may exclude slavery 
sort exercised nothing all. 
running Popular Sovereignty got 
thin made shadow 
last, brought 
test close reasoning, even thin left. 
presumption impossible domain thought. precisely 
putting proposition, 
two bodies occupy space time. Dred Scott 
decision covers whole ground, it, 
room even shadow occupy ground. 
 
Judge Douglas, reply said upon previous 
occasion made speech Ottawa one took extract 
Charleston, says shows practiced deception Now, 
friends, enough that? Judge Douglas 
said made speech Charleston would make north, 
turned around answered showing made 
speech made made made 
Abolition personal 
presence Lovejoy atmosphere exactly 
made Chicago speech, complains much. 
 
Now, relation said anything quotation 
Chicago thinks terrible subject 
Why, gentlemen, show substance Chicago speech 
delivered two years ago calls it. 
Springfield. speech book, could turn 
read lack time. time read 
it. it, read No, gentlemen, obliged use discretion 
brief time. Judge taken great 
exception adopting statement Declaration 
Independence, "all men created equal," great deal 
say negro equality. want say sometimes alluding 
Declaration Independence, uttered sentiments Henry 
Clay used hold. Allow occupy time moment 
said. Mr. Clay one time called upon Indiana, way 
suppose liberate slaves; made written 
reply one portion words: 
 
"What foundation appeal Indiana liberate 
slaves care general declaration 
act announcing world independence thirteen American 
men created equal. Now, abstract principle, 
doubt truth declaration, desirable 
original construction society, organized keep 
view great fundamental 
 
sometimes, relation organization new societies new 
countries, soil clean clear, insisted keep 
principle view, Judge Douglas want negro 
wife. never brought understand middle 
ground subject. lived fiftieth year, 
never negro woman either slave wife, think 
live fifty matter, without one either. 
maintain may take Judge Douglas's quotations Chicago 
speech, Charleston speech, 
speech compare over, willing trust 
upon proposition show 
deny do. 
 
Judge seem disposed peace, find 
disposed personal warfare me. says oath would 
taken bare word Charles H. Lanphier Thomas L. 
Well, altogether matter opinion. certainly 
word oaths gentlemen, tell 
Judge Douglas facts upon say proved 
forgery. pointed publication 
resolutions Illinois State Register could result 
accident, proceedings meeting bore unmistakable 
evidence done man knew 
publication partly taken real proceedings Convention, 
partly proceedings convention another place, showed 
real proceedings him, taking one part 
resolutions, threw another part, substituted false 
fraudulent ones pointed him, also 
friend editor Register time 
is, must known done. Now, whether it, got 
friend him, could tell, certainly knew 
it. pointed Judge Douglas Freeport speech 
promised investigate matter. say make 
right ask keep it. call upon 
tell to-day keep fraud 
traced lies him, 
little room escape Lanphier Judge 
good service, Douglas desires word taken truth. 
desires Lanphier taken authority states 
desires Harris taken man vast 
thing lies among them, press show 
really Now, said would investigate it, 
implied would tell us result investigation, 
demand tell investigate it, not; 
did, won't tell result. call upon that. 
 
third time Judge Douglas assumed learned 
resolutions attempting use 
floor Congress. tell Judge Douglas public records 
country show attempted upon Trumbull month 
Harris tried Harris opportunity learning 
him, rather ask attention 
part record case. friends, disposed detain 
longer regard matter. 
 
told still five minutes left. another matter 
wish call attention to. says, discovered mistake 
case, came forward without calling 
attention it, explained it. tell became 
newspapers side discovered published 
it, put beyond power deny it, came forward made 
virtue necessity acknowledging it. argues 
point resolutions, although never passed 
Springfield, retained passed 
said hand passing them, opening speech, 
convention helped pass them. resolutions 
touch all? strikes difference holding 
man responsible act done holding 
responsible act done. judge whether 
difference taken credit great 
coming forward acknowledging proved 
beyond even capacity Judge Douglas 
capacity way living man. 
 
wants know won't withdraw charge regard 
conspiracy make slavery national, withdrawn one made. 
May please worship, withdraw proven false 
proven false him. add little that, 
withdraw whenever reasonable man shall brought believe 
charge true. asked Judge Douglas's attention 
certain matters fact tending prove charge conspiracy 
nationalize slavery, says untrue 
Buchanan country time, Dred 
Scott case got Supreme Court; says say 
Democratic owners Dred Scott got case. never say 
defy Judge Douglas show ever said so, never uttered 
it. Mr. Douglas's reporters Mr. 
don't care say did, tell 
never said owners Dred Scott got case. 
never pretended know whether Dred Scott's owners Democrats, 
Abolitionists, Border said 
evidence case tending show 
case, purpose getting decision. said 
evidence strong fact Dred Scott declared 
slave, owner made free, showing 
case tried question settled use could made 
decision; cared nothing property thus declared 
decision. time out, say more. 
 
 
 
 
LAST DEBATE, ALTON, OCTOBER 15, 1858 
 
 
 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S REPLY 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN:--I mind, complimented 
large portion Judge Douglas's mean portion 
controversy present 
Administration. seventh time Judge Douglas met 
joint gradually improving regard 
war Administration. day yesterday, 
little severe upon Administration heard upon 
occasion, took pains compliment it. told 
give power 
present, told would much obliged would give 
way. take vastly improved upon 
attack made upon Administration. flatter 
really taken advice subject. say 
prosecute war 
one another vigorous manner. say again: "Go it, 
it, 
 
one thing mention leave branch 
consider much business, anyway. 
refer part Judge's remarks undertakes involve 
Mr. Buchanan reads something Mr. Buchanan, 
undertakes involve gets 
something done so. would remind Judge 
fighting Nebraska Bill 
repeal Missouri Compromise, little since 
advocate Missouri Compromise. want know 
Buchanan much right inconsistent Douglas 
Douglas exclusive right, country, sides 
nobody allowed high privilege 
entire subject? 
 
far Judge Douglas addressed speech me, far 
me, business pay attention it. heard 
Judge state two three times stated to-day, speech 
made Springfield, Illinois, especial manner 
complained Supreme Court Dred Scott case decided 
negro could never citizen United States. omitted 
accident heretofore statement, required 
notice now. point fact untrue. never 
complained especially Dred Scott decision held 
negro could citizen, Judge always wrong says 
ever complain it. speech here, thank 
friends show said negro 
citizen, complained especially Dred Scott decision 
declared could one. done thing; Judge 
Douglas, persistently insisting done so, strongly 
impressed belief part 
misrepresent me. could get foundation insisting 
favor negro equality anywhere else well could 
assuming untrue proposition. Let tell audience true 
regard matter; means may correct 
tell truly speech itself. spoke 
Dred Scott decision Springfield speech, 
endeavoring prove Dred Scott decision portion 
system scheme make slavery national country. pointed 
things decided court. mentioned fact 
decided negro could done so, 
supposed, deprive negro, circumstances, 
possibility ever becoming citizen claiming rights 
citizen United States certain clause Constitution. 
stated that, without making complaint all. went 
stated points decided case; namely, bringing 
negro State Illinois holding slavery two 
years matter regard would decide whether 
would make free not; decided point 
taking United States Territory slavery prohibited 
Act Congress make free, Act Congress, 
held, unconstitutional. mentioned three things making 
points decided case. mentioned taken 
connection introduction Nebraska Bill, amendment 
Chase, offered time, right people 
Territories exclude slavery, voted friends 
bill. mentioned things together, evidence tending 
prove combination conspiracy make institution slavery 
national. connection way mentioned decision 
point negro could citizen, 
 
Judge Douglas beautiful 
purpose introduce perfect social political equality 
white black races. assertion made 
exact decision account untrue 
point fact. 
 
Now, upon subject, Henry Clay alluded to, 
desire place myself, connection Mr. Clay, nearly right 
people may be. quite aware Judge's object 
knows audience 
strong sympathies place 
on. desires place extremely Abolition read 
upon former occasion, without reading, to-day portion 
speech delivered Chicago. quotations 
speech, made upon former occasions, extracts taken 
way as, suppose, brings within definition 
called portions speech which, taken 
themselves, present entire sense speaker expressed 
time. propose, therefore, speech, show 
one portion extract 
extract give different idea, true idea intended 
take little time read it, believe 
occupy time way. 
 
heard frequently allude controversy regard 
Declaration Independence. confess struggle 
Judge Douglas matter, try briefly place 
right regard occasion. 
extracts Judge Douglas taken speech, put 
published 
 
"It may argued certain conditions make necessities 
impose upon us, extent necessity imposed 
upon man must submit it. think condition 
found established government. slaves 
among us, could get Constitution unless permitted 
remain slavery, could secure good secure 
grasped necessity submitted much, 
destroy principle charter Let 
charter remain 
 
Now, upon occasions declared strongly Judge Douglas 
disposition interfere existing institution 
slavery. hear read speech takes 
extracts purpose proving upon disposition 
interfere institution slavery, establish perfect social 
political equality negroes white people. 
 
Allow upon subject briefly present one extract 
speech mine, year ago, Springfield, discussing 
question, soon Judge Douglas took ground negroes 
were, included Declaration 
 
"I think authors notable instrument intended include 
men, mean declare men equal respects. 
mean say men equal color, size, intellect, moral 
social defined tolerable 
consider men created certain 
inalienable rights, among life, liberty, pursuit 
happiness. said, meant. mean 
assert obvious actually enjoying 
equality, yet confer immediately upon them. 
fact power confer meant simply 
declare right, enforcement might follow fast 
circumstances permit. 
 
"They meant set standard maxim free society 
familiar looked to, constantly labored for, even, 
though never perfectly constantly thereby 
constantly spreading influence, augmenting 
happiness value life people, 
 
sentiments expressed regard 
Declaration Independence upon former 
put print read wherever anybody cared know humble 
individual chose say regard it. 
 
Galesburgh, day, said, answer Judge Douglas, 
three years ago never man, far knew believed, 
whole world, said Declaration Independence 
include negroes term "all men." to-day. assert 
Judge Douglas friends may search whole records 
country, matter great astonishment shall 
able find one human three years ago ever uttered 
sentiment term "all men" Declaration 
include negro. let misunderstood. know 
three years ago men who, finding assertion constantly 
way bring perpetuation 
slavery, denied truth it. know Mr. Calhoun 
politicians school denied truth Declaration. know 
ran along mouth Southern men period years, 
ending last though rather declaration 
Indiana, upon floor United States Senate, 
Declaration Independence respect "a self-evident 
rather self-evident truth. say, perfect knowledge 
Declaration without directly it, 
three years ago never lived man ventured assail 
way pretending believe it, asserting 
include negro. believe first man ever said Chief 
Justice Taney Dred Scott case, next friend 
Stephen A. Douglas. become entire 
party. would like call upon friends everywhere consider 
come short time view matter way entirely 
different former ask whether 
borne along irresistible know not. 
 
answer proposition last week, see man 
Chicago got letter, addressed Chicago Times, show, 
somebody said before; signs 
"An Old-Line remember first place, would 
say old-line somewhat acquainted old-line 
Whigs origin end became pretty well 
acquainted them, know always sense, whatever else 
could ascribe them. know never one 
sense try show evidence produces men had, 
prior time said negroes included 
term "all men" Declaration Independence. evidence 
bring forward evidence, let see 
offers way showing somebody three years ago said 
negroes included Declaration. brings forward part 
speech Henry part speech Henry Clay 
used bring forward prove precisely contrary. guess 
surrounded extent to-day old friends Mr. Clay, 
glad hear anything authority. Indiana 
man presented petition liberate negroes, (Mr. made 
speech answer it, suppose carefully wrote 
caused extract speech 
constitutes evidence pretended Chicago 
brought forward show Mr. Clay n't suppose negro 
included Declaration Independence. Hear Mr. Clay said: 
 
"And foundation appeal Indiana liberate 
slaves care general declaration 
act announcing world independence thirteen American 
men created equal. Now, abstract principle, 
doubt truth desirable, 
original construction society organized 
keep view great fundamental principle. But, then, apprehend 
society ever exist, ever shall formed, 
equality asserted among members human race 
practically enforced carried out. large 
women, always 
probably remain subject government another portion 
community. 
 
"That declaration, whatever may extent made 
thirteen States. slavery existed, 
long existed, established law. introduced 
forced upon colonies paramount law England. believe 
making declaration States concurred intended 
emancipation slaves 
within respective Would Virginia Southern States 
ever united declaration interpreted 
abolition slavery among them? one thirteen colonies 
entertain design secret 
purpose, would charge political fraud upon noblest 
band patriots ever assembled fraud upon 
Confederacy fraud upon union States 
whose Constitution recognized slavery, 
permitted importation slaves Africa year 
 
entire quotation brought forward prove somebody 
previous three years ago said negro included 
term "all men" Declaration. so? way 
tendency prove that? Mr. Clay says true abstract principle 
men created equal, cannot practically apply 
bringing forward cases 
insane persons, cannot says 
true abstract principle organization society well 
organized society kept view fundamental 
principle. Let read words add comments 
own. Mr. Clay says, little on: 
 
"I desire opinions regard institution 
slavery. look upon great evil, deeply lament 
derived government ancestors. wish 
every slave United States country ancestors. 
are, question is, best dealt 
state nature existed, lay foundations 
society, man would strongly opposed 
institution slavery amongst 
 
Now, book, speech, 
brought forward prove Mr. Clay held negro 
included Declaration Independence, statement 
part, declaration great fundamental truth 
constantly kept view organization society 
societies already organized. say word it; attempt, 
Mr. Clay said good men ought do, keep if, 
ask public eye turned upon it; 
ask, relation organization new Territories, public 
eye turned upon it, forthwith hear 
to-day. done license Henry Clay's 
example doing? done aught 
authority for, maintaining organizing new Territories 
societies fundamental principle organized 
society holding public view recognizing 
recognized great principle free government? 
 
new new proposition human ever 
thought three years brought forward, combat 
evil tendency, evil combat tendency 
negro, take away right ever 
man. combat one thousand things constantly done 
days prepare public mind make property, nothing 
property, negro States Union. 
 
point wish, leaving part 
discussion, ask attention to. read repeat words 
Henry 
 
"I desire opinions regard institution 
slavery. look upon great evil, deeply lament 
derived government ancestors. wish 
every slave United States country ancestors. 
are, question is, best dealt 
state nature existed, lay foundations 
society, man would strongly opposed 
institution slavery amongst 
 
principle upon insisted canvass relation 
laying foundations new never sought apply 
principles old States purpose abolishing slavery 
States. nothing miserable 
said, assume declared Missouri, slave State, 
shall emancipate slaves; proposed thing. Mr. 
Clay says laying foundations society Territories 
exist, would opposed introduction 
slavery insist 
insisting upon exclusion element declared 
strong emphatic language him. 
 
Judge Douglas referred Springfield speech said 
"a house divided cannot stand." Judge often made 
entire quotation speech make memory. 
used language: 
 
"We far fifth year since policy initiated 
avowed object confident promise putting end slavery 
agitation. operation policy, agitation 
ceased, constantly augmented. opinion 
cease crisis shall reached passed. 'A house divided 
cannot believe government cannot endure 
permanently, half slave half free. expect house fall, 
expect cease divided. become one thing, 
other. Either opponents slavery arrest 
spread it, place public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction, advocates 
push forward till shall become alike lawful States, old 
well new, North well South." 
 
extract sentiments expressed extremely 
offensive Judge Douglas. upon upon 
Bible. upon views upon 

 
said far fifth year since policy initiated 
avowed object confident promise putting end 
slavery agitation. so? Nebraska Bill brought 
forward four years ago last January, 
putting end slavery agitation 
Congress; Territories. way, 
remark that, Judge Douglas fond Mr. 
days, Mr. said falsehood 
whole business, slavery agitation time 
little quiet thing, 
Judge Douglas's stirred again. 
understood intimated putting end 
slavery Surely was. every speech heard Judge 
Douglas make, got call it, 
Administration Lecompton Constitution, every speech 
Nebraska Bill full 
end slavery agitation. last tip last joint old 
tail drawing view. proved so? 
asserted policy agitation "has ceased, 
constantly ever greater agitation 
Congress last great country to-day? 
 
collateral object introduction Nebraska policy, 
people Territories superior degree 
beyond ever before. first 
object main one upon people higher degree 
question fact determined answer 
single question. ever heard known people anywhere 
earth little as, first instance use, 
people Kansas right 
main policy collateral object, nothing 
living, lie time introduction till to-day. 
 
intimated thought agitation would cease 
crisis reached passed. stated way 
thought would reached passed. said might go one 
way other. might, arresting spread it, 
placing fathers originally placed it, put public 
mind rest belief course ultimate 
extinction. Thus agitation may cease. may pushed forward 
shall become alike lawful States, old well new, North 
well South. said, repeat, wish 
spread may arrested, may public 
mind shall rest belief course ultimate 
expressed wish entertain opinion, upon 
evidence sufficient mind, fathers government placed 
institution public mind rest belief 
course ultimate extinction. Let ask made provision 
source African cut 
end twenty make provision new 
territory owned time slavery forever 
stop spread one direction, cut source another, 
look placed course ultimate 

 
Again: institution slavery mentioned Constitution 
United States two three times, neither cases 
word "slavery" covert language used 
time, purpose full significance. language 
regard prohibition African runs 

 
"The importation persons States 
existing shall think proper admit, shall prohibited 
Congress prior year one thousand eight hundred 
 
next allusion Constitution question slavery 
black race subject basis 
language used is: 
 
direct taxes shall among several 
States may included within Union, according 
respective numbers, shall determined adding whole 
number free persons, including bound service term 
years, excluding Indians 

 
says slaves, 
applied class among us negroes. 
 
Lastly, provision fugitive slaves, 
said: 
 
"No person held service labor one State, laws thereof, 
escaping another, shall consequence law regulation 
therein discharged service labor, shall delivered 
up, claim party service labor may 
 
mention word slavery. 
three places, slavery 
instrument, covert language Language used suggesting 
slavery existed black race among us. understand 
contemporaneous history times covert language used 
purpose, purpose Constitution, 
hoped still hoped endure read 
intelligent patriotic men, institution slavery 
passed among nothing face great 
charter liberty suggesting thing negro slavery ever 
existed among us. part evidence fathers 
government expected intended institution slavery come 
end. expected intended course 
ultimate extinction. say desire see 
spread arrested, say desire see done 
fathers first done. say desire see placed 
public mind rest belief course ultimate 
extinction, say desire see placed placed it. 
true fathers, Judge Douglas made 
government part slave part free. Understand sense 
puts it. assumes slavery rightful thing within 
introduced framers Constitution. exact truth is, 
found institution existing among us, left 
found it. making government left institution 
many clear marks upon it. found slavery among 
them, left among absolute 
immediate Judge Douglas asks 
cannot let remain part slave part free, fathers 
government made it, asks question based upon assumption 
turn upon ask question, 
policy fathers government adopted relation 
element among us best policy world, wise 
policy, policy ever safely continue upon 
ever give us peace, unless dangerous element masters us 
becomes national turn upon ask could 
leave alone. turn ask driven necessity 
introducing new policy regard it. said 
introduced new policy. said speech 22d March 
present year, 1858. ask could let remain 
fathers placed it. ask, too, Judge Douglas friends 
shall place institution upon basis fathers 
left it. ask you, favor setting free 
slave States war, institution placed attitude 
made Constitution, make 
war thus wherein ground belief 
shall war return 
peace upon matter springing maintain 
not. proposed nothing return policy 
fathers. 
 
propose certain measure policy, enough 
intend anything evil result, 
show tendency result. 
met Judge Douglas point view. made 
declaration mean produce conflict States, 
tried show fair reasoning, think shown 
minds fair men, propose nothing peaceful 
quotation happened make Springfield 
Speech, "a house divided cannot 
proved offensive judge, part parcel thing. 
show variety democratic institutions 
different States necessary indispensable. dispute it. 
controversy Judge Douglas that. shall readily 
agree would foolish us insist upon 
cranberry law Illinois, 
cranberry law Indiana, 
insist would exceedingly wrong us deny Virginia 
right oyster laws, want 
laws here. understand, hope, quite well Judge Douglas 
anybody else, variety soil climate face 
country, consequent variety industrial productions 
country, require systems law conforming variety 
natural features country. understand quite well Judge 
Douglas raise want, 
raise sugar want, mutual 
advantage produces commerce, brings us together, 
makes us better friends. like one another it. 
understand well Judge Douglas, anybody else, mutual 
bind together different parts 
Union; instead thing 
expressing tend sustain it; 
house, tending always hold up. 
 
admitted this, ask parallel 
things institution slavery? see 
parallel them. Consider it. 
difficulty quarrel amongst cranberry laws 
Indiana, oyster laws Virginia, laws Maine, 
fact Louisiana produces Illinois 
quarrels perfect peace 
regard thing say element discord Union? 
sometimes peace, it? institution 
slavery remained quiet was. difficulty 
whenever made struggle spread not. ask, 
then, experience speak telling us 
policy given peace country heretofore, returned to, 
gives greatest promise peace again. may say, Judge Douglas 
intimated thing, difficulty regard 
institution slavery mere agitation 
ambitious Northern thinks want get "his 
suppose. agree amongst us. Bible 
says somewhere think would 
discovered fact without Bible. claim less 
average men, claim selfish 
Judge Douglas. 
 
true difficulty agitation regard 
institution slavery spring mere 
ambition many times 
danger question? Go back day Missouri Compromise. 
Go back question, bottom lay 
slavery question. Go back time annexation Texas. 
Go back troubles led Compromise 1850. find 
every time, single exception question, 
sprung endeavor spread institution. never 
party history country, probably never be, 
sufficient strength disturb general peace country. Parties 
may divided quarrel minor questions, yet extends 
beyond parties themselves. question make 
disturbance outside political enter 
churches rend divided great Methodist Church 
two parts, North raised constant disturbance 
every General Assembly disturbed 
Church city two years 
shaken great American Tract Society recently, yet it, 
sure divide end? 
power somehow operates minds men, exciting stirring 
every avenue politics, religion, 
relations 
work irresistible power, fifty years 
shaken government agitated people, 
pretending exceedingly simple thing, ought 
talk it? get everybody else stop talking it, 
assure quit half done so. 
philosophy statesmanship assumes quiet 
disturbing element society disturbed us 
half century, serious danger threatened 
say, philosophy statesmanship 
based assumption quit talking it, 
public mind cease agitated it? Yet 
policy North Douglas care 
nothing it! ask false 
false statesmanship undertakes build system policy upon 
basis nothing thing everybody care 
thing experience shown care 
great deal 
 
Judge often course remarks exclusive 
right States decide whole thing themselves. 
agree readily different States right. 
fighting man assumes contending 
right States please it. 
controversy regard new Territories. agree 
States come States right power 
please. power citizens 
Federal capacity members Federal Union General 
Government, disturb slavery States exists. profess 
constantly inclination belief power 
government disturb it; yet driven constantly defend 
assumption upon rights 
insist upon is, new Territories shall kept free 
Territorial condition. Judge Douglas assumes 
interest right whatever interfere. 
think interest. think white men have. 
wish surplus population, may express 
feel interest getting 
institutions would like prevail there? go 
Territory opposed slavery, another man comes upon ground 
slave, upon assumption things equal, turns 
equal right way, part 
way. goes makes slave Territory, consequence 
slave State, time desire free 
State equal Let suggest different way. many 
Democrats left slave States 
come free State Illinois get rid institution 
slavery? voice: "A thousand reckon 
thousand one. ask you, policy advocating 
prevailed country Territorial condition, would 
gone get rid it? would found free State 
Territory go to? hereafter, cause, people 
place shall desire find new homes, wish rid 
institution, find place go to? 
 
Now, moral aspect question whether 
right wrong enslaving negro, still favor new 
Territories condition white men may find 
find spot better condition; 
settle upon new soil better condition life. favor 
this, merely (I must say 
people born amongst us, free white people 
everywhere world 
men world, may find new homes better 
conditions life. 
 
stated upon former occasions, may well state again, 
understand real issue controversy Judge Douglas 
myself. point wanting make war free 
slave States, issue us. So, too, 
assumes favor producing perfect social political 
equality white black races. false issues, 
upon Judge Douglas tried force controversy. 
foundation truth charge maintain either 
real issue one pressing upon 
every sentiment part one class looks upon 
institution slavery wrong, another class look 
upon wrong. sentiment contemplates institution 
slavery country wrong sentiment Republican 
party. sentiment around actions, 
propositions look 
upon moral, social, political wrong; 
contemplate such, nevertheless due regard actual 
existence among us, difficulties getting rid 
satisfactory way, constitutional obligations thrown 
it. Yet, due regard these, desire policy regard 
looks creating danger. insist 
should, far may be, treated wrong; one methods 
treating wrong make provision shall grow 
also desire policy looks peaceful end slavery 
time. views entertain regard understand 
them; sentiments, arguments propositions, 
brought within range. said, repeat here, 
man amongst us think institution 
slavery wrong one aspects 
ought us. man amongst us 
impatient wrong disregard actual 
presence among us difficulty getting rid suddenly 
satisfactory way, disregard constitutional obligations thrown 
it, man platform. 
sympathy practical action. placed properly us. 
 
subject treating wrong, limiting let 
say word. anything ever threatened existence Union save 
except institution slavery? hold 
dear amongst us? liberty prosperity. ever threatened 
liberty prosperity, save except institution slavery? 
true, propose improve condition things 
enlarging slavery, spreading making may 
upon person, able cut out, lest 
death; surely way cure it, 
spread whole body. proper way treating 
regard wrong. see peaceful way dealing wrong, 
restricting spread it, allowing go new 
countries already existed. peaceful way, 
old-fashioned way, way fathers set us 
example. 
 
hand, said sentiment treats 
wrong. Democratic sentiment day. mean 
say every man stands within range positively asserts 
right. class include positively assert 
right, who, like Judge Douglas, treat indifferent 
say either right wrong. two classes men fall within 
general class look upon wrong. 
among anybody supposes he, Democrat, consider 
"as much opposed slavery would like reason 
him. never treat wrong. thing 
consider wrong deal deal that? Perhaps 
say leader never does, quarrel anybody 
says wrong. Although pretend say yourself, 
find fit place deal wrong. must say anything 
free States, here. must say 
anything slave States, there. must 
say anything pulpit, religion, 
nothing it. must say anything politics, 
disturb security "my place 
talk wrong, although say wrong. 
But, finally, belief people 
slave States adopt system gradual emancipation 
slavery question, would favor it. would favor 
it. say getting right place, would glad 
see succeed. yourself. know Frank 
Blair Gratz Brown, St. Louis, undertook introduce 
system Missouri. fought could 
system gradual emancipation pretend would glad see 
succeed. Now, bring hard fight 
beaten, news came here, threw hats 
Democracy. that, take argument made 
favor system proposed, carefully excludes idea 
anything wrong institution slavery. arguments 
sustain policy carefully exclude it. Even to-day heard 
Judge Douglas quarrel uttered wish might 
sometime come end. Although Henry Clay could say wished every 
slave United States country ancestors, 
denounced pretending respect Henry Clay uttering 
wish might peaceful way, come end. 
Democratic policy regard institution tolerate 
breath, slightest least degree wrong 
it. Try Judge Douglas's says "don't care 
whether voted voted Territories. care 
myself, dealing expression, whether intended 
expressive individual sentiments subject, 
national policy desires alike valuable 
purpose. man say see anything wrong 
slavery; man logically say see wrong it, 
man logically say don't care whether wrong voted 
voted down. may say don't care whether indifferent thing 
voted down, must logically choice right 
thing wrong thing. whatever community wants slaves 
right them. have, wrong. 
wrong, cannot say people right wrong. says upon 
score equality slaves allowed go new Territory, 
like property. strictly logical difference 
property. property equal, 
argument entirely insist one wrong 
right, use institute comparison right 
wrong. may turn everything Democratic policy 
beginning end, whether shape takes statute book, 
shape takes Dred Scott decision, shape takes 
conversation, shape takes short 
everywhere carefully excludes idea anything wrong it. 
 
real issue. issue continue 
country poor tongues Judge Douglas shall 
silent. eternal struggle two 
world. two principles 
stood face face beginning time, ever continue 
struggle. one common right humanity, 
divine right principle whatever shape 
itself. spirit says, "You work toil 
earn bread, I'll eat it." matter shape comes, whether 
mouth king seeks people 
nation live fruit labor, one race men 
apology enslaving another race, principle. 
glad express gratitude here, 
Judge looks end institution slavery. 
help people see struggle really is. 
hereafter place us men really wish wrong may 
end. whenever get rid real 
question, get Judge Douglas friends avow policy 
looking get among class men 
bring side treat wrong. 
soon end it, end 
Whenever issue distinctly made, matter 
thrown men fairly see real difference 
parties, controversy soon settled, done 
peaceably too. war, violence. placed 
wisest best men world placed it. Brooks South 
Carolina declared Constitution framed framers 
look institution existing day. said 
this, think stated fact fully borne history 
times. also said better wiser men men 
days, yet men days experience not, 
invention became necessity 
country slavery perpetual. say that, willingly 
without purpose, Judge Douglas 
prominent instrument changing position institution 
fathers government expected come end 
ere this, putting upon basis; placing 
openly desire shall ever end it. 
 
understand ten minutes yet. employ saying something 
argument Judge Douglas Dred Scott 
decision, people Territories still somehow exclude 
slavery. first thing ask attention fact Judge Douglas 
constantly said, decision, whether could not, 
question Supreme Court. court made 
decision virtually says question Supreme Court, 
people. tells us exclude it? says 
needs admits "unfriendly 
Although right established Constitution United 
States take slave Territory United States hold 
property, yet unless Territorial Legislature give friendly 
legislation, especially adopt unfriendly legislation, 
practically exclude him. Now, without meeting proposition 
matter fact, pass consider real constitutional 
Let take gentleman looks face me, let 
us suppose member Territorial Legislature. first 
thing swear support Constitution 
United States. neighbor side Territory 
slaves needs Territorial legislation enable enjoy 
constitutional right. withhold legislation neighbor 
needs enjoyment right fixed favor 
Constitution United States sworn 
withhold without violating oath? And, pass 
unfriendly legislation violate oath? Why, monstrous sort 
talk Constitution United never 
lawless doctrine mouth respectable man 
earth. believe constitutional right hold slaves 
Territory United States. believe decision 
made go reversing it. Judge Douglas furious 
go reversing decision. legislating 
force law repeat never 
monstrous doctrine uttered mouth respectable man. 
 
suppose us (I know believe people 
Southern States entitled Congressional Fugitive Slave 
right fixed Constitution. cannot made available 
without Congressional legislation. Judge's language, 
right," needs legislation become efficient 
valuable persons right 
constitutional, agree legislation shall granted it, 
like institution slavery. profess 
taste running catching least, profess taste 
job all. yield support Fugitive Slave law? 
understand Constitution, guarantees 
right, supported without it. believed right 
hold slave Territory equally fixed Constitution 
right reclaim bound give legislation 
necessary support it. say man deny obligation give 
necessary legislation support slavery Territory, believes 
constitutional right there. man can, 
give Abolitionists argument deny obligation 
Constitution Fugitive State law. Try now. 
strongest Abolition argument ever made. say Dred Scott decision 
correct, right hold slaves Territory equally 
constitutional right right slaveholder 
returned. one show distinction them. one 
cannot deny it. construed 
Constitution, believes decision correct believes 
right. man argues unfriendly legislation, 
spite constitutional right, slavery may driven 
Territories, cannot avoid furnishing argument Abolitionists 
may deny obligation return claim power pass 
laws unfriendly right slaveholder reclaim 
know may strike popular assembly like this, 
defy anybody go body men whose minds educated 
evidence reasoning, show 
difference constitutional right reclaim fugitive 
constitutional right hold slave, Territory, provided Dred 
Scott decision correct, defy man make argument 
justify unfriendly legislation deprive slaveholder right 
hold slave Territory, length, 
furnish argument Fugitive 
Slave law. Why, Abolitionist nation 
Douglas, Abolitionist nation Douglas, 

 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME THREE 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN-DOUGLAS DEBATES 
 
POLITICAL SPEECHES & DEBATES LINCOLN DOUGLAS Senatorial 
Campaign 1858 Illinois SPEECH SPRINGFIELD, JUNE 17, 1858 
 
 
[The following speech delivered Springfield, Ill., close 
Republican State Convention held time place, 
Convention Mr. LINCOLN named candidate United States 
Mr. DOUGLAS 
 
 
Mr. PRESIDENT GENTLEMEN could first know 
are, whither tending, could better judge 
do, it. far fifth year since policy 
initiated avowed object confident promise putting 
end slavery agitation. operation policy, 
agitation ceased, constantly augmented. 
opinion, cease crisis shall reached 
passed. "A house divided cannot stand." believe 
government cannot endure permanently half slave half free. 
expect Union expect house 
expect cease divided. become one thing, 
other. Either opponents slavery arrest 
spread it, place public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction, advocates 
push forward till shall become alike lawful States, old 
well new, North well South. 
 
tendency latter condition? 
 
Let one carefully contemplate almost complete 
legal machinery, speak 
Nebraska doctrine Dred Scott decision. Let consider, 
work machinery adapted do, well also 
let study history construction, can, 
rather fail, can, trace evidences concert 
action, among chief beginning. 
 
new year 1854 found slavery excluded half 
States State Constitutions, National territory 
Congressional prohibition. Four days later, commenced struggle 
ended repealing Congressional prohibition. opened 
National territory slavery, first point gained. 
 
But, far, Congress indorsement people, 
real apparent, indispensable save point already 
give chance more. 
 
necessity provided for, well 
might be, notable argument "squatter sovereignty," otherwise 
called "sacred right latter phrase, though 
expressive rightful basis government, 
attempted use amount this: one man 
choose enslave another, third man shall allowed object. 
argument incorporated Nebraska Bill itself, language 
follows: 
 
"It true intent meaning Act legislate slavery 
Territory State, exclude therefrom, leave 
people thereof perfectly free form regulate domestic 
institutions way, subject Constitution 
United States." 
 
opened loose favor "squatter 
sovereignty," "sacred right self-government." "But," said 
opposition members, "let us amend bill expressly declare 
people Territory may exclude slavery." "Not said 
friends measure, voted amendment. 
 
Nebraska Bill passing Congress, law case, 
involving question negro's freedom, reason owner 
voluntarily taken first free State, territory 
covered Congressional Prohibition, held slave 
long time each, passing United States Circuit Court 
District Missouri; Nebraska Bill brought 
decision month May, 1854. negro's name 
name decision finally made case. 
next Presidential election, law case came to, 
argued in, Supreme Court United States; decision 
election. Still, election, Senator 
Trumbull, floor Senate, requested leading advocate 
Nebraska Bill state opinion whether people territory 
constitutionally exclude slavery limits; latter 
"That question Supreme Court." 
 
election came. Mr. Buchanan elected, indorsement, 
was, second point gained. indorsement, 
however, fell short clear popular majority nearly four hundred 
thousand so, perhaps, 
reliable satisfactory. outgoing President, 
last annual message, possible echoed back upon 
people weight authority Supreme Court 
met again, announce decision, ordered 
Presidential inauguration came, still decision court; 
incoming President, inaugural address, fervently 
people abide decision, whatever might be. Then, 
days, came decision. 
 
author Nebraska Bill finds early occasion make 
speech capital indorsing Dred Scott decision, 
denouncing opposition it. new President, too, seizes early 
occasion letter indorse strongly construe 
decision, express astonishment different view ever 

 
length squabble springs President author 
Nebraska Bill, mere question fact, whether Lecompton 
Constitution sense made people 
Kansas; quarrel latter declares wants 
fair vote people, cares whether slavery voted 
voted up. understand declaration, cares 
whether slavery voted voted up, intended 
apt definition policy would impress upon public 
principle declares suffered much, 
ready suffer end. well may cling 
feeling, well may cling it. principle 
left original Nebraska doctrine. Dred Scott 
decision "squatter sovereignty" squatted existence, 
like temporary like mould served 
one fell back loose helped carry election, 
kicked late joint struggle 
Republicans, Lecompton Constitution, involves nothing 
original Nebraska doctrine. struggle made 
right people make 
Republicans never differed. 
 
several points Dred Scott decision, connection Senator 
Douglas's "care policy, constitute piece machinery, 
present state third point gained. working 
points machinery 
 
negro slave, imported Africa, 
slave, ever citizen State, sense 
term used Constitution United States. point 
made order deprive negro, every possible event, 
benefit provision United States Constitution declares 
"The citizens State shall entitled privileges 
immunities citizens several States." 
 
Secondly, That, "subject Constitution United States," 
neither Congress Territorial Legislature exclude slavery 
United States Territory. point made order individual 
men may fill Territories slaves, without danger losing 
property, thus chances 
institution future. 
 
Thirdly, whether holding negro actual slavery free 
State makes free, United States courts 
decide, leave decided courts slave State 
negro may forced master. point made, 
pressed but, acquiesced while, apparently 
indorsed people election, sustain logical 
conclusion Dred Scott's master might lawfully Dred 
Scott, free State Illinois, every master may lawfully 
one, one thousand slaves, Illinois, 
free State. 
 
this, working hand hand it, Nebraska 
doctrine, left it, mould public opinion, 
least Northern public opinion, care whether slavery voted 
voted up. shows exactly are; 
also, 
 
throw additional light latter, go back run mind 
string historical facts already stated. Several things 
appear less dark mysterious 
people left "perfectly free," "subject 
Constitution." Constitution it, 
could see. Plainly enough exactly fitted 
Dred Scott decision afterward come in, declare perfect 
freedom people freedom all. amendment, 
expressly declaring right people, voted Plainly enough 
adoption would niche Dred 
Scott decision. court decision held even 
individual opinion till Presidential Plainly 
enough speaking would "perfectly 
argument upon election 
outgoing President's delay 
incoming President's advance favor 
decision? things look like cautious 
horse preparatory mounting him, dreaded may 
give fall. hasty decision 
President others? 
 
cannot absolutely know exact adaptations result 
see lot framed different portions 
know gotten different times places 
different Franklin, James, instance, 
see joined together, see exactly make 
frame house mill, exactly 
lengths proportions different pieces exactly 
adapted respective places, piece many 
omitting even single piece 
see place frame exactly fitted prepared yet bring 
piece case, find impossible believe 
Stephen Franklin Roger James understood one another 
beginning, worked upon common plan draft drawn 
first blow struck. 
 
Nebraska Bill people 
State well Territory left "perfectly free," "subject 
Constitution." mention State? legislating 
Territories, States. Certainly people State 
ought subject Constitution United States; 
mention merely Territorial law? 
people Territory people State therein 
together, relation Constitution therefore treated 
precisely opinion court, Chief Justice 
Taney, Dred Scott case, separate opinions 
concurring Judges, expressly declare Constitution United 
States neither permits Congress Territorial Legislature exclude 
slavery United States Territory, omit declare whether 
Constitution permits State, people State, 
exclude it. mere quite sure, 
McLean Curtis sought get opinion declaration 
unlimited power people State exclude slavery 
limits, Chase Mace sought get declaration, behalf 
people Territory, Nebraska ask, 
quite sure would voted one case 
other? nearest approach point declaring 
power State slavery made Judge approaches 
once, Using precise idea, almost language, too, 
Nebraska Act. one occasion, exact language is, cases 
power restrained Constitution United States, 
law State supreme subject slavery within 
cases power States restrained 
United States Constitution, left open question, precisely 
question, restraint power Territories, 
left open Nebraska Act. Put together, 
another nice little may, ere long, see filled another 
Supreme Court decision, declaring Constitution United 
States permit State exclude slavery limits. 
may especially expected doctrine "care whether 
slavery voted voted up" shall gain upon public mind 
sufficiently give promise decision maintained 
made. 
 
decision slavery alike lawful 
States. Welcome decision probably coming, 
soon upon us, unless power present political dynasty 
shall met shall lie pleasantly 
people Missouri making State free, 
shall reality instead Supreme Court made 
Illinois slave State. meet overthrow power dynasty 
work would prevent consummation. 
do. best it? 
 
denounce us openly friends, yet 
us softly Senator Douglas instrument 
effect object. wish us infer all, fact 
little quarrel present head 
regularly voted us single point, upon 
never differed. remind us great man, 
largest us small ones. Let "a living dog 
better dead Judge Douglas, dead lion, 
work least one. oppose advances 
slavery? don't care anything it. avowed mission 
care nothing it. leading Douglas 
Democratic newspaper thinks Douglas's superior talent needed 
resist revival African slave trade. Douglas believe 
effort revive trade said so. 
really think so? is, resist it? years 
labored prove sacred right white men take negro slaves 
new Territories. possibly show less sacred right 
buy bought unquestionably 
bought cheaper Africa Virginia. done 
power reduce whole question slavery one mere right 
property; and, such, oppose foreign slave trade, 
refuse trade shall "perfectly 
protection home home 
probably ask protection, wholly without 
ground opposition. 
 
Senator Douglas know, man may rightfully wiser to-day 
may rightfully change finds 
wrong. we, reason, run ahead, infer make 
particular change, given 
safely base action upon vague Now, ever, wish 
misrepresent Judge Douglas's position, question motives, 
aught personally offensive him. ever, 
come together principle cause may assistance 
great ability, hope 
clearly us; pretend 
promise ever be. 
 
cause, then, must intrusted to, conducted by, 
whose hands free, whose hearts work, 
care result. Two years ago Republicans nation mustered 
thirteen hundred thousand strong. single 
impulse resistance common danger, every external circumstance 
us. even hostile elements gathered 
four formed fought battle through, 
constant hot fire proud, enemy. 
brave enemy 
result doubtful. shall 
fail; stand firm, shall fail. Wise counsels may 
mistakes delay it, but, sooner later, victory sure come. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH CHICAGO, JULY 10, 1858. 
 
REPLY SENATOR DOUGLAS 
 
DELIVERED CHICAGO, SATURDAY EVENING, JULY 10, 1858. 
 
(Mr. DOUGLAS 
 
[Mr. LINCOLN introduced C. L. Wilson, Esq., made 
appearance greeted perfect storm applause. 
moments enthusiasm continued last, wave 
hand partial silence restored, Mr. LINCOLN 
 
yesterday evening, upon occasion 
reception given Senator Douglas, furnished seat 
convenient hearing him, otherwise treated 
friends, thank them. course 
remarks name mentioned way as, suppose, renders 
least improper make sort reply him. 
shall attempt follow precise order addressed 
assembled multitude upon occasion, though shall perhaps 

 
one question asked attention 
deem somewhat less least dwell 
upon others, brought near close speech, 
think would entirely proper omit attending 
to, yet give attention now, 
probably forget altogether. upon subject, allow 
say intend indulge inconvenient mode sometimes 
adopted public speaking, reading shall depart 
rule far read little scrap speech, 
first topic shall is, provided 
find 
 
"I made mind appeal people combination 
made me; Republican leaders formed 
unnatural portion 
Federal intend fight army wherever meet 
them. know deny yet men trying 
divide Democratic party purpose electing Republican 
Senator place much agents tools 
supporters Mr. Lincoln. Hence shall deal army 
dealt is, 
stop fired whether 
hit stop 
shall whether blows shall hit Republican leaders 
holding Federal offices, yet acting 
concert them." 
 
Well, now, gentlemen, think it! 
right outset canvass, I, poor, kind, amiable, intelligent 
Why, friend Judge 
only, turns out, dead lion, even living 
Russian 
 
says deny 
says don't propose hanging much 
upon question 
Administration men stand 
attitude English, French, occupying position 
case beg indulge us barely 
suggest took 
 
Gentlemen, words part, 
say whether depends, far know, 
upon may right definition term 
Republican party see great party opposed 
divided among themselves, try stop division, rather 
glad confess in; meant 
said Republicans formed going beyond that, 
money sacrifice principle 
one side other, far Republican party 
thing, protest neither know anything it, 
believe it. will, however, think branch 
argument would leave state, benefit 
concerned, one Buchanan men tell 
argument made opposition Judge Douglas. said 
friend Senator Douglas talking him, had, 
among things, said him: 
 
don't want beat "Yes," said he, "I want 
beat him, tell why. believe original Nebraska Bill 
right abstract, wrong time 
brought forward. wrong application Territory regard 
question brought forward time 
nobody asked him; tendered South South 
asked it, could well refuse it; 
reason forced question upon party. best men 
nation, now, President, struggling 
difficulties man's getting up, reached 
point turn case, putting 
trouble us more." 
 
Now, gentlemen, argument all. 
stating argument Buchanan man. 
judge force it. 
 
Popular Everlasting popular Let us moment 
inquire vast matter popular sovereignty. popular 
sovereignty? recollect early period history 
struggle another name 
sovereignty." exactly popular sovereignty, squatter 
sovereignty. terms mean? terms mean used 
now? vast credit taken friend Judge regard 
support it, declares last years life been, 
future years life shall be, devoted matter 
popular sovereignty. it? Why, sovereignty 
squatter sovereignty? suppose, significance 
all, right people govern themselves, sovereign 
affairs squatted country 
own, squatted Territory belong them, 
sense State belongs people inhabit it, 
belonged nation; right govern called 
"squatter sovereignty." 
 
Now, wish become squatter sovereignty? 
become it? get anybody tell people 
Territory authority govern themselves, regard 
question slavery, form State constitution? 
thing all; although general running fire, although 
made every speech side, assuming policy 
given people Territory right govern upon 
question, yet point To-day 
year ago Supreme Court United 
States, insisted upon to-day people Territory 
right exclude slavery Territory; one man chooses 
take slaves Territory, rest people right 
keep out. so, decision made one 
points Judge approved, one approval says 
means keep say, never 
says favor it, sticks it, expects 
win battle decision, says thing 
squatter sovereignty, one man may take slaves 
Territory, men Territory may opposed it, 
yet reason Constitution cannot prohibit it. 
so, much left vast matter squatter sovereignty, 
like know? 
 
get back, get point right people make 
constitution. Kansas settled, example, 1854. Territory 
yet, without formed constitution, regular way, 
three years. time negro slavery could taken 
individuals, decision Supreme Court, Judge 
rest people cannot keep out; 
come make constitution, may say slavery. 
there; obliged tolerate way, experience 
shows so, take negro slaves 
absolutely deprive owners them. experience shows so. 
space time runs beginning settlement 
Territory people make State 
portion time popular sovereignty given up. 
seal absolutely put upon court decision, Judge 
Douglas puts upon top that; yet appealing 
people give vast credit devotion popular sovereignty. 
 
Again, get question right people form 
State constitution please, form slavery without 
slavery, anything new, confess don't know it. 
ever time anybody said people 
Territory form constitution? Judge 
Douglas fought several years life, pledge 
fight remaining years life for? Judge Douglas find 
anybody earth said anybody else form constitution 
people? [A voice, Well, like name him; 
like know was. voice, "John 
 
No, sir, never heard even John Calhoun saying thing. 
insisted principle Judge Douglas; mode applying 
it, fact, wrong. enough purpose ask crowd 
whenever Republican said anything it. never said anything 
it, constantly spoken it; whoever 
undertake examine platform, speeches responsible men 
party, men, too, please, unable 
find one word anybody Republican ranks opposed popular 
sovereignty Judge Douglas thinks suppose 
Judge Douglas claim, little while, 
idea people govern themselves; nobody ever 
thought thing brought forward. remember 
old Declaration Independence said that: 
 
"We hold truths self-evident, men created equal; 
endowed certain inalienable rights; 
among life, liberty, pursuit 
secure rights, governments instituted among men, 
powers consent 
 
origin popular sovereignty. Who, then, shall come 
day claim invented it? 
 
Lecompton Constitution question, 
matter Lecompton Constitution friend Judge 
Douglas claims vast agree opposing Lecompton 
Constitution, far perceive, right. deny 
all; and, gentlemen, readily see could deny it, 
even wanted to. wish to; Republicans 
nation opposed it, would opposed much without 
Judge Douglas's aid it. taken ground long 
did. Why, reason urges constitution 
urged year before. printed speech hand. 
argument makes, constitution adopted, 
people fairly represented allowed vote, pointed 
speech year ago, hold hand now, fair chance 
given people. it, Read shall waste 
time trying read it. it, Read Gentlemen, reading 
speeches tedious business, particularly old man 
put man tall 
bend light. 
 
little more, now, matter popular sovereignty 
Lecompton Constitution. Lecompton Constitution, Judge tells us, 
defeat good thing not. thinks 
defeat good thing, I, agree that. 
defeated it? 
 
[A voice: Judge 
 
Yes, furnished himself, suppose controlled 
Democrats went him, furnished three 
Republicans furnished 
 
defeat it. House Representatives 
friends furnished twenty votes, Republicans furnished 
ninety Now, work? 
 
[A voice: 
 
Why, yes, Douglas it! sure did. 
 
Let us, however, put proposition another way. Republicans could 
done without Judge Douglas. Could done without 
them? could come nearest without other? 
 
[A voice: killed 
 
voice: 
 
Ground taken Republicans long Douglas it. 
proportion opposition measure five one. 
 
[A voice: don't come 
 
don't know talking about, friend. quite willing 
answer gentleman crowd asks intelligent question. 
 
Now, country ever found friends Judge 
Douglas's way acted upon main question, 
ever thought uttering word behalf Judge 
 
[A voice: 
 
defy show printed resolution passed Democratic 
take upon defy man show printed resolution 
Democratic meeting, large favor Judge Trumbull, 
five one Republicans beat bill. Everything must 
everything, five one really 
thing over, seem remember 
existence upon face earth. 
 
Gentlemen, fear shall become leave branch 
subject take hold another. take part Judge Douglas's 
speech respectfully attended me. 
 
Judge Douglas made two points upon recent speech Springfield. 
says issues campaign. first one 
points upon language speech delivered 
Springfield, believe quote correctly memory. 
said "we far fifth year since policy 
instituted avowed object, confident 
putting end slavery operation policy, 
agitation ceased, constantly 
"I believe cease crisis shall reached 
passed. 'A house divided cannot believe 
government cannot endure permanently half slave half "I 
expect Union quoting speech, 
expect house fall, expect cease divided. 
become one thing other. Either opponents 
slavery arrest spread place public mind 
shall rest belief course ultimate extinction, 
advocates push forward shall become alike lawful 
States, north well south." 
 
quoted 
hearing, ask attention all, Judge Douglas thinks 
discovers great political want attention particularly 
inferred it. says favor making 
States Union uniform internal 
domestic concerns favor making entirely 
draws inference language quoted you. says 
favor making war North upon South 
extinction slavery; also favor inviting (as 
expresses it) South war upon North purpose 
nationalizing slavery. Now, singular enough, carefully 
read passage over, say favor anything 
it. said expected would take place. made prediction 
may foolish one, even say 
desired slavery put course ultimate extinction. 
say now, however, need longer difficulty that. 
may written great speech. 
 
Gentlemen, Judge Douglas informed speech mine 
probably carefully admit was. master 
fine capable entering 
upon believe call it; 
believe language employed bears construction Judge 
Douglas puts upon it. don't care regard words. 
know leave crowd doubt, 
explain them, really meant use 
 
not, first place, unaware government endured 
eighty-two years half slave half free. know that. tolerably 
well acquainted history country, know 
endured eighty-two years half slave half free. 
meant allude believe endured 
time, introduction Nebraska Bill, public 
mind rest time belief slavery course 
ultimate extinction. gave us rest 
period eighty-two least, believe. always 
hated slavery, think, much Old 
Line always hated it; always quiet 
new era introduction Nebraska Bill began. 
always believed everybody it, course 
ultimate extinction. Mr. stood near 
thought so; great mass nation rested 
belief slavery course ultimate extinction. reason 
believe. 
 
adoption Constitution history led 
people believe so; belief framers 
Constitution itself, old men, time adoption 
Constitution, decree slavery go new 
Territory, already declare within twenty 
years African slave trade, slaves might cut 
might enumerate 
enough. clear framers 
Constitution intended expected ultimate extinction 
now, say, said speech Judge 
Douglas quoted from, say think opponents slavery 
resist farther spread it, place public mind 
shall rest belief course ultimate extinction, 
mean say place founders 
government originally placed it. 
 
said hundred times, inclination take 
back, believe right, ought 
people free States enter slave States interfere 
question slavery all. said always; Judge 
Douglas heard say it, quite hundred times, least 
good hundred times; said favor 
interfering slavery exists, know 
anything ever intended, and, believe, anything ever 
said. If, means, ever used language could fairly 
construed however, believe never correct it. 
 
much, then, inference Judge Douglas 
favor setting sections war one another. know never 
meant thing, believe fair mind infer 
thing anything ever said. 
 
Now, relation inference favor general 
local institutions various States. 
attend little while, try can, 
earth could man could draw inference anything 
said. said, many times, Judge Douglas's hearing, 
man believed principle lies 
bottom ideas government, beginning end. 
denied use term applies thing 
itself, deny man ever gone ahead devotion 
principle, whatever may done efficiency advocating it. 
think said hearing, believe individual 
naturally entitled pleases fruit 
labor, far wise man's rights; 
community State right exactly pleases 
concerns within State interfere right 
State; General Government, upon principle, 
right interfere anything general class things 
concern whole. said times. said, 
believe right Illinois 
interfere cranberry laws Indiana, oyster laws Virginia, 
laws Maine. said things again, 
repeat 
 
it, then, Judge Douglas hope see slavery 
put public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction, favor Illinois going 
interfering cranberry laws authorize 
draw 
 
suppose might one thing least enabled draw 
inference would true many is, 
looks upon matter slavery exceedingly little 
matter keeping one sixth population whole 
nation state oppression world. 
looks upon exceedingly little equal 
question cranberry laws something moral 
question it; something par question whether man 
shall land plant little 
small thing could desire anything 
done bring ultimate extinction little 
thing, must favor bringing amalgamation 
little things Union. Now, there, 
presume, foundation Judge thinks 
happens vast portion American people 
look upon matter little thing. look 
upon vast moral prove writings 
gave us blessings liberty 
looked upon it, evil merely 
States agree that, Constitution 
assented to, States exists, right 
interfere it, Constitution; 
duty inclination stick Constitution, letter 
spirit, beginning end. 
 
much, then, wish State 
legislatures out, one consolidated government, 
uniformity domestic regulations States, suppose 
raise corn here, must make grow 
too, must make grow North grow South. 
suppose understands favor doing. Now, much 
must call so. Judge issue 
question establishing uniformity domestic regulations 
States. 
 
little Dred Scott decision. Another 
issues says made upon devotion Dred 
Scott decision, opposition it. 
 
expressed heretofore, repeat, opposition 
Dred Scott decision; allowed state nature 
opposition, ask so. fairly 
implied term Judge Douglas used, 
resist it. wanted take Dred Scott master, 
would interfering property, terrible difficulty 
Judge Douglas speaks of, interfering property, would 
thing that, refusing 
obey political Congress, vote come 
question whether slavery prohibited new Territory, 
spite Dred Scott decision, would vote should. 
 
do. Judge Douglas said last night 
decision might advance opinion, might contrary 
decision made; made would abide 
reversed. let property abide 
decision, try reverse decision. try put 
Judge Douglas would object, says obey 
reversed. Somebody reverse decision, since made, 
mean reverse it, mean 
 
uses decisions two uses. rules 
property two uses. First, decide upon question 
court. decide case Dred Scott slave. Nobody 
that, that, say everybody else persons 
standing Dred Scott stands is. is, say 
question comes upon another person, decided again, 
unless court decides another way, unless court 
decision. Well, mean court decide 
way. one thing mean try do. 
 
sacredness Judge Douglas around decision degree 
sacredness never thrown around decision. 
never heard thing. Why, decisions apparently contrary 
decision, good lawyers thought contrary 
decision, made court before. first 
legal history. new wonder 
world. based upon falsehood main facts; 
facts upon stands facts many instances, 
decision made first instance decision made 
many ever held 
profession law, always needed confirmation 
lawyers regarded settled law. Judge Douglas 
hands must take extraordinary decision, made 
extraordinary circumstances, give vote Congress accordance 
it, yield it, obey every possible sense. Circumstances 
alter cases. gentlemen remember case Supreme 
Court twenty-five thirty years ago deciding National Bank 
ask, somebody remember National 
Bank declared truth, whether 
remembered not. Bank charter ran out, granted 
Congress. laid General Jackson. urged 
upon him, denied constitutionality Bank, 
Supreme Court decided General Jackson 
said Supreme Court right lay rule govern 
coordinate branch government, members sworn 
support Constitution; member sworn support 
Constitution understood it. venture say 
heard Judge Douglas say approved General Jackson act. 
become Supreme 

 
fellow-citizens, getting back pass 
Judge Douglas makes threat upon 
cautious say warfare fall 
upon leaders Republican party. Almost every word 
every distinction makes, significance. means 
Republicans count leaders, 
makes fuss them; leaders making war upon. 
wants understood mass Republican party really 
friends. leaders something 
require hands. 
unquestionably light presents matter, want 
ask attention, addressing Republicans here, may 
ask questions you, Republican party, would 
placed sustained Judge Douglas present position 
claim, gentlemen, pretend 
would like go United States make 
say mighty issue 
nothing mass people 
Judge Douglas shall ever heard 
may trifle either us, connection mighty 
question, upon hang nation, perhaps, 
absolutely placed Judge 
Don't know apt is, exceedingly anxious 
times, seize upon anything everything persuade 
something done yourselves? Why, tried persuade 
last night Illinois Legislature instructed introduce 
Nebraska Bill. nobody Legislature ever thought 
thing; first introduced bill, never thought it; 
still furiously proposition, 
standing instruction Senators always introducing 
Nebraska tells Cincinnati platform, tells 
Dred Scott decision. tells you, speech 
last night, substantially former speech, cares 
slavery voted tells struggle Lecompton 
may come not, does, stands 
stood when, spite opposition, built 
Republican party. indorse him, tell care whether 
slavery voted down, close try close 
declaration, repeated day, week, month, 
year. mean? [Cries "No," one voice Yes, 
doubt always him, mean that. doubt 
that, said, repeat it. think, position 
Judge Douglas stood opposing Lecompton Constitution, 
right; know return, may know 
find him, not, may know look him, 
Cincinnati platform. Now, could ask Republican 
party, hard names Judge Douglas called 
repeated charges inclination marry 
declarations Black way, 
black got rubbed that, 
indorsed Republican votes, Plainly, stand ready 
waiting driven 
slavery extension camp ready driven over, tied 
together driven over, every man rope around 
neck, held Judge Douglas. question. 
Republican men earnest done, think 
better it; think Republican party made 
who, far peaceably, oppose extension 
slavery, hope ultimate extinction. believe 
wrong new lands continent keeping 
settlement free white laborers, want land bring 
families earnest, although may make 
mistake, grow time come 
come back name, least upon 
principles party has. better, then, save 
work done maintain it, keep it. 
men choose serve you, go them; made 
organization upon principle, stand it; for, surely God 
you, inspired mind, given sense 
continues give hope, surely still cling 
ideas, last come back merely 
work again. 
 
once, course Judge 
Douglas's speech last night, reminded government made 
white men; believed made white men. Well, 
putting shape one wants deny it; Judge 
goes passion drawing inferences 
protest, forever, logic 
want negro woman slave, necessarily 
want wife. understanding need 
either, but, God made us leave one another alone, 
one another much good white men enough marry 
white women, enough black men marry black 
God's name let Judge us terrible 
take place mixture races; inferior race 
bears superior down. Why, Judge, let get together 
Territories, won't mix there. 
 
[A voice: cheers cheers given hearty 

 
say least self-evident truth. 
 
Now, happens meet together every year, sometimes 
4th July, reason other. 4th July 
suppose uses. indulge me, state 
suppose them. 
 
mighty nation; thirty thirty millions 
people, inhabit one fifteenth part dry land 
whole earth. run memory back pages history 
eighty-two years, discover small 
people point numbers, vastly inferior now, 
vastly less extent country, vastly less everything deem 
desirable among men; look upon change exceedingly advantageous 
us posterity, fix upon something happened 
away back, way connected rise 
prosperity. find race men living day claim 
fathers iron men; fought 
principle contending understood 
followed degree prosperity 
enjoy come us. hold annual remind 
good done process time, done 
it, historically connected it; go 
meetings better humor ourselves, feel attached 
one other, firmly bound country 
every way better men age race country 
live, done 
yet reached whole. something else connected it. 
these, men descended blood us 
perhaps half people descendants men; 
men come Europe, German, French, 
come Europe themselves, whose 
come settled here, finding equals 
things. look back history trace 
connection days blood, find none, cannot 
carry back glorious make feel 
part us; look old Declaration 
Independence, find old men say "We hold 
truths self-evident, men created 
feel moral sentiment, taught day, evidences 
relation men, father moral principle 
them, right claim though blood 
blood, flesh flesh, men wrote 
are. electric cord Declaration 
hearts patriotic men together, link 
patriotic hearts long love freedom exists minds 
men throughout world. 
 
Now, purpose things idea "don't 
care slavery voted voted down," sustaining Dred Scott 
decision, holding Declaration Independence mean 
anything all, Judge Douglas giving exposition 
Declaration Independence means, saying 
people America equal people England. According 
construction, Germans connected it. Now, ask 
things, indulged in, confirmed 
taught children, repeated them, tend 
sentiment liberty country, 
government government form. arguments 
made, inferior race treated much allowance 
capable much done 
condition arguments 
kings made enslaving people ages world. 
find arguments favor 
always necks people wanted 
it, people better 
argument, argument Judge old 
says, work, enjoy fruits 
it. Turn whatever way will, whether come mouth 
king, excuse enslaving people country, mouth 
men one race reason enslaving men another race, 
old hold, course 
made purpose convincing public mind 
care stop negro. 
like know, taking old Declaration Independence, 
declares men equal upon principle, making exceptions 
it, one man says mean negro, 
another say mean man? Declaration 
truth, let us get statute book, find it, tear 
out! it? true, let us tear out! 
[Cries "No, Let us stick it, then; let us stand firmly it, 
then. 
 
may argued certain conditions make necessities 
impose upon us; extent necessity imposed 
upon man, must submit it. think condition 
found established government. slavery 
among us, could get Constitution unless permitted 
remain slavery, could secure good secure 
grasped necessity submitted much, 
destroy principle charter Let 
charter stand 
 
friend said poor hand quote 
try again, however. said one Lord, 
"As Father heaven ye also 
suppose, expect human creature could perfect 
Father said, "As Father heaven ye 
also set towards 
reaching standard attained highest degree moral 
say relation principle men created equal, let 
nearly reached can. cannot give freedom every 
creature, let us nothing impose slavery upon 
Let us turn government back channel 
framers Constitution originally placed it. Let us stand 
firmly other. so, turning contrary 
direction, friend Judge Douglas 
working tends make one universal slave nation. 
one runs direction, resist him. 
 
friends, detained long desired do, 
say: Let us discard quibbling man 
man, race race race inferior, 
therefore must placed inferior position; discarding 
standard left us. Let us discard things, unite 
one people throughout land, shall stand 
declaring men created equal. 
 
friends, could not, without upon new 
would detain long, continue to-night. thank 
extensive audience furnished to-night. leave you, 
hoping lamp liberty burn bosoms shall 
longer doubt men created free equal. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH SPRINGFIELD, JULY 17, 1858. 
 
DELIVERED SATURDAY EVENING 
 
(Mr. Douglas 
 
election, deemed important one, 
and, suppose, Republican party will, without much 
difficulty, elect State ticket. regard Legislature, 
we, Republicans, labor first place, 
Legislature elect upon apportionment representation 
made several years ago, proportion population far 
greater South (as compared is; 
inasmuch opponents hold almost entire South, 
large majority North, fact 
represented years ago, population different, 
us great year according 
law, inhabitants, taken purpose 
new apportionment know fair apportionment 
representation upon census would give us. know could 
not, fairly made, fail give Republican party six ten 
members Legislature probably get law 
happened last session Legislature 
holding control branches Legislature, 
steadily refused give us apportionment rightly 
entitled upon census already taken. Legislature steadily 
refused give us apportionment rightfully entitled 
upon census taken population State. Legislature 
would pass bill upon subject, except least 
unfair us old one, which, instances, two men 
Democratic regions allowed go far toward sending member 
Legislature three Republican Comparison 
made time representative senatorial districts, 
completely demonstrated fact. bill passed 
tendered Republican Governor but, 
reasons stated, withheld approval, bill fell 
without becoming law. 
 
Another disadvantage labor one two 
Democratic Senators members next Legislature, 
vote election Senator, holding districts 
could, reasonable calculation, elect men own, 
chance election. consider 
twenty-five Senators Senate, taking two side 
rightfully adding other, us disadvantage 
lightly Still, is; contend with. 
Perhaps ground complaint part. attending 
many things involved last general election President, Governor, 
Auditor, Superintendent Public Members 
Congress, Legislature, County Officers, on, allowed 
things happen want sufficient attention, cause 
complain adversaries, far matter 
cause complain refusal give us fair 

 
still another disadvantage labor, 
ask attention. arises relative positions 
two persons stand State candidates Senate. 
Senator Douglas anxious politicians 
party, party years past, looking 
upon certainly, distant day, President 
United States. seen round, fruitful face 
cabinet appointments, 
foreign bursting wonderful 
ready laid hold greedy hands. 
upon picture long, cannot, 
little taken place party, bring 
give charming anxiety rush 
him, sustain him, give 
beyond even days highest prosperity could 
brought favor. contrary, nobody ever expected 
President. poor, face, nobody ever seen 
out. all, taken 
together, Republicans labor fight battle 
upon principle, upon principle alone. am, certain sense, made 
behalf Republicans. made merely 
one nowise preferable 
one perhaps hundred, 
Republican ranks. say wish distinctly understood 
borne mind fight battle without 
without external aids brought bear us. 
hope surrounded principle enough nerve 
task, leave nothing fairly done 
bring right result. 
 
Senator Douglas left Washington, movements made known 
public considerable time city New 
that, like another Napoleon, lying 
framing plan campaign. telegraphed Washington City, 
published Union, framing plan purpose 
going Illinois upon treasonable 
disunion speech Lincoln made 16th June. Now, 
suppose Judge really spent time New York 
plan campaign, friends him. 
able, movements since arrival Illinois, discover 
evidences think able see 
material points plan. will, little while, ask 
attention them. shall point out, though showing 
whole plan, are, nevertheless, main points, suppose. 
 
first popular sovereignty. second 
third attacks upon speech made 16th June. 
three within range popular sovereignty 
question Lecompton makes principal 
Upon successive speeches substantially one same. 
matter popular sovereignty wish little careful. 
main points, sure, 
marching music, 
waste time them. little 
campaign. 
 
Coming first point, "popular sovereignty." 
upon cars put upon 
in; upon passes 
wave him. many French cook 
produce Now, great 
plan campaign, worth examine 
examine little, allow 
shall able see whole thing 
ever enacted community. matter popular 
sovereignty? first thing, order understand it, get good 
definition is, see applied. 
 
suppose almost every one knows that, controversy, whatever 
said reference question negro slavery. 
controversy right people govern 
ordinary matters domestic concern States Territories. 
Mr. Buchanan, one late messages (I think sent 
Lecompton urged main point public 
attention directed regard great variety 
small domestic matters, directed question negro slavery; 
asserts people fair chance vote 
question reasonable ground objection regard minor 
questions. Now, think people given, 
offered, fair chance upon slavery question, still, 
fair submission vote upon main question, 
President's proposition would true Hence, 
hereafter speak popular sovereignty, wish understood 
applying say question slavery only, minor 
domestic matters Territory State. 
 
Judge Douglas, says several past years 
life devoted question "popular sovereignty," 
remainder life shall devoted it, mean 
say life securing people 
Territories right exclude slavery Territories? means 
say means every one knows 
decision Supreme Court, makes especial ground 
attack upon forbids people Territory 
exclude slavery. covers whole ground, settlement 
Territory till reaches degree maturity form 
State Constitution. far ground concerned, Judge 
sustaining popular sovereignty, absolutely opposing it. 
decision declares popular 
Territory constitutional power exclude slavery 
territorial existence. so, period time first 
settlement Territory till reaches point forming State 
Constitution thing Judge fought fighting 
for, but, contrary, fought for, fighting for, 
thing popular sovereignty. 
 
Well, much disposed of, Why, contending 
right people, come make State Constitution, 
make themselves, precisely best suits themselves. say 
again, defy declare 
Judge find one oppose proposition. repeat, 
nobody opposing proposition principle. Let 
misunderstood. know that, reference Lecompton Constitution, 
may understand 
proposition true Nobody 
right people, form constitution, form 
themselves. Mr. Buchanan friends done it; they, too, 
well Republicans Democrats, done 
it; contrary, together insisted right 
people form constitution themselves. difference 
Buchanan men one hand, Douglas men Republicans 
other, question principle, question 
fact. 
 
dispute upon question fact, whether Lecompton 
Constitution fairly formed people not. Mr. Buchanan 
friends contended contrary principle 
Douglas men Republicans. insisted whatever 
small existed getting Lecompton Constitution 
happen settlement new Territories. question was, 
fair people? question fact, 
principle. principle, agreed. Judge Douglas voted 
Republicans upon matter fact. 
 
they, voices votes, denied fair 
people. Administration affirmed was. 
respect evidence bearing upon question fact, readily 
agree Judge Douglas Republicans right side, 
Administration wrong. state that, 
matter principle, dispute upon right people 
Territory, State, form constitution 
without outside interference so, 
Judge Douglas going spend life for? going spend life 
maintaining principle nobody earth expect 
stand dignity, go become 
god maintaining principle neither man 
God's creation something regard Lecompton 
Constitution pass question 
popular sovereignty ever attempted 
intelligent community. 
 
Lecompton Constitution, already said question 
fact, whether fair people not, Judge 
Douglas, Republicans Americans, greatly argument 
repeat this, wish know 
opposition Judge Douglas Lecompton Constitution 
considered 
par opposition. agree 
opposition. Senate class men 
formed number three more. House Representatives 
class number 
took one hundred twenty defeat measure, one 
hundred votes one hundred Judge 
Douglas's friends furnished add six 
Americans Republicans. say precisely 
accurate numbers, sufficiently use 
making it. 
 
twenty shall entitled credit 
work, hundred none it? Why, if, Judge Douglas says, 
honor divided due credit given parties, 
much given interests, 
advancement understanding is, common job done, 
common enterprise put five dollars one, 
right take five dollars one. 
understand it. declares credit Lecompton 
upon basis seems unprecedented 
 
Let us see. Lecompton afterward took sort 
shape, passed English bill. said 
Judge defeat good proper thing. good thing, 
entitled credit others performance 
good act, unless something Republicans 
might induce every one expect join good work, 
time something leading doubt 
place superior claim credit ground performed 
good act never expected him? says proneness 
quoting now, occurs perhaps places 
somewhat upon ground lost sheep 
went upon mountains, owner hundred sheep 
found one lost, threw upon shoulders came home 
said rejoicing one sheep 
lost found ninety nine 
application made thus: 
say unto you, rejoicing heaven one 
ninety nine persons need 

 
now, Judge claims benefit let 
Let come say: "I 
provision 
Christian system, condition alone Republicans 
grant 
 
prove ever occupied different position 
regard Lecompton Constitution principle it? says 
make opposition ground whether free 
slave constitution, would understand Republicans 
made opposition ultimately became slave constitution. 
make proof favor point, reminds us 
opposed Lecompton vote taken declaring whether State 
free slave. forgets say Republican 
Senator, Trumbull, made speech Lecompton even did. 
 
oppose it? members 
convention framed fairly elected people; 
people allowed vote unless 
people whole counties, instances, 
reasons declares Constitution 
true sense, people. also additional objection 
mode submitting Constitution back people. bearing 
question whether delegates fairly elected, speech his, 
made something twelve months ago, stand, becomes 
important. made little election delegates 
made speech declared every reason 
hope believe election would one failed 
vote, would 
 
I, days after, made sort answer speech. answer 
made, substantially, argument 
Lecompton adversaries Senate last pointed facts 
people could vote without time 
gone by. commented wonderful Judge 
Douglas could ignorant facts every one else 
nation well knew. 
 
pass popular sovereignty may occasion 
refer one both. 
 
preparing plan campaign, New York, 
appears two speeches heard deliver since arrival 
Illinois, gave special attention speech mine, delivered 
16th June last. says carefully read speech. told 
us Chicago week ago last night repeated Bloomington 
last night. Doubtless, repeated to-day, though hear 
him. first two Bloomington heard him; to-day 
not. said carefully examined 
say; reasonable doubt New York 
preparing plan campaign. glad read carefully. 
says evidently prepared great care. freely admit 
prepared care. claim free errors 
scarcely much; careful put 
anything speech matter fact, make 
appear true fully made 
mistake, willing drawn inference 
regard Judge Douglas one else 
fully prepared modify soon planted upon 
truth truth only, far knew it, could brought 
know it. 
 
made speech kindly feelings toward Judge 
Douglas, manifested therein, gratified found 
carefully examined it, detected error fact, 
inference him, thought fit 
neither two speeches mentioned make 
thank one inform he, 
speech to-day, pointed anything stated respecting 
presume thing. reason 
gratified care caution used speech left 
he, others interested error, able 
point one thing could say wrong. seizes 
upon doctrines supposes included speech, declares 
upon turn issues campaign. 
attempts speech. say wilfully 
fail quote attempt quoting 
passage believe quote accurately memory. shall 
make quotation now, comments upon it, already 
said, order Judge shall left entirely without excuse 
me. now, hope, last time. 
great caution, order repeats misrepresentation 
shall plain If, all, still 
shall compelled reconstruct course marked 
myself, draw upon humble resources, have, new 
course, better suited real exigencies case. set 
campaign intention conducting strictly gentleman, 
substance least, outside latter shall 
never be; constitutes inside gentleman hope 
understand, less inclined practice others. 
purpose expectation canvass would conducted upon 
principle, fairness sides, shall fault 
purpose expectation shall given up. 
 
charges, substance, invite war 
propose local institutions different States shall become 
consolidated language speech 
expresses purpose bears 
said would enter States disturb 
institution slavery. Judge Douglas said, Bloomington, used 
language able ingenious really 
protested entering slave States, 
nevertheless mean go banks Ohio throw 
Kentucky, disturb domestic institutions. 
 
said speech, meant more, institution 
slavery ought placed attitude framers 
government placed left it. understand framers 
Constitution left people free States attitude 
firing shells slave States. using passage 
purpose use it. said: 
 
"We far advanced fifth year since policy created 
avowed object confident promise putting end 
slavery agitation. operation policy agitation 
ceased, constantly augmented. opinion 
cease till crisis shall reached passed. 'A house 
divided cannot believe government 
cannot endure permanently half slave half free; become one 
thing other. Either opponents slavery arrest 
spread it, place public mind shall rest 
belief course ultimate extinction, advocates 
push forward till shall become alike lawful States, 
old well new, North well South." 
 
Now, see, express wish 
anything. passage indicated wish purpose own; 
simply expressed Cannot Judge perceive distinction 
purpose often expressed 
expectation never expressed wish said 
Chicago, repeat, quite aware government 
endured, half slave half free, eighty-two years. understand 
little bit history. expressed opinion 
thought new set causes 
say Chicago, speech there, wish see spread 
slavery arrested, see placed public mind shall rest 
belief course ultimate extinction. said 
supposed, public mind shall rest belief, 
shall peace slavery question. 
public mind rest belief introduction 
Nebraska Bill. 
 
Although ever opposed slavery, far rested hope 
belief course ultimate extinction. 
reason minor question me. might 
believed, believe, whole public mind, is, 
mind great majority, rested belief repeal 
Missouri Compromise. upon event became convinced 
either resting institution 
placed new basis, basis making perpetual, national, 
Subsequent events greatly confirmed belief. 
believe bill beginning conspiracy purpose. 
since considered question paramount one. 
thought public mind never rest till power 
Congress restrict spread shall acknowledged 
exercised one hand or, other, resistance entirely 
out. expressed opinion, entertain to-night. 
denied tendency nationalization slavery 
States. 
 
Mr. South Carolina, one speeches, 
presenting silver gold like, 
Senator Sumner, distinctly affirmed opinion 
Constitution formed belief man slavery would 
last present day. said, think, framers 
Constitution placed institution slavery public mind 
rested hope course ultimate extinction. 
went say men present age, experience, 
become wiser framers Constitution, invention 
cotton gin made perpetuity slavery necessity 
country. 
 
another piece evidence tending point: Quite recently 
Virginia, owner providing 
death certain slaves freedom 
choose, go Liberia, rather remain slavery. chose 
persons would descend property claimed 
slaves. suit finally came Supreme 
Court Virginia, therein decided slaves upon 
ground negro cannot make legal power 
choose, could perform condition upon freedom 
 
mention purpose it, connect 
arguments affording additional evidence change 
sentiment upon question slavery direction making 
perpetual national. argue before, 
merely facts, open 
slave States. 
 
Judge's inference wish see slavery 
placed course ultimate fathers 
originally placed wish State 
force cotton grow upon Green Mountains, 
Florida, cut broad Illinois 
favor ridiculous impossible things. 
 
seems complete answer ask if, 
Congress fashion restricting slavery free territory; 
courts fashion deciding taking slave 
free country made say sufficient answer ask 
ridiculous nonsense uniformity 
actually follow. heard thing Ordinance 
Missouri numerous court 
decisions 
 
Now, Dred Scott decision; upon makes last point 
me. boldly takes ground favor decision. 
 
one half one third entire plan 
campaign. opposed decision certain sense, 
sense puts it. say far decided favor 
Dred Scott's master, Dred Scott family, 
propose disturb resist decision. 
 
never proposed thing. think respect 
judicial authority humble history would suffer comparison 
Judge Douglas. would citizen conform vote 
decision; member Congress, his; President, use veto 
power. would make rule political action people 
departments government. would not. resisting 
political rule, disturb right property, create excite 

 
spoke Chicago, Friday evening last week, made 
point upon me. Saturday evening replied, reminded 
Supreme Court decision opposed least several years. Last 
night, Bloomington, took notice reply, entirely 
forgot remember part it. 
 
upon me, remember turned 
point. renew effort draw 
attention it. wish stand country, well 
Judge Douglas, question judicial authority; therefore 
add something authority favor position. wish 
show sustained authority, addition heretofore 
presented. expect convince Judge. part plan 
campaign, cling desperate Even turn 
upon sharp point him, 
still cling till invent new take place 
it. 
 
public speaking tedious reading must beg 
indulge practice limited extent. shall read letter 
written Mr. Jefferson 1820, found seventh 
volume page seems presented 
gentleman name book, 
called Republican, writing acknowledgment 
present, expressing hope 
work produce favorable effect upon minds young, 
proceeds say: 
 
"That tendency may expected, reason 
feel note deem error it, requiring 
notice opinion strengthened many others. 
pages consider judges ultimate 
constitutional dangerous doctrine indeed, one 
would place us despotism judges 
honest men, so. have, others, 
passions party, power, privilege 
maxim is, power 
dangerous office life, responsible, 
are, elective control. Constitution 
erected single knowing that, whatever hands 
time party, members would become 
wisely made departments 

 
Thus see power claimed Supreme Court Judge Douglas, Mr. 
Jefferson would reduce us despotism 
 
Now, said fact, never quite much this; 
least sustained Mr. 
 
Let us go little further. remember National Bank. 
one owed bank sought avoid payment 
ground bank unconstitutional. case went Supreme 
Court, therein decided bank 
whole Democratic party decision. General Jackson 
asserted he, President, would bound hold 
National Bank constitutional, even though court decided 
so. fell precisely view Mr. Jefferson, acted 
upon official oath, charter National Bank. 
declaration Congress possess constitutional power 
charter bank gone Democratic platform, 
National brought forward last 
Convention contended declaration, 
teeth Supreme Court, quarter century. 
fact, reduced decision absolute 
decision, repeat, repudiated Cincinnati still, 
show go further, Judge Douglas 
speeches denounces opposing Dred Scott 
decision stands Cincinnati platform. 
 
Now, wish know Judge charge upon me, respect 
decisions Supreme Court, lie length, 
proportions door. plain truth simply this: 
Judge Douglas Supreme Court decisions 
like them. Dred Scott decision 
tends nationalize slavery; part original 
combination object. singularly enough, 
never stood opposed decision Supreme Court till this, 
contrary, recollection ever particularly favor 
one till this. never favor opposed any, till 
present one, helps nationalize slavery. 
 
Free men Sangamon, free men Illinois, free men everywhere, judge ye 
upon issue. 
 
says Dred Scott case small matter 
practical best, rather, suppose, 
submit proposition thing 
determines whether man free slave rather 
think would conclude was, liberty depended 
upon it, would Judge Douglas, liberty depended upon it. 
suppose question spreading slavery new 
Territories considers merely abstract matter, 
one practical importance. planting slavery new 
countries always decided slavery 
cannot kept new Territories legal means. 
new Territories differ respect old Colonies 
slavery first planted within them? Mr. Clay 
declared, history proves true, individual men, spite 
wishes people; Mother Government refusing prohibit it, 
withholding people Colonies authority prohibit 
themselves. Mr. Clay says one great causes 
complaint Great Britain best apology 
make institution amongst us. precise 
condition Nebraska politicians last succeeded placing 
new Territories; government prohibit slavery within them, 
allow people prohibit it. 
 
defy man find difference policy originally 
planted slavery Colonies policy prevails 
new Territories. go them, 
individual wishes go. Judge indulged doubtless to-day 
question going Dred Scott 
decision. Well, Judge, please tell 
bank decision? allow us Dred Scott 
decision precisely bank decision? succeeded 
breaking moral effect find necessary 
amend Constitution, set court negroes order 
it? 
 
one point. Judge Douglas affectionate leaning 
toward Americans Old Last evening, sort 
tone, described us scene. called side 
Mr. Clay, last order genius "popular 
sovereignty" might duly descend dying man settle upon him, 
living worthy successor. could less promise 
would devote remainder life "popular 
great statesman peace. part 
Judge evidently promised tears shall 
drawn cheeks Old Whigs, large 
 
Mr. Webster, too, mentioned; quite come 
scene him. would see 
quick administer political effects 
dead adversaries, claims never heard of, 
dividing among themselves. found dead to-morrow 
morning, nothing insignificance could prevent speech made 
authority, end next week. happens 
"popular sovereignty" Mr. Clay Missouri 
Compromise expressly little singular Mr. 
Clay cast upon Judge Douglas purpose compromise 

 
Again, Judge keep faith Mr. Clay first brought 
Nebraska Bill. left Missouri Compromise unrepealed, 
report accompanying bill told world purpose. 
Mr. Clay must great agony till thirty days later, 
"popular sovereignty" stood forth 
 
One thing. Last night Judge Douglas horrors 
disposition make negroes perfectly equal white men 
social political stop show said 
thing, follows anything 
said, adhere Declaration 
Independence. Judge Douglas friends willing stand 
it, let come amend it. Let make read men 
created equal except negroes. Let us decided whether 
Declaration Independence, blessed year 1858, shall thus 
amended. construction Declaration last year, said 
meant Americans America equal England. Then, 
pointed rule excludes 
people come among us 
since revolution, last speech 
tells us meant 
 
press little further, ask meant include 
mean exclude vast population 
principles Declaration expect ere long 
introduce another amendment 
particular. satisfied anything endanger 
nationalizing negro slavery. may draw white men down, must 
lift negroes up. 
 
shall say, "I 
 
declarations upon subject negro slavery may misrepresented, 
cannot misunderstood. said understand 
Declaration mean men created equal respects. 
equal suppose mean declare 
men equal equal right 
"life, liberty, pursuit happiness." Certainly negro 
equal color, perhaps many still, 
right put mouth bread hands 
equal every man, white pointing 
given you, cannot justified taking away little 
given him. ask negro 
like him, let alone. God gave little, little let 

 
government established institution slavery 
among us. certain sense compelled tolerate existence. 
sort necessity. gone struggle 
secured independence. framers Constitution found 
institution slavery amongst institutions time. 
found effort eradicate might lose much 
already gained. obliged bow necessity. gave 
power Congress abolish slave trade end twenty years. 
also prohibited Territories exist. 
could, yielded necessity rest. also 
yield follows necessity. would desire 
would separation white black races. 
 
One point Springfield speech Judge Douglas says 
read carefully. expressed belief existence conspiracy 
perpetuate nationalize slavery. profess know it, 
now. showed part Judge Douglas played string 
facts constituting mind proof showed 
parts played others. 
 
charged people deceived carrying last 
Presidential election, impression people 
Territories might exclude slavery known 
advance court decide neither 
Congress people could exclude slavery. charges 
distinctly made anything else speech. 
 
Judge Douglas carefully read speech. not, 
far know, contradicted two speeches 
heard certainly not. admission, renew 
charge. charge party conspiracy 
deception sole purpose nationalizing slavery. 
 
 
 
 
CORRESPONDENCE LINCOLN DOUGLAS 
 
[The following correspondence two rival candidates 
United States 
 
 
 
 
MR. LINCOLN MR. DOUGLAS. 
 
CHICAGO, ILL., July 24, 
 
HON. S. A. DOUGLAS: 
 
dear agreeable make arrangement 
divide time, address audiences present 
Mr. hand this, authorized receive 
and, agreeable you, enter terms 

 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Mr. DOUGLAS Mr. LINCOLN. 
 
Co., ILL., July 30, 1858. 
 
Dear letter dated yesterday, accepting proposition 
joint discussion one prominent point Congressional District, 
stated previous letter, received morning. 
 
times places designated follows: 
 
    Ottawa, La County   August  1858. 
    Freeport, County  "    
    Union County, September 
    Charleston, Coles County   "  
    Galesburgh, County October 
    Adams County    " 
    Alton, Madison County    " 
 
agree suggestion shall open close 
discussion. speak Ottawa one hour, reply, occupying 
hour half, follow half hour. Freeport, 
shall open discussion speak one follow hour 
half, reply half hour. alternate 
like manner successive place. 
 
respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
S. A. DOUGLAS. 
 
 
 
 
Mr. LINCOLN Mr. DOUGLAS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, July 31, 1858. HON. S. A. DOUGLAS: 
 
Dear yesterday, places, times, terms joint 
discussions us, received morning. terms, 
propose, take four three, 
thus close direct 
shall try letter appear Journal 
Register Monday morning. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FIRST JOINT DEBATE, OTTAWA, 
 
AUGUST 21, 1858 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S REPLY 
 
man somewhat misrepresented, 
him, least, find myself; 
misrepresentation becomes gross apt amuse 
him. first thing see fit notice fact Judge Douglas 
running history old Democratic 
old Whig parties, Judge Trumbull made arrangement 
1854, place General Shields United 
States Senate, Judge Trumbull place Judge Douglas. 
Now, say upon subject think man even 
Judge Douglas prove it, true. doubt 
"conscientious" saying it. resolutions took 
length time read, platform Republican party 
1854, say never anything them, think Trumbull 
never had. Judge Douglas cannot show either us ever 
anything them. 
 
believe true call 
convention form Republican party Springfield, think 
friend Mr. upon stand, hand it. think 
true, think remember accurately able 
recollect tried get it, would go in. 
believe also true went away Springfield 
convention session, attend court Tazewell county. true 
place name, though without authority, upon committee, 
afterward wrote attend meeting refused 
so, never anything organization. 
plain truth matter resolutions. 
 
Now, story Judge Douglas tells Trumbull 
sell old Democratic party, Lincoln agreeing sell 
old Whig party, means knowing that: Judge Douglas 
cannot know substance whatever. Yet 
doubt "conscientious" it. know Mr. Lovejoy got 
Legislature winter, complained told 
old Whigs district old Whig party good enough 
them, voted told so. Now, 
means totally charges Judge 
man cannot prove right claim 
man makes affirmative charge, must offer proof show 
truth says. certainly cannot introduce testimony show 
negative things, right claim man says 
knows thing, must show knows it. always 
right claim this, satisfactory may 
"conscientious" subject. 
 
Now, gentlemen, hate waste time regard 
general Abolition Judge Douglas makes, says 
engaged time selling old Whig 
party, hope permit read part printed speech 
made Peoria, show altogether different view 
position took contest 1854. 
 

 
Mr. LINCOLN: Yes, sir, obliged so; longer young man. 
 
"This repeal Missouri Compromise. foregoing history 
may precisely accurate every particular, sure 
sufficiently uses shall attempt make it, 
us chief materials enabling us correctly judge 
whether repeal Missouri Compromise right wrong. 
 
"I think, shall try show, direct 
effect, letting slavery Kansas Nebraska, wrong 
prospective principle, allowing spread every part 
wide world men found inclined take it. 
 
"This declared but, must think, covert real zeal 
spread slavery, cannot hate 
monstrous injustice slavery itself. hate 
republican example influence 
enemies free institutions, us 
causes real friends freedom doubt 
especially forces many really good men amongst 
open war fundamental principles civil liberty, 
Declaration Independence, insisting 
right principle action 
 
"Before let say think prejudice 
Southern people. would situation. 
slavery exist among them, would introduce it. 
exist among us, instantly give up. believe 
masses north south. Doubtless individuals 
sides would hold slaves others 
would gladly introduce slavery existence. know 
Southern men free slaves, go north, become 
Northern ones go south become cruel 

 
"When Southern people tell us responsible origin 
slavery we, acknowledge fact. said 
institution exists, difficult get rid it, 
satisfactory way, understand appreciate saying. 
blame know myself. 
earthly power given me, know do, 
existing institution. first impulse would free slaves 
send native land. moment's reflection 
would convince whatever high hope (as think 
may long term, sudden execution impossible. 
landed day, would perish next ten 
days; surplus surplus money enough 
world carry many times ten days. then? Free 
keep among us quite certain 
condition? think would hold one slavery, 
yet point clear enough denounce people upon. 
next? Free them, make politically socially 
feelings admit this; mine would, well know 
great mass white people not. Whether 
feeling accords justice sound judgment, sole question, 
if, indeed, part it. universal feeling, whether well ill 
cannot safely disregarded. cannot, then, make 
seem systems gradual emancipation might 
undertake judge brethren 
South. 
 
"When remind us constitutional rights, acknowledge 
them, grudgingly, fully would give 
legislation reclaiming not, 
likely carry free man slavery 
ordinary criminal laws hang innocent one. 
 
"But this, judgment, furnishes excuse permitting 
slavery go free territory would reviving 
African slave-trade law. law forbids bringing slaves 
Africa, long forbid taking 
Nebraska, hardly distinguished moral principle; 
repeal former could find quite plausible 

 
reason know Judge Douglas knows said this. think 
answer one questions put me. mean 
allow unless pays back kind. 
answer questions one another, unless 
made answered before, got 
without getting anything return. got answer 
Fugitive Slave law. 
 
Now, gentlemen, don't want read greater length; 
true ever said regard institution 
slavery black race. whole it; anything 
argues idea perfect social political equality 
negro fantastic arrangement words, man 
prove horse. say here, 
upon subject, purpose, directly indirectly, 
interfere institution slavery States exists. 
believe lawful right so, inclination 
so. purpose introduce political social equality 
white black races. physical difference 
two which, judgment, probably forever forbid living 
together upon footing perfect equality; inasmuch becomes 
necessity must difference, I, well Judge Douglas, 
favor race belong superior position. 
never said anything contrary, hold that, notwithstanding 
this, reason world negro entitled 
natural rights enumerated Declaration Independence, 
right life, liberty, pursuit happiness. hold 
much entitled white man. agree Judge Douglas 
equal many respects, certainly color, perhaps 
moral intellectual right eat bread, 
without leave anybody else, hand 
equal, equal Judge Douglas, equal every living man. 
 
pass consider one two little 
Judge fault early friend Lincoln 
don't know would great 
mistaken. Lincoln never kept anywhere world. 
true Lincoln work latter part one winter little 
head think friend Judge 
equally fault charges time Congress 
opposed soldiers fighting Mexican war. 
Judge make charge tell 
referring record. remember old Whig, 
whenever Democratic party tried get vote war 
begun President, would it. whenever 
asked money, anything pay soldiers 
there, time, gave vote Judge Douglas did. 
think please whether 
truth, Judge right make it. 
he, general charge, idea withheld supplies 
soldiers fighting Mexican war, anything else 
hinder soldiers, is, say least, grossly altogether 
consultation records prove him. 
 
used much time supposed, dwell 
little longer upon one two minor topics upon Judge 
read speech Springfield, say 
"a house divided cannot Judge say 
don't know whether not. Judge seem 
attending now, would like know opinion 
house divided stand. does, 
question veracity, me, Judge 
Authority somewhat higher character. 
 
Now, friends, ask attention matter purpose 
saying something know Judge may readily enough agree 
maxim put forth true, 
may misapply it; Judge right urge that, 
misapply it, right show 
misapply it, undertakes say think 
nation, far question slavery concerned, become 
one thing other, favor bringing dead 
uniformity various States, institutions, argues 
great variety local institutions States, 
springing differences soil, differences face 
country, climate, bonds Union. make "a house 
divided make house produce 
one section country called for, wants another 
section, section supply wants first, 
matters bonds union, true bonds union. 
question slavery considered among 
institutions country? leave say whether, 
history government, institution slavery always 
failed bond union, and, contrary, 
discord element division house. ask consider 
whether, long moral constitution men's minds shall continue 
same, generation assemblage shall sink 
grave, another race shall arise, moral intellectual 
development have, whether, institution standing 
position is, continue element 
so, right say that, regard 
question, Union house divided itself; Judge 
reminds often said institution slavery 
existed eighty years States, yet exist 
others, agree fact, account looking 
position fathers originally placed 
new Territories gone, legislating cut 
source slave trade, thus putting seal 
legislation public mind rest belief 
course ultimate extinction. lately, 
charge nothing Judge's think he, 
acting him, placed institution new basis, 
looks perpetuity nationalization slavery. 
placed upon new basis, say, said, believe 
shall peace upon question opponents slavery 
arrest spread it, place public mind shall 
rest belief course ultimate extinction; or, 
hand, advocates push forward shall 
become alike lawful States, old well new, North well 
South. Now, believe could arrest place 
Washington Jefferson Madison placed it, would course 
ultimate extinction, public mind would, eighty years 
past, believe course ultimate extinction. crisis 
would past, institution might let alone hundred years, 
live long, States yet would 
going existence way best black white 
races. 
 
[A voice: "Then repudiate popular 
 
Well, then, let us talk popular popular 
sovereignty? right people slavery it, 
see fit, Territories? able man 
watch understanding popular sovereignty, applied 
question slavery, allow people Territory 
slavery want to, allow 
want it. mean vast people 
Territory United States, one would obliged 
slave want one; say that, understand Dred 
Scott decision, one man wants slaves, rest way 
keeping one man holding them. 
 
made speech Springfield, Judge 
really thinking things 
all. thought world 
anything bring war free slave states. 
thought world anything bring political 
social equality black white races. never occurred 
anything anything reduce dead 
uniformity local institutions various States. must 
say, fairness him, thinks something leads 
bad results, none better mean it. 
fatal country, influence producing 
it, whether intend not. true placing 
institution upon original basis upon fathers 
placed tendency set Northern Southern 
States war one another, tendency 
make people Vermont raise raise 
Louisiana, compel people Illinois cut 
Grand cut 
Maine, Judge says new principle 
started regard question. Judge claim 
working plan founders government? think says 
speeches indeed, one saw evidence 
policy allow slavery south certain line, north 
saw part 
country stand upon policy, therefore set studying 
subject upon original principles, upon original principles got 
Nebraska fighting upon 
fighting fashion. 
 
Now, friends, wish attend little one two 
things Springfield speech. main object show, 
far humble ability capable people 
country believed tendency, 
among slavery question 
last four five years, make slavery perpetual universal 
nation. made speech object, 
arranging evidences thought tended prove proposition, 
concluded bit 
 
"We cannot absolutely know exact adaptations result 
see lot framed different portions 
know gotten different times places, 
different Franklin, James, 
see joined together, see exactly make 
frame house mill, exactly 
lengths proportions different pieces exactly 
adapted respective places, piece many 
omitting even single piece 
see place frame exactly fitted prepared yet bring 
piece case feel impossible believe 
Stephen Franklin Roger James understood one another 
beginning, worked upon common plan draft drawn 
first blow 
 
friend Judge Douglas came Chicago 9th July, 
speech delivered 16th June, made 
there, took hold speech mine, showing 
carefully read it; paid attention matter all, 
complimented amiable, intelligent 
notwithstanding said this, goes draws out, 
speech tendency mine set States war one 
another, make institutions set 
white people marrying together. Then, Judge complimented 
pleasant (I must confess little 
came great man. much accustomed 
came me. rather like 
said reckoned loved better 
man, got less it. Judge flattered me, could 
make mind meant deal me; went 
work show misunderstood whole scope speech, 
really never intended set people war one another. 
next time met him, Springfield, used 
expression, claimed right Constitution, 
enter slave States interfere 
institutions slavery. says upon that: Lincoln enter 
slave States, go banks Ohio, side, 
shoot runs on, step step, style 
argument, Springfield speech says: shall 
successful firing batteries shall 
slavery States Union shall Now, don't 
think exactly way treat "a kind, amiable, intelligent 
know asked Judge show 
said that, didn't succeed firing slave States 
slavery Union could 
shown it. understand would do. would say: don't 
mean quote you, result say. 
right ask, ask now, put form 
ordinary reader would take expression 
me? 
 
speech Springfield, night thought might 
well attend business little, recalled attention 
well could charge conspiracy nationalize slavery. 
called attention fact acknowledged hearing 
twice carefully read speech, and, language 
lawyers, twice read speech, still put plea 
answer, took him. insisted right 
renew charge Ten days afterward met Judge 
say, ground, 
heard make speech. comes plea 
charge, first time; plea put in, well 
recollect it, amounted this: never talk Judge 
Taney President United States regard Dred Scott 
decision made. ought know man 
makes charge without knowing true much 
knowingly tells and, lastly, would pronounce 
whole thing but, would make personal application 
charge regard amiable, 
intelligent personal 
understood since Judge hold 
Judge broken 
got saying thing out. Judge 
so. fortunate keep 
do, Judge trying make question 
veracity me. know Judge great man, 
small man, feel got him. waive 
objections filed till taken, 
upon Judge Douglas never talk 
Chief Justice Taney President Dred Scott decision 
made, follow could perfect 
understanding without talking it? disposed stand upon 
legal advantage. disposed take denial like 
answer neither knowledge, information, 
belief existence disposed take 
answer broad though put words. now, 
ask, even done so, right prove him, 
offer evidence two prove it; 
evidence proves existence 
answer denying knowledge, information, belief, disturb fact? 
show used leader 
them. 
 
Now, regard moral rule persons tell 
know true much knowingly 
tell remember rule, must borne mind 
read you, say know conspiracy 
exist. reply, believe it. Judge says 
believe it, says know, falls within 
rule, asserts thing know true, 
much knowingly tells falsehood. want call 
attention little discussion branch case, 
evidence brought mind conclusion expressed 
belief. If, evidence stated anything 
false erroneous, needed Judge Douglas point out, 
would taken back, kindness world. 
deal way. brought forward anything fact, 
point out, even take back. 
point anything erroneous evidence, rather 
show, comparison evidence, reasoned 
call amiable, intelligent 
reasoned false conclusion, 
able show argument wandered erroneous 
conclusion. want ask attention portion Nebraska 
Bill, Judge Douglas 
 
 "It true intent meaning Act, 
legislate slavery Territory State, exclude 
therefrom, leave people thereof perfectly free form 
regulate domestic institutions way, subject 
Constitution United States." 
 
Thereupon Judge Douglas others began argue favor "popular 
sovereignty," right people slaves wanted 
them, exclude slavery want them. "But," said, 
substance, Senator Ohio (Mr. Chase, "we 
suspect mean allow people exclude slavery 
wish to; mean it, accept amendment propose, 
expressly authorizing people exclude slavery." 
 
believe amendment me, offered, 
people Territory, representatives, 
might, saw fit, prohibit existence slavery therein. 
state fact, taken back mistake it, 
Judge Douglas acting voted amendment down. 
think men voted real reason 
so. know reason was. looks us, since seen 
Dred Scott decision holding "under 
people cannot exclude slavery, say looks poor, simple, 
intelligent though niche left place 
put Dred Scott decision niche would 
adopting amendment. now, say again, 
reason, avail Judge much calmly 
point people reason voting 
amendment down, than, swelling up, may 
provoked call somebody 
 
Again: quotation Nebraska Bill 
"It true intent meaning bill legislate 
slavery Territory State." always puzzled know 
business word Judge Douglas 
knows. put there. knows put for. 
cannot say put for. law passing 
States, making provisions States. placed 
for? seeing Dred Scott decision, holds 
people cannot exclude slavery Territory, another Dred Scott 
decision shall come, holding cannot exclude State, 
shall discover word originally put there, view 
something come due time, shall see 
half something. say again, different 
reason putting there, Judge Douglas, way, without 
calling anybody tell reason was. 
 
Judge spoke came near making charge 
falsehood me. used, found printed newspaper, 
which, remember, nearly like real speech, following 
language: 
 
"I answer charge before, reason 
suppose man America heart corrupt 
believe charge could true. much respect Mr. 
Lincoln suppose serious making 
 
confess rather curious view, respect 
consider making deemed rather grave charge 
confess strikes rather let pass. Judge 
moment believe man America whose heart 
make charge, places among 
hearts base enough make charge, hope 
excuse hunt another charge like this; 
turn find other, 
turn Judge Douglas made it, hope 
reconsider question deep heart thought 
fit ascribe me. Judge Douglas's speech March 22, 1858, 
hold hand, says: 
 
"In connection another topic desire 
seldom refer course newspapers, notice articles 
publish regard myself; course Washington Union 
extraordinary last two three months, think 
well enough make allusion it. read 
Democratic party every day, least two three months, 
keeps reading out, and, still continues 
read out, using terms 
kind polite nature. Sir, 
make Democracy Washington Union, 
willing allow history action last 
twenty years speak political principles 
fidelity political Washington Union personal 
editor nominated public declined 
vote him, stated time might give reasons 
so. Since declined give vote, 
constant attacks repeated almost daily me. 
friend Michigan read article 
 
part speech. must excuse reading entire 
article Washington Union, Mr. read Mr. Douglas. 
Judge goes sums up, think, 
 
"Mr. President, find several distinct propositions 
advanced boldly Washington Union apparently 
man questions denounced 
propositions are, first, 
primary object government original institution 
protection person property; second, Constitution 
United States declares citizens State shall entitled 
privileges immunities citizens several States; 
that, therefore, thirdly, State laws, whether organic 
otherwise, prohibit citizens one State settling 
another slave property, especially declaring 
direct violations original intention government 
Constitution United States; and, fourth, emancipation 
slaves Northern States gross outrage rights 
property, inasmuch done part 
 
article published Union 17th 
November, 18th appeared first article giving adhesion 
Union, Lecompton Constitution. words: 
 
vexed question settled. problem 
dead point danger passed. serious trouble 
Kansas affairs 
 
column nearly sort. Then, come look 
Lecompton Constitution, find doctrine incorporated 
put forth Union. it? 
 
"ARTICLE 7, Section I. right property higher 
constitutional right owner slave 
slave increase right 
owner property 
 
provision Constitution may amended 
1864 two-thirds 
 
"But alteration shall made affect right property 

 
"It seen Lecompton Constitution 
identical spirit authoritative article Washington 
Union day previous indorsement Constitution." 
 
pass portions speech, hope one feels 
interested matter read entire section speech, 
see whether Judge 
 
"When saw article Union 17th November, followed 
Lecompton Constitution 10th November, 
clause Constitution asserting doctrine State 
right prohibit slavery within limits, saw 
fatal blow struck sovereignty States Union." 
 
stop quotation there, requesting may read. 
read portion desire comment upon. charge 
Judge thinks must corrupt heart 
purpose part certain high make impossible 
people one State prohibit people State 
entering called, making slave State. 
words, charge design make institution 
slavery national. ask attention Judge Douglas 
done here. know made part speech reason 
refused vote certain man public 
get it, charge one made him, 
thinks corrupt Now, make charge 
make newspaper editor 
says identical spirit Lecompton Constitution, 
framers Constitution brought editor 
newspaper "fatal blow call 
language, "fatal blow 
words carry meaning better changed 
"fatal blow change expression, call "fatal 
blow see charge made merely editor 
Union, framers Lecompton Constitution; 
so, article authoritative whose authority? 
question means authority 
President 
 
sort question means make 
Union, framers Lecompton Constitution, 
President United States Cabinet, supporters 
Lecompton Constitution, Congress Congress, 
involved "fatal blow commend Judge 
Douglas's consideration question corrupt man's heart must 
make 
 
Now, friends, one branch subject, little time 
left, call shall come 
close end probable shall occupy 
quite time me. Although questions would 
like talk twice long have, could enter upon another head 
discuss properly without running time. ask attention 
people assembled elsewhere course Judge 
Douglas pursuing every day bearing upon question making 
slavery national. going back taking speeches 
makes, speeches made yesterday day before, makes 
constantly country, ask attention them. 
first place, necessary make institution 
war. danger people Kentucky shoulder 
and, young stuck every bayonet, march 
Illinois force upon us. danger going 
making war upon them. necessary 
nationalization slavery? simply next Dred Scott decision. 
merely Supreme Court decide State 
Constitution exclude it, already decided 
Constitution neither Congress Territorial Legislature 
it. decided acquiesced in, whole thing done. 
true, way, think, slavery made 
national, let us consider Judge Douglas every day 
end. first place, let us see influence 
public sentiment. like public sentiment 
everything. public sentiment, nothing fail; without it, nothing 
succeed. Consequently, public sentiment goes deeper 
statutes decisions. makes statutes 
decisions possible impossible executed. must borne 
mind, also additional fact Judge Douglas man vast 
influence, great enough many men profess believe 
anything find Judge Douglas believe it. 
Consider also attitude head large 
party claims majority voters country. 
man sticks decision forbids people Territory 
excluding slavery, so, says right 
give opinion 
decided court; decided court, is, are, 
bound take political action law, judges 
decision court "Thus 
saith Lord." places ground alone; bear 
mind thus committing decision 
next one firmly this. commit 
account merit decision, "Thus 
saith Lord." next decision, much this, "Thus saith 
Lord." nothing divert turn away 
decision. nothing point great 
General Jackson, believe binding force decisions. 
nothing Jefferson believe. said 
often heard approve Jackson's course disregarding decision 
Supreme Court National Bank says 
hear say so. denies accuracy say 
ought know better I, make question 
thing, though still seems heard say twenty times. 
tell him, though, claims stand Cincinnati 
platform, affirms Congress cannot charter National Bank, 
teeth old standing decision Congress charter bank. 
remind another piece history question respect 
judicial piece Illinois history belonging 
time large party Judge Douglas belonged 
decision Supreme Court Illinois, 
decided Governor could remove Secretary State. 
find whole story History Illinois, know 
Judge Douglas deny favor 
decision mode adding five new judges, vote 
four old ones. so, ended Judge's sitting 
bench one five new judges break four 
old ones way precisely got title judge. Now, 
Judge tells men appointed conditionally sit members 
court upon subject, say, 
"You know, tried it." says court kind 
lose confidence men, 
say, "You know best, 
cannot shake Judge Douglas's teeth loose Dred Scott 
decision. Like animal (I mean hang 
got teeth may cut may 
tear away arm, still hold. may point 
Judge, say over, beginning 
political life present time, attacks upon judicial 
may cut limb limb public record, strive 
single cannot divert 
it. last, Dred Scott decision. things 
show purpose strong death adheres 
decision, adhere decisions 
court. 
 
[A "Give us something besides Dred 
 
doubt want hear something don't Now, 
spoken Dred Scott decision, one word, done. Henry 
Clay, statesman, man fought 
humble life, Henry Clay said class men would repress 
tendencies liberty ultimate emancipation must, 
would this, go back era Independence, muzzle 
cannon thunders annual joyous return; must blow 
moral lights around us; must penetrate human soul, eradicate 
love liberty; then, till then, could 
perpetuate slavery Judge Douglas is, 
example vast influence, thing 
community, says negro nothing Declaration 
Independence. Henry Clay plainly understood contrary. Judge Douglas 
going back era Revolution, and, extent 
ability, cannon thunders annual joyous return. 
people, willing slavery, establish it, 
moral lights around us. says 
whether slavery voted sacred right 
is, judgment, human soul 
light reason love liberty American 
people. say when, means 
Judge Douglas shall succeed bringing public sentiment 
exact accordance vast shall 
back sentiments; shall come repeat views 
avow principles, say says mighty 
needs second Dred Scott 
decision, advance, make slavery alike lawful 
States, old well new, North well South. 
 
friends, ends Judge take 
 
 
 
 
SECOND JOINT DEBATE, FREEPORT, 
 
AUGUST 27, 1858 
 
LADIES Saturday last, Judge Douglas first 
met public discussion. spoke one hour, hour half, 
replied half hour. order reversed. speak 
hour, hour half, reply half hour. 
propose devote first hour scope 
brought within range speech Ottawa. course 
brought within scope speech something 
opening speech. course opening argument Judge 
Douglas proposed seven distinct interrogatories. speech 
hour half, attended parts speech, 
thought, intimated would answer rest 
interrogatories condition agree answer 
many me. made intimation time proposition, 
reply allude suggestion mine. 
injustice saying occupied least half reply dealing 
though refused answer interrogatories. 
propose answer interrogatories, upon condition 
answer questions exceeding number. give 
opportunity 
 
Judge remains silent. say answer 
interrogatories, whether answers mine not; 
done so, shall mine him. 
 
supposed myself, since organization Republican party 
Bloomington, May, 1856, bound party man platforms 
party, since. interrogatories shall answer go 
beyond scope within perceived 
one responsible myself. 
 
said thus much, take Judge's interrogatories 
find printed Chicago Times, answer order 
may mistake it, interrogatories 
writing, also answers them. first one 
interrogatories words: 
 
Question desire know whether Lincoln to-day stands, 
1854, favor unconditional repeal Fugitive Slave 
Answer:--I now, ever did, stand favor unconditional 
repeal Fugitive Slave law. 
 
Q. desire answer whether stands pledged to-day, 
1854, admission slave States Union, 
even people want them?" Answer:--I now, ever did, stand 
pledged admission slave States Union. 
 
Q. want know whether stands pledged admission 
new State Union constitution people 
State may see fit Answer:--I stand pledged 
admission new State Union, constitution 
people State may see fit make. 
 
Q. want know whether stands to-day pledged abolition 
slavery District Answer:--I stand to-day 
pledged abolition slavery District Columbia. 
 
Q. desire answer whether stands pledged 
prohibition slave-trade different States?" Answer:--I 
stand pledged prohibition slave-trade 
different States. 
 
Q. desire know whether stands pledged prohibit slavery 
Territories United States, north well south 
Missouri Compromise Answer:--I 
pledged belief right duty Congress prohibit slavery 
United States 
 
Q. desire answer whether opposed acquisition 
new territory unless slavery first prohibited Answer:--I 
generally opposed honest acquisition territory; and, 
given case, would would oppose accordingly 
might think acquisition would would slavery 
question among ourselves. 
 
Now, friends, upon examination 
questions answers, far answered 
pledged this, that, other. Judge framed 
interrogatories ask anything this, answered 
strict accordance interrogatories, answered truly, 
pledged upon points answered. 
disposed hang upon exact form 
rather disposed take least questions, state 
really think upon them. 
 
first one, regard Fugitive Slave law, never 
hesitated say, hesitate say, think, 
Constitution United States, people Southern States 
entitled Congressional Fugitive Slave law. said that, 
nothing say regard existing Fugitive Slave law, 
think framed free 
objections pertain it, without 
efficiency. inasmuch agitation regard 
alteration modification law, would man 
introduce new subject agitation upon general question 
slavery. 
 
regard question, whether pledged admission 
slave States Union, state frankly 
would exceedingly sorry ever put position 
pass upon question. exceedingly glad know 
would never another slave State admitted Union; must 
add slavery shall kept Territories 
territorial existence one given Territory, people 
shall, fair chance clear field, come adopt 
constitution, extraordinary thing adopt slave 
constitution, actual presence institution among 
them, see country, admit 
Union. 
 
third interrogatory answered answer second, being, 
second. 
 
fourth one regard abolition slavery District 
Columbia. relation that, mind distinctly made up. 
exceedingly glad see slavery abolished District 
Columbia. believe Congress possesses constitutional power 
abolish it. Yet member Congress, not, present 
views, favor endeavoring abolish slavery District 
Columbia, unless would upon First, 
abolition second, vote 
majority qualified voters District; third, compensation 
made unwilling owners. three conditions, 
confess would exceedingly glad see Congress abolish slavery 
District Columbia, and, language Henry Clay, 
capital foul blot upon 
 
regard fifth must say that, 
question abolition slave-trade different States, 
truly answer, have, pledged nothing it. 
subject given mature consideration 
would make feel authorized state position hold 
entirely bound it. words, question never 
enough induce investigate whether really 
constitutional power it. could investigate 
sufficient time bring conclusion upon subject; 
done so, say frankly here, Judge Douglas. 
must say, however, opinion Congress 
possess constitutional power abolish slave-trade among 
different States, still favor exercise 
power, unless upon conservative principle conceive it, 
said relation abolition slavery District 
Columbia. 
 
answer whether desire slavery prohibited 
Territories United States full explicit within itself, 
cannot made comments mine. suppose 
regard question whether opposed acquisition 
territory unless slavery first prohibited therein, answer 
could add nothing way making better 
understood, answer placed writing. 
 
Judge me, record. suppose 
flattered really entertaining one set 
opinions one place, another set another place; 
afraid say one place uttered another. 
saying suppose say vast audience strongly tending 
audience State Illinois, believe 
saying which, would offensive persons render 
enemies myself, would offensive persons 
 
proceed Judge interrogatories, far 
framed them. bring forward new get 
ready. bring forward reaching number 
first one is: 
 
Question people Kansas shall, means entirely 
unobjectionable respects, adopt State constitution, ask 
admission Union it, requisite 
number inhabitants according English 
vote admit them? 
 
Q. people United States Territory, lawful way, 
wish citizen United States, exclude slavery 
limits prior formation State constitution? 
 
Q. 3. Supreme Court United States shall decide States 
cannot exclude slavery limits, favor 
in, following decision rule political 
 
Q. 4. favor acquiring additional territory, disregard 
acquisition may affect nation slavery question? 
 
introductory interrogatories Judge Douglas propounded 
Ottawa, read set resolutions said Judge Trumbull 
participated first Republican State 
Convention, held Springfield October, 1854. insisted 
Judge Trumbull, perhaps entire Republican party, responsible 
doctrines contained set resolutions read, 
understand set resolutions deduced 
interrogatories propounded me, using resolutions 
sort authority questions me. Now, say 
to-day answer interrogatories springing 
set resolutions read. answered 
Judge Douglas thought fit ask them. now, ever did, 
recognize responsibility upon set resolutions. 
replied occasion, assured never anything 
them. repeat today never possible form 
anything set resolutions turns out, believe, 
resolutions never passed convention held 
Springfield. 
 
turns never passed convention public 
meeting part in. believe turns out, addition 
this, not, fall 1854, convention holding 
session Springfield, calling Republican State yet 
true convention, assemblage men calling 
convention, Springfield, pass resolutions. 
little really know proceedings convention, 
set resolutions passed, though general knowledge 
assemblage men there, Judge Douglas 
read resolutions, really know 
resolutions passed there. question 
resolutions adopted. could bring suppose Judge 
Douglas could say upon subject without knowing 
true. contented myself, occasion, truly 
could, connection them, denying whether 
passed Springfield. Now, turns got hold 
resolutions passed convention public meeting Kane County. 
wish say here, don't conceive fair mind 
discovery relieves all. much 
convention Kane County Springfield. much responsible 
resolutions Kane County amount 
responsibility exactly nothing either case; 
would regard set resolutions passed moon. 
 
allude extraordinary matter canvass 
purpose anything yet advanced. Judge Douglas make 
statement upon occasion matters believed true, 
stated roundly true, form pledge 
veracity truth. whole matter turns does, 
consider Judge Douglas is, distinguished Senator 
United States; served nearly twelve years 
character limited ordinary Senator United 
States, name become 
extraordinary far forget suggestions justice 
prudence himself, venture upon 
assertion slightest investigation would shown 
wholly false. account done upon 
supposition evil genius attended life, 
giving apparent astonishing prosperity, lead 
many good men doubt advantage virtue 
say account supposition evil genius 
last made mind him. 
 
may add another extraordinary feature Judge's conduct 
extraordinary 
habit, almost speeches makes, charging falsehood upon 
adversaries, others. ask whether able find 
anything Judge Trumbull, instance, said, anything 
said, justification compared have, 
instance, sort 
 
habit charging matter belief part 
that, introduction Nebraska Bill Congress, 
conspiracy make slavery perpetual national. arranged 
time time evidence establishes proves truth 
charge. charge Ottawa. shall time 
dwell upon great length; inasmuch Judge Douglas, 
reply half hour, made points upon relation it, 
propose noticing them. 
 
Judge insists that, first speech made, 
distinctly made charge, thought good 
sincere it; 
grew angry somewhat excited found insisted upon 
matter earnestness. says characterized falsehood far 
implicated moral character Well, 
know, till presented view, implicated moral 
character. much habit, argues 
position never thought saying 
doubt Lincoln "conscientious" saying so. remember 
know ALTOGETHER "CONSCIENTIOUS" matter. 
conceive possible men good thing, 
really find nothing Judge Douglas's course arguments 
contrary inconsistent belief conspiracy nationalize 
spread slavery good blessed thing; hope 
understand question matter 
entirely 
 
draw attention one points made case, 
beginning Nebraska Bill introduced, 
short time afterward, amendment, believe, provided 
must considered "the true intent meaning Act 
legislate slavery State Territory, exclude therefrom, 
leave people thereof perfectly free form regulate 
domestic institutions way, subject 
Constitution United States." called attention 
fact others began arguing giving 
increased degree liberty people Territories 
formerly question slavery, question 
raised whether law enacted give unconditional liberty 
people; test sincerity mode argument, Mr. 
Chase, Ohio, introduced amendment, made 
amendment declare people Territory 
power exclude slavery saw fit. asked 
attention also fact Judge Douglas acted 
voted amendment down, notwithstanding expressed exactly 
thing said true intent meaning law. called 
attention fact subsequent times decision Supreme 
Court made, declared Territorial 
Legislature constitutional right exclude slavery. 
argued said men did, intend people 
Territory right exclude slavery absolutely 
voting Chase's amendment wholly 
said, men 
look forward decision, contemplation 
decision Supreme Court would might made, voting 
amendment would perfectly rational 
would keep Congress coming collision decision 
made. Anybody conceive intention expectation 
decision follow, would desirable party 
attitude get Supreme nearly members 
belonging decide one way, party Congress 
decided way. Hence would rational men 
expecting decision keep niche law clear it. 
pointing out, tell Judge Douglas looks 
though reason Chase's amendment voted down. tell 
that, it, knows it, done 
reason different this, knows reason tell us 
was. tell him, also, vastly satisfactory 
country give intelligible reason 
voted stand upon dignity call people Well, 
Saturday make think 
says taken upon tell whole truth 
amendment explanation would necessary part 
words effect. Now, say quite 
suppressed anything material case, frank 
admit sound reason appeared 
material, quite fair present it. reason 
Chase came forward amendment expressly 
authorizing people exclude slavery limits every 
Territory, General Cass proposed Chase, would add 
amendment people power introduce exclude, 
would let go. substantially reply. 
Chase would that, voted amendment down. Well, turns 
out, believe, upon examination, General Cass took part 
little running debate upon amendment, ran away 
vote all. fact? think, 
General Cass somewhere about, chose run away 
whole thing. inference draw fact that, 
though took part debate, name appear ayes 
Judge Douglas's reply amount satisfactory 
 
[Cries "Yes," "Yes," "No," 
 
little difference opinion here. ask attention 
views bearing question whether amounts 
satisfactory answer. men determined amendment 
get bill, place Dred Scott 
decision come in, sought excuse get rid 
One ask Chase add 
proposed amendment provision people might introduce slavery 
wanted to. well knew Chase would thing, Mr. 
Chase one men differing broad principle 
insisting freedom better man would 
consent law, penned hand, made 
recognize slavery one hand, liberty other, precisely 
equal; insisted this, well knew 
insisted would moment think doing, 
him. believe (I not, since made 
answer, chance examine journals Congressional Globe 
therefore speak believe state bill 
time, according parliamentary member could 
propose additional amendment Chase's amendment. rather think 
Judge shakes head. well. would like know, 
then, wanted Chase's amendment fixed over, somebody else could 
offered it? wanted 
offer put put 
suppose amendment offered, 
Chase's amendment one disposed 
parliamentary law, cannot pile another on. gentlemen 
vote Chase's on, then, amended form 
whole stood, add amendment it, wanted put 
obliged do, ayes 
show thirty-six voted down, ten voted 
favor it. thirty-six held entire control. could 
form put bill exact shape wanted. 
rule preventing amending time, could pass 
that, then, Chase's amendment put shape 
wanted. choose so, went 
Chase get add knew would add, 
would not, stand upon pretext voting 
argued meaning intent bill. left room 
thereby Dred Scott decision, goes far make slavery 
national throughout United States. 
 
pass one two points have, time soon 
must allowed say Judge Douglas again, 
upon one two occasions, enormity Lincoln, 
insignificant individual like charging 
conspiracy upon large number members Congress, Supreme Court, 
two nationalize slavery. want say that, 
first place, made charge sort upon 
arrayed evidence tending prove it, presented 
understanding others, saying think giving 
means judging whether proves not. precisely 
done. placed upon all. 
occasion, wish recall attention piece evidence 
brought forward Ottawa Saturday, showing made 
substantially charge substantially persons, 
excluding dear self ask give 
attention evidence brought forward 
discovered "fatal blow right people 
exclude slavery limits, fatal blow assumed 
evidence article Washington Union, published "by 
ask whose authority? discovers similar identical provision 
Lecompton Constitution. Made framers 
Constitution. Advocated members party 
nation, advocated introduction Kansas Union 
Lecompton Constitution. asked attention evidence 
arrayed prove fatal blow facts 
brought forward support identical 
one thinks me. pointed it, 
newspaper editor merely, President Cabinet 
members Congress advocating Lecompton Constitution 
framing instrument. must permitted remind 
although may great his, yet somewhat 
force calling attention enormity making like 
charge him. 
 
Go on, Judge Douglas. 
 
 
 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S 
 
readily occur cannot, half hour, 
notice things able man Judge Douglas say 
hour hope, therefore, anything 
said upon would like hear something me, 
omit comment upon, bear mind would expecting 
impossibility go whole ground. take 
points upon, employ specially 
them. 
 
first thing say word regard Judge 
Douglas's declaration 
audience, thing, says, shown Democrat 
speaking. Now, wish, way reply subject, say 
speaking, used toward 

 
Now, friends, come long portion Judge's 
half devoted various 
resolutions platforms adopted different counties 
different Congressional districts, Illinois legislature, 
supposes variance positions assumed 
to-day. true many resolutions variance 
positions ask talk 
reasonably it. happen know, Judge's opinion 
contrary never tried conceal 
opinions, tried deceive one reference them. may go 
examine members voted United States Senator 
election 1854. pledged certain things 
home, determined pledges me; find 
persons tell anything inconsistent 
say now, rather retire race, give 
trouble. plain truth this: introduction Nebraska 
policy, believed new era introduced history 
Republic, tended spread perpetuation slavery. 
opposition measure agree one another 
everything. people north end State stronger 
measures opposition central southern portions 
State, opposed Nebraska doctrine. one 
feeling one sentiment north end met 
conventions passed resolutions. middle State 
farther south hold conventions pass resolutions, 
although general common view common sentiment. 
meetings Judge alluded to, resolutions 
read from, spread whole State. last 
met together parts State, agreed upon 
common platform. You, held extreme either yielded 
or, wholly yielding them, agreed yield 
sake opposition measures 
opposite party pushing forward time. met 
then, anything practical purposes. 
agreed upon platform party throughout entire State 
Illinois, party, platform. 
 
say you, one expects case 
anything signified Republican platform 
answers to-day, tell frankly person 
deceived. ask vote one supposes 
secret purposes pledges dare speak out. Cannot Judge 
fears, unfortunate case election, 
going Washington enable advocate sentiments contrary 
expressed voted elected me, assure 
fears wholly groundless. Judge really 
afraid I'll tell afraid of. afraid 
we'll pull together. anything else. 
part, hope us, entertaining common sentiment 
opposition appears us design nationalize perpetuate 
slavery, waive minor differences questions either belong 
dead past distant future, pull together 
struggle. true ground 
occupy frankly boldly Judge Douglas 
views, though partly yours, 
perfectly accordance feelings are, say 
go him, me. hope deal things 
fairly Judge Douglas, people State, 
contest. never elected office, trust may go 
falsehood upon notwithstanding 
hard opinions Judge Douglas chooses entertain me. 
 
Judge addressed Abolition tendencies 
speech mine made Springfield June last. often tried 
answer always saying melancholy almost 
turn disgust repetition answer 
it. trust nearly intelligent audience read 
speech. have, may venture leave 
see whether contains 
Judge Douglas. 
 
Judge complains fully answer questions. 
sense comprehend answer questions, done 
pointed fully fairly answer him, 
aver sense see done. says 
declare would event vote admission slave State 
Union. fairly see give 
explicit answer merely say would 
dislike put said clearly, put 
Territory slavery excluded 
present State constitution 
extraordinary thing, wholly unlikely see 
could avoid voting refuses understand 
said so, wants audience understand say 
so. Yet reported printed speech cannot help 
seeing it. 
 
says vote admission slave State would 
voting dissolution Union, hold Union 
cannot permanently exist half slave half free. repeat 
believe government endure permanently half slave half free; 
yet admit, follow, admission 
single slave State permanently fix character establish 
universal slave nation. Judge happy indeed working 
leaving subject answering questions, aver 
confident belief, come see speeches print, 
find every question asked fairly boldly 
fully answered answered put him. 
so? two speeches may placed side side, venture 
leave impartial judges whether questions 
directly answered mine. 
 
Judge Douglas says made charge upon editor Washington 
Union, alone, entertaining purpose States power 
exclude slavery limits. undertake say, make 
direct issue, make charge editor 
Union alone. undertake prove record made 
charge higher editor 
Washington Union. quite aware around 
form put it, make manifest 
"fatal persons Washington 
trying defend Mr. Buchanan 
all. making charge 
trying show you, Judge Douglas, witness side. 
defending Buchanan, tell Judge Douglas opinion, 
made charge, eye farther north to-day. 
fighting people called Black Republican 
mixed speech, tolerably 
manifest eye great deal farther north to-day. 
Judge says though made charge, Toombs got declared 
man United States, except editor Union, 
favor doctrines put forth thereupon 
understand Judge withdrew charge. Although taken 
extracts newspaper, Lecompton Constitution, 
show existence conspiracy bring "fatal 
States deprived right excluding slavery, 
went soon Toombs got told true. 
reminds story John California railroad 
says started Mission 
two ways determining One 
taken ground. 
invention instrument, 
series points. night turned 
ascertain distance come, found 
mistake merely dragged ground, without keeping 
record. found made ten miles. 
this, asked passing far 
replied half 
put Judge Douglas says, made 
took statement. 
doubt Judge Douglas made charge, easily 
satisfied truth statement 
distance Yet fact man put forth 
matter Douglas deemed "fatal State sovereignty 
elected Democrats public 
 
Now, gentlemen, may take Judge Douglas's speech March 22, 1858, 
beginning middle page 21, reading bottom page 
24, find evidence say make 
charge editor Union alone. cannot stop read it, 
give Judge Douglas said: 
 
"Mr. President, find several distinct propositions 
advanced boldly Washington Union apparently 
every man questions denounced 
propositions are, first, 
primary object government original institution 
protection persons property; second, Constitution 
United States declares citizens State shall 
entitled privileges immunities citizens several 
States; that, therefore, thirdly, State laws, whether organic 
otherwise, prohibit citizens one State settling 
another slave property, especially declaring 
direct violations original intention Government 
Constitution United States; and, fourth, emancipation 
slaves Northern States gross outrage rights 
property, much done part 

 
article published Union 17th 
November, 18th appeared first article giving adhesion 
Union Lecompton Constitution. words: 
 
vexed question settled. problem 
dead point danger passed. serious trouble 
Kansas affairs 
 
"And sort. Then, come look 
Lecompton Constitution, find doctrine incorporated 
put forth Union. it? 
 
7, Section i. right property higher 
constitutional right owner slave 
slave increase right 
owner property 
 
"Then provision Constitution may amended 
1864 two-thirds vote. 
 
alteration shall made affect right property 

 
"It seen Lecompton Constitution 
identical spirit authoritative article Washington 
Union day previous indorsement Constitution. 
 
"When saw article Union 17th November, followed 
Lecompton Constitution 18th November, 
clause Constitution asserting doctrine State 
right prohibit slavery within limits, saw 
fatal blow struck sovereignty States Union." 
 
says, "Mr. President, find several distinct propositions 
advanced apparently whose authority, 
Judge Again, says another place, "It seen 
Lecompton Constitution identical spirit 
authoritative whose mean 
say authorized publication knows 
Washington Union considered organ Administration. demand 
Judge Douglas whose authority meant say articles 
published, authority President United States 
defy show referred to, 
high Federal Government. this, says 
articles paper provisions Lecompton Constitution 
and, argues authors 
co-operating together. use word 
construction put upon it? winds 

 
"When saw article Union 17th November, followed 
Lecompton Constitution 18th November, 
clause Constitution asserting doctrine State 
right prohibit slavery within limits, saw 
fatal blow struck sovereignty States Union." 
 
ask fuss made editor 
would terribly "fatal indeed single man could 
President, Cabinet officer, member Congress, giving 
strength efficiency movement. respect Judge Douglas's 
good sense must believe n't idea 
character blow miserable represents 
editor be. Judge's eye farther south now. Then, 
peculiarly decidedly north. hope rested idea 
great "Black party, making tail 
new knows expecting day day turn 
Republican, place head organization. 
found "Black estimate standard 
taught none well. Hence back 
old camp, find installed full 
among 
fearful 
 
 
 
 
THIRD JOINT DEBATE, 
 
SEPTEMBER 15, 1858 
 
Mr. LINCOLN'S REPLY. 
 
LADIES much principles Judge 
Douglas cordially approve, 
shall controversy him. far insisted 
States right exactly please 
domestic relations, including slavery, agree entirely him. 
places wrong spite tell him, though repeat 
again, insisting difference upon 
subject. made great many speeches, 
utterly impossible find anything 
ever put print contrary say upon subject. 
hold constitutional obligations allow people 
States, without direct exactly 
deny inclination interfere 
them, even constitutional say 
placed spite 
insisted entertain view purposes 
regard matter. 
 
upon subject, make answers briefly certain 
propositions Judge Douglas says, "Why can't Union 
endure permanently half slave half said supposed 
could not, new audience, give briefly 
reasons entertaining opinion. Another form 
question is, "Why can't let stand fathers placed it?" 
exact difficulty us. say Judge Douglas friends 
changed position fathers originally placed 
it. say, way father's originally left slavery question, 
institution course ultimate extinction, 
public mind rested belief course ultimate 
extinction. say government first established 
policy founders prohibit spread slavery new 
Territories United States, existed. Judge 
Douglas friends broken policy, placed upon 
new basis, become national perpetual. 
asked desired anywhere placed back upon 
basis fathers government originally placed upon. 
doubt would become time come, 
policy fathers, restricting limits 
already restricting new Territories. 
 
wish dwell great length branch subject 
time, allow repeat one thing stated before. 
man Senator Sumner floor 
Senate, complimented silver 
good many things one 
speeches declared government originally 
established, nobody expected institution slavery would last 
day. opinion one man, 
opinion never get Judge Douglas anybody favor 
slavery, North, all. sometimes get Southern 
man. said time framers government 
knowledge experience taught us; experience 
invention taught us perpetuation 
slavery necessity. therefore, upon changed 
basis upon fathers government left 
basis perpetuation 
 
insist difference Judge Douglas 
Judge Douglas helping change along. insist upon 
government placed fathers originally placed it. 
 
remember Judge Douglas said saw evidences 
statute books Congress policy origin government 
divide slavery freedom geographical saw 
maintain policy, therefore set studying 
way settle institution right basis 
thought ought placed upon speech 
seeks place it, upon basis fathers 
placed upon, upon one gotten 
asks cannot get along attitude fathers 
placed it, better clear evidences 
changed basis, chiefly 
changing policy fathers. one read speech 
22d last March see makes open 
showing set fixing institution upon altogether 
different set principles. think fully answered 
asks cannot let alone upon basis fathers 
left it, showing changed whole policy 
government 
 
Now, fellow-citizens, regard matter contract 
made Judge Trumbull myself, long portion Judge 
Douglas's speech wish simply say said 
before, cannot know whether true not, 
know word truth it. told 
before. don't want harsh language indulged in, know 
deal persistent insisting story know 
utterly without truth. used fashion amongst men 
charge made, sort proof brought forward establish it, 
proof found exist, charge don't know 
meet kind argument. don't want fight 
Judge Douglas, way making argument 
mouth it. 
say that, beginning end 
story bargain Judge Trumbull myself, 
word truth it. ask show sort evidence 
truth story. brings forward reads 
speech James H. Matheny, charging bargain 
Trumbull myself. opinion 
thing tell story knew nothing about. believe 
did. contradicted contradicted Judge 
Trumbull, nobody produced proof, none. Now, 
whether speech Judge brings forward really 
one made, know, hope Judge pardon 
doubting since production 
Springfield resolutions Ottawa. wish dwell great 
length upon matter. say nothing long story like 
told, except true, demand insists upon shall 
produce proof. man do, leave 
way, know way dealing it. 
 
argument lines "Yes, not." bears 
former prove point, negative 
easily 
 
Judge gone long account old Whig Democratic 
parties, charge Trumbull 
myself. says agreed upon compromise regard 
slavery question National Democratic Convention 
resolutions passed abide compromise upon 
slavery question. also says Whig party National Convention 
agreed abide regard Compromise 1850. 
understand Judge altogether right that; understand 
part history country stated correct 
recollect I, member party, acquiesced 
compromise. recollect Presidential election followed, 
General Scott presidency, Judge Douglas around 
us Whigs Abolitionists, precisely 
bit difference. often heard him. could nothing 
old Whig party alive got 
extremely good name since passed away. 
 
almost natural law that, matter bad 

 
Compromise made repeal old Missouri 
Compromise. left region United States territory half large 
present territory United States, north line 
degrees 30 minutes, slavery prohibited Act Congress. 
Compromise repeal one. affect propose 
repeal it. last became Judge Douglas's duty, thought (and 
find fault Chairman Committee Territories, 
bring bill organization territorial 
one, two Territories north line. so, 
ended provision substantially repealing Missouri 
Compromise. Compromise 1850 repealed it. 
ask could let Compromise 
quiet agitation slavery question. making fuss 
it. acquiesced Compromise measures 1850. 
never seriously disturbed Abolition agitation 
period. came form governments Territories north 
line degrees 30 minutes, could let matter stand 
necessary organization 
all. Iowa lay north line, organized 
Territory come Union State without disturbing 
Compromise. sort necessity destroying organize 
Territories. But, gentlemen, would take time meet 
little quibbling arguments Judge Douglas show 
Missouri Compromise repealed Compromise 1850. opinion 
is, careful investigation arguments sustain 
position Compromise virtually repealed Compromise 
1850 would show report 
Judge Douglas first brought Congress time introduction 
Nebraska Bill, original form repeal 
Missouri Compromise, expressly stated forborne 
done Compromise 1850. close 
part discussion part asking question again, "Why, 
peace Missouri Compromise, could let 

 
complaining said speech Springfield, 
says accepted nomination way, 
examine it, find acceptance 
quotes portion said "a house divided 
cannot stand." Let say word regard matter. 
 
persuade us must variety different 
institutions States Union; variety necessarily 
proceeds variety soil, climate, face country, 
difference natural features States. agree 
that. matters ever produced difficulty amongst us? 
all. ever quarrel fact laws 
Louisiana designed regulate commerce springs 
production different class relative 
production State? produced 
all. Union. don't make house 
house divided itself. hold house 
sustain Union. 
 
element slavery? always 
quarrels difficulties it? cease quarrels 
it? Like causes produce like worth observe 
generally comparative peace upon slavery question, 
cause alarm excited 
effort spread new territory. Whenever limited 
present effort spread it, 
peace. trouble convulsion proceeded efforts 
spread territory. thus date Missouri 
Compromise. annexation 
territory acquired Mexican war; now. Whenever 
effort spread it, agitation 
Now, appeal audience political 
national men, whether reason expect 
agitation regard subject cease causes tend 
agitation actively work? cause 
produced agitation 1820, Missouri Compromise formed, 
produced agitation upon annexation Texas, 
times, work results think nature 
man changed, causes produced agitation one 
time effect 
 
result far observation slavery question 
reading history right hope 
trouble agitation come 
shall either placed back originally stood, 
fathers originally placed it, or, hand, shall 
entirely master view 
reason entertained it, Judge Douglas read 
Springfield speech. 
 
Now, friends, one thing feel 
sort obligation mention. Judge Douglas 
way, platforms 
seeks hold says, "Why can't come make 
open avowal principles places reads 
advertisement says used notify people speech 
made Judge Trumbull desires know 
whether cannot speak frankly friends do. 
How, ask, friends speak Convention 
party State met 21st April Springfield, 
passed set resolutions proclaim country 
platform. constitute platform, Judge 
Douglas claims principles 
right declare speaks sentiments 
9th June Colonel John Governor 
others, calling National Democrats, met 
Springfield adopted set resolutions easily 
understood, plain definite stating country 
world believed would stand upon, Judge Douglas's 
platform Now, reason Judge Douglas willing 
Colonel Governor stand upon 
written printed platform well upon must look 
farther platform claims stand 

 
Again, reference 16th June Republicans 
Convention published platform, clear 
distinct Judge spoke principles plainly 
definitely world. reason Judge Douglas 
willing stand upon must go around 
one supporting supported 
time life, said something time contrary 
Judge regard rule good turn 
rule good one responsible 
every opinion man expressed 
good rule him. ask, good rule 
me? opinion, good rule either us. think 

 
[Mr. DOUGLAS: 
 
Judge Douglas says think differently. glad it. 
tell looking resolutions five six years ago, 
insisting platform, notwithstanding protest 
not, never platform, pointing platform 
State Convention say nominated 
cannot see means resolutions, 
hold responsible way. says 
hold rule good, one way other, 
comprehend could answer fully answered greater 
length. therefore put answer resolutions 
hunted me, I, lawyer, would call good plea 
bad declaration. understand law poor plea 
may good plea bad declaration. think opinions 
Judge brings support me, yet differ me, bad 
declaration me; bring things him, 
putting good plea kind declaration, propose 
try it. 
 
Freeport, Judge Douglas occupied large part time producing 
resolutions documents various understood, make 
somehow responsible them; propose little 
sort thing him. 1850 clever gentleman name 
Thompson Campbell, personal friend Judge Douglas myself, 
political friend Judge Douglas mine, candidate 
Congress District. views 
slavery question. interrogatories, 
answers read them: 
 
 
 
 

 
you, elected, vote cordially support bill 
prohibiting slavery Territories United States? 
 
vote support bill abolishing slavery 
District 
 
oppose admission Slave States may formed 
Texas Territories? 
 
vote advocate repeal Fugitive Slave law 
passed recent session 
 
advocate vote election Speaker 
House Representatives shall willing organize 
House give Free States influence 
business 
 
views, constitutional right 
Congress prohibit slave-trade States, also 
expediency exercising right 
 
 
 
 
REPLY. 
 
"To first second interrogatories, answer 

 
"To third interrogatory reply, opposed admission 
Slave States Union, may formed Texas 
Territory. 
 
"To fourth fifth interrogatories unhesitatingly answer 

 
"To sixth interrogatory reply, long Slave States 
continue treat slaves articles commerce, Constitution 
power Congress pass laws peculiar COMMERCE, 
protection Human Rights demands interposition 
every constitutional means prevent 

 

 
 
want say Thompson Campbell elected Congress 
platform, Democratic candidate District, 
Martin P. 
 
DOUGLAS: Give date 
 
time Campbell ran 1850. exact date here. 
time 1850 interrogatories put answer 
given. Campbell elected Congress, served term. think 
second election came served term, 
re-elected. Whether defeated know. [Mr. 
Campbell nominated re-election Democratic party, 
end term good friend Judge Douglas 
got high office President sent 
fact? end term Congress 
appears mutual friend Judge Douglas got mutual friend 
Campbell good office, sent California upon it. 
so, 27th last month, Judge Douglas spoke 
Freeport joint discussion, friend Campbell, come 
way California, help Judge beat me; poor 
Martin P. Sweet standing platform, trying help poor 
elected. true one Judge Douglas's friends. 
 
again, race 1850, Congressional Convention 
assembled nominated R. S. Congress, 
unanimously adopted following 
 
"Resolved, opposed extension 
slavery; would make opposition ground 
interference interests States exists, yet 
firmly insist duty Congress oppose 
extension Territory free, means compatible 
obligations Constitution, good faith sister States; 
principles recognized Ordinance 1787, 
received sanction Thomas Jefferson, acknowledged 
great 
 
Subsequently interrogatories propounded Dr. 
addressed Campbell above, exception 
respecting slave trade, Dr. Democratic 
Congress, replied follows: 
 
"I received written interrogatories day, and, see 
La Democrat Ottawa Free took 
Ottawa affirmative side interrogatories 1st 
relation admission Slave States Free 
Territory, position taken correctly reported 
said papers, emphatically distinctly opposed it. relation 
admission Slave States Texas, whether shall go 
depend upon opinion may hereafter form 
true meaning nature resolutions If, 
said resolutions, honor good faith nation pledged 
admit Slave States Texas may apply 
admission State, should, Congress, vote 
PLEDGED bound sacred contract, bill 
admission Slave States Texas would never receive 
vote. 
 
"To fourth interrogatory answer decidedly 
reasons set forth reported remarks Ottawa last Monday. 
 
"To fifth interrogatory also reply affirmative 
use utmost secure 
nomination election man accomplish objects said 
interrogatories. cordially approve resolutions adopted 
Union meeting held 27th September 
 
etc., R. S. 
 
 
say regard Dr. regularly 
nominated Democratic candidate Congress district; elected 
time; end term appointed land-office 
(I never heard anything Judge Douglas's 
held office considerable time, 
Freeport day scattered 
public debate R. S. would make Democratic 
speech favor Judge Douglas. know personal 
added resolution, truly believe, 
among participated Convention, supported 
platform laid resolution 
Convention reply given, call 
following names, recognized day leading 

 
B. Williams, Charles Thomas 

 
reckon ought except Cook. 
 
  C. Sherman. 
  A. S. W. 
  F. Hall, G. W. A. M. 
  M. Jackson, W. Smith, 
  La William 
 
William another one Judge Douglas's friends stood 
stand Ottawa, time Judge says knees trembled 
carried away. names 
 
  
  B. 
 
another set resolutions think 
matter hand. 
 
28th February year Democratic District Convention 
held nominate candidate Circuit Judge. Among 
delegates Captain H. H. 
Du W. M. Jackson, J. M. P. W. 
W. Smith J. others Colonel 
Strode Convention. following resolutions 
unanimously first motion P. W. second 
motion William M. 
 
"Resolved, Convention favor Wilmot Proviso, 
Principle Practice, know good reason person 
oppose largest Free Soil, Free Territory Free 
speech. 
 
"Resolved, opinion Convention, time arrived 
men free, whites well 
 
DOUGLAS: date 
 
understand 1850, know it. state thing 
say know it, not. highest belief 
so. know way arrive conclusion error 
it. mean put case stronger truth 
going comment upon extract newspaper De 
County; strikes rather 
circumstances. Judge county, candidate 
Legislature, purpose, secures election, 
helping Judge Douglas. editor newspaper 
County paper find extract going 
read. part article 
fiercely could Judge Douglas me. curious 
thing, think, paper. agree that, Judge 
may make it: 
 
"Our education rather favor 
equality is, enjoy privileges 
whites aware 
popular doctrine. many strong 
taking broad ground equality, 
opposite ground. 
 
"We brought State blacks voters, 
know resulting it, though perhaps would 
work well blacks doubt 
right whites guard evil, one. 
opinion would best concerned colored 
population State agree 
within jurisdiction United States, say means 
right Senators Representatives 
Congress, vote President. us makes man, 
want seen many thought 
white men." 
 
one Judge Douglas's friends. Now, want leave 
attitude misrepresented, say think 
Judge responsible quite responsible 
would one friends said it. think 
fair enough. 
 
also set resolutions passed Democratic State 
Convention Judge Douglas's good State Vermont, think 
ought good 
 
"Resolved, liberty right inherent inalienable man, 
herein men equal. 
 
"Resolved, claim authority Federal Government abolish 
slavery several States, claim Constitutional power 
perpetually prohibit introduction slavery territory 
free, abolish jurisdiction Congress, 
exists. 
 
"Resolved, power ought immediately exercised 
prohibiting introduction existence slavery New Mexico 
California, abolishing slavery slave-trade District 
Columbia, high wherever else, Constitution, 
reached. 
 
"Resolved, Slave States admitted Federal 
Union. 
 
"Resolved, Government ought return ancient policy, 

discourage slavery." 
 
Freeport answered several interrogatories propounded 
Judge Douglas Ottawa meeting. Judge yet seen fit 
find fault position took regard seven 
interrogatories, certainly broad enough, 
cover entire ground. answers, 
opportunity take ground elect 
must expect nothing accordance 
right assert Judge Douglas fault 
find them. chooses still try thrust upon different 
ground, without paying attention answers, obtaining 
cost much trouble time 
propounded four interrogatories him, claiming right 
answer many interrogatories him, would 
reserve future got ready. Judge, 
answering upon occasion, put suppose intends 
answers four interrogatories. first one 
interrogatories me, words: 
 
people Kansas shall, means entirely 
unobjectionable respects, adopt State constitution, ask 
admission Union it, requisite 
number inhabitants according English 
vote admit them?" 
 
read Judge's answer newspaper, remember 
pronounced time, give answer equivalent 
answers considerable length, 
rather asking question, insisting 
Judge Trumbull done something ought say something about, 
finally getting statements induce infer means 
understood will, supposed case, vote admission 
Kansas. bring forward purpose saying 
chooses put different construction upon answer, may it. 
not, shall time forward assume vote 
admission Kansas disregard English bill. 
right remove misunderstanding may have. mention now, 
may hereafter assume true construction 
answer, choose correct me. 
 
second interrogatory propounded this: 
 
people United States Territory, lawful 
way, wish citizen United States, exclude slavery 
limits prior formation State 
 
Judge Douglas answered lawfully exclude slavery 
Territory prior formation constitution. goes tell 
us done. understand him, holds done 
Territorial Legislature refusing make enactments 
protection slavery Territory, especially adopting 
unfriendly legislation it. sake clearness, state again: 
exclude slavery Territory, withholding 
assumes indispensable assistance way 
and, unfriendly legislation. rightly understand 
him, wish ask attention position. 
 
first place, Supreme Court United States decided 
Congressional prohibition slavery Territories 
reached proposition conclusion 
former proposition, Constitution United 
States expressly recognizes property slaves, 
Constitutional provision, person shall deprived property 
without due process law. Hence reach conclusion 
Constitution United States expressly recognizes property slaves, 
person deprived property without due 
process law, pass Act Congress man owned 
slave one side line would deprived took 
side, property without due process law. 
understand decision Supreme Court. understand 
also Judge Douglas adheres firmly decision; 
difficulty is, possible power exclude slavery 
Territory, unless violation decision? 
difficulty. 
 
Senate United States, 1850, Judge Trumbull, speech 
substantially, directly, put interrogatory Judge 
Douglas, whether people Territory lawful power 
exclude slavery prior formation constitution. Judge Douglas 
answered considerable length, answer found 
Congressional Globe, date June 1856. Judge said 
whether people could exclude slavery prior formation 
constitution question decided Supreme Court. 
put proposition, seen Congressional Globe, 
variety forms, running thing 
question Supreme Court. maintain says, 
Supreme Court decided question, people may yet exclude 
slavery means whatever, virtually say 
question Supreme Court. ground. appeal 
whether say question Supreme 
Supreme Court decided question? says people may 
exclude slavery, make question people? 
virtually shift ground say question 
Court, people? simple 
plain naked one. seems difficulty 
deciding it. variety ways said question 
Supreme Court. stop tell us that, whatever 
Supreme Court people withholding necessary 
keep slavery out. make answer submit 
whether new state case induced Judge 
sheer away original ground. Would impression 
every man? 
 
hold proposition slavery cannot enter new country 
without police regulations historically false. true all. 
hold history country shows institution 
slavery originally planted upon continent without 
Judge thinks necessary actual 
establishment it. so, another came 
Dred Scott decision made upon case negro 
taken actually held slavery Minnesota Territory, claiming 
freedom Act Congress prohibited held 
there. Judge pretend Dred Scott held without 
police least one matter record 
held slavery Territory, without police 
regulations, teeth Congressional legislation supposed 
valid time. shows vigor enough slavery 
plant new country even unfriendly legislation. 
takes law, enforcement law keep out. 
history country upon subject. 
 
wish ask one question. understood 
Constitution United States guarantees property slaves 
Territories, right property, 
would United States courts, organized government 
Territory, apply remedy might necessary case? 
maxim held courts wrong without 
courts remedy whatever acknowledged treated 
wrong. 
 
Again: ask you, friends, elected members 
Legislature, would first thing would 
entering upon Swear support Constitution United 
States. Suppose believe, Judge Douglas does, Constitution 
United States guarantees neighbor right hold slaves 
Territory; clear 
oaths unless give legislation necessary enable 
enjoy understand supporting 
Constitution State, United States? give 
constitutional helps rights established Constitution may 
practically you, swear support Constitution, 
believe Constitution establishes right, clear oath, 
without giving support Constitution if, knowing 
believing right established needs specific 
legislation, withhold violate 
disregard oath? conceive nothing world. 
nothing words may run 
refusing support right established 
Constitution. say hold still force 
Judge's doctrine "unfriendly could you, 
sworn support Constitution, believing guaranteed right 
hold slaves Territories, assist legislation intended 
defeat right? would violating view 
Constitution. so, so, long would 
take courts hold votes unconstitutional 
moment. 
 
Lastly, would Congress obligation give 
legislative support right established United 
States Constitution? repeat question: Congress bound 
give legislative support right established 
United States Constitution? member Congress swears support 
Constitution United States: sees right established 
Constitution needs specific legislative protection, 
clear oath without giving Let ask many 
us opposed slavery upon principle give acquiescence 
Fugitive Slave law? hold obligations pass 
law, abide Constitution 
makes provision owners slaves shall right reclaim 
them. gives right reclaim slaves; right is, Judge 
Douglas says, barren right, unless legislation 
enforce it. 
 
mere declaration, "No person held service labor one State 
laws thereof, escaping another, shall consequence 
law regulation therein discharged service labor, 
shall delivered claim party service labor 
may powerless without specific legislation enforce it. Now, 
ground would member Congress, opposed slavery 
abstract, vote Fugitive law, would deem duty do? 
constitutional right needs legislation enforce 
it. although me, sworn support 
Constitution; cannot conceive support 
withhold right necessary legislation make 
practical. true regard Fugitive Slave law, 
right fugitive slaves reclaimed better fixed 
Constitution right hold slaves Territories? 
decision exposition Constitution, Judge Douglas 
one right better other? man who, 
member Congress, would give support one 
other? wished refuse give legislative support slave 
property Territories, member Congress, could it, 
holding view Constitution establishes right. 
all, would deny decision properly 
Constitution. Judge Douglas, 
decision properly Constitution, cannot conceive 
would less man refuse Congress give 
protection property nature needed. 
 
end said propose give Judge fifth 
may take answer fifth 
interrogatory this: 
 
slaveholding citizens United States Territory need 
demand Congressional legislation protection slave 
property Territory, would you, member Congress, vote 

 
DOUGLAS: repeat that? want answer 
 
slaveholding citizens United States Territory need 
demand Congressional legislation protection slave 
property Territory, would you, member Congress, vote 

 
aware speeches Judge Douglas made, 
spoken know think Supreme Court decided 
Territorial Legislature cannot exclude slavery. Precisely 
Judge would say upon would say definitely 
understand decided, whether would say 
understand court know; know 
speech Springfield spoke thing 
decided answer Freeport, spoke it, far, 
again, comprehend it, thing yet 
Now, hold Judge entertain view, think 
mistaken far said court 
decided anything save mere question know legal 
arguments court decided cannot 
take jurisdiction case, decided it, 
end it. plausible argument made favor 
know Judge Douglas said one 
speeches court went forward, like honest men were, 
decided points case. points really 
decided, necessarily them, 
one power Territorial Legislature, exclude slavery 
one them, also one Missouri Compromise 
neither is, according 
court held jurisdiction case parties, 
want capacity one party maintain suit court. 
want, sufficient time, show court pass 
thing actually done case. 
decide, showed ready decide whenever matter 
them. argued Congress 
power pass law excluding slavery United States 
Territory, used language inasmuch 
Congress could exercise power, followed matter 
course could authorize Territorial government exercise 
it; Territorial Legislature Congress could 
do. Thus expressed opinion emphatically power 
Territorial Legislature exclude slavery, leaving us little 
doubt point upon point really 
 
Now, fellow-citizens, detain little 
time nearly out. find report speech made Judge Douglas 
since last met believe, 
Missouri Republican, 9th month, Judge Douglas 
says: 
 
"You know Ottawa read platform, asked concurred 
principles set forth it. would answer 
questions. last said wish answer them, 
get color principles little 
Egypt, intend notice 
going take Egypt made knees 
carried platform. laid seven days, 
meantime held consultation political 
Lovejoy leaders Abolition party, 
over, last Lincoln came conclusion 
would answer, came Freeport last 
 
Now, statement altogether furnishes subject philosophical 
treating way, really come 
conclusion explain way believing 
Judge right mind cannot conceive 
would risked four five thousand friends 
stood knew, carried platform, 
word truth it. 
 
DOUGLAS: n't carry 
 
question character man Douglas exactly. 
now, says, "Did n't carry said 
"he carried said convince country 
completely broken speech carried 
away. seeks it, "Did n't carry 
Yes, did. But, Judge Douglas, didn't tell would 
like know n't tell truth it. "He 
laid seven put print people country 
read serious document. think sober 
would risked presence thousands 
friends knew made speeches within six seven days 
Henry, County, County, 
County, including necessary travel meet Freeport 
end six days. say way look 
statement, except conclude actually 
another thing statement alarmed greatly states 
it, going Thereby would 
infer would come Egypt unless forced 
could got unless he, here. 
statement makes, too, teeth knowledge made 
stipulation come 
enter this: Judge Douglas, 
made statement, must wholly sober 
else would known got here, 
powers me, would n't 
amount anything. Now, little look like carried away 
Let Judge go on; done 
want all, can't go home myself, let stay here; 
anything happens Judge, cannot carry hotel 
put bed, let stay say, then, something 
extraordinary statement. ask know living 
man would make ask friend 
there, would Would send 
men take Judge talk Egypt 
Why, know people better does. 
raised little east here. part people. 
Judge raised farther north, perhaps idea 
people might induced do. really talked 
matter perhaps longer great thing; yet 
smallest often difficult things deal with. Judge 
set seriously trying make impression meet 
different places literally poor, 
nothing all. one 
ways taken create impression. don't know 
way meet except this. don't want quarrel call 
come square don't know else call 
must tell truth out. want peace, reserve 
fighting powers necessary occasions. time nearly 
out, give trifle left Judge, let set 
knees trembling again, can. set knees trembling again, can. 
 
 
 
 
English 
 
LINCOLN'S ADDRESSES LETTERS 
 

 
 
 
 
EDITED 
 
INTRODUCTORY NOTES 
 
 

 
DANIEL 
 
 
 
ENGLISH LANGUAGE LITERATURE 
 
UNIVERSITY ILLINOIS 
 
 
 
 
GREEN, CO. 
 
FOURTH AVENUE & 30TH STREET, NEW YORK 
 
AVENUE & 25TH STREET, CHICAGO 
 
 
 
 

 

 
GREEN CO. 
 
 
 
 
 
FIRST JULY, 
 
JUNE, MAY, MARCH, 
 
 
 
 
CONTENTS 
 
INTRODUCTION 
 
NOTE 
 

 
LETTERS 
 
  Address People Sangamon County, March 9, 1832 
  Perpetuation Political Institutions, January 27, 1837 
  Speech Springfield, Illinois, June 16, 1858 
  Second Joint Debate Freeport, August 27, 1858 
  Cooper Institute Address, Monday, February 27, 1860 
  Farewell Address Springfield, Illinois, February 12, 1861 
  Farewell Address Springfield, Illinois, February 11, 1861 
  Address Independence Hall, Philadelphia, February 22, 1861 
  First Inaugural Address, March 4, 1861 
  Response Serenade, March 4, 1861 
  Letter Colonel May 25, 1861 
  Letter Horace Greeley, August 22, 1862 
  Extract Second Annual Message Congress, December 1, 1862 
  Emancipation Proclamation, January 1, 1863 
  Thanksgiving Proclamation, July 15, 1863 
  Letter J. C. August 26, 1863 
  Gettysburg Address, November 19, 1863 
  Letter Mrs. November 21, 1864 
  Second Inaugural Address, March 4, 1865 
  Last Public Address, April 11, 1865 
 
  December 20, 1859 
 
NOTES 
 
 
 
 
INTRODUCTION 
 
facts Lincoln's early life best stated words, 
communicated Mr. J. W. Fell, Bloomington, 
Illinois.  Unlike many men risen humble 
Lincoln never wonderful struggle  
nature room false pride Mr. even though 
facts warranted claim.  Indeed, seldom mentioned early 
life all.  one occasion referred "the short 
simple  Lincoln way base 
claims public recognition upon fact born 
log split rails youth, 
hand, ashamed facts.  More, perhaps, 
man time believed actions realized truth 
saying, "The man's that."  real 
drawn Lincoln's life conditions real 
success won intelligent, effort, degree 
success determined ability character 
 Still less profitable attempt contrast 
success Lincoln Washington, Jefferson 
American whose early circumstances favorable 
 case success 
Americans present generation rejoice country 
produced many great men.  True patriotism consist 
recognition one type rather grateful 
acceptance every service advances 
reputation republic.  Peculiar interest 
character Lincoln's early reading especially small number 
books accessible him.  days cheap 
literature hard us realize conditions 
Kentucky Indiana, half dozen volumes formed 
family library even newspapers far  
room mental precious volumes could 
obtained read contents fully 
 Sir Henry asked prepare list 
hundred best books replied, "Before hundred books, commend 
reading two, Bible  Fortunately two 
came early age within reach Lincoln 
quotes periods career, 
writings conversation, shows made 
good use them.  boy Lincoln read books, made 
extracts them, often using absence 
paper upon uncertain light log fire 
father's  use books makes intellectual 
much Lincoln's later success writer referred back 
careful method reading. 
 
Lincoln's later reading shows considerable variety within certain 
limits.  remarked liked "little sad 
special class 
"The Lament Irish "The Last 
Charles "The  poem frequently 
quoted seems impressed was, "Oh, 
Spirit Mortal  marked tendency 
reflected face, seemed respond appeals 
sort.  Among favorite besides Shakespeare 
 Many personal 
picked corner newspapers, 
way became acquainted  Lincoln 
especially fond humorous taste 
closely connected funny 
favorite humorous writer presidential period 
V. P. whose letters frequently 
read less sympathetic  eminently 
characteristic Lincoln presentation Cabinet 
Emancipation Proclamation reading latest 
letter. 
 
Lincoln's statement picked 
little advance made upon early education, rather lack 
education, altogether  known term 
Congress studied mastered and, like Washington, 
early became successful  study law, too, 
skill debate, 
result careful  
presidential period Lincoln gave evidence critical ability 
little short marvellous man whose amounted less 
year.  letter several 
passages 
plays sympathy rarely surpassed even 
eminent literary 
 
early age Lincoln's interest aroused public speaking 
soon began exercise direction attend 
meetings addressed art  Many 
stories told local reputation speaker 
even moved Illinois, much success later 
life due singular charm personality.  Lincoln never 
certain almost appearance, 
never acquired rival Douglas 
 spite physical difficulties 
acknowledged Douglas man feared 
Lincoln able audience 
assembled Cooper Union readily gathered 
Illinois 
 
subject Lincoln's religious belief, varying 
opinions held, sufficient state that, although 
member religious body, firm conviction 
protecting power Providence special 
latter characteristic seems especially developed 
presidential period.  proclamations many 
private communications expresses clearly 
emphatically upon subject.  probable, too, Lincoln read 
deeply frequently Bible storm 
Civil War period life.  
seems authority statement sometimes made 
death son Lincoln showed tendency believe 
doctrines  free, however, belief 
significance dreams important events.  
also little stated 
friend 
 
Perhaps striking characteristic Lincoln's apart 
sincerity perfect simplicity 
 A. great leader colored 
race, remarked President Lincoln white man 
ever met never suggested manner sense 
 Lincoln lacking personal dignity. 
Neither lawyer President United States, 
would permit anyone take regarded liberties him. 
But, hand, allow elevated position 
change personal  old Illinois friends found 
White House cordial welcome simple 
accustomed pleasant home Springfield. 
 
first weeks administration believed 
many persons, including Mr. Seward himself, President Lincoln 
would greatly influenced policy superior experience 
public affairs Secretary State.  Mr. Seward even went far 
draw plan action, submitted chief. 
Lincoln soon however, leader 
men, beneath whose good nature kindly spirit power 
rarely among statesmen 
world.  Even dictatorial Secretary War found necessary 
yield President points latter regarded 
 presidents bitterly attacked 
Lincoln, nothing could turn 
purpose formed.  Like wise man was, 
Lincoln always ready listen suggestions others, 
conclusion finally reached always own.  applied 
questions state methods careful, impartial inquiry 
served well lawyer Illinois 
if, always avoid committing never 
acted impulse  Lincoln strong 
time wise 
 
 
Turning man works, note first 
development Lincoln's style  One might almost tempted 
say Lincoln developed several different styles 
This, however, hardly true, spite numerous marked 
changes improvements Lincoln's manner writing, certain 
fundamental qualities remained, real expression 
is, real style Lincoln.  beginning end 
find effort say something say clear manner 
possible, effort without real success 
writing.  practice public speaking thirty years 
Lincoln President could still say: "I believe shall never old 
enough speak without embarrassment nothing talk 

 
first specimen Lincoln's writings preserved 
communication voters Sangamon County Lincoln 
first time candidate State legislature.  
significant Lincoln's command English time 
"some corrected friend 
circular issued.  Although circumstance makes impossible 
us judge exactly style period, may 
sure changes comparatively slight general 
form least  question naturally arises whether 
anything first specimen Lincoln's writing 
however Gettysburg Address Second 
 little study discover suggestions least 
later manner, awkward young candidate 
Illinois State Legislature, note many intellectual 
moral, distinguish mature statesman 
thirty years later.  man, developed 
style, strengthened  
Nicolay Hay go far say "This 
almost precisely style later would quite 
wrong deny two.  first place, 
severely logical treatment subject matter, 
Lincoln, lawyer public speaker, never  Lincoln's 
may time, thinking 
powers already little short  This, then, first 
element Lincoln's style, ability think straight 
consequently write  legal 
cannot account logical 
correct say later became successful lawyer 
logical bent mind. 
 
Closely connected early development form thinking 
Lincoln's interest words, desire always use words 
perfect understanding meaning.  Even 
found pleasure exact meaning new word 
later life constantly adding verbal  Shortly 
inauguration Lincoln remarked asked 
acquired remarkable power "I 
say this, among earliest remember how, 
mere child, used get anybody talked 
way could understand.  don't think ever got angry anything 
else life.  always disturbed temper, ever 
since.  remember going little hearing 
neighbors talk evening father, small part 
night walking down, trying make exact 
meaning me, dark 
 
first address find loose use words.  character 
address course admit 
language, subject, however simple, admits 
mental  
 Even informal letters 
written post haste times extreme pressure 
business anxiety, Lincoln shows natural feeling 
appropriate expression found masters language. 
 
Five years later, interval represented 
unimportant letters, Lincoln entered upon period distinguished 
qualities usually associated name, tendency 
fine writing look earlier age 
 subject address "The Perpetuation 
Political complete text given 
Lincoln speaks 
Washington.  influence Webster apparent, first purely 
attempt  could hardly otherwise 
time great Whig orator making whole country ring 
wonderful speeches.  almost certain, too, Henry 
Clay, Lincoln later referred 
part early manner, though probably less 
apparent later 
 
must supposed speech consists merely 
would call words,  Neither figures 
inferior  Although anything 
later period, following description passing away 
Revolution fine example 
"They forest giant 
swept them, left lonely 
shorn murmur 
sink more."  closing 
sentence address almost later style might 
served close First Inaugural, which, 
original form, actually contain 
 
manner gained entire possession Lincoln 
time, simply used seemed 
appropriate occasions, sufficiently shown speech delivered 
legislature early find strictly logical 
discussion first address.  speech especially interesting 
fact earliest encounter Lincoln 
Douglas  way, therefore, may 
regarded first Lincoln-Douglas debate. 
 
One effort made, find 
specimens class speaking so-called Lost Speech 
1856.  address delivered Springfield 
Temperance Society, 
even first  Combined 
however, mass sober argument 
suggests later Lincoln.  too, characterized 
sound common sense less characteristic  
deserves quotation one finest 
time one least familiar passages Lincoln's 
"This one hundredth tenth anniversary birthday 
Washington.  met day.  Washington 
mightiest name long since mightiest cause civil 
liberty, still mightiest moral  name eulogy 
expected.  cannot be.  add sun glory 
name Washington alike impossible.  Let none attempt it.  
solemn pronounce name, 
leave shining on."  approaches closely beauty 
strength presidential period. 
 
Lincoln wrote several without  
boy famous among skill writing 
humorous later specimens serious, 
even melancholy tone. 
 
next come congressional period, 1849.  
speech period, Lincoln's introduction 
national public, July 27, General Taylor 
Taylor Whig candidate presidency.  
speech, received immense owes special 
prominence fact purely humorous speech 
Lincoln  subject attack General 
Cass, Taylor's Democratic Lincoln treats manner 
somewhat suggests later treatment Lincoln 
 peculiar interest, since consists 
funny story. 
 
anyone familiar Lincoln's habit 
introduction story end speech may seem 
But, matter fact, case kind 
careful reading speeches shows either 
fully reported rule confined 
conversation.  Even debates Douglas, 
addressing Illinois stump time stories 
even popular now, Lincoln seldom used 
interest strengthen argument.  partial 
explanation curious contrast conversation 
writing, far debates concerned, may found remark 
made Lincoln friend urged treat subject 
 Lincoln "The occasion serious, issues 
grave.  seek amuse people, 
convince them."  Lincoln desire prove proposition, 
whatever might be, always  earliest speeches 
noted severe logic strict adherence subject 
hand.  end Lincoln never changed principle public 
speaking. 
 
Although then, little direct bearing upon 
Lincoln's characteristic feature man 
cannot wholly disregarded.  two cases already noted 
stories appears true 
Lincoln's whether occur conversation 
 apparently never dragged stories sake, 
many habit doing, 
story suggested served illustrate incident 
principle.  Indeed, illustration Lincoln never 
 said him: "I sure man ruled 
period less facility would become 
years, like one Seven Wise 
Masters,  Many anecdotes attributed 
Lincoln undoubtedly referred sources, 
number stories especially presidency, 
large. 
 
question often raised whether Lincoln originated 
stories told well.  Fortunately words 
matter.  Brooks said: "I generally remember good story 
hear it, never invent anything  
 Slightly differing this, though probably 
it, Lincoln's statement Mr. M. "I 
originated two stories life, tell tolerably well 
people's 
 
Civil War Lincoln's stories served special purpose 
sort safety  
apparent funny stories serious 
discussion, said: "If stories 
addresses presidential period, however, exception 
entirely without humorous 
 Although Lincoln never hesitated clear discussion 
momentous questions medium funny story, 
sense official literary propriety made 
informal occasions. 
 
Eulogy Henry Clay 1852 interest 
address kind Lincoln ever delivered.  might perhaps 
better called sincerity deep 
sympathy may regarded model kind.  Two years later 
Lincoln engaged first real debate Douglas burning 
question day, repeal Missouri Compromise.  
purely literary point view Peoria Speech superior 
debates four years later.  finish 
two far 
 One striking features comparatively large 
number Bible 
Although rule Lincoln quotes one speech contains 
fewer twelve seven Bible. 
speech equals one number quotations 
so-called Lost Speech 1856, 
doubtful.  much shorter Second Inaugural, however, 
four Bible larger number.  Lincoln's 
quotations seem suggested rather 
indicated fact speeches contain 
greatest number  first Inaugural, example, 
main sober statement principles, intended quiet 
rather excite passion, four times long 
Second Inaugural, contains one quotation four 
other.  may note connection almost exactly one-half 
total number quotations occurring Lincoln's writings 
taken Bible, large proportion 
quotations  Lincoln also fond using 
habit character popular 
national  local many 
 Quotations class occur 
periods life, beginning first address, 
sometimes used unexpected places official telegrams 
officers field.  Strange say, maxim 
frequently associated Lincoln's name cannot certainty 
regarded used him, either quotation 
original saying, "You fool people time, 
people time, cannot fool people 
time." 
 
first regular Republican State Convention Illinois, held 
Bloomington, May 29, 1856, Lincoln delivered address public 
issues day roused enthusiasm 
degree reporters forgot take notes therefore failed 
furnish text respective  course time 
came known Lost Speech, such, opinion 
many present occasion, continued be.  Mr. W. C. 
Whitney, young lawyer neighboring town later 
prepared based upon notes, general idea 
character speech perhaps gained. 
 
Lincoln-Douglas Debates furnish perhaps best example 
class public speaking  Although 
far actual language concerned, 
preserved full.  spite informal style appropriate 
discussions Dred Scott decision, Popular 
Sovereignty, questions suggested slavery marked 
reasoning readiness show great 
master difficult art debate.  qualities 
confined one speaker, less 
ready.  may well say "there 

 
Much Lincoln's success historic debates due 
intense conviction cause 
 lawyer political speaker Lincoln always felt 
necessity believing case.  frequently refused appear 
suits could put heart them, never 
defended policy mere party  Much Lincoln's success 
speaker due fact felt could 
trust him.  simply new application old principle 
chief qualification success character.  
reading man's books may forget character time, 
listening orator man constantly us, 
makes success. 
 
1859 Lincoln delivered second last long occasional 
discussion agriculture Wisconsin State Fair 
 important speech Lincoln 
preserved interesting showing ability 
treat subject general interest.  Here, discussions 
political questions, Lincoln displayed true 
long time experiment 
began teach principles wisely 

 
1860 Lincoln appeared first time New York audience 
word suffered severe attack 
stage occasion.  event however, 
reason fear judgment one critical audiences 
ever assembled Cooper Union.  Hon. Joseph H. 
present, writes "When spoke 
eye voice face shone seemed 
light whole  hour half held 
audience hollow  address may regarded 
worthy First Inaugural, many 
competent critics given first place among 
discussions political situation war.  
performance could hesitation part 
heard acknowledging Abraham Lincoln one powerful 
speakers day.  returning Illinois Lincoln 
several New England States, making speeches number 
larger 
 
speeches delivered Lincoln journey Washington, 
1860, beginning exquisite Farewell Address Springfield, 
include best shorter  
interesting one delivered Independence Hall. 
 
First Inaugural Address received time first 
publication newspapers, even North, general 
enthusiasm inclined South 
severely alleged lack force 
 effect, however, upon immense audience gathered 
front seems  document 
written great care Springfield, changes made 
arrival Washington.  important 
original closing paragraph beautiful 
suggested Secretary Seward.  beauty language 
elevation thought first public utterance President Lincoln 
may compared great political 
 
First among little world stands Gettysburg 
Address.  time delivery seem 
generally accepted notable  many newspaper 
referred 
papers contained comment upon it.  others 
dismissed words  Even death 
Lincoln general agreement supreme merits 
part national  Conflicting stories still pass 
current books articles Lincoln 
original reception.  examination testimony shows 
following facts may accepted fairly  greater part 
address written Washington careful 
profound reflection.  address read 
apparently occurred speaker time 
 Mr. President's hand 
expressed exchange hundred pages twenty 
lines read.  uncertain whether Lincoln said time 
address use expression 
consciousness failed make adequate 
preparation occasion. 
 
One best Second Inaugural Address appeared 
article London "We cannot read without 
renewed conviction noblest political document known 
history, nation statesmen left 
behind something sacred almost  Carl 
compared sacred poem, discriminating readers 
agree placing side Gettysburg Address almost 
perfect specimen pure English 
 
addresses presidential period are, exception 
last speech, reconstruction Louisiana, minor 
importance.  consist main form 
address Lincoln cordially rule 
achieved moderate degree success.  cares great 
office made cruel demands upon time strength 
declined many requests speak public, whenever appear 
confined remarks within smallest possible limits. 
Furthermore, Lincoln reader speaker rarely 
justice without careful  Lincoln failed 
note severe upon Lincoln's remarks 
appeared opposition press English  Even 
late 1863 newspaper opposed hesitate 
refer President's public speaking. 
 
Messages Congress distinguished documents 
class frequent purple  dry 
facts furnished various departments add elevation 
breadth thought first order. 
 
class various 
purely formal character, announcing others 
distinctly literary character, like 
 two classes important all, 
Emancipation Proclamation January 1, 1863, which, 
exception concluding sentence, entirely free 
Perhaps Lincoln felt here, occasion 
serious, even attempting mere 
language. 
 
Finally, mention made letters telegrams written 
President Lincoln.  Although many letters preserved 
earlier times, none make special claims attention outside 
information  last four years 
life Lincoln wrote beautiful letters ever 
 One these, letter Mrs. given 
place walls one model noble 
 Conkling letter letter Horace Greeley 
among important statements Lincoln's policy really 
short political 
 
First Inaugural traced Cooper Union Address 
Lincoln-Douglas Peoria Speech, speeches 
1854 seed plain, logical, direct statement 
principles Lincoln's first address public.  development 
Gettysburg Address Second Inaugural, supreme 
expressions Lincoln's feelings, not, traced 
complete speeches, must sought isolated 
left logic moment gave 
passing emotion.  real seed simplicity 
addresses perhaps found speeches 
early period, lacking apparently qualities love 
 writing, many things, 
 effect may seem related 
cause, would fool would deny relation 
them. 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 
 
complete works Abraham Lincoln edited 
John G. Nicolay John Hay Century 
 life Lincoln ten volumes 
standard authority.  also excellent one 
 biographies W. H. Herndon, Lincoln's law 
Miss John 
T. Jr., American Statesmen Series & 

 
Among many Lincoln, James Russell 
Carl address 
noble lines 

 
Lincoln's writings familiar history 
United States, consult standard histories 
explanation events long struggle 
Civil War. 
 
 
 
 
TABLE 
 
 LIFE LINCOLN.        CONTEMPORARY            CONTEMPORARY 
                                      AMERICAN HISTORY. 
 
 Lincoln born,            Madison President. 
   Feb.                
                           born. 
 
                         Douglas born. 
 
 Family moved                              Indiana admitted 
   Indiana.                                     state. 
 
 Mother died.                              Illinois admitted 
                                                   state. 
 
 Father married 
   Johnston. 
 
                                                 Missouri Compromise. 
 
                                                 Missouri admitted 
                                                   state. 
 
                         Grant born. 
 
                                                 Jackson President. 
 
 Family moved      Douglas moved     Speeches 
   Illinois.            New York.            
 
 Settled                                Publication 
   New                                      _The 
 
 Enlisted                           
   Black Hawk War:                                 New England Anti-Slavery 
   unsuccessful                                    Society. 
   candidate 
   legislature 
 
 Postmaster     Douglas moved     
   New       Illinois.            American Anti-Slavery 
                                 Society. 
 
 Elected    Douglas admitted 
   legislature.            
 
                         Douglas elected 
                           
 
 1836. Reelected      1836. Douglas elected 
   legislature.        legislature. 
   Presidential 
 
 1837. Admitted       1837. Douglas           1837. Van Buren 
    Moved         appointed     President.  Murder 
   Springfield.         Land Office;     
                           nominated 
                           Congress. 
 
 Reelected 
   legislature. 
 
 1840. Presidential      1840. Douglas 
                  appointed Judge 
                           Illinois 
                           Supreme Court. 
 
                                                 Harrison 
                                                   President.  Tyler 
                                                   President. 
 
 1843. Married 
   Mary 
 
  Presidential      Douglas elected 
                   Congress. 
 
                                                 Polk President. 
                                                   Texas admitted 
                                                   state. 
 
 1846. Elected                                War Mexico. 
   Congress. 
 
                          Douglas elected 
                            U.S. moved 
                            Chicago. 
 
 1848. Presidential 
   
 
                                                 1849. Taylor President. 
 
                          1850. Death 
                            
 
                                                 1850. Fillmore President. 
                                                   Clay's Compromise 
                                                   Measure. 
 
                          Death Clay 
                            
 
                          Douglas          Pierce President. 
                            reelected 
 
 1854. Reelected                          1854. Kansas-Nebraska 
   legislature.                                    Bill. 
 
 Resigned 
   legislature.  Candidate 
   U. S. Senate. 
 
 1856. Candidate                             1856. Fremont first 
   nomination                                  Republican candidate 
                                   presidency.  Civil 
                                                   war Kansas. 
 
                                                 1857. Buchanan President. 
                                                   Dred Scott Decision. 
 
 1858. Candidate                             1858. Lincoln-Douglas 
   U. S. Senate.                               
 
                          1859. Douglas          1859. Death John 
                            reelected              Brown. 
                            Senate. 
 
 1860. Cooper Institute   1860. Douglas          1860. South Carolina 
   Address.  Elected        Democratic             Ordinance 
   President.               candidate 
                            Presidency. 
 
 1861. Left Springfield,  1861. Douglas died,    1861. Fall Fort Sumter, 
   Feb. inaugurated     June 3.                April  Battle 
   March 4.                 McClellan              Bull Run, July 
                               Kansas admitted 
                                                   state. 
 
 1862. Preliminary                           1862. Slavery abolished 
   Emancipation                                    District 
   Proclamation, Sept.                         Columbia, April 
 
 1863. Final                                 1863. Battle 
   Emancipation                                    Gettysburg, July 
   Proclamation, 
   Jan. 1.  
   Gettysburg Address, 
   Nov. 
 
 1864. Reelected        1864. Grant           1864. Battles 
   Presidency.           appointed             May 
                             
 
 1865.                              1865. Fall Richmond, 
   4.                           April 3.  Surrender 
   April died April                            Lee, April 9.  Johnson 
   buried                                   sworn President, 
   Springfield, May 4.                             April 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESSES LETTERS 
 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN'S ADDRESSES LETTERS 
 
ADDRESS PEOPLE SANGAMON COUNTY, MARCH 9, 1832 
 
become candidate honorable office 
one representatives next General Assembly state, 
accordance established custom principles true 
becomes duty make known people 
propose sentiments regard local affairs. 
 
Time experience public 
internal improvements.  
countries would greatly opening good 
roads, clearing streams within limits, 
person deny.  yet folly undertake works 
kind, without first knowing able 
finish half finished work generally proves labor lost. 
cannot justly objection railroads 
good things, provided cost nothing.  
objection paying them; objection paying 
arises want ability pay. 
 
respect county Sangamon, easy means 
communication possess, purpose 
task surplus products soil, 
necessary articles abroad, necessary. 
meeting held citizens Jacksonville, 
adjacent country, purpose 
expediency constructing railroad point 
Illinois river, town Jacksonville, Morgan county, 
town Springfield Sangamon county.  is, indeed, 
desirable object.  improvement reason justify us 
hoping for, equal railroad.  never failing 
source communication, places business situated 
other.  Upon railroad regular progress commercial 
intercourse interrupted either high low water, 
principal difficulties render future 
hopes water communication  Yet, however 
desirable object construction railroad country 
may be; however high may heated thoughts 
always heart shock accompanying account 
cost, forces us shrink pleasing 
probable cost contemplated railroad estimated 
bare statement which, opinion, sufficient 
justify belief, improvement Sangamon river 
object much better suited infant resources. 
 
Respecting view, think may say, without fear 
navigation may rendered completely 
practicable, high mouth South probably 
vessels 25 30 least one half 
common years, vessels much greater part 
time.  peculiar circumstances, probable 
last twelve months given particular attention stage 
water river, person country.  
month March, company others, commenced building 
flatboat Sangamon, finished took 
course  Since time, concerned 
New  circumstances sufficient evidence, 
stages time 
crossed last days April, 
water lower since breaking winter 
February, several weeks after.  principal 
difficulties descending river, 
drifted know difficult 
removed.  Knowing almost precisely height water time, 
believe safe saying often higher lower 
since. 
 
view subject, appears 
regard navigation Sangamon, cannot 
whatever may natural certain is, 
never practically useful great extent, without 
greatly improved  drifted 
mentioned, formidable object.  parts 
river, none require much labor make 
last thirty thirty-five going 
distance 
mouth, twelve eighteen miles 
something near straight direction, route upon low 
ground retain water many places 
parts draw two-thirds three-fourths river water 

 
route whole appears 
me, removing sufficient old 
whole river short time would wash way through, 
thereby distance, increasing velocity 
current would upon 
banks navigation nearly 
might head, would apt go clear 
through.  also many places river, 
course, forms complete easier cut 
necks remove 
done, would also lessen distance. 
 
cost work would be, unable say.  
probable, however, would greater common 
streams length.  Finally, believe improvement 
Sangamon river, vastly important highly desirable 
improvement county; elected, measure 
legislature object, may appear 
meet approbation shall receive support. 
 
appears practice money rates 
interest, already opened field 
suppose may enter upon without claiming honor, 
danger, may await first  seems though 
never end system, acting 
almost general interests community 
direct tax several thousand dollars laid county, 
benefit individuals only, unless law made 
setting limit rates  law purpose, 
opinion, may made without injuring class people. 
cases extreme necessity could always means found 
law, cases would intended 
effect.  would favor passage law upon subject 
might easily  Let labor 
difficulty could justified cases greatest 
necessity. 
 
Upon subject education, presuming dictate plan 
system respecting it, say view 
important subject people engaged in.  every 
man may receive least, moderate education, thereby enabled 
read history countries, may 
duly appreciate value free institutions, appears 
object vital importance, even account alone, say nothing 
advantages satisfaction derived able 
read works, religious moral 
nature, themselves.  part, desire see time 
education, means, enterprise 
industry, shall become much general present, 
gratified power contribute something 
advancement measure might tendency 
happy period. 
 
regard existing laws, alterations thought 
necessary.  Many respectable men suggested 
law respecting issuing road law, 
others, present form, require 
 considering great probability framers 
laws wiser myself, prefer 
them, unless first attacked others, case 
feel privilege duty take stand, 
view, might tend advancement justice. 
 
But, fellow-citizens, shall great degree 
always attend youth, probable 
already presuming becomes me.  However, upon 
subjects spoken thought.  may 
wrong regard them; but, holding sound 
better sometimes right, times wrong, 
soon discover opinions erroneous, shall ready 
them. 
 
Every man said peculiar ambition.  Whether true 
not, say, one, great 
truly esteemed fellow men, rendering worthy 
 far shall succeed gratifying ambition, yet 
 young unknown many you.  born 
ever remained humble life.  wealthy 
popular relations recommend me.  case thrown exclusively 
upon independent voters county, elected 
conferred favor upon me, shall 
labors  But, good people wisdom shall 
see fit keep background, familiar 
much 
 
  friend 
            A. LINCOLN. 
 
  NEW SALEM, March 9, 
 
 
 
 
PERPETUATION POLITICAL INSTITUTIONS, JANUARY 27, 1837 
 
great journal things happening sun, we, 
American People, find account running date nineteenth 
century Christian find peaceful 
possession fairest portion earth, regards extent 
territory, soil,  find 
government system political institutions 
essentially ends civil religious liberty 
history former times tells us.  We, 
mounting stage existence, found legal 
fundamental  
establishment us 
brave, lamented race ancestors. 
task (and nobly performed it) possess 
themselves, us, land, 
upon political edifice liberty 
equal rights; 'tis transmit these, former 
foot latter lapse 
time latest generation fate 
shall permit world know.  task gratitude fathers, 
justice ourselves, duty posterity, love species 
general, require us faithfully perform. 
 
How, then, shall perform point shall expect 
approach  means shall fortify it?  Shall 
expect military giant step ocean crush 
us  armies Europe, Africa 
treasure earth 
military chest, commander, could 
force take drink Ohio make track Blue Ridge 
trial thousand years. 
 
point approach danger  answer, 
ever reach us must spring amongst us.  cannot come 
abroad.  destruction must author 
 nation freemen must live time, die 

 
hope not, is, even now, something 
ill amongst us.  mean increasing disregard law 
pervades country; growing disposition substitute wild 
furious passions lieu sober judgment courts; 
worse savage executive ministers justice.  
disposition awfully fearful exists 
ours, though feelings admit, would 
violation truth insult intelligence deny.  Accounts 
outrages committed form news times. 
country New England 
neither peculiar eternal former burning 
creature climate, neither 
confined states. 
Alike spring among masters Southern 
slaves, citizens land steady 
then, cause may be, common whole 
country. 
 
would tedious well useless horrors 
them.  Those, happening State Mississippi St. Louis 
are, perhaps, dangerous example 
Mississippi case first commenced hanging regular 
set men certainly following 
useful honest one which, far 
forbidden laws, actually licensed act 
Legislature passed single year before.  Next negroes suspected 
raise insurrection caught hanged 
parts State; then, white men supposed 
finally, strangers neighboring States, going 
business, were, many instances, subjected fate.  Thus 
went process gamblers negroes, negroes 
white citizens, till dead men seen 
literally trees upon every 
numbers almost sufficient rival native Spanish 
country, 
 
Turn, then, scene St. Louis.  single 
victim there.  story short, 
perhaps highly anything length ever 
witnessed real life.  man name 
seized street, dragged city, chained 
tree, actually burned death; within single hour 
time attending business 
peace world. 
 
effects mob law, scenes becoming 
frequent land lately love law 
order, stories even grown familiar 
anything idle remark. 
 
perhaps ready ask, "What 
perpetuation political  answer, much 
it.  direct consequences are, comparatively speaking, 
small evil, much danger consists proneness 
minds regard direct consequences.  
considered, hanging gamblers Vicksburg little 
consequence.  constitute portion population worse 
useless death, 
example set it, never matter reasonable regret 
one.  swept stage existence 
honest men would perhaps much 
correct reasoning regard 
burning negro St. Louis.  forfeited life 
outrageous murder upon one worthy 
respectable citizens city, died did, 
must died sentence law short time 
afterwards.  alone, well way could 
otherwise been.  example either case  
men take heads to-day hang gamblers burn murderers, 
recollect confusion usually attending 
transactions likely hang burn one 
neither murderer one is, that, acting upon 
example mob to-morrow may, probably will, hang 
burn mistake.  so; 
innocent, ever set faces violations law 
every shape, alike guilty fall victims 
mob law; thus goes on, step step, till walls erected 
defence persons property individuals 
disregarded.  this, even, full extent 
evil.  instances 
acts going lawless spirit encouraged become 
lawless used restraint dread 
thus become absolutely  ever 
regarded government make 
suspension operations, pray nothing much total 
 While, hand, good men, men love 
desire abide laws enjoy benefits, 
would gladly blood defence country, 
seeing property destroyed, families 
lives persons seeing nothing prospect 
change better, become tired 
government offers protection, much 
averse change, imagine nothing lose. 
Thus, then, operation spirit must 
admit abroad land, strongest 
government, particularly constituted like ours, may 
effectually broken mean 
people.  Whenever effect shall produced among us; whenever 
portion population shall permitted gather 
hundreds thousands burn churches, 
throw rivers, shoot 
hang burn obnoxious persons pleasure 
depend it, government cannot last.  things feelings 
best citizens become less it, 
thus left without friends, few, 
weak make friendship  time, 
circumstances, men sufficient talent ambition 
wanting seize strike blow, 
fair fabric last half century hope 
lovers freedom throughout world. 
 
know American People much attached government; 
know would suffer much know would endure 
evils long patiently would ever think 
another.  Yet, notwithstanding this, laws continually 
rights secure persons 
property held better 
government natural 
that, sooner later, must come. 
 
Here, then, one point danger may expected. 
 
question recurs, "How shall fortify it?"  answer 
simple.  Let every American, every liberty, every 
posterity swear blood Revolution never violate 
least particular laws country, never tolerate 
violation others.  patriots seventy-six 
support Declaration Independence, support 
Constitution Laws let every American pledge life, property, 
sacred every man remember violate law 
trample blood father, tear charter 
children's liberty.  Let reverence laws 
breathed every American mother 
let taught schools, 
let written books, let 
preached pulpit, proclaimed legislative 
enforced courts justice.  And, short, let become 
political religion nation; let old young, 
rich poor, grave gay tongues 
colors conditions, sacrifice upon 
 
ever state feeling shall universally even 
generally prevail throughout nation, vain every 
effort, fruitless every attempt, national freedom. 
 
urge strict observance laws, let 
understood saying bad laws, 
may arise redress legal provisions 
made.  mean say thing.  mean say although 
bad laws, exist, repealed soon possible, still 
continue force, sake example 
observed.  also cases.  arise, let 
proper legal provisions made least possible delay, 
but, till then, let them, borne with. 
 
fit object redress mob law.  
case may arise, as, instance, 
one two positions necessarily is, 
thing right within itself, therefore deserves protection 
law good citizens, or, wrong, therefore proper 
prohibited legal neither case 
interposition mob law either necessary, 
 
may asked, suppose danger political 
preserved fifty  may 
fifty times 
 
hope reason.  hope dangers may 
conclude danger may ever arise would 
extremely dangerous.  now, hereafter be, many 
dangerous tendency, existed heretofore, 
insignificant merit attention.  
government maintained original form, 
establishment now, much wondered at.  many 
support period, 
crumbled away.  period felt 
understood successful 
sought fame distinction expected 
find success experiment.  _all_ 
upon it; destiny it.  
ambition admiring world practical 
demonstration truth proposition hitherto 
considered best better _the 
people govern  succeeded 
names transferred 
counties, rivers, revered 
time.  failed, called 
sink 
forgotten.   experiment successful, 
thousands won names making so.  game 
believe true catching end 
pleasures chase.  field glory crop 
already  new arise, 
seek field.  deny history world tells 
us true, suppose men ambition talents 
continue spring amongst us.  And, do, 
naturally seek gratification ruling passion others 
done them.  question is, gratification 
found supporting maintaining edifice erected 
others?  certainly  Many great good men, 
sufficiently qualified task may ever 
found whose ambition would nothing beyond seat Congress, 
presidential belong 
family lion,  think 
places would satisfy  
Towering genius beaten  seeks regions hitherto 
 sees distinction adding story story upon 
fame erected memory others.  
glory enough serve chief.  tread 
footsteps however  
burns possible, it, whether 
expense slaves enslaving  
unreasonable then, expect man possessed 
coupled ambition sufficient push utmost 
time spring among us?  one 
does, require people united other, attached 
government laws, generally intelligent, successfully 

 
Distinction paramount object, and, although would 
perhaps so, acquire good yet, 
opportunity past, nothing left done way 
building up, would set boldly task pulling down. 
 
probable case, highly one 
could well existed heretofore. 
 
Another reason which, extent, 
done much maintaining institutions thus far, 
mean powerful influence interesting scenes 
Revolution upon people distinguished 
judgment.  influence, 
incident nature, common state peace, prosperity, 
conscious strength, time great measure 
rendered principles 
powerful motive instead turned 
other, directed exclusively British nation.  thus, 
force circumstances, principles nature 
either made lie become active agents 
advancement noblest establishing 
maintaining civil religious liberty. 
 
state feeling 
circumstances produced it. 
 
mean say scenes Revolution 
entirely that, like everything else, 
must upon memory world, grow 
lapse time.  history, hope, read of, 
long Bible shall even granting 
will, influence heretofore been. 
Even universally known felt 
generation gone rest.  close 
struggle, nearly every adult male 
 consequence form 
husband, father, son, brother, 
found every history bearing 
limbs wounds 
received, midst scenes history, too, 
could read understood alike all, wise 
learned histories gone.  
read forever.  fortress 
invading could silent artillery time 
walls.  gone.  
forest giant swept 
them, left lonely 
shorn murmur 
gentle combat limbs 
sink more. 
 
temple liberty; 
crumbled away temple must fall unless we, 
supply places solid 
sober reason.  Passion helped us, more.  
future enemy.  
furnish materials future support 
 Let materials moulded intelligence, 
sound and, particular, _a reverence Constitution 
improved last, remained free 
last, revered name last, long 
sleep permitted hostile foot pass 
shall learn last trump shall 
WASHINGTON. 
 
Upon let proud fabric freedom rest, rock 
basis, and, truly said greater institution, 
gates hell shall prevail 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH, SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, JUNE 16, 1858 
 
Mr. President, Gentlemen could first know 
are, whither tending, could better judge 
do, it.  far fifth year since 
policy initiated avowed object confident promise 
putting end slavery agitation.  operation 
policy, agitation ceased, constantly 
augmented.  opinion, crisis shall 
reached passed.  "A house divided cannot 
stand."  believe government cannot endure permanently half slave 
half free.  expect Union 
expect house expect cease divided. 
become one thing other.  Either opponents 
slavery arrest spread it, place 
public mind shall rest belief course 
ultimate extinction; advocates push forward, till 
shall become alike lawful States, old well 
well South. 
 
tendency latter condition? 
 
Let one doubts carefully contemplate almost complete 
legal machinery, 
Nebraska doctrine Dred Scott decision.  Let consider 
work machinery adapted do, well 
also let study history construction, 
can, rather fail, can, trace evidences design 
concert action among chief beginning. 
 
new year 1854 found slavery excluded half 
States State constitutions, national territory 
Congressional prohibition.  Four days later commenced struggle 
ended repealing Congressional prohibition.  opened 
national territory slavery, first point gained. 
 
But, far, Congress indorsement people, 
real apparent, save point already 
give chance more. 
 
necessity provided for, 
well might be, notable argument "squatter sovereignty," 
otherwise called "sacred right latter 
phrase, though expressive rightful basis government, 
attempted use amount this: 
man choose enslave man shall 
allowed object.  argument incorporated Nebraska 
bill itself, language follows: "It true intent 
meaning act legislate slavery Territory 
State, exclude leave people thereof 
perfectly free form regulate domestic institutions 
way, subject Constitution United States." 
opened loose favor "Squatter 
Sovereignty" "sacred right self-government."  "But," said 
opposition members, "let us amend bill expressly declare 
people Territory may exclude slavery."  "Not said 
friends voted amendment. 
 
Nebraska bill passing Congress, 
involving question negro's freedom, reason owner 
voluntarily taken first free State 
Territory covered Congressional prohibition, held 
slave long time each, passing United States 
Circuit Court District Missouri; Nebraska bill 
brought decision month May, 1854.  
negro's name name decision 
finally made case.  next presidential election, 
law case came argued Supreme Court United 
States; decision election. 
Still, election, Senator Trumbull, floor 
Senate, requested leading advocate Nebraska bill state 
whether people Territory constitutionally 
exclude slavery limits; latter "That 
question Supreme Court." 
 
election came.  Mr. Buchanan elected, indorsement, 
was,  second point gained.  
indorsement, however, fell short clear popular majority nearly 
four hundred thousand votes, so, perhaps, 
reliable satisfactory.  President, last annual 
message, possible echoed back upon people 
weight authority  Supreme Court met 
announce decision, ordered  
presidential inauguration came, still decision court; 
incoming President inaugural address fervently 
people abide decision, whatever might be. 
Then, days, came decision. 
 
author Nebraska bill finds early occasion make 
speech capital Dred Scott decision, 
denouncing opposition it.  new President, too, 
seizes early occasion letter indorse 
strongly construe decision, express astonishment 
different view ever 
 
length squabble springs President author 
Nebraska bill, mere question whether 
Lecompton Constitution not, sense, made 
people Kansas; quarrel latter declares 
wants fair vote people, cares whether 
slavery voted voted  understand 
declaration cares whether slavery voted voted 
intended apt definition policy 
would impress upon public principle declares 
suffered much, ready suffer end.  well 
may cling principle.  feeling, well 
may cling it.  principle left 
original Nebraska doctrine.  Dred Scott decision "squatter 
sovereignty" squatted existence, like temporary 
mould served one 
fell back loose carry election, 
kicked  late joint struggle Republicans 
Lecompton Constitution involves nothing original 
Nebraska doctrine.  struggle made right 
people make 
Republicans never differed. 
 
several points Dred Scott decision, connection 
Senator Douglas's "care policy, constitute piece machinery 
present state  third point gained. 
working points machinery 
 
(1) negro slave, imported Africa, 
slave, ever citizen State, 
sense term used Constitution United States. 
point made order deprive negro, every possible 
event, benefit provision United States 
Constitution declares "the citizens State shall 
entitled privileges immunities citizens 
several States." 
 
(2) That, "subject Constitution United States," neither 
Congress Territorial Legislature exclude slavery 
United States Territory.  point made order individual 
men may fill Territories slaves, without danger losing 
property, thus chances 
institution future. 
 
(3) whether holding negro actual slavery free State 
makes free United States courts 
decide, leave decided courts slave State 
negro may forced master.  point made, 
pressed but, acquiesced while, 
apparently indorsed people election, sustain 
logical conclusion Dred Scott's master might lawfully 
Dred Scott, free State Illinois, every master may 
lawfully one, one thousand slaves, Illinois, 
free State. 
 
this, working hand hand it, Nebraska 
doctrine, left it, mould public 
opinion, least Northern public opinion, care whether slavery 
voted voted up.  shows exactly are; 
also, whither 
 
throw additional light latter, go back run 
mind string historical facts already stated.  Several 
things appear less dark mysterious 
 people left "perfectly free," 
"subject Constitution."  Constitution 
could see.  Plainly enough now, 
exactly fitted niche Dred Scott decision afterward come in, 
declare perfect freedom people freedom 
all.  amendment, expressly declaring right 
people, voted  Plainly enough now, adoption would 
niche Dred Scott decision.  court 
decision held  even individual opinion withheld 
till presidential  Plainly enough now, speaking 
would perfectly free argument upon 
election  outgoing President's 
 delay  incoming 
President's advance favor decision?  things 
look like cautious horse 
preparatory mounting him, dreaded may give 
fall.  hasty decision 
President others? 
 
cannot absolutely know exact adaptations 
result  see lot framed 
different portions know gotten different 
times places different Franklin, 
James, see joined together, 
see exactly make frame house mill, 
exactly lengths proportions 
different pieces exactly adapted respective places, 
piece many few, omitting even 
single piece see place frame exactly fitted 
prepared yet bring piece case find 
impossible believe Stephen Franklin Roger James 
understood one another beginning, worked upon 
common plan draft drawn first blow struck. 
 
that, Nebraska bill, people 
well Territory left "perfectly free," "subject 
Constitution."  mention State?  legislating 
Territories, States.  Certainly people 
State ought subject Constitution United 
States; mention merely Territorial 
law?  people Territory people State 
therein together, relation Constitution therein 
treated precisely  opinion court, 
Chief Justice Taney, Dred Scott case, separate 
opinions concurring judges, expressly declare 
Constitution United States neither permits Congress 
Territorial Legislature exclude slavery United States 
Territory, omit declare whether 
Constitution permits State, people State, exclude it. 
mere quite sure, McLean 
Curtis sought get opinion declaration unlimited 
power people State exclude slavery limits, 
Chase Mace sought get declaration, behalf 
people Territory, Nebraska ask, quite 
sure would voted one case 
other?  nearest approach point declaring 
power State slavery made Judge  approaches 
once, using precise idea, almost language too, 
Nebraska act.  one occasion exact language is: 
cases power restrained Constitution United 
States, law State supreme subject slavery 
within  cases power States 
restrained United States Constitution left open question, 
precisely question restraint power 
Territories left open Nebraska act.  Put 
together, another nice little may, ere 
long, see filled another Supreme Court decision declaring 
Constitution United States permit exclude 
slavery limits.  may especially expected 
doctrine "care whether slavery voted voted up" shall 
gain upon public mind sufficiently give promise 
decision maintained made. 
 
decision slavery alike lawful 
States.  decision probably 
coming, soon upon us, unless power present 
political dynasty shall met  shall lie 
pleasantly people Missouri 
making State free, shall reality instead 
Supreme Court made Illinois slave State.  meet 
overthrow power dynasty work 
would prevent consummation.  do.  
best it? 
 
denounce us openly friends, yet 
us softly Senator Douglas instrument 
effect object.  wish us 
fact little quarrel present head 
regularly voted us single point, 
upon never differed.  remind us 
great man, largest us small ones.  Let 
 "a living dog better dead  Judge 
Douglas, dead lion work, least 
one.  oppose advances slavery?  don't 
care anything it.  avowed mission 
care nothing  leading Douglas Democratic 
newspaper thinks Douglas's superior talent needed resist 
revival African  Douglas believe effort 
revive trade  said so.  really 
think so?  is, resist it?  years 
labored prove sacred right white men take negro slaves 
new Territories.  possibly show less 
sacred right buy bought  
unquestionably bought cheaper Africa Virginia. 
done power reduce whole question slavery 
one mere right property; and, such, oppose 
foreign refuse trade 
shall "perfectly protection 
home  home probably ask 
protection, wholly without ground opposition. 
 
Senator Douglas know, man may rightfully wiser 
to-day may rightfully change 
finds wrong.  we, reason, run ahead, infer 
make particular change, given 
 safely base action upon vague 
 Now, ever, wish misrepresent Judge Douglas's 
position, question motives, aught personally 
offensive him.  ever, come together 
principle great cause may assistance great 
ability, hope  
clearly pretend 
promise ever be. 
 
cause, then, must intrusted to, conducted by, 
whose hands free, whose hearts 
work, care result.  Two years ago Republicans 
nation mustered thirteen hundred thousand strong.  
single impulse resistance common danger, every 
external circumstance us.  even 
hostile elements, gathered four formed 
fought battle through, constant hot fire 
proud, enemy.  brave 
enemy 
 result doubtful.  shall 
stand firm,  Wise counsels may 
mistakes delay it, but, sooner later, victory sure come. 
 
 
 
 
SECOND JOINT DEBATE FREEPORT, AUGUST 27, 1858 
 
Ladies Saturday last, Judge Douglas first 
met public discussion.  spoke one hour, hour half, 
replied half hour.  order reversed.  speak 
hour, hour half, reply half 
hour.  propose devote first hour scope 
brought within range speech Ottawa. 
course, brought within scope 
speech something opening speech.  course 
opening argument Judge Douglas proposed seven distinct 
interrogatories.  speech hour half, attended 
parts speech, thought, 
answered one interrogatories then.  distinctly intimated 
would answer rest interrogatories condition 
agree answer many me.  made 
intimation time proposition, reply 
allude suggestion mine.  injustice 
saying occupied least half reply dealing 
though answer interrogatories.  propose 
answer interrogatories, upon condition 
answer questions exceeding number.  give 
opportunity  Judge remains silent.  say 
answer interrogatories, whether answers mine not; 
done so, shall mine him. 
 
supposed myself, since organization Republican party 
Bloomington, May, 1856, bound party man platforms 
party, since.  interrogatories shall 
answer go beyond scope within 
perceived one responsible myself. 
 
said thus much, take Judge's interrogatories 
find printed Chicago answer 
order may mistake it, 
interrogatories writing, also answers them.  first one 
interrogatories words: 
 
Question 1.  "I desire know whether Lincoln today stands 
1854, favor unconditional repeal Fugitive Slave 

 
Answer.  now, ever did, stand favor 
unconditional repeal Fugitive Slave Law. 
 
Q. 2.  "I desire answer whether stands pledged to-day 
1854, admission slave States 
Union, even people want them?" 
 
A.  now, ever did, stand pledged admission 
slave States Union. 
 
Q. 3.  "I want know whether stands pledged admission 
new State Union constitution people 
State may see fit 
 
A.  stand pledged admission new State 
Union constitution people State may see 
fit make. 
 
Q. 4.  "I want know whether stands to-day pledged 
abolition slavery District 
 
A.  stand to-day pledged abolition slavery 
District Columbia. 
 
Q. 5.  "I desire answer whether stands pledged 
prohibition slave-trade different States?" 
 
A.  stand pledged prohibition slave-trade 
different States. 
 
Q. 6.  "I desire know whether stands pledged prohibit slavery 
Territories United States, North well South 
Missouri Compromise 
 
A.  pledged belief 
Congress prohibit slavery United 
States Territories. 
 
Q.  "I desire answer whether opposed acquisition 
new territory unless slavery first prohibited 
 
A.  generally opposed honest acquisition territory; and, 
given case, would would oppose 
accordingly might think acquisition would would 
slavery question among ourselves. 
 
Now, friends, perceived upon examination 
questions answers, far answered 
this, that, other.  Judge framed 
interrogatories ask anything this, answered 
strict accordance interrogatories, answered truly 
upon points 
answered.  disposed hang upon exact form 
 really disposed take least 
questions, state really think upon them. 
 
first one, regard Fugitive Slave law, never 
hesitated say, hesitate say, think, 
Constitution United States, people Southern 
States entitled Congressional Fugitive Slave law.  said 
that, nothing say regard existing Fugitive 
Slave law, think framed 
free objections pertain it, without 
efficiency.  inasmuch 
agitation regard alteration modification law, 
would man introduce new subject agitation upon 
general question slavery. 
 
regard question, whether pledged 
admission slave States Union, state 
frankly would exceedingly sorry ever put position 
pass upon question.  exceedingly glad 
know would never another slave State admitted 
Union; must add, slavery shall kept 
Territories territorial existence one given 
Territory, people shall, fair chance clear 
field, come adopt Constitution, 
extraordinary thing adopt slave Constitution, 
actual presence institution among them, see 
country, admit Union. 
 
third interrogatory answered answer second, 
being, second. 
 
fourth one regard abolition slavery District 
Columbia.  relation that, mind distinctly made 
up.  exceedingly glad see slavery abolished 
District Columbia.  believe Congress possesses 
constitutional power abolish it.  Yet, member Congress, 
not, present views, favor endeavoring 
abolish slavery District Columbia, unless would upon 
First, abolition second, 
vote majority qualified voters 
District; third, compensation made unwilling 
owners.  three conditions, confess would exceedingly 
glad see Congress abolish slavery District Columbia, and, 
language Henry Clay, Capital foul blot 
upon 
 
regard fifth must say 
question abolition slave-trade different 
States, truly answer, have, pledged nothing 
it.  subject given mature 
consideration would make feel authorized state position 
hold entirely bound it.  words, question 
never enough induce investigate 
whether really constitutional power it.  could 
investigate sufficient time bring conclusion 
upon subject, done so, say frankly 
Judge Douglas.  must say, however, 
opinion Congress possess constitutional power abolish 
slave-trade among different States, still 
favor exercise power unless upon conservative 
principle, conceive it, said relation 
abolition slavery District Columbia. 
 
answer whether desire slavery prohibited 
Territories United States full explicit within 
itself, cannot made comments mine.  
suppose regard question whether opposed 
acquisition territory unless slavery first prohibited 
therein, answer could add nothing way 
making better understood, answer 
placed writing. 
 
Judge me, record.  
suppose flattered really entertaining one set 
opinions one place another set another 
afraid say one place uttered another.  saying 
suppose say vast audience strongly tending 
audience State Illinois, believe 
saying which, would offensive persons 
render enemies myself, would offensive persons 

 
proceed Judge interrogatories, far 
framed them.  bring forward new get 
ready.  bring forward now, reaching number 

 
first one is: 
 
Question 1.  people Kansas shall, means entirely 
unobjectionable respects, adopt State Constitution, 
ask admission Union it, requisite 
number inhabitants according English 
vote admit them? 
 
Q. 2.  people United States Territory, lawful way, 
wish citizen United States, exclude slavery 
limits prior formation State Constitution? 
 
Q. 3.  Supreme Court United States shall decide 
States cannot exclude slavery limits, favor 
in, following decision rule 
political 
 
Q. 4.  favor acquiring additional territory, disregard 
acquisition may affect nation slavery question? 
 
introductory interrogatories Judge Douglas propounded 
Ottawa, read set resolutions said Judge 
Trumbull participated first 
Republican State Convention, held Springfield, October, 1854.  
insisted Judge Trumbull, perhaps entire Republican 
party, responsible doctrines contained set 
resolutions read, understand set 
resolutions deduced interrogatories propounded 
me, using resolutions sort authority 
questions me.  say to-day answer 
interrogatories springing set 
resolutions read.  answered Judge Douglas 
thought fit ask them.  now, ever did, recognize 
responsibility upon set resolutions.  replied 
occasion, assured never anything 
them.  repeat to-day, never possible form 
anything set resolutions.  turns out, believe, 
resolutions never passed convention held 
Springfield.  turns never passed 
convention public meeting part in.  believe 
turns out, addition this, not, fall 
1854, convention holding session Springfield calling 
Republican State yet true convention, 
assemblage men calling convention, Springfield, 
pass resolutions.  little really know 
proceedings convention, set resolutions 
passed, though general knowledge 
assemblage men there, Judge Douglas read resolutions, 
really know resolutions passed 
there.  question resolutions 
adopted.  could bring suppose Judge Douglas 
could say upon subject without 
true.  contented myself, occasion, truly 
could, connection them, denying whether 
passed Springfield.  turns got hold 
resolutions passed convention public meeting Kane 
County.  wish say here, don't conceive fair 
mind discovery relieves all.  much 
convention Kane County Springfield.  
much responsible resolutions Kane County 
Springfield, amount responsibility exactly nothing 
either case; would regard set 
resolutions passed moon. 
 
allude extraordinary matter canvass 
purpose anything yet advanced.  Judge Douglas make 
statement upon occasion matters believed true, 
stated roundly form pledge 
veracity truth.  whole matter turns 
does, consider Judge Douglas 
distinguished Senator United States; served nearly 
twelve years character limited 
ordinary Senator United States, name become 
far 
forget suggestions justice prudence 
himself, venture upon assertion 
slightest investigation would shown wholly false.  
account done upon supposition evil 
genius attended life, giving 
apparent astonishing prosperity, lead many good men 
doubt advantage virtue say 
account supposition evil genius last 
made mind him. 
 
may add another extraordinary feature Judge's conduct 
extraordinary 
habit, almost speeches makes, charging 
falsehood upon adversaries, others.  ask whether 
able find anything Judge Trumbull, instance, 
said, anything said, justification compared 
have, instance, sort 
 
habit charging matter belief part, 
that, introduction Nebraska bill Congress, 
conspiracy make slavery perpetual national.  arranged 
time time evidence establishes proves truth 
charge.  charge Ottawa.  shall 
time dwell upon great length; but, inasmuch Judge 
Douglas reply half hour made points upon 
relation it, propose noticing them. 
 
Judge insists that, first speech made, 
distinctly made charge, thought good 
sincere 
grew angry somewhat excited found insisted upon 
matter earnestness.  says characterized 
falsehood far implicated 
 Well, know, till presented view, 
implicated moral character.  much habit, 
argues position never thought 
saying doubt Lincoln "conscientious" saying so. 
remember know _he_ ALTOGETHER 
"CONSCIENTIOUS" matter.  conceive possible men 
good thing, really find nothing Judge 
Douglas's course arguments contrary inconsistent 
belief conspiracy nationalize spread slavery 
good blessed thing, hope understand 
question matter entirely 

 
draw attention one points made case, 
beginning beginning.  Nebraska bill introduced, 
short time afterward, amendment, believe, provided 
must considered "the true intent meaning act 
legislate slavery State Territory, exclude 
therefrom, leave people thereof perfectly free form 
regulate domestic institutions way subject 
Constitution United States."  called attention 
fact others began arguing 
giving increased degree liberty people Territories 
formerly question slavery, 
question raised whether law enacted give 
unconditional liberty people; test sincerity 
mode argument, Mr. Chase, Ohio, introduced amendment, 
made amendment declare 
people Territory power exclude slavery 
saw fit.  asked attention also fact Judge 
Douglas, acted him, voted amendment down, 
notwithstanding expressed exactly thing said true 
intent meaning law.  called attention fact 
subsequent times decision Supreme Court made 
declared Territorial Legislature 
constitutional right exclude slavery.  argued said 
men intend people Territory 
right exclude slavery absolutely 
voting Chase's amendment wholly  
 said men look forward 
decision, 
decision Supreme Court would might made, voting 
amendment would perfectly rational  
would keep Congress coming collision decision 
made.  Anybody conceive intention 
expectation decision follow, would 
desirable party attitude get Supreme 
nearly members belonging decide one way, 
party Congress decided way.  Hence would 
rational men expecting decision keep niche 
law clear it.  pointing out, tell Judge Douglas 
looks though reason Chase's amendment 
voted down.  tell it, knows it, 
done reason different this, knows 
reason was, tell us  tell him, also, 
vastly satisfactory country give 
intelligible reason voted stand upon 
dignity call people  Well, Saturday make 
answer, think  says taken upon 
tell whole truth amendment 
explanation would necessary words 
effect.  Now, say quite 
suppressed anything material case, frank admit 
sound reason appeared 
material, quite fair present it.  reason 
 Chase came forward amendment expressly 
authorizing people exclude slavery limits every 
Territory, General Cass proposed Chase, would add 
amendment people power 
exclude, would let go.  substantially reply. 
Chase would voted amendment down. 
Well, turns out, believe, upon examination, General Cass took 
part little running debate upon amendment, 
ran away vote  fact?  
think, General Cass 
somewhere about, chose run away whole thing.  
inference draw fact that, though took part debate, 
name appear ayes  Judge 
Douglas's reply amount satisfactory  [Cries "Yes," 
"Yes," "No,"  little difference opinion 
here.  ask attention views bearing question 
whether amounts satisfactory answer.  men 
determined amendment get bill, 
place Dred Scott decision come in, sought 
excuse get rid  One 
ask Chase add proposed amendment provision 
people might slavery wanted to.  
well knew Chase would Mr. Chase one 
men differing broad principle insisting 
freedom man would consent 
law, penned hand, made recognize 
slavery one hand liberty 
insisted this, well knew 
insisted would moment think doing, 
him.  not, since made 
answer, chance examine journals 
therefore speak believe state 
bill time, according parliamentary 
member could propose additional amendment Chase's amendment.  
rather think Judge shakes head.  well.  
would, like know then, wanted Chase's amendment fixed over, 
somebody else could offered  wanted 
offer  stand 
quibbling  put 
 But, put suppose 
amendment offered Chase's amendment 
one disposed parliamentary law, cannot pile another 
on.  gentlemen vote Chase's on, 
then, amended form whole stood, add 
amendment wanted put  
obliged do, ayes show 
thirty-six voted down, ten voted favor it. 
thirty-six held entire control.  could form 
put bill exact shape wanted.  
rule preventing amending time, could pass 
that, then, Chase's amendment put shape 
wanted.  choose so, went 
Chase get add knew would add, 
would not, stand upon pretext 
voting argued meaning intent 
bill.  left room thereby Dred Scott decision, goes 
far make slavery national throughout United States. 
 
pass one two points time soon 
must allowed say Judge Douglas again, 
upon one two occasions, enormity 
insignificant individual like charging 
conspiracy upon large number members Congress, Supreme 
Court, two nationalize slavery.  want say that, 
first place, made charge sort upon 
 arrayed evidence tending prove it, 
presented understanding others, saying think 
giving means judging whether proves 
not.  precisely done.  placed upon 
all.  occasion, wish recall attention 
piece evidence brought forward Ottawa Saturday, 
showing made substantially 
substantially excluding dear self 
 ask give attention evidence 
brought forward, discovered "fatal blow 
right people exclude slavery 
limits, fatal blow assumed evidence article 
Washington published "by  ask whose 
authority?  discovers similar identical provision 
Lecompton Constitution.  Made  framers 
constitution.  Advocated  members party 
nation advocated introduction Kansas Union 
Lecompton Constitution. 
 
asked attention evidence arrayed prove 
fatal blow facts 
brought forward support identical one 
thinks me.  pointed newspaper 
editor merely, President Cabinet, members 
Congress advocating Lecompton Constitution, framing 
instrument.  must permitted remind him, although 
may great his, yet somewhat 
force calling attention enormity making like 
charge him. 
 
Go on, Judge Douglas. 
 
 
 
 
COOPER INSTITUTE ADDRESS, MONDAY, FEBRUARY 27, 1860 
 
Mr. President Fellow-Citizens New York: facts 
shall deal evening mainly old 
anything new general use shall make them.  shall 
mode presenting facts, 
inferences observations following 
 
speech last Columbus, Ohio, reported New 
York Times, Senator Douglas said: 
 
 
fathers, framed Government live, 
understood question well, even better, now. 
 
 
fully indorse this, adopt text discourse.  
adopt furnishes precise agreed starting point 
discussion Republicans wing Democracy 
headed Senator Douglas.  simply leaves 
 
"What understanding fathers question 

 
frame Government 
 
answer must be, "The Constitution United States."  
Constitution consists original, framed 1787 (and 
present Government first went twelve 
subsequently framed amendments, first ten framed 

 
fathers framed Constitution?  suppose 
"thirty-nine" signed original instrument may fairly called 
fathers framed part present Government.  
almost exactly true say framed it, altogether true 
say fairly represented opinion sentiment whole 
nation time.  names, familiar nearly all, 
accessible quite all, need repeated. 
 
take "thirty-nine," present, "our fathers 
framed Government live." 
 
question which, according text, fathers 
understood "just well, even better, now?" 
 
this: proper division local Federal authority, 
anything Constitution, forbid Federal Government 
control slavery Federal Territories? 
 
Upon this, Senator Douglas holds Republicans 
negative.  affirmation denial form issue; 
precisely text declares fathers 
understood "better 
 
Let us now, inquire whether "thirty-nine," them, ever 
acted upon question; did, acted upon 
expressed better understanding. 
 
1784, three years Constitution, United States 
owning Northwestern Territory, other, Congress 
Confederation question prohibiting slavery 
Territory; four "thirty-nine" afterward framed 
Constitution Congress, voted question.  
these, Roger Sherman, Thomas voted 
prohibition, thus showing that, understanding, line 
dividing local Federal authority, anything else, properly 
forbade Federal Government control slavery Federal 
territory.  
prohibition, showing cause thought improper vote 
it. 
 
1787, still Constitution, Convention 
session framing it, Northwestern Territory still 
territory owned United States, question 
prohibiting slavery Territory came Congress 
three "thirty-nine" afterward 
signed Constitution Congress, voted 
question.  William William Few, Abraham 
voted showing that, 
understanding, line dividing local Federal authority, 
anything else, properly forbade Federal Government control 
slavery Federal territory.  time prohibition became law, 
part well known Ordinance '87. 
 
question Federal control slavery Territories seems 
directly convention framed original 
Constitution; hence recorded "thirty-nine," 
them, engaged instrument, expressed opinion 
precise question. 
 
first Congress sat Constitution, act 
passed enforce Ordinance '87, including prohibition 
slavery Northwestern Territory.  bill act 
reported one "thirty-nine," Thomas member 
House Representatives Pennsylvania.  went 
stages without word opposition, finally passed 
branches without ayes equivalent unanimous 
passage.  Congress sixteen "thirty-nine" 
fathers framed original Constitution.  John Langdon, 
Wm. S. Johnson, Roger Sherman, Robert 
William Few, Abraham King, William 
George Richard George Read, Pierce Butler, 
Daniel James Madison. 
 
shows that, understanding, line dividing local 
Federal authority, anything Constitution, properly forbade 
Congress prohibit slavery Federal territory; else 
fidelity correct principle, oath support 
Constitution, would constrained oppose prohibition. 
 
Again, George Washington, another "thirty-nine," 
President United States, such, approved signed 
bill, thus validity law, thus showing that, 
understanding, line dividing local Federal authority, 
anything Constitution, forbade Federal Government control 
slavery Federal territory. 
 
great adoption original Constitution, North 
Carolina ceded Federal Government country constituting 
State Tennessee; years later Georgia ceded 
constitutes States Mississippi  deeds 
cession made condition States 
Federal Government prohibit slavery ceded country. 
Besides this, slavery actually ceded country.  
circumstances, Congress, taking charge countries, 
absolutely prohibit slavery within them.  interfere 
control there, certain extent.  
Congress organized Territory Mississippi.  act 
organization prohibited bringing slaves Territory 
place without United States, giving freedom 
slaves  act passed branches Congress 
without yeas  Congress three 
"thirty-nine" framed original Constitution.  John 
Langdon, George Read, Abraham  probably voted 
it.  Certainly would placed opposition upon 
record if, understanding, line dividing local Federal 
authority, anything Constitution, properly forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal territory. 
 
Federal Government purchased Louisiana country.  
former territorial came certain States; 
Louisiana country acquired foreign nation.  
Congress gave territorial organization part 
constitutes State Louisiana.  New Orleans, lying within 
part, old comparatively large city.  
considerable towns slavery 
thoroughly people.  Congress not, 
Territorial Act, prohibit slavery; interfere 
control marked extensive way 
case Mississippi.  substance provision therein made 
relation slaves 
 
First.  slave imported Territory 
foreign 
 
Second.  slave carried imported 
United States since first day May, 
 
Third.  slave carried it, except owner, 
use penalty cases 
fine upon law, freedom slave. 
 
act also passed without ayes  Congress 
passed two  Abraham 
 stated case Mississippi, 
probable voted it.  would allowed 
pass without opposition if, 
understanding, violated either line properly dividing local 
Federal authority, provision Constitution. 
 
came passed Missouri question.  Many votes 
taken, yeas branches Congress, upon various 
general question.  Two King 
Charles members Congress.  Mr. King steadily 
voted slavery prohibition Mr. 
steadily voted slavery prohibition 
 this, Mr. King showed that, understanding, 
line dividing local Federal authority, anything 
Constitution, violated Congress prohibiting slavery Federal 
territory; Mr. votes, showed that, 
understanding, sufficient reason opposing 
prohibition case. 
 
cases mentioned acts "thirty-nine," 
them, upon direct issue, able 

 
enumerate persons thus acted four 1784, three 
1787, seventeen three two two 
would thirty them.  would counting 
John Langdon, Roger Sherman, William Few, King, George Read 
twice, Abraham three times.  true number 
"thirty-nine" shown acted upon question 
which, text, understood better we, twenty-three, 
leaving sixteen shown acted upon way. 
 
Here, then, twenty-three "thirty-nine" fathers "who 
framed government live," have, upon 
official responsibility oaths, acted upon 
question text affirms well, even 
better, twenty-one clear majority 
whole acting upon make guilty 
gross political impropriety if, 
understanding, proper division local Federal authority, 
anything Constitution made themselves, sworn 
support, forbade Federal Government control slavery 
Federal Territories.  Thus twenty-one and, actions speak 
louder words, actions responsibility speak still 

 
Two twenty-three voted Congressional prohibition 
slavery Federal Territories, instances 
acted upon question.  reasons voted 
known.  may done thought proper division 
local Federal authority, provision principle 
Constitution, stood way; may, without question, 
voted prohibition appeared 
sufficient grounds expediency.  one sworn support 
Constitution conscientiously vote understands 
unconstitutional measure, however expedient may think it; one 
may ought vote measure deems constitutional 
if, time, deems  It, therefore, would 
set even two voted prohibition 
done because, understanding, proper division 
local Federal authority, anything Constitution, forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal territory. 
 
remaining sixteen "thirty-nine," far 
left record understanding upon direct 
question Federal control slavery Federal Territories.  
much reason believe understanding upon 
question would appeared different 
twenty-three manifested all. 
 
purpose rigidly text, purposely 
omitted whatever understanding may manifested person, 
however thirty-nine fathers framed 
original Constitution; and, reason, also 
omitted whatever understanding may manifested 
"thirty-nine" even phase general question 
slavery.  look acts declarations 
foreign slave-trade, morality policy 
slavery generally, would appear us direct question 
Federal control slavery Federal Territories, 
acted all, would probably acted 
twenty-three did.  Among sixteen several noted 
anti-slavery men Dr. Franklin, Alexander Hamilton, 
one known 
otherwise, unless may John Rutledge, South Carolina. 
 
sum whole "thirty-nine" fathers framed 
original Constitution, clear majority 
understood proper division local 
Federal authority, part Constitution, forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal Territories; 
rest probably understanding.  Such, 
understanding fathers framed 
original Constitution; text affirms understood 
question "better 
 
But, far, considering understanding question 
manifested framers original Constitution.  
original instrument, mode provided amending it; and, 
already stated, present frame "the government 
live" consists original, twelve amendatory articles 
framed adopted since.  insist Federal control 
slavery Federal Territories violates Constitution, point us 
provisions suppose thus and, understand, 
fix upon provisions amendatory articles, 
original instrument.  Supreme Court, Dred Scott case, 
plant upon fifth amendment, provides "no 
person shall deprived life, liberty, property without due 
process Senator Douglas peculiar plant 
upon tenth amendment, providing "the powers 
United States Constitution reserved 
States respectively, 
 
Now, happens amendments framed first 
Congress sat identical Congress 
passed act already mentioned, enforcing prohibition slavery 
Northwestern Territory.  Congress, 
individual men who, session, 
time within session, consideration, 
progress toward constitutional amendments, 
act prohibiting slavery territory nation 
constitutional amendments introduced before, passed after, 
act enforcing Ordinance that, whole 
act enforce constitutional 
amendments also 
 
Congress, consisting seventy-six members, including 
sixteen framers original Constitution, stated, 
fathers framed part "the Government 
live," claimed forbidding Federal 
Government control slavery Federal Territories. 
 
little one day affirm 
two things Congress deliberately carried 
maturity time, absolutely inconsistent other? 
affirmation become absurd coupled 
mouth, 
two things, alleged understood whether really 
inconsistent better affirms 

 
surely safe assume thirty-nine framers 
original Constitution, seventy-six members Congress 
framed amendments thereto, taken together, certainly 
include may fairly called "our fathers framed 
government live."  defy man 
show one ever, whole life, declared that, 
understanding, proper division local Federal authority, 
part Constitution, forbade Federal Government 
control slavery Federal Territories.  go step further. 
defy one show living man, whole world ever 
did, prior beginning present century (and might almost 
say prior beginning last half present 
declare that, understanding, proper division local 
Federal authority, part Constitution, forbade Federal 
Government control slavery Federal Territories.  
declare give "our fathers framed 
Government live," living men 
within century among search, 
shall able find evidence single man agreeing 
them. 
 
Now, let guard little misunderstood.  
mean say bound follow whatever 
fathers did.  would discard lights current 
reject progress, improvement.  say is, 
would opinions policy fathers 
case, upon evidence argument 
clear, even great authority, fairly considered 
cannot surely case whereof 
declare understood question better 
 
man day sincerely believes proper division 
local Federal authority, part Constitution, forbids 
Federal Government control slavery Federal 
Territories, right say so, enforce position 
truthful evidence fair argument can.  right 
others, less access history, less leisure 
study it, false belief "our fathers framed 
Government live" 
substituting falsehood deception truthful evidence fair 
argument.  man day sincerely believes "our fathers 
framed Government live" used applied principles, 
cases, ought led understand 
proper division local Federal authority, part 
Constitution, forbids Federal Government control slavery 
Federal Territories, right say so.  should, 
time, brave responsibility declaring that, 
opinion, understands principles better 
themselves; especially responsibility 
asserting question well, even 
better, now." 
 
enough.  Let believe "our fathers framed 
government live understood question well, 
even better, now," speak spoke, act 
acted upon it.  Republicans Republicans 
relation slavery.  fathers marked it, let 
evil extended, tolerated 
protected far actual presence among us 
makes protection necessity.  Let 
guaranties fathers gave grudgingly, fully 
maintained.  Republicans this, 
far know believe, content. 
 
now, would suppose would 
address words Southern people. 
 
would say them: consider reasonable 
people; consider general qualities reason 
justice inferior people.  Still, 
speak us Republicans, denounce us or, 
best, better  grant hearing 
murderers, nothing like "Black  
one another, deems 
unconditional condemnation "Black first thing 
attended to.  Indeed, condemnation us seems 
indispensable 
admitted permitted speak all. 
 
Now, you, not, prevailed upon pause consider 
whether quite us, even yourselves? 
 
Bring forward charges patient long 
enough hear us deny 
 
say sectional.  deny it.  makes issue; 
burden proof upon you.  produce it? 
Why, party existence votes 
section.  fact substantially true; prove 
issue?  does, case should, without change 
principle, begin get votes section, thereby cease 
sectional.  cannot escape yet, 
willing abide it?  are, probably soon find 
ceased sectional, shall get votes section 
year.  begin discover, truth plainly 
is, proof touch issue.  fact get 
votes section fact making, ours.  
fault fact, fault primarily yours, 
remains show repel wrong principle 
practice.  repel wrong principle practice, 
fault ours; brings ought 
discussion right wrong principle.  
principle, put practice, would wrong section benefit 
ours, object, principle, it, 
sectional, justly opposed denounced such.  Meet us, 
then, question whether principle, put practice, would 
wrong section; meet us possible 
something may said side.  accept  
really believe principle "our fathers 
framed Government live" thought clearly right 
adopt it, indorse again, upon official oaths, 
fact clearly wrong demand condemnation without 
moment's consideration. 
 
delight faces warning 
sectional parties given Washington Farewell Address.  Less 
eight years Washington gave had, 
President United States, approved signed act Congress 
enforcing prohibition slavery Northwestern Territory, 
act embodied policy Government upon subject 
moment penned one year 
penned it, wrote considered prohibition 
wise measure, expressing connection hope 
time confederacy free States. 
 
Bearing mind, seeing sectionalism since arisen 
upon subject, warning weapon hands 
us, hands you?  Could Washington speak, would 
cast blame sectionalism upon us, sustain policy, 
upon you, repudiate it?  respect warning Washington, 
commend you, together example pointing 
right application it. 
 
say 
revolutionary, something sort.  
 adherence old tried, 
new  stick to, contend for, identical old policy 
point controversy adopted "our fathers framed 
Government one accord 
upon old policy, insist upon substituting 
something new.  True, disagree among 
substitute shall be.  divided new propositions plans, 
unanimous rejecting denouncing old policy 
fathers.  reviving foreign 
congressional Territories; Congress 
forbidding Territories prohibit slavery within limits; 
maintaining slavery Territories 
"if one man would enslave 
another, third man called "Popular 
never man among favor Federal 
prohibition slavery Federal Territories, according 
practice "our fathers framed Government 
live."  one various plans show precedent 
advocate century within Government originated. 
Consider, then, whether claim yourselves, 
charge us, based clear 

 
Again, say made slavery question prominent 
formerly was.  deny it.  admit 
deny made so.  we, you, discarded old 
policy fathers.  still 
thence comes greater prominence question.  Would 
question reduced former  Go back 
old policy.  again, 
would peace old times, 
policy old times. 
 
charge stir insurrections among slaves.  deny 
it;  Harper's  John  John Brown 
failed single Republican 
Harper's Ferry enterprise.  member party guilty 
matter, know it, know it.  know it, 
inexcusable designating man proving fact. 
know it, inexcusable assert it, especially 
assertion tried failed make 
proof.  need told persisting charge one 
know true, simply malicious 
 
admit Republican aided encouraged 
Harper's Ferry affair, still insist doctrines 
declarations necessarily lead results.  believe it. 
know hold doctrine, make declaration, 
held made "our fathers framed Government 
live."  never dealt fairly us relation affair. 
occurred, important State elections near hand, 
evident belief that, charging blame 
upon us, could get advantage us elections.  
elections came, expectations quite fulfilled.  Every 
Republican man knew that, least, charge 
much inclined cast vote 
favor.  Republican doctrines declarations accompanied 
continual protest interference whatever slaves, 
slaves.  Surely, encourage 
 True, do, common "our fathers framed 
Government live," declare belief slavery 
wrong; slaves hear us declare even this.  anything 
say do, slaves would scarcely know Republican 
party.  believe would not, fact, generally know 
us hearing.  political 
among yourselves, faction charges sympathy 
Black then, give point charge, 
Black simply insurrection, blood, 
among slaves. 
 
Slave insurrections common 
Republican party organized.  induced Southampton 
insurrection, twenty-eight years ago, least three times 
many lives lost Harper's Ferry?  scarcely stretch 
elastic fancy conclusion Southampton "got 
Black  present state things United 
States, think general, even slave 
insurrection possible.  indispensable concert action cannot 
 slaves means rapid 
incendiary black white, supply it.  materials 
everywhere neither are, 
indispensable connecting 
 
Much said Southern people affection slaves 
masters part it, least, true.  plot 
could scarcely devised communicated twenty 
individuals one them, save life favorite 
master mistress, would divulge it.  slave 
revolution exception it, case occurring 
peculiar circumstances.  plot British history, 
though connected slaves, point.  case, 
twenty admitted yet one them, 
anxiety save friend, betrayed plot friend, and, 
consequence, averted  Occasional 
kitchen, open field, local 
extending score continue occur 
natural results slavery; general insurrection slaves, 
think, happen country long time.  Whoever much fears, 
much hopes, event, alike disappointed. 
 
language Mr. Jefferson, uttered many years ago, "It still 
power direct process emancipation deportation 
peaceably, slow evil wear 
places be, filled free white 
laborers.  If, contrary, left force on, human 
nature must prospect held up." 
 
Mr. Jefferson mean say, I, power 
emancipation Federal Government.  spoke Virginia; and, 
power emancipation, speak slaveholding States 
only. 
 
Federal Government, however, insist, power 
extension power insure 
slave insurrection shall never occur American soil 
free slavery. 
 
John Brown's effort  slave insurrection.  
attempt white men get revolt among slaves, 
slaves refused  fact, absurd 
slaves, ignorance, saw plainly enough could 
succeed.  affair, philosophy, corresponds many 
related history, kings 
 oppression people till 
fancies commissioned Heaven liberate them.  
attempt, ends little else execution. 
attempt Louis Napoleon, John Brown's attempt 
Harper's Ferry, were, philosophy, precisely same.  
cast blame old England one case, New 
England other, two things. 
 
much would avail you, could, use John 
Brown, Book, like, break Republican 
 Human action modified extent, human 
nature cannot changed.  judgment feeling 
slavery nation, cast least million half 
votes.  cannot destroy judgment 
breaking political organization 
around it.  scarcely disperse army 
formed order face heaviest 
could, much would gain forcing sentiment created 
peaceful channel 
 would channel probably be?  Would number 
John enlarged 
 
break Union rather submit denial 
Constitutional rights. 
 
somewhat reckless sound; would 
fully justified, mere force numbers, 
deprive right plainly written Constitution. 
proposing thing. 
 
make declarations specific well 
understood allusion assumed constitutional right take 
slaves Federal Territories, hold 
property.  right specifically written 
Constitution.  instrument literally silent 
right.  We, contrary, deny right existence 
Constitution, even 
 
purpose, then, plainly stated, destroy 
Government, unless allowed construe force 
Constitution please, points dispute 
us.  rule ruin events. 
 
This, plainly stated, language.  Perhaps say 
Supreme Court decided Constitutional question 
favor.  quite so.  lawyer's distinction 
decision, court decided question 
sort way.  court substantially said, 
constitutional right take slaves Federal Territories, 
hold property. 
 
say decision made sort way, mean made 
divided court, bare majority judges, 
quite agreeing one another reasons making it; 
made avowed supporters disagree one another 
meaning, mainly based upon mistaken 
statement statement opinion "the right 
property slave distinctly expressly affirmed 
Constitution." 
 
inspection Constitution show right property 
slave "distinctly expressly it.  Bear 
mind, judges pledge judicial opinion right 
affirmed Constitution; pledge 
veracity "distinctly affirmed 
is, mingled anything 
is, words meaning that, without aid 
inference, meaning. 
 
pledged judicial opinion right 
affirmed instrument implication, would open others 
show neither word "slavery" found 
Constitution, word even, connection 
language alluding things slave, slavery; wherever 
instrument slave alluded to, called 
wherever legal right relation alluded to, 
spoken labor may debt payable 
service labor.  Also would open show, contemporaneous 
history, mode alluding slaves slavery, instead 
speaking them, employed purpose exclude 
Constitution idea could property man. 
 
show easy certain. 
 
obvious mistake judges shall brought 
notice, reasonable expect withdraw 
mistaken statement, reconsider conclusion based upon it? 
 
remembered "our fathers framed 
Government men made 
Constitutional question favor 
long decided without division among making 
decision; without division among meaning 
made, far evidence left, without 
upon mistaken statement facts. 
 
circumstances, really feel justified 
break Government unless court decision shall 
submitted conclusive final rule political 

 
abide election Republican  
supposed event, say, destroy Union; then, say, 
great crime destroyed upon 
 
cool.  holds pistol 
teeth, shall kill you, 

 
sure, demanded own; 
clear right keep it; vote 
own; threat death me, extort money, 
threat destruction Union, extort vote, scarcely 
distinguished principle. 
 
words Republicans.  exceedingly desirable 
parts great Confederacy shall peace, harmony one 
another.  Let us Republicans part so.  Even 
though much let us nothing passion ill temper. 
Even though Southern people much listen us, let 
us calmly consider demands, yield if, 
deliberate view duty, possibly can.  Judging say 
do, subject nature controversy us, let 
us determine can, satisfy them. 
 
satisfied Territories 
surrendered them?  know not.  present 
complaints us, Territories scarcely mentioned. 
Invasions insurrections rage now.  satisfy if, 
future, nothing invasions 
know not.  know, know never anything 
invasions yet total 
exempt us charge 
 
question recurs, satisfy them?  Simply this: must 
let alone, must somehow convince let 
alone.  This, know experience, easy task.  
trying convince beginning 
organization, success.  platforms speeches 
constantly protested purpose let alone; 
tendency convince them.  Alike convince 
fact never detected man us 
attempt disturb them. 
 
natural apparently adequate means failing, 
convince them?  This, cease call slavery 
join calling  must done 
well  Silence 
must place avowedly them.  Senator 
Douglas's new law must enacted enforced, suppressing 
declarations slavery wrong, whether made politics, 
private.  must arrest return 
fugitive slaves greedy pleasure.  must pull Free-State 
constitutions.  whole atmosphere must 
opposition slavery, cease believe 
troubles proceed us. 
 
quite aware state case precisely way. 
would probably say us, "Let us alone; nothing us, 
say please slavery."  let 
never disturbed that, all, 
say them.  continue accuse us doing, 
cease saying. 
 
also aware yet terms demanded overthrow 
Free-State constitutions.  Yet constitutions declare 
wrong slavery solemn sayings 
it; sayings shall 
overthrow constitutions demanded, nothing 
left resist  nothing contrary 
demand whole now.  Demanding do, 
reason do, voluntarily stop nowhere short 
consummation.  do, slavery morally right 
socially cannot cease demand full national 
recognition legal right social 
 
justifiably withhold ground save conviction 
slavery wrong.  slavery right, words, acts, laws, 
constitutions wrong, silenced 
swept away.  right, cannot justly object 
wrong, cannot justly 
insist upon  ask could 
readily grant, thought slavery right; ask could 
readily grant, thought wrong.  thinking right 
thinking wrong precise fact upon depends whole 
controversy.  Thinking right, do, blame 
desiring full recognition right; thinking wrong, 
do, yield them?  cast votes view, 
 view moral, social, political 
this? 
 
Wrong think slavery is, yet afford let alone 
is, much due necessity arising 
actual presence nation; we, votes prevent 
it, allow spread national Territories, overrun us 
free States?  sense duty forbids this, let 
us stand duty  Let us diverted 
none 
industriously 
middle ground right vain search 
man neither living man dead man; 
policy "don't question true men 
Union appeals true Union men yield 
Disunionists, reversing divine rule, 
righteous Washington, 
imploring men Washington said Washington 
did. 
 
Neither let us duty false 
us, frightened menaces destruction government, 
ourselves.  Let us faith right makes 
might, faith let us end dare duty 
understand it. 
 
 
 
FAREWELL ADDRESS SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, FEBRUARY 12, 1861 
 
one position appreciate feel 
 people owe am.  
lived quarter children born, 
one lies  know soon shall see 
again.  duty upon is, perhaps, greater 
devolved upon man since days Washington.  
never could succeeded except aid Divine Providence, 
upon times  feel cannot succeed 
without Divine Aid sustained him; 
Almighty place reliance hope you, 
friends, pray may receive Divine Assistance, 
without cannot succeed, success certain. 
bid affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
FAREWELL ADDRESS SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, FEBRUARY 11, 1861 
 
one, situation, appreciate feeling 
 place, kindness 
people, owe everything.  lived quarter century, 
passed young old man.  children 
born one  leave, knowing whether ever 
may return, task greater rested upon 
Washington.  Without assistance Divine ever 
attended him, cannot succeed.  assistance, cannot fail. 
Trusting Him, go remain you, 
everywhere let us confidently hope yet well. 
care you, hope prayers commend 
me, bid affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS INDEPENDENCE HALL, PHILADELPHIA, FEBRUARY 22, 1861 
 
Mr. filled deep emotion finding standing 
place, collected together wisdom, patriotism, 
devotion principle, sprang institutions 
live.  kindly suggested hands 
task restoring peace distracted country.  say 
return, sir, political sentiments entertain 
drawn, far able draw them, sentiments 
originated given world hall.  
never feeling politically, spring 
sentiments embodied Declaration Independence.  often 
pondered dangers men assembled 
framed adopted Declaration.  pondered 
endured officers soldiers army 
achieved independence.  often inquired great 
principle idea kept Confederacy long together. 
mere matter separation colonies 
sentiment Declaration Independence 
gave liberty alone people country, hope 
world, future time.  gave promise 
due time would lifted shoulders men, 
equal chance.  sentiment embodied 
Declaration Independence.  Now, friends, country 
saved  can, consider one 
men world help save it.  cannot 
saved upon principle, truly awful.  country 
cannot saved without giving principle, say 
would rather spot surrender it.  Now, 
view present aspect affairs, need bloodshed 
war.  necessity it.  favor 
course; may say advance bloodshed unless 
forced upon government.  government use force, 
unless force used it. 
 
friends, wholly speech.  expect 
called say word came here.  supposed merely 
something toward raising flag.  may, therefore, said 
something  [Cries "No,  said nothing 
willing live by, and, pleasure 
Almighty God, die by. 
 
 
 
 
FIRST INAUGURAL ADDRESS, MARCH 4, 1861 
 
Fellow Citizens United States: compliance custom 
old government itself, appear address 
briefly, take presence oath prescribed 
Constitution United States taken President "before 
enters execution office." 
 
consider necessary present discuss 
matters administration special anxiety 
excitement.  Apprehension seems exist among people 
Southern States that, accession Republican administration, 
property peace personal security 
 never reasonable cause 
 Indeed, ample evidence contrary 
existed open inspection.  found 
nearly published speeches addresses you.  
quote one speeches declare "I 
purpose, directly indirectly, interfere institution 
slavery States exists.  believe lawful 
right so, inclination so."  
nominated elected full knowledge made 
many similar declarations, never them.  And, 
this, placed platform acceptance, 
law me, clear emphatic resolution 
read: 
 
 
maintenance rights States, 
especially right State order control 
domestic institutions according judgment exclusively, 
essential balance power perfection 
endurance political fabric denounce lawless 
invasion armed force soil State Territory, 
matter among 
 
 
reiterate sentiments; and, so, press upon 
public attention conclusive evidence case 
property, peace, security section 
wise endangered incoming administration.  
add, too, protection which, consistently 
Constitution laws, given, cheerfully given 
States lawfully demanded, whatever 
cheerfully one section another. 
 
much controversy delivering fugitives 
service labor.  clause read plainly written 
Constitution 
 
 
person held service labor one State, laws 
thereof, escaping another, shall consequence law 
regulation therein discharged service labor, shall 
delivered claim party service labor may 

 
 
scarcely questioned provision intended 
made reclaiming call fugitive slaves; 
intention law.  members Congress swear 
support whole provision much 
other.  proposition, then, slaves whose cases come 
within terms clause "shall delivered up," oaths 
 Now, would make effort good temper, 
could nearly equal unanimity frame pass law 
means keep good unanimous oath? 
 
difference opinion whether clause 
enforced National State authority; surely difference 
material one.  slave surrendered, 
little consequence others authority 
done.  one case content oath shall 
go merely controversy shall 

 
Again, law upon subject, ought safeguards 
liberty known civilized humane introduced, 
free man not, case, surrendered  
might well time provide law 
enforcement clause Constitution guarantees 
"the citizen State shall entitled privileges 
immunities citizens several States?" 
 
take official oath to-day mental reservations, 
purpose construe Constitution laws 
 choose specify particular acts 
Congress proper enforced, suggest much 
safer all, official private stations, conform 
abide acts stand unrepealed, violate 
them, trusting find held 
unconstitutional. 
 
years since first inauguration President 
National Constitution.  period fifteen different 
greatly distinguished citizens have, succession, administered 
executive branch government.  conducted 
many perils, generally great success.  Yet, 
scope precedent, enter upon task brief 
constitutional term four years great peculiar difficulty. 
 
disruption Federal Union, heretofore 
attempted.  hold that, contemplation universal law 
constitution, Union States perpetual. 
Perpetuity implied, expressed, fundamental law 
national governments.  safe assert government proper 
ever provision organic law 
Continue execute express provisions National 
Constitution, Union endure impossible 
destroy except action provided instrument 
itself. 
 
Again, United States government proper, 
association States nature contract merely, it, 
contract, peaceably less parties made it? 
One party contract may violate it, speak; 
require lawfully rescind it? 
 
Descending general principles, find proposition that, 
legal contemplation Union perpetual confirmed history 
Union itself.  Union much older Constitution. 
formed, fact, Articles Association  
matured continued Declaration Independence  
matured, faith thirteen States 
expressly engaged perpetual, 
Articles Confederation  And, finally, 1787 one 
declared objects establishing Constitution 
"to form perfect Union."  destruction Union 
one part States lawfully possible, Union 
less perfect Constitution, lost vital 
element 
 
follows views State upon mere motion 
lawfully get Union; resolves ordinances 
effect legally acts violence, within State 
States, authority United States, insurrectionary 
revolutionary, according circumstances. 
 
therefore consider that, view Constitution laws, 
Union extent ability shall take 
care, Constitution expressly upon me, 
laws Union faithfully executed States.  
deem simple duty part; shall perform 
far practicable, unless rightful masters, American people, 
shall withhold requisite means, authoritative manner 
direct contrary.  trust regarded menace, 
declared purpose Union 
constitutionally defend maintain itself. 
 
needs bloodshed 
shall none, unless forced upon national authority.  
power confided used hold, occupy, possess 
property places belonging government, collect 
duties beyond may necessary objects, 
invasion, using force among 
people anywhere.  hostility United States, interior 
locality, shall great universal prevent competent 
resident citizens holding Federal offices, 
attempt force obnoxious strangers among people object. 
strict legal right may exist government enforce 
exercise offices, attempt would 
nearly impracticable deem better forego 
time uses offices. 
 
unless continue furnished parts 
Union.  far possible, people everywhere shall 
sense perfect security favorable calm thought 
reflection.  course indicated followed unless 
current events experience shall show modification change 
proper, every case best discretion 
exercised according circumstances actually existing, view 
hope peaceful solution national troubles 
restoration fraternal sympathies 
 
persons one section another seek destroy 
Union events, glad pretext it, 
neither affirm such, need address word 
them.  those, however, really love Union may speak? 
 
entering upon grave matter destruction 
national benefits, hopes, 
would wise ascertain precisely it?  
hazard desperate step possibility 
portion ills fly real existence?  you, 
certain ills fly greater real ones 
fly risk commission fearful 
 
profess content Union constitutional rights 
maintained.  true, then, right, plainly written 
Constitution,  think not.  Happily human 
mind constituted party reach 
this.  Think, can, single instance plainly 
written provision Constitution ever denied.  
mere force numbers majority deprive minority 
clearly written constitutional right, might, moral point 
view, justify would right vital 
one.  case.  vital rights 
individuals plainly assured affirmations 
guarantees Constitution, 
controversies never arise concerning them.  organic law ever 
framed provision specifically applicable every question 
may occur practical administration.  
document reasonable length express 
provisions possible questions.  Shall fugitives labor 
surrendered national State authority?  Constitution 
expressly say.  Congress prohibit slavery Territories? 
Constitution expressly say.  Congress protect 
slavery Territories?  Constitution expressly say. 
 
questions class spring constitutional 
divide upon majorities 
minority acquiesce, majority must, 
government must cease.  continuing 
government acquiescence one side other. 
 
minority case secede rather acquiesce, make 
precedent turn divide ruin them; minority 
secede whenever majority refuses 
controlled minority.  instance, may portion 
new confederacy year two hence arbitrarily secede again, 
precisely portions present Union claim secede it? 
cherish disunion sentiments educated exact 
temper this. 
 
perfect identity interests among States compose 
new Union, produce harmony only, prevent renewed 
 
Plainly, central idea secession essence  
majority held restraint constitutional limitations, 
always changing easily deliberate changes popular opinions 
sentiments, true sovereign free people.  Whoever 
does, necessity, fly anarchy despotism. 
Unanimity impossible; rule minority, permanent 
arrangement, wholly that, rejecting majority 
principle, anarchy despotism form left. 
 
forget position, assumed some, constitutional 
questions decided Supreme Court; deny 
decisions must case, upon parties 
suit, object suit, also entitled 
high respect consideration parallel cases 
departments government.  obviously possible 
decision may erroneous given case, still evil effect 
following it, limited particular case, chance 
may overruled never become precedent cases, 
better borne could evils different practice.  
time, candid citizen must confess policy 
government, upon vital questions affecting whole people, 
irrevocably fixed decisions Supreme Court, instant 
made, ordinary parties personal 
actions, people ceased 
extent practically resigned government hands 
eminent  view assault upon 
court  duty may shrink 
decide cases properly brought them, fault 
others seek turn decisions political purposes. 
 
One section country believes slavery right, ought 
extended, believes wrong, ought 
extended.  substantial dispute.  fugitive-slave 
clause Constitution, law suppression 
foreign slave-trade, well enforced, perhaps law 
ever community moral sense people imperfectly 
supports law itself.  great body people abide dry 
legal obligation cases, break each.  This, 
think, cannot perfectly would worse cases 
separation sections before.  foreign 
slave-trade, imperfectly suppressed, would ultimately 
without restriction, one section, fugitive slaves, 
partially surrendered, would surrendered other. 
 
Physically speaking, cannot separate.  cannot remove 
respective sections other, build impassable wall 
them.  husband wife may go 
presence beyond reach other; different parts 
country cannot this.  cannot remain face face, 
intercourse either amicable hostile, must continue them.  
possible, then, make intercourse advantageous 
satisfactory separation before?  aliens make treaties 
easier friends make laws?  treaties faithfully 
enforced aliens laws among friends?  Suppose go 
war, cannot fight always; when, much loss sides, 
gain either, cease fighting, identical old questions 
terms intercourse upon you. 
 
country, institutions, belongs people inhabit 
it.  Whenever shall grow weary existing government, 
exercise constitutional right amending it, 
revolutionary right overthrow it.  cannot ignorant 
fact many worthy patriotic citizens 
National Constitution amended.  make 
recommendation amendments, fully recognize rightful authority 
people whole subject, exercised either 
modes prescribed instrument itself; should, existing 
circumstances, favor rather oppose fair opportunity 
afforded people act upon it.  venture add 
convention mode seems allows amendments 
originate people themselves, instead permitting 
take reject propositions originated others especially 
chosen purpose, might precisely 
would wish either accept  understand proposed 
amendment amendment, however, 
passed Congress, effect Federal Government 
shall never interfere domestic institutions States, 
including persons held service.  avoid 
said, depart purpose speak particular 
amendments far say that, holding provision 
implied constitutional law, objection made 
express 
 
chief magistrate derives authority people, 
conferred none upon fix terms separation 
States.  people also 
executive, such, nothing it.  duty 
administer present government, came hands, 
transmit it, him, successor. 
 
patient confidence ultimate justice 
people?  better equal hope  
present differences either party without faith 
right?  Almighty Ruler Nations, eternal truth 
justice, side North, South, 
truth justice surely prevail judgment 
great tribunal American people. 
 
frame government live, people 
wisely given public servants little power 
have, equal wisdom, provided return little 
hands short  people retain 
virtue vigilance, administration, extreme wickedness 
seriously injure government short space 
four years. 
 
countrymen, one all, think calmly well upon whole 
subject.  Nothing valuable lost taking time.  
object hurry hot haste step would never 
take deliberately, object frustrated taking time; 
good object frustrated it.  
still old Constitution and, 
sensitive point, laws framing it; new 
administration immediate power, would, change 
either.  admitted dissatisfied hold 
right side still single good reason 
precipitate action.  Intelligence, patriotism, firm 
reliance never yet forsaken favored land, still 
competent adjust best way present difficulties. 
 
hands, dissatisfied fellow-countrymen, mine, 
momentous issue civil war.  government assail you. 
conflict without  
oath registered heaven destroy government, 
shall solemn one protect, defend it." 
 
loath close.  enemies, friends.  must 
enemies.  Though passion may must break bonds 
affection.  mystic chords memory, stretching every 
battle-field patriot grave every living heart 
broad land, yet swell chorus Union 
surely be, better angels 
nature. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, MARCH 4, 1861 
 
Fellow thank visit.  thank call 
upon me, sectional spirit, come, without 
distinction party, pay respects President 
United States.  informed mostly citizens New York. 
[Cries  appear  May hope 
public expression day given 
sentiments, may degree happiness. 
 far concerned, loyal 
citizens every State, every section, shall cause 
feel sentiment.  [Cries  towards 
portions fellow-citizens, say, every good 
man throughout country must feel, rejoicing 
one sheep lost, found, ninety 
nine gone  [Great  now, 
friends, risen see you, 
excuse remarks, permit thank 
heartily cordially pleasant 
await return. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER COLONEL PARENTS 
 
Washington, D.C., May 25, 1861. 
 
Father Mother Colonel E. 
 
dear Sir loss noble son, 
affliction scarcely less own.  much promised 
usefulness one's country, bright hopes one's self 
friends, rarely suddenly dashed fall.  size, 
years, appearance boy only, power command 
men great.  power, combined fine 
intellect, energy, taste altogether military, 
constituted him, seemed me, best natural talent 
department ever knew. 
 
yet, singularly modest social 
intercourse.  acquaintance began less two years ago; 
yet latter part intervening period 
intimate ages 
would permit.  appeared 
never heard utter word.  
conclusive good heart, never forgot  honors 
labored sad end 
gave life, meant less himself. 
 
hope may upon sacredness 
sorrow, ventured address memory 
young friend brave early fallen child. 
 
May God give consolation beyond earthly power. 
 
Sincerely friend common 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER HORACE GREELEY 
 
Executive Mansion, Washington, August 22, 1862. 
 
Hon. Horace 
 
Dear Sir:  read addressed 
N. Y.  statements 
assumptions fact may know erroneous, 
them.  inferences may 
believe drawn, argue them. 
impatient dictatorial tone, 
waive deference old friend, whose heart always 
supposed right. 
 
policy say, meant 
leave one doubt. 
 
would save Union.  would save shortest way 
Constitution. 
 
sooner National authority restored, nearer Union 
"the Union was." 
 
would save Union unless could 
time Slavery, agree them.  
would save Union unless could time 
Slavery, agree them.  paramount object 
struggle save Union, _not_ either save 
destroy Slavery.  could save Union without freeing 
slave, would it; could save freeing _all_ slaves, 
would it; could save freeing leaving others 
alone, would also that.  Slavery colored 
race, believe helps save Union; 
forbear believe would help save 
Union.  shall whenever shall believe 
hurts cause, shall whenever shall believe 
help cause.  shall try correct errors shown 
shall adopt new views fast shall appear 
true views. 
 
stated purpose according views 
intend modification wish 
men, everywhere could free.  Yours, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
EXTRACT SECOND ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS, DECEMBER 1, 1862 
 
Nation may said consist territory, people, 
laws.  territory part certain 
"One generation away, another generation 
earth  first importance duly consider 
estimate part.  portion earth's 
surface owned inhabited people United States 
well adapted home one national family, 
well adapted two more.  vast extent variety 
climate productions advantage age one people 
whatever might former ages.  
intelligence brought advantageous combination 
one united people. 
 
Inaugural Address briefly pointed total 
disunion remedy differences people two 
sections.  language cannot improve which, 
therefore, beg 
 
 
One section country believes slavery right ought 
extended, believes wrong ought 
extended.  substantial dispute.  fugitive-slave 
clause Constitution law suppression 
foreign slave-trade well enforced, perhaps, law 
ever community moral sense people imperfectly 
supports law itself.  great body people abide dry 
legal obligation cases, break each.  This, 
think, cannot perfectly would worse cases 
separation sections before.  foreign 
slave-trade, imperfectly suppressed, would ultimately revived 
without restriction one section; fugitive slaves, 
partially surrendered, would surrendered other. 
 
Physically speaking, cannot separate.  cannot remove 
respective sections other, build impassable wall 
them.  husband wife may go 
presence beyond reach other; different parts 
country cannot this.  cannot remain face 
intercourse, either amicable hostile, must continue them. 
possible, then, make intercourse advantageous 
satisfactory separation before?  aliens make 
treaties easier friends make laws?  treaties 
faithfully enforced aliens laws among friends? 
Suppose go war, cannot fight always; when, much 
loss sides gain either, cease fighting, 
identical old questions terms intercourse upon you. 
 
 
line, straight suitable national boundary 
upon  Trace through, east west, upon line 
free slave country, shall find little 
one-third length rivers, easy 
populated, soon populated, upon 
nearly remaining length merely lines, 
people may walk back forth without consciousness 
presence.  part line made difficult pass 
writing paper national boundary.  
fact separation, comes, gives part seceding 
section fugitive-slave clause along constitutional 
obligations upon section seceded from, expect 
treaty stipulation would ever made take place. 
 
another difficulty.  great interior region, bounded 
east north British west 
Rocky Mountains, south line along culture corn 
cotton includes part Virginia, part 
Tennessee, Kentucky, Ohio, Indiana, Michigan, Wisconsin, 
Illinois, Missouri, Kansas, Iowa, Minnesota, Territories 
Nebraska, part Colorado, already ten millions 
people, fifty millions within fifty years 
prevented political folly mistake.  contains one 
third country owned United 
one million square miles.  half populous Massachusetts 
already is, would seventy-five millions people.  
glance map shows that, speaking, great 
body republic.  parts marginal borders it, 
magnificent region sloping west Rocky Mountains 
Pacific deepest also 
resources.  production provisions, 
proceed them, great interior region naturally one 
important world.  Ascertain statistics 
small proportion region has, yet, brought 
also large rapidly increasing amount 
products, shall overwhelmed magnitude 
prospect yet region 
ocean anywhere.  part one nation, people find, may 
forever find, way Europe New York, South America 
Africa New Orleans, San  separate 
common country two nations, designed present rebellion, 
every man great interior region thereby cut 
one perhaps, physical 
embarrassing trade regulations. 
 
true wherever dividing boundary line may fixed. 
Place free slave country, place south 
Kentucky north Ohio, still truth remains none south 
trade port place north it, none north 
trade port place south except upon terms dictated 
government foreign them.  outlets, east, west, south, 
indispensable well-being people 
vast interior region.  three may 
best, proper question.  better 
right belong people successors forever.  True 
themselves, ask line separation shall be, 
rather shall line.  marginal 
regions less interested communications 
great outside world.  They, too, them, must access 
Egypt West without paying crossing 
national boundary. 
 
national strife springs permanent part, 
land national  possible 
would evils among us. 
adaptations demands union abhors 
 fact, would ere long force reunion, however much 
blood treasure separation might cost. 
 
strife pertains passing generations men; 
without convulsion hushed forever passing one 
generation. . . . 
 
forget gravity paper addressed 
Congress nation Chief Magistrate nation. 
forget many 
experience conduct public affairs.  Yet 
trust view great responsibility resting upon me, 
perceive want respect undue earnestness 
may seem 
 
then, plan propose, adopted, would 
war, thus lessen expenditure money  
doubted would restore national authority national 
prosperity, perpetuate  doubted 
secure  
good people respond united earnest appeal us?  we, 
they, means certainly speedily assure 
vital  succeed concert.  "Can 
us imagine better?" but, "Can better?"  Object 
possible, still question occurs, "Can better?"  
quiet past inadequate present.  occasion 
piled high difficulty, must rise occasion.  
case new, must think anew act anew.  must 
ourselves, shall save country. 
 
Fellow-citizens, cannot escape history.  Congress 
administration remembered spite ourselves.  
personal significance insignificance spare one another us. 
trial pass light us down, honor 
latest generation.  say Union.  
world forget say this.  know save Union. 
world knows know save it.  
power bear responsibility.  giving freedom slave, 
assure freedom alike give 
 shall nobly save meanly lose last, best hope 
earth.  means may succeed; could fail.  way 
plain, peaceful, generous, way which, followed, world 
forever God must forever 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
Washington, Dec. 1, 1862. 
 
 
 
 
EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION, JANUARY 1, 1863 
 
Whereas, twenty-second day September, year Lord 
one thousand eight hundred sixty-two, proclamation issued 
President United States, among things, 
following, 
 
 
"That first day January, year Lord one thousand 
eight hundred sixty-three, persons held slaves within 
State, designated part State, people whereof shall 
rebellion United States, shall then, thenceforward, 
forever free; Executive Government United States, 
including military naval authority thereof, recognize 
maintain freedom persons, act acts 
repress persons, them, efforts may make 
actual freedom. 
 
"That Executive will, first day January aforesaid, 
proclamation, designate States parts States, any, 
people thereof respectively shall rebellion 
United States; fact State, people 
thereof, shall day good faith represented Congress 
United States members chosen thereto elections wherein 
majority qualified voters State shall 
shall absence strong testimony deemed 
conclusive evidence State people thereof 
rebellion United States." 
 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
virtue power vested commander-in-chief army 
navy United States, time actual armed rebellion 
authority government United States, fit 
necessary war measure suppressing said rebellion, do, first 
day January, year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
sixty-three, accordance purpose do, publicly 
proclaimed full period days day first 
mentioned, order designate States parts States 
wherein people thereof, respectively, day rebellion 
United States, following, 
 
Arkansas, Texas, Louisiana (except St. 
Jefferson, St. John, St. St. James, 
Assumption, St. Mary, St. Orleans, 
including city New Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, 
Georgia, South Carolina, North Carolina, Virginia (except 
forty-eight counties designated West Virginia, also counties 
Elizabeth City, York, 
Norfolk, including cities Norfolk 
excepted parts present left precisely 
proclamation issued. 
 
virtue power purpose aforesaid, order 
declare persons held slaves within said designated 
States parts States are, shall be, free; 
executive government United States, including 
military naval authorities thereof, recognize maintain 
freedom said persons. 
 
hereby enjoin upon people declared free abstain 
violence, unless necessary recommend 
that, cases labor faithfully 
reasonable 
 
declare make known persons suitable 
condition received armed service United States 
garrison forts, positions, stations, places, man 
vessels sorts said service. 
 
upon act, sincerely believed act justice, 
warranted Constitution upon military necessity, invoke 
considerate judgment mankind gracious favor Almighty God. 
 
 
 
 
THANKSGIVING PROCLAMATION, JULY 15, 1863 
 
pleased Almighty God prayers 
afflicted people, army navy 
United States victories land sea signal 
effective furnish reasonable grounds augmented confidence 
union States maintained, Constitution 
preserved, peace prosperity permanently restored.  
victories accorded without sacrifices life, 
health, liberty, brave, loyal, patriotic 
citizens.  Domestic affliction every part country follows 
train fearful  meet right 
recognize confess presence Almighty Father, 
power hand equally triumphs 
 
Now, therefore, known set apart Thursday, 6th day 
August next, observed day national thanksgiving, 
prayer, invite people United States 
assemble occasion customary places worship, and, 
forms approved render due 
Divine Majesty wonderful things done nation's 
invoke influence Holy Spirit anger 
produced long sustained cruel 
rebellion, change hearts insurgents, guide 
counsels government wisdom, adequate great national 
visit tender care consolation throughout 
length breadth land who, 
battles, brought suffer 
mind, body, finally lead whole nation 
paths submission Divine back 
perfect enjoyment union fraternal peace. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER J. C. CONKLING 
 
Executive Mansion, 
 
Washington, August 26, 1863. 
 
Hon. James C. 
 
dear Sir: letter inviting attend 
unconditional Union men, held capital Illinois 
3d day September, received.  would agreeable 
thus meet old friends cannot 
absent long visit would require. 
 
meeting maintain unconditional devotion 
Union; sure old political friends thank 
do, nation's gratitude noble men 
malice hope make false nation's 
life. 
 
dissatisfied me.  would say: 
desire peace, blame it.  
attain it?  three conceivable  First, suppress 
rebellion force arms.  trying do.  
it?  are, far agreed.  it, second 
way give Union.  this.  it?  
are, say  force, yet 
remains imaginable compromise.  
believe compromise embracing maintenance Union 
possible.  learn leads directly opposite belief.  
strength rebellion military, army.  army 
country people within range.  
offer terms made man men within opposition 
army, simply nothing present, man 
men power whatever enforce side compromise, 
one made them. 
 
Suppose South peace men 
North get together convention, frame proclaim compromise 
embracing restoration Union.  way compromise 
used keep Lee's army  Meade's army keep 
Lee's army Pennsylvania, and, think, ultimately drive 
existence.  paper compromise 
Lee's army agreed affect army.  effort 
compromise waste time enemy would improve 
would all.  compromise, 
must made either control rebel army, 
people first liberated army 
success army.  Now, allow assure word 
intimation rebel army, men controlling 
it, relation peace compromise, ever come knowledge 
belief.  charges insinuations contrary 
groundless.  promise proposition shall 
hereafter come, shall rejected kept secret you.  
freely acknowledge servant people, according 
bond United States that, such, 
responsible them. 
 
plain.  dissatisfied negro.  Quite 
likely difference opinion upon 
subject.  certainly wish men could free, 
suppose not.  Yet neither adopted proposed 
measure consistent even views, provided 
Union.  suggested compensated emancipation, 
replied wished taxed buy negroes.  asked 
taxed buy negroes, except way save 
greater taxation save Union exclusively means. 
 
dislike Emancipation Proclamation, perhaps would 
 say unconstitutional.  think differently.  
think Constitution commander-in-chief law 
war time war.  
slaves property.  there, ever been, question that, 
law war, property, enemies friends, may taken 
needed whenever taking helps us hurts 
enemy?  Armies, world over, destroy property 
cannot use it, even destroy keep enemy. 
Civilized power help hurt 
enemy, except things regarded  Among 
exceptions massacre 
male 
 
Proclamation, law, either valid valid.  
valid, needs  valid, cannot 
dead brought life.  
profess think retraction would operate favorably Union. 
better retraction issue?  
year half trial suppress rebellion 
Proclamation last one hundred days passed 
explicit notice coming, unless averted revolt 
returning  war certainly 
favorably us since issue Proclamation before. 
 
know, fully one know opinions others, 
commanders armies field given us 
important successes, believe emancipation policy use 
colored troops constitute heaviest blow yet dealt rebellion, 
least one important successes could 
achieved aid black soldiers.  Among 
commanders holding views never 
called party 
hold purely military opinions.  submit 
opinions entitled weight objections 
often urged emancipation arming blacks unwise 
military measures, adopted good faith. 
 
say fight free negroes.  seem willing 
fight you; matter.  Fight you, then, exclusively, save 
Union.  issued Proclamation purpose aid saving 
Union.  Whenever shall conquered resistance 
Union, shall urge continue fighting, apt time 
declare fight free negroes. 
 
thought struggle Union, whatever extent 
negroes cease helping enemy, extent 
enemy resistance you.  think  thought 
whatever negroes got soldiers, leaves much 
less white soldiers saving Union.  appear 
otherwise you?  negroes, like people, act upon 
anything us nothing them?  
stake lives us must prompted strongest 
even promise freedom.  promise made, must 

 
signs look better.  Father Waters goes 
 Thanks great Northwest it.  yet wholly them. 
Three hundred miles met New England, 
Jersey, way right left.  South, too, 
colors one, also hand.  spot, part 
history black white.  job great 
national one, let none bore honorable part it. 
cleared great river may well proud, 
even all.  hard say anything 
bravely well done Gettysburg, 
many fields lesser note.  must Uncle 
forgotten.  present.  
deep sea, broad bay, rapid river, also 
wherever ground little 
made  Thanks great 
Republic, principle lives keeps man's vast 
all. 
 
Peace appear distant did.  hope come soon, 
come come worth keeping future 
time.  proved among freemen 
successful appeal ballot take 
appeal sure lose case pay cost.  
black men remember silent tongue, 
teeth, steady eye, bayonet, 
helped mankind great fear 
white ones unable forget heart 
speech hinder it. 
 
Still, let us final triumph.  Let us 
quite  Let us diligently apply means, never doubting 
God, good time, give us rightful result. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GETTYSBURG ADDRESS, NOV. 19, 1863 
 
seven years ago fathers brought forth 
continent new nation, conceived liberty, dedicated 
proposition men created equal. 
 
engaged great civil war, testing whether nation, 
nation conceived long endure.  
met great battle-field war.  come 
portion field final gave 
lives nation might live.  altogether fitting 
proper this. 
 
But, larger sense, cannot cannot 
cannot ground.  brave men, living dead, 
struggled here, consecrated far poor power add 
 world little note long remember say 
here, never forget here.  us, 
living, rather, dedicated unfinished work 
fought thus far nobly advanced.  rather us 
dedicated great task remaining 
honored dead take increased devotion cause 
gave last full measure highly 
resolve dead shall died nation, 
God, shall new birth government 
people, people, people, shall perish 
earth, 
 
 
 
 
LETTER MRS. 
 
Executive Mansion, 
 
Washington, Nov. 21, 1864. 
 
Mrs. Boston, 
 
Dear shown War Department 
statement General Massachusetts 
mother five sons died gloriously field battle.  
feel weak fruitless must word mine 
attempt grief loss  
cannot refrain tendering consolation may found 
thanks republic died  pray 
Heavenly Father may leave 
cherished memory loved lost, solemn 
pride must laid sacrifice upon 
freedom. 
 
sincerely respectfully, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECOND INAUGURAL ADDRESS, MARCH 4, 1865 
 
second appearing take oath 
presidential office, less occasion extended address 
first.  statement, somewhat detail, 
course pursued, seemed fitting proper.  Now, 
expiration four years, public declarations 
constantly called forth every point phase great contest 
still absorbs attention energies 
nation, little new could presented.  progress 
arms, upon else chiefly depends, well known 
public myself; is, trust, reasonably satisfactory 
encouraging all.  high hope future, prediction 
regard 
 
occasion corresponding four years ago, thoughts 
anxiously directed impending civil war.  dreaded 
sought avert it.  inaugural address delivered 
place, devoted altogether saving Union without war, 
insurgent agents city seeking destroy without 
dissolve Union, divide effects, 
parties deprecated war; one would make war rather 
let nation would accept war rather let 
 war came. 
 
whole population colored slaves, distributed 
generally Union, Southern part it. 
slaves constituted peculiar powerful interest.  knew 
interest was, somehow, cause war.  
extend interest object 
insurgents would rend Union, even war; government 
claimed right restrict territorial 
enlargement it. 
 
Neither party expected war magnitude duration 
already attained.  Neither anticipated cause 
conflict might cease with, even before, conflict 
cease.  looked easier result less 
fundamental  read Bible, pray 
God; aid other.  may seem 
strange men dare ask God's assistance 
bread sweat men's let us 
judge not,  prayers could 
neither answered fully. 
 
Almighty purposes.  unto world 
must needs offences come; woe man 
offence  shall suppose American slavery 
one offences which, providence God, must needs 
come, which, continued appointed time, 
wills gives North South 
terrible war, woe due offence came, shall 
discern therein departure divine 
living God always ascribe him?  Fondly 
mighty scourge war may 
speedily pass away.  Yet, God wills continue 
wealth piled two hundred fifty years unrequited 
toil shall sunk, every drop blood drawn lash 
shall paid another drawn sword, said three 
thousand years ago, still must said, "The judgments 
Lord true righteous 
 
malice toward charity all; firmness 
right, God gives us see right, let us strive finish 
work in; bind nation's care 
shall borne battle, 
may achieve cherish lasting peace among 
ourselves, nations. 
 
 
 
 
LAST PUBLIC ADDRESS, APRIL 11, 1865 
 
meet evening sorrow, gladness heart.  
evacuation Petersburg Richmond, surrender 
principal insurgent army, give hope righteous speedy peace, 
whose joyous expression cannot  midst this, 
however, blessings must forgotten.  call 
national thanksgiving duly 
 must whose harder part give us cause 
rejoicing overlooked.  honors must 
others.  near front, high pleasure 
much good news you; part honor 
plan execution mine.  General Grant, skilful officers 
brave men,  gallant navy stood ready, 
reach take active part. 
 
recent successes national 
large share thought 
first, pressed much closely upon attention.  
great difficulty.  Unlike case war 
independent nations, authorized organ us treat with. 
one man authority give rebellion man. 
simply must begin 
elements.  small additional embarrassment we, 
loyal people, differ among manner, 
measure reconstruction. 
 
general rule, abstain reading reports attacks upon 
myself, wishing provoked cannot properly 
offer answer.  spite however, comes 
knowledge much supposed agency setting 
seeking sustain new State Government Louisiana.  
done much as, than, public knows. 
annual message December, 1863, accompanying 
proclamation, presented plan reconstruction, phrase goes, 
promised, adopted State, acceptable 
sustained executive government nation.  distinctly 
stated plan might possibly 
also distinctly protested executive claimed 
right say whether members admitted seats 
Congress States.  plan was, advance, submitted 
Cabinet, distinctly approved every member it.  One 
suggested connection apply 
Emancipation Proclamation excepted parts Virginia 
Louisiana; drop suggestion 
freed people, omit protest 
power regard admission members Congress.  even 
approved every part parcel plan since 
employed touched action Louisiana. 
 
new Constitution Louisiana, declaring emancipation whole 
State, practically applies proclamation part previously 
 adopt freed people, 
silent, could well otherwise, admission 
members Congress.  that, applies Louisiana, every member 
cabinet fully approved plan.  message went Congress, 
received many plan, written 
single objection professed came 
knowledge news reached Washington people 
Louisiana began move accordance it.  July, 
1862, different persons supposed 
interested seeking reconstruction State government 
Louisiana.  message 1863, plan mentioned, 
reached New Orleans, General Banks wrote confident 
people, military would reconstruct substantially 
plan.  wrote try it.  tried it, 
result known.  agency getting 
Louisiana government.  sustaining it, promise out, 
stated.  bad promises better broken 
shall treat bad break whenever shall 
convinced keeping adverse public interest; 
yet 
 
shown letter subject, supposed able one, 
writer expresses regret mind seemed 
definitely fixed question whether seceded States, called, 
Union it.  would, perhaps, add astonishment 
regret learn since found professed Union men 
endeavoring make question, forborne 
public expression upon it.  appears me, question 
been, yet is, practically material one, discussion 
it, thus remains practically could 
effect mischievous one dividing friends.  yet, 
whatever may hereafter question bad basis 
controversy, good nothing merely 

 
agree seceded States, called, 
proper practical relation Union, sole object 
government, civil military, regard States 
get proper practical relation.  believe 
possible, fact do; without deciding 
even considering whether States ever 
Union, it.  Finding safely home, would 
utterly immaterial whether ever abroad.  Let us join 
acts necessary restoring proper practical relations 
States Union, forever 
indulge opinion whether acts brought States 
without Union, gave proper assistance, 
never it. 
 
amount speak, new Louisiana 
government would satisfactory contained 
even instead 
really does.  also unsatisfactory elective 
franchise given colored man.  would prefer 
conferred intelligent, serve 
cause soldiers.  Still, question whether 
Louisiana government, stands, quite 
question is, wiser take help 
improve it, reject disperse it?  Louisiana brought 
proper practical relation Union sooner sustaining 
discarding new State government? 
 
twelve thousand voters heretofore slave State Louisiana 
sworn allegiance Union, assumed rightful 
political power State, held elections, organized State 
government, adopted free-State constitution, giving benefit 
public schools equally black white, 
Legislature confer elective franchise upon colored man. 
Legislature already voted ratify constitutional 
amendment recently passed Congress, abolishing slavery throughout 
nation.  twelve thousand persons thus fully committed 
Union perpetual freedom 
things, nearly things, nation ask 
nation's recognition assistance make good 
 
Now, reject them, utmost 
disperse them.  We, effect, say white worthless 
neither help you, helped you.  
blacks say: cup Liberty these, old masters, hold 
lips dash you, leave chances 
scattered contents vague 
when, where, how.  course, discouraging 
white black, tendency bring Louisiana 
proper practical relations Union, far 
unable perceive it.  If, contrary, recognize sustain 
new government Louisiana, converse made true. 
encourage hearts nerve arms twelve thousand 
adhere work, argue it, it, fight 
it, feed it, grow it, complete success. 
colored man too, seeing united him, inspired 
vigilance, energy, end.  Grant 
desires elective attain sooner saving 
already advanced steps toward running backward 
them?  Concede new government Louisiana 
egg shall sooner 
egg it. 
 
Again, reject Louisiana also reject one vote favor 
proposed amendment national Constitution.  meet 
proposition argued three-fourths 
States attempted secession necessary 
ratify amendment.  commit 
say ratification would sure 
persistently questioned, ratification three-fourths 
States would unquestioned  repeat 
question: Louisiana brought proper practical relation 
Union sooner sustaining discarding new State 
government?  said Louisiana apply generally 
States.  yet great pertain State, 
important sudden changes occur State, 
withal new unprecedented whole case exclusive 
inflexible plan safely prescribed details 
exclusive inflexible plan would surely become new 
 Important principles may must inflexible. 
 
present situation, phrase goes, may duty make 
new announcement people South.  
shall fail act satisfied action proper. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER J. W. FELL, DECEMBER 20, 1859 
 
born February 12, Hardin County, Kentucky.  parents 
born Virginia, families, 
perhaps say.  mother, died tenth year, 
family name reside Adams, 
others Macon County, Illinois.  Abraham 
Lincoln, County, Virginia, Kentucky 
year two later killed Indians, 
battle, laboring open farm 
 ancestors, went Virginia 
County, Pennsylvania.  effort identify New 
England family name ended nothing definite 
similarity Christian names families, 
like. 
 
father, death father, six years age, 
grew literally without education.  removed Kentucky 
County, Indiana, eighth year.  reached new 
home time State came Union.  wild 
region, many bears wild animals still 
grew up.  schools, called, 
qualification ever required teacher beyond 
rule three.  supposed 
understand Latin happened looked 
upon  absolutely nothing excite ambition 
education.  course, came age, know much.  Still, 
somehow, could read, write, rule three, 
all.  school since.  little advance 
upon store education picked time time 
pressure necessity. 
 
raised farm work, continued till  
twenty-one came Illinois, Macon County.  got New Salem, 
time Sangamon, Menard County, remained year 
sort clerk 
 
came Black Hawk War; elected captain 
volunteers, success gave pleasure 
since.  went campaign, ran legislature 
year time ever beaten 
people.  next three succeeding elections 
elected legislature.  candidate afterward.  
legislative period studied law, removed Springfield 
it.  1846 elected lower House 
Congress.  candidate  1849 1854, 
practised law ever before. 
Always Whig generally Whig electoral 
making active  losing interest politics 
repeal Missouri Compromise aroused again.  done 
since pretty well known. 
 
personal description thought desirable, may said 
am, height, six feet four flesh, weighing 
average one hundred eighty dark 
coarse black hair eyes.  marks 
 
 
 
 
NOTES 
 
 
COMMUNICATION PEOPLE SANGAMON COUNTY 
 
announcement political principles appeared Sangamon 
time newspaper published Springfield. 
present text, differs details found 
various Lincoln's works, follows original, except 
changing 
 
 
 
PERPETUATION POLITICAL INSTITUTIONS. 
 
close address resolutions passed requesting 
author furnish copy press, reason 
published year later.  present text taken 
Sangamon  Lincoln one 

 
life Lincoln showed marked respect law, 
present warning consequences 
sounded young orator 
perfectly sincere expression profound 
 
gates  Matthew  quotation repeated 
speech delivered twenty-four years later, 
civil war 
 
 
 
SPRINGFIELD SPEECH 
 
summer 1858 Lincoln delivered two important anti-slavery 
speeches Springfield.  first important 
made June close Republican State Convention, 
Lincoln declared party candidate United States 
Senate.  second, delivered month later, part defence 
explanation earlier speech, severely 
Lincoln's old Judge Douglas.  first Springfield speech 
carefully prepared submitted several 
Lincoln's friends, objected opening statement 
sure lose speaker position 
candidate.  Lincoln refused make change, however, saying 
preferred go truth, necessary. 
 
date given June 
 
house divided  Suggested Matthew 25, 
Mark iii.  quotation already used Whig 
circular signed Lincoln two others, letter written 
1863 Lincoln speaks government house divided itself. 
 
 doctrine "squatter sovereignty" 
recognized bill, introduced Senate January 4, 1854, 
Douglas, give territorial government district west 
Missouri Iowa known Nebraska.  similar bill 
introduced year Douglas.  original form bill 
contained reference repeal Missouri Compromise, 
form passed declared Missouri Compromise 
 terms compromise slavery 
restricted territory south degrees 30 minutes. 
 
Scott  decision rendered March 6, 1857. 
 
 statement situation Kansas 
Connecticut, received name 
main drawn up. 
 
 1857 convention held 
draw state constitution.  convention 
advocates slavery majority instrument 
prepared interfere slavery wherever already existed 
territory.  advocates refused accept 
constitution.  question admitting Kansas 
Lecompton Constitution presented Congress, Douglas, 
accordance principles popular sovereignty, broke 
party opposed effort.  present point view Lincoln 
seem Douglas justice. 
 
Franklin,  reference Stephen A. Douglas, 
President Franklin Chief Justice Roger B. Taney, James 
 Lincoln's perfectly sincere belief deliberate 
conspiracy among men perpetuate slavery, 
many Republicans time, sustained impartial 
later 
 
 John McLean Benjamin R. Curtis 
strongly opposed Dred Scott decision.  Curtis, 
Whig Massachusetts resigned year, wrote 
minority decision. 
 
 P. Chase time Senator Ohio. 
Daniel Mace Democrat representative, opposed 
Nebraska Bill. 
 
 Samuel justice Supreme Court. 
 
living dog better dead  ix. 4. 
 
 
 
FREEPORT DEBATE. 
 
Lincoln-Douglas Joint Debates took place seven towns various 
parts Illinois August October 15, 1858.  proposal 
meetings made Lincoln note addressed Douglas. 
length debate division time speakers 
stated opening sentence speech given 
speeches, far actual form 
concerned, later collected newspaper 
slight revision authors published 1860 Columbus, 
Ohio.  present text taken, contained 
addition number speeches delivered Lincoln Douglas earlier 
1858 two speeches made Lincoln Ohio 1859.  Lincoln's 
statement close letter accompanying 
copy book, characteristic "I wish 
precisely copies without comment 
 Columbus issue used Republican campaign 
document large numbers 
 
Freeport Debate, second held 
afternoon August  exception Debate, 
largely attended seven effect 
upon campaign regarded important. 
 
Douglas  informal speeches Lincoln 
frequently committed errors speech like this.  Even 
presidential period shows marked tendency use 
 carefully written addresses language 
almost always correct. 
 
Slave  statute passed 1850 
regulation return escaped slaves owners.  
answer question Lincoln showed clearly 
term understood. 
 
 reply question follows: "I 
answer Mr. Lincoln heard answer hundred times 
every stump Illinois opinion people 
territory can, lawful means, exclude slavery limits prior 
formation State Constitution."  claimed 
question put Lincoln spite several 
friends, believed would give Douglas advantage.  
here, equally feared Springfield Speech, Lincoln proved 
superior  affirmative answer probably gained 
certainly lost presidency two years later. 
 
Republican State  reference meeting 
held Springfield, addressed  Lincoln 
present occasion.  Recent investigation seems show 
foundation charge exclusively 
meeting Abolitionists, included many men held 
political views Lincoln.  Douglas honestly believed 
resolutions read Ottawa meeting genuine 
greatly mistake. 
 
 amendment offered Douglas. 
 
 
 
COOPER INSTITUTE ADDRESS. 
 
address, Lincoln's first important direct message people 
East, carefully  text volume 
taken _The issued campaign document. 
 
Northwestern Territory.  district present States 
Ohio, Illinois, Indiana, Michigan, Wisconsin, ceded 
national government original States. 
 
 Douglas constantly referred opponents 
 Ottawa Debate affirmed 1854 
Lincoln Trumbull arranged form "an Abolition party, 
name disguise Republican 
 
 principle defined Douglas 
follows: "My principle recognize State Union 
equal sovereignty." 
 
John  John Brown New 
taken active part Kansas 1856.  
summer 1859 engaged attempt free slaves Virginia. 
Arsenal Harper's Ferry, 
body  
extreme anti-slavery people regarded best 
expression spirit given Mrs. Ward 
 speech Congress January 16, 1860, 
Senator Douglas stated deliberate conviction 
Harper's Ferry crime logical, inevitable result 
doctrines teachings Republican 
 
_The Southampton  reference slave 
insurrection occurred Va. 
 
 P. North so-called 
poor white class, author book effects slavery, 
entitled _The Impending Crisis  special reference 
recent agreement among Republican representatives 
publish book circulation doubtful States. 
 
 
 
FAREWELL SPEECH. 
 
beautiful little address delivered platform 
car bore away old home.  
preserved two slightly differing neither probably 
exactly words  Springfield papers, 
followed Herndon, gave report speech 
much rare 
 
 
 
FIRST INAUGURAL ADDRESS. 
 
First Inaugural carefully written Springfield month 
 Contrary usual practice public speaking, 
Lincoln read  address received 
immense audience assembled front general 
impression produced North  Southern 
Abolition press severely regard 
form content. 
 
_The mystic chords  passage suggested Mr. 
Seward, address submitted  
customary genius paid verbal 
 
 
 
RESPONSE 
 
speech delivered delegation New 
called White House evening March 4.  Two similar 
preserved day.  present address 
first time, New York 
 
 
 
LETTER HORACE GREELEY. 
 
letter August 19, headed "The Prayer Twenty 
began follows: "I tell 
must know great proportion 
election, desire suppression 
Rebellion country, disappointed 
deeply pained policy seem  Lincoln 
good reason complain "an impatient dictatorial 
sufficiently shown closing sentence, "I render 
hearty obedience laws  
following issue contained long 
subject.  influence Northern States 
Lincoln realized importance making clear 
statement policy 
 
 
 
SECOND ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
long statement conditions finances 
different departments, President devoted remainder space 
discussion compensated emancipation, already 
made recommendation earlier year special message 
Congress.  concluding paragraph elevated style 

 
 
 
EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION. 
 
first draft Proclamation submitted Cabinet 
preceding July, remark fully determined issue 
immediately.  Secretary Seward suggested issue postponed 
could given country supported military 
success.  President saw force suggestion waited 
battle  Preliminary Proclamation 
dated September 22, 1862.  reply two days later 
President said: "I trust God made 
 
military  phrase inserted concluding 
sentence, suggested Secretary Chase, furnishing 
authority President felt could free 
slaves enemy.  Proclamation refer slaves 
held persons rebellion. 
 
 
 
LETTER J. C. CONKLING. 
 
Mr. Conkling personal friend President, formal 
letter accompanied following 
 
"MY DEAR 
 
"I cannot leave now.  Herewith letter  one 
best public  one 
slowly God bless you, good Union men." 
 
spite letter published New York 
several days meeting. 
 
know fully one know.  portion paragraph 
words end original letter, added 

 
 
 
GETTYSBURG ADDRESS. 
 
standard text address agree exactly either 
original written form form 
combination these, made Lincoln days later.  
contemporary newspaper reports referred 
address, speech, 
 
 thought contained sentence 
original Lincoln, traced back several 
 probably suggested Lincoln following 
passage address known 
read: direct self-government people, 
people, 
 
 
 
SECOND INAUGURAL ADDRESS. 
 
address marked length character, 
President Lincoln's first official communication.  main 
thoughts two quotations occur letter written 
May 30, 1864. 
 
us judge not,  Adapted Matthew vii. 1. 
 
unto  Matthew 
 
 accidental passage 
objected address, serious. 
 
judgments  9.  opening words 
last paragraph best expression ever given spirit 
Lincoln, another occasion said, "I never willingly planted 
thorn man's 
 
 
 
LAST SPEECH. 
 
address, presidential period exception 
First Inaugural, delivered great crowd gathered 
front White House, four days Lincoln's 
evening before, similar occasion, requested people 
wait could prepare remarks, adding wished 
careful, everything said got  newspaper reports 
following day state received great 
address special interest attitude 
President toward difficult question Reconstruction. 
 
_The evacuation Petersburg  April 2 3 
 General Lee surrendered April 9. 
 
_The new constitution  constitution adopted 
September 5, 1861. 
 
_The proposed  amendment, abolishing slavery 
throughout United States, proposed 1864, failed 
receive necessary two-thirds vote House Representatives. 
passed 1865, receiving 
necessary number States went effect December 
year. 
 
 
 
 
 
CROME YELLOW 
 

 
 
 
 
CHAPTER I. 
 
Along particular stretch line express ever passed. 

Denis knew names heart. 
West and, finally, 
always got out, leaving 
train goodness knew 
green heart England. 
 
West now. next station, 
thank Denis took piled neatly 
corner opposite own. one must 
something do. finished, sank back seat 
closed eyes. extremely 
 
Oh, two hours cut clean life; two hours 
might done much, perfect poem, 
example, read one book. Instead 
rose smell 

 
Two One hundred twenty minutes. Anything might done 
time. Anything. Nothing. Oh, hundreds hours, 
done them? them, precious minutes though 
Denis spirit, condemned 
utterly right sit 
occupy corner seats 
None, none, none. 
 
Misery distress possessed him. 
twenty-three, conscious fact. 
 
train came last. Denis 
jumped up, hat eyes, pile 
leaned window shouted porter, seized 
either hand, put order open door. 
last safely 
platform, ran train towards 
 
"A said felt 
man action. guard paid attention, continued 
hand out, one one, 
"A Denis repeated. "A green name 

 
"All good time, sir," said guard large, 
man naval One home, drinking tea, 
surrounded numerous family. tone must 
spoken children "All good time, sir." 
Denis's man action 
 
left called later, pushed 
always took bicycle went country. 
part theory One day one would get six 
o'clock away 
within radius twenty miles always churches 
seen course 
Somehow never get seen, nice feel 
bicycle there, one fine morning one really might 
get 
 
top long hill led station, 
felt spirits world, found, good. 
blue harvests ridge along 
road led him, changed 
good. overcome beauty 
deeply ridge beneath him. 
repeated word slowly, trying find 
term give expression 
made gesture hand, though 
achieved expression air, almost fell 
word describe curves little 
fine lines human body, informed 

 
good French. Le de 
one ever read French novel phrase didn't 
day would dictionary use 


 
really must find word. Curves little 
lines cup moulded round woman's seemed 
huge divine body rested 
seemed getting 
nearer wanted. mind wandered 
ever 
point. beauty words. 
 
Becoming aware outer world, found 
road plunged down, 
considerable There, opposite little higher 
valley, stood Crome, put 
view Crome pleasant over. three 
rose among dark trees 
garden. house full old brick 
ripe rich was, time, 
hill becoming gaining 
speed spite grip 
moment down. Five minutes later passing 
gate great front door stood 
open. left bicycle leaning wall walked in. 
would take surprise. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER II. 
 
took nobody nobody take. 
Denis wandered room empty room, looking pleasure 
familiar pictures little signs life 
lay scattered there. rather glad 
out; amusing house though one 
dead, deserted sort life would 
reconstruct would people 
empty long respectable 
course, one couldn't publicly admit it) rather boring 

huge 
stood, comfort among 
pale 
painted 
modern library, dark, 
floor rich 
English, great 
table, 
animal 
could one reconstruct much 
Henry Wimbush long library, something Anne, 
perhaps, all. Among 
ten generations living left 
 
Lying table saw book 
picked opened it. call 
"a read 
 
silence dark lights 
bright 
 
put again, shook head, sighed. "What genius 
reflected, nearly six months 
since book glad think would never 
write anything sort again. could reading it, 
Anne, liked think so. Perhaps, too, 
last recognised 
whose movements like swaying young tree 
"The Woman called poem. 
given book came out, hoping poem would tell 
hadn't dared say. never referred it. 
 
shut eyes saw vision red velvet swaying 
little sometimes together 
quarters hour late, table, 
anxiety, Oh, 
 
occurred perhaps might boudoir. 
would go see. Mrs. Wimbush's boudoir 
central garden little staircase 
hall. Denis tapped door. "Come in." 
Ah, there; rather hoped wouldn't be. opened 
door. 
 
Priscilla Wimbush lying rested 
knees thoughtfully end silver 
 
said, looking up. "I'd forgotten 
 
"Well, am, I'm said Denis "I'm awfully 

 
Mrs. Wimbush laughed. voice, deep 
Everything large, square, 
face, nose little eyes, whole 
lofty elaborate curiously improbable 
shade Looking her, Denis always thought 

 
"That's I'm going Sing sing Sing 

 
Today wearing purple silk high row 
Royal 
Family, made look ever like something 
 
"What time?" asked. 
 
"Well," said Denis, hesitated, almost 
tremendously amusing account London doings ripe ready 
mind. would pleasure give "To begin 

 
Mrs. Wimbush's question 
call asked answer. little 
polite 
 
"You find busy said, without even aware 
interrupted him. 
 
little Denis decided reserve story 
ears. contented himself, way saying rather 

 
"Did tell won four hundred Grand National 
 
"Yes," replied, still must told 
least six times. 
 
isn't it? Everything Old Days, 
Stars help me, used lose thousands. 
paused look four hundred Grand 
National. That's 
 
Denis would liked hear Old Days. 
discreet and, still more, something 
up; knew. Old old then, 
course, lost great deal money, dropped 
every country. 
too. number thousands varied different 
put Henry Wimbush forced sell 
four five 
Americans. crisis. first 
time life Henry asserted himself, good effect, 

 
gay existence come abrupt end. 
spent almost time Crome, rather 
consolation New Thought 
passion still possessed her, Henry, 
fellow allowed forty pounds month 
money. days spent casting 
horses, invested money stars 
too, large notebook 
registered 
process two one 
delicate difficult one. match 
conflict vast 
complicated wondered sometimes made 
mistake 
 
pity don't believe things, Denis, 
said Mrs. Wimbush distinct voice. 
 
"I can't say feel so." 
 
"Ah, that's don't know it's like faith. You've 
idea amusing exciting life becomes believe. 
happens means nothing ever 
makes life know. Crome. Dull 
you'd no, don't find so. don't regret Old Days 
bit. picked sheet paper 
lying explained. 
thought I'd like little 
Infinite keep waved 
hand. "And there's next world one's 
Mrs. saying you're ill, Christian 
Mrs. It's One's never dull 
moment. can't think used get Old Days. 
about, that's running about. 
tea, dinner, supper every day. course, 
wasn't much left afterwards. There's rather 
good thing Barbecue-Smith's new book. it?" 
 
sat reached book lying little table 
head 
 
"Do know him, way?" asked. 
 

 
"Mr. 
 
Denis knew Barbecue-Smith name Sunday 
papers. wrote Conduct Life. might even author 
"What Young Girl Ought 
 
"No, said. 
 
"I've invited next turned pages 
book. "Here's passage thinking of. marked it. always mark 
things 
 
Holding book almost length, somewhat 
making suitable free hand, began 
read, slowly, 
 
thousand quarter million 
looked page movement 
orange nodded Denis looked it, 
Real Thing one 
Complete one sees 
 

 
orange must 
again. 
 
Rich, 
pride Great, pleasures High 

 
voice, risen tone, sentence 
sentence, dropped suddenly reply. 
 
nothing. seed thin 
things matter happen heart. 
Seen things thousand times 

 
Mrs. Wimbush lowered book. isn't it?" said. 
 
Denis preferred hazard opinion, uttered 

 
"Ah, it's fine book this, beautiful said Priscilla, 
let pages back, one one, "And here's 
passage Soul 
know." held book read. Friend mine 
Pool garden. lies little wild 
roses among forth amorous 
summer long. Within pool 
air come drink 
Ah, reminds me," Priscilla exclaimed, 
book uttering big profound reminds 
things going since 
last. gave village people leave come 
You've idea things 
 
leaned forward, speaking confidential every 
uttered deep laughter. 
pair make 
doubt laughter broke again. Denis laughed too. 
Barbecue-Smith tossed floor. 
 
"It's time went see said 
went across room, 
beneath Denis followed her, 

 
     "That's I'm going Sing sing 
     Sing 
 
little bit 
 
 
 
CHAPTER III. 
 
terrace front house long narrow 
bounded along outer edge stone Two little 
brick stood either end. house ground 
away, terrace high one; 
sloping beneath drop thirty 
feet. Seen below, high terrace wall, built like 
house almost menacing aspect 
whose parapet one looked 
across distances level eye. Below, 
solid masses yew trees, lay 
Beyond stretched park, 
green grass, and, bottom 
valley, gleam narrow river. farther side stream 
land rose long Looking 
valley, right, one saw line 
 
planted shade one little 
rest party already assembled 
Denis Priscilla made appearance. Henry Wimbush begun 
pour tea. one men 
farther side might thirty, might anything. Denis 
known almost long could remember. years 
pale, rather handsome face never grown 
like pale grey hat always winter 
calm, without expression. 
 
Next him, separated rest world 
almost sat Jenny 
perhaps thirty, nose 
wore brown hair two 
ears. secret sat apart, looking 
world piercing eyes. think men 
women something Denis never able 
Jenny little 
Even interior seemed amusing her, 
smiling herself, brown eyes like bright round 

 
side serious, Mary 
face shone nearly twenty-three, one 
wouldn't guessed it. short hair, like hung 
bell elastic gold cheeks. large blue china eyes, 
whose expression one often puzzled earnestness. 
 
Next Mary small man rigid 
chair. appearance Mr. Scogan like one extinct 
nose dark eye 
shining nothing soft gracious 
him. skin brown face dry 
hands hands movements 
marked abrupt 
speech thin, Henry Wimbush's exact 
Mr. Scogan looked far older and, time, far 
alive gentle face like 
grey 
 
Mr. Scogan might look like extinct Gombauld 
altogether essentially old-fashioned natural histories 
might figured steel type 
honour time commonly fell Lord 
Indeed, hair less Gombauld would 
completely even, Gombauld 
young thirty, 
teeth luminous large dark eyes. Denis looked 
jealous wrote well Gombauld 
painted Still more, moment, Gombauld 
easy confidence manner. surprising 
Anne like him? Like might even something worse, 
Denis reflected walked side long 
grass 
 
Gombauld Mr. Scogan much lowered presented 
back new advanced towards 
Gombauld leaning it; face moved smiled, 
made quick hands. 
chair came sound lazy laughter. Denis started heard 
it. well knew it! emotions 
pace. 
 
low Anne nearer lying 
long, slender body attitude 
Within setting light brown hair face pretty 
almost indeed moments 
seemed nothing face, 
pale blue eyes, expressed 
lazy mask Henry Wimbush's 
countenance one Wimbush ran family, 
appearing female members blank across 
like gay dancing fundamental 
passed Anne's light 
changing expressions many smiling 
Denis looked called it, 
good reason. mouth either side 
two tiny formed cheeks. 
slightly malicious little 
half-closed eyes, eyes themselves, bright 
laughing narrowed 
 
preliminary Denis found empty chair 
Gombauld Jenny sat down. 
 
"How you, shouted her. 
 
Jenny nodded smiled mysterious silence, though subject 
health secret could publicly 
 
London since went Anne inquired depth 
chair. 
 
moment come; tremendously amusing waiting 
"Well," said Denis, smiling "to begin 
 
"Has Priscilla told great Henry Wimbush 
leaned promising 
 
"To begin said Denis "there 
 
Mr. Wimbush went softly "we fifty 
tree bored 
interesting Whether laid 
fifteenth century, 
 
Denis listened gloomily. said, Mr. Wimbush 
"quite helped another 
didn't even want tell tale London now; 

 
time past Mary's grave blue eyes fixed upon him. "What 
writing asked. would nice 
little literary conversation. 
 
"Oh, said 
 
Mr. Scogan word. "You've writing 

 
"Yes." 
 
"Not 
 
"Yes." 
 
"My poor exclaimed Mr. Scogan. "What about?" 
 
Denis felt rather "Oh, usual things, know." 
 
"Of course," Mr. Scogan "I'll describe plot you. Little 
never good always 
passes usual public school usual university 
comes London, lives among bowed 
melancholy thought; carries whole weight universe upon 
shoulders. writes novel 
end book, 
luminous 
 
Denis Mr. Scogan described plan novel 
accuracy made effort laugh. "You're 
entirely said. "My novel least like that." 
heroic reflected, two written. 
would tear evening 
 
Mr. Scogan paid attention went on: "Why 
young men continue write things entirely 
Professional 
might find interesting turn sometimes 
philosophical 
can't expect ordinary adult man, like myself, 
much moved story spiritual all, 
even England, even Germany Russia, 
problems 
utterly unlike ordinary adult pure 
don't much present people like 
description mental processes boring 
ordinary reader piece pure serious book 
regarded book 
regarded like 
really worth writing again. stock 
stock man 

 
"I'm sorry hear I'm that," said Gombauld. 
 
"Not all, dear Mr. Scogan explain. "As 
I've doubt 
forms, must honestly admit it, you're 

 
"I entirely disagree you," exclaimed Mary. somehow always 
breath speech little 
"I've known great many I've always found 
Especially 
saw great deal Paris 
 
"Ah, you're Mary, you're said Mr. 
Scogan. "You 
 
flush pleasure turned Mary's face moon. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER IV. 
 
Denis woke next morning find sun sky 
decided wear white 
black silk new 
White obvious choice, something rather 
pleasing notion black patent lay bed 
several minutes considering 
 
went final looked 
glass. hair might 
reflected. was, hint 
it. good. made height 
chin nose might longer, 
would pass. eyes might blue coat 
well cut and, made seem 
actually was. legs, white long 
Satisfied, descended stairs. party already 
finished found alone 
 
"I hope slept said. 
 
"Yes, isn't Jenny replied, giving two rapid little 
"But awful last 
 
Parallel straight lines, Denis reflected, meet 
might talk ever sleep till 
end time. one ever establish contact 
parallel straight lines. Jenny little parallel 

 
"They said, helping 
"Don't think so? 
 
"No. always go bed One much safer lying down." 
 
"Why?" 
 
said making "because lightning 
goes flat ways. you're lying you're 

 
"That's 
 
"It's 
 
silence. Denis finished helped 
lack anything better say, Mr. Scogan's 
absurd phrase reason running head, turned 
Jenny asked: 
 
"Do consider repeat 
question several times Jenny got hang it. 
 
"No," said, rather last heard Denis 
saying. "Certainly not. anyone suggesting 
 
"No," said Denis. "Mr. Scogan told Mary one." 
 
"Did he?" Jenny lowered voice. "Shall tell think 
man? think he's slightly 
 
made entered 
closed door. Denis could induce say anything 
more, could induce even smiled him, 
smiled occasionally nodded. 
 
Denis went terrace smoke pipe 
read morning paper. hour later, Anne came down, found 
still reading. time got Court Circular 
got meet 
white across 
 
"Why, Denis," exclaimed, "you look perfectly sweet white 

 
Denis taken possible "You 
speak though child new said, show 

 
"But that's feel you, Denis 
 
"Then to." 
 
"But can't help it. I'm much older you." 
 
"I like that," said. years 
 
"And look perfectly sweet white 
shouldn't say so? put on, didn't think 
going look sweet them?" 
 
"Let's go said Denis. put out; conversation 
taken unexpected turn. 
different lead with, "You look 
morning," something kind, answer, "Do 
pregnant silence. got 
first pride 
 
part garden foot terrace 
pool beauty depend colour much 
beautiful sun. silver 
water, dark yew trees remained, hours 
features scene. black 
white. colour lay one side 
separated huge wall 
passed opened wall, 
found yourself, suddenly, world 
July borders sun. Within high brick 
walls garden like great 
 
Denis held open little iron gate "It's like 
passing said, took 
deep breath air. 
let 
 
ye sweet round equal 
Whose report ear tell, eye 

 
"You bad habit said Anne. "As never know 
author, find 
 
Denis "It's fault one's education. Things somehow 
seem real vivid one apply somebody 
phrase them. lots lovely names 
bring 
feel you've argument mere 
sound them. That's comes higher 
 
"You may regret said "I'm ashamed lack 
it. Look Aren't 
 
faces golden kings like 
way cling flowers pick 
look 
ground. look That's literary I'm 
afraid. Education again. always comes back that." silent. 
 
Anne sat bench stood shade old 
"I'm said. 
 
sit down, walked front 
bench, little 
One reads many, one sees people little 
world. Great thick books universe mind 
You've idea many are. must read twenty thirty 
last five years. Twenty 
that, one's pushed world." 
 
went walking down. voice rose, fell, silent 
moment, talked on. moved hands, sometimes waved 
arms. Anne looked listened quietly, though 
nice boy, to-day looked 
 
One entered world, Denis pursued, ideas 
everything. One philosophy tried make life fit it. 
One lived first made one's philosophy fit 
facts, things horribly ideas, even 
difficult them, simple. world ideas 
everything life 
surprising one horribly Denis came 
halt front bench, asked last question 
stretched arms stood instant attitude 
let fall sides. 
 
"My poor Anne really 
stood front white "But one 
suffer seems 
 
"You're like cried Denis "You regard specimen 
Well, suppose 
 
"No, no," drew gesture 
indicated sit beside her. sat down. "Why can't 
take things granted asked. "It's 
much 
 
"Of course is," said Denis. "But it's learnt 
twenty got rid 

 
"I've always taken things said Anne. "It seems 
obvious. One pleasant things, ones. There's 
nothing 
 
you. But, then, born trying 
make one. take nothing 
enjoy nothing comes along. Beauty, art, 
invent justification everything that's 
Otherwise can't enjoy easy conscience. make little 
story beauty pretend something truth 
say art process one 
divine reality Pleasure one 
roads union 
women, perpetually 
they're broad think I'm 
beginning see whole thing! It's 
incredible anyone escaped 
 
"It's still incredible me," said Anne, "that anyone 
victim them. like see believing men 
amused malice smile planted two 
little either side mouth, half-closed 
eyes shone laughter. "What Denis, nice 
young wife, fixed little congenial regular 

 
"What need you." ought 
wanted say. could say it. desire 
fought "What need you." shouted 
words, sound issued lips. looked 
Couldn't see going inside him? Couldn't 
"What need you." would say it, 
would. 
 
"I think shall go said Anne. "It's 
opportunity passed. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER V. 
 
Mr. Wimbush taken see Home 
standing, six Wimbush, Mr. Scogan, Denis, 
Gombauld, Anne, low wall looking 
one 
 
"This good said Henry Wimbush. "She 
 
Mary echoed turned astonished blue eyes 
towards Mr. Wimbush, let fall mass 
vital 
 
immense side middle round, 
black double line presented 
assault army small, 
mother's old stirred sometimes 
uttered little One small 
unable secure place 
ran trying 
push among stronger brothers even tight 
little black towards 
 
"There said Mary. "You're quite right. It's 

 
"The next Mr. Wimbush went on, "has done 
five shall give another chance. 
better next time, shall fat kill her. There's 
pointed towards farther old beast, isn't he? he's 
getting past He'll go too." 
 
"How Anne exclaimed. 
 
"But eminently said Mr. Scogan. "In 
farm model sound government. Make 
make work, they're past working breeding 
them." 
 
seems mostly said Anne. 
 
Denis began 
long back. animal moved little bring 
within easier range instrument 
stood stock still, softly 
years sides grey 
 
"What pleasure is," said Denis, "to somebody 
believe enjoy quite much 
one could always kind little expense 

 
gate sound heavy 
 
said Henry Wimbush. 
 
sir," old answered. 
labourers solid man, still grey 
dignified Grave, weighty 
manner, air great English 
statesman century. halted 
moment looked silence 
broken sound sharp 
turned last, slowly 
everything, addressed Henry Wimbush. 
 
"Look them, sir," said, motion hand towards 
called 
 
indeed," Mr. Wimbush agreed. 
 
"I said Mr. Scogan, old 
slowly dignity. "What wisdom, judgment, sense 
called Yes. wish could, 
much justice, say, called 
 
walked towards 
Five white taking air fine morning, even 
doing, met way. hesitated, then, 
lifted necks rushed 
horribly Red 
another stood 
calm face wore 
expression melancholy gazed eyes 
thoughtfully tangible memories earlier 
swallowed again. tail 
side seemed nothing 
short red short 

 
said Henry Wimbush. he's getting 
little old, like 
 
him," Mr. Scogan delicate 
precision 
 
give animals little holiday producing 
asked Anne. "I'm sorry poor 
 
Mr. Wimbush shook head. said, "I rather like seeing 
fourteen grow one grew before. spectacle much 
life 
 
"I'm glad hear say so," Gombauld broke 
that's want. like everything ought increase 
multiply hard can." 
 
Gombauld grew Everybody ought ought 
them, Mary ought 
point 
Mr. Scogan ought pass intelligence little 
Denis little bull turned head see 
regarded stick several turned 
back satisfied, seemed, nothing 
life. Life, life, still 
life. bull 
 
Standing back little apart, Denis 
examined Gombauld, 
others stood round, Wimbush, calm polite 
beneath grey Mary, parted lips eyes shone 
indignation convinced Anne looked 
eyes, beside stood Mr. Scogan, bolt 
attitude strangely 
grace even suggested soft movement. 
 
Gombauld ceased talking, Mary, flushed opened 
mouth him. could utter 
word Mr. Scogan's voice pronounced opening 
discourse. hope getting much word 
Mary resign herself. 
 
dear 
eloquence must prove inadequate world belief 
mere 
Applied Science presented 
world another precious even means 
love wish it, 
entirely free god; may 
broken will. course next 
world may see complete look forward 
great Miss Anna Seward, 
scientific 
descendants experiment succeed. 
generation take place system. vast state 
upon supply world 
population family system society, 
find new 
beautifully free, like gay 
flower flower world." 
 
"It sounds said Anne. 
 
"The distant future always 
 
Mary's china blue eyes, serious astonished ever, 
fixed Mr. Scogan. said. "Do really think so? 

 
 
 
CHAPTER VI. 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith arrived time tea Saturday afternoon. 
short man, large head 
earlier middle age absence neck, 
reading 
world's great men marked 
simple obvious Greatness nothing less 
harmonious faculties head 
shorter neck, closely two approach one 
another; 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith belonged old school 
head hair 
back broad low forehead. somehow always seemed 
slightly, ever slightly, younger days called 
longer. teacher now, kind 
books comfort spiritual teaching 
hundred twentieth thousand. 
 
Priscilla received every mark never 
Crome before; showed round house. Mr. Barbecue-Smith 
full 
 
"So kept rich, rather 
voice. 
 
Priscilla latest book. thought 
said large, jolly way. 
 
"I'm happy think found said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. 
 
"Oh, bit thought 

 
"I knew would like that. came me, know, 
waved hand indicate world. 
 
went garden tea. Mr. Barbecue-Smith duly 

 
"Mr. Stone writer too," said Priscilla, introduced Denis. 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith smiled and, looking Denis 
expression "And sort things 

 
Denis and, make matters worse, felt 
Priscilla sense putting 
himself. 
used pen Mr. Barbecue-Smith's question answered, 
"Oh, nothing much, looked away. 
 
"Mr. Stone one younger Anne's voice. 
her, smiled back 
 
said Mr. Denis's 
arm "The noble 
 
soon tea Mr. Barbecue-Smith excused himself; 
writing Priscilla quite understood. 
retired 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith came ten 
good and, descended stairs, smiled 
rubbed large white hands together. someone 
playing softly wondered could 
be. One young no, Denis, got 
hurriedly embarrassment came room. 
 
"Do go on, go on," said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. "I fond 

 
"Then couldn't possibly go on," Denis replied. "I make 
 
silence. Mr. Barbecue-Smith stood back 
memory last could 
control interior still went smiling 
himself. last turned Denis. 
 
"You asked, "don't you?" 
 
"Well, little, know." 
 
"How many words find write 
 
"I don't think I've ever 
 
"Oh, ought to, ought to. It's 
 
Denis exercised memory. "When I'm good said, "I fancy 
review four sometimes 
takes much 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith nodded. "Yes, three hundred words hour 
walked middle room, turned round 
confronted Denis again. many words wrote 
evening five half-past 
 
"I can't 
 
"No, must five half-past two 
half 
 
hundred Denis 
 
"No, no, Mr. Barbecue-Smith's expanded face shone 
again." 
 

 
"No." 
 
"I give up," said Denis. found couldn't much interest 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith's writing. 
 
"Well, I'll tell you. Three thousand eight 
 
Denis opened eyes. "You must get lot done said. 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith suddenly became extremely confidential. pulled 
side Denis's sat it, began 
talk softly 
 
me," said, laying hand Denis's "You want 
make living you're young, you're Let 
give little sound 
 
fellow going do? Denis give 
introduction editor "John tell 
could sell light middle seven Mr. Barbecue-Smith 
arm several times went on. 
 
"The secret said, young man's 
secret writing 
 
Denis looked 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith repeated. 
 
"You mean native 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith nodded. 
 
"Oh, entirely agree you," said Denis. "But one 
hasn't got 
 
"That precisely question waiting said Mr. 
Barbecue-Smith. "You ask one one hasn't got 
Inspiration. Inspiration. 
It's simply question getting 
 
clock struck sign 
everybody always late Crome. Mr. Barbecue-Smith went on. 
 
"That's said. "I give made 
grateful murmur "I'll help find 
don't like see steady young man like 
best years life 
intellectual labour could completely 
Inspiration. myself, know it's like. till 
time writer like writer without 
Inspiration. wrote sheer hard work. 
Why, days never able words 
hour, what's more, often didn't sell sighed. 
"We said "we aren't much 
appreciated Denis wondered 
course, could 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith's besides, 
late now, Mr. Barbecue-Smith pursuing 
discourse. 
 
"At poor, unknown 
Now, paused made little 
moving fat hands away one another, 
fingers though exhibiting 
himself. Denis thought advertisement two 
wall, one black thin, white, 
Inspiration after. 
 
made said Mr. Barbecue-Smith 
"It came quite gentle lifted 
hand let fall back indicate descent 
"It one evening. writing first little book 
Conduct may read it; 
least hope think comfort many thousands. 
middle second 
written hundred words last hour, 
could get further. sat end pen looking 
electric light, hung table, little front 
me." indicated position lamp elaborate care. "Have 
ever looked bright light long time?" asked, 
turning Denis. Denis didn't think had. "You 
way," Mr. Barbecue-Smith went on. 
 
sounded terrific hall. Still sign 
others. Denis horribly 
 
"That's happened me," said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. "I 
lost consciousness like that." 
"When came to, found past written 
four thousand words. Four repeated, opening mouth 
wide thousand. come me." 
 
"What extraordinary thing," said Denis. 
 
"I afraid first. didn't seem didn't 
feel, somehow, quite right, quite fair, might almost say, 
produce literary Besides, afraid 
might written 
 
"And written Denis asked. 
 
"Certainly not," Mr. Barbecue-Smith replied, trace 
"Certainly not. mistakes 
generally writing. style, 
that, Inspiration 
came wrote whole like that. 
great success, everything written 
leaned forward Denis "That's 
said, "and that's could write too, 
effort, well." 
 
"But asked Denis, trying show deeply 
final 
 
"By getting touch 
ever read little book, 

 
Denis confess was, one few, perhaps 
one, Mr. Barbecue-Smith's works read. 
 
"Never mind, never said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. "It's little 
book connection Infinite. Get 
touch touch Universe. 
fact. follow me?" 
 
said Denis. "But don't find 
Universe sometimes 
 
"I don't allow Mr. Barbecue-Smith replied. "I it. 
bring work conscious 
 
Denis Mr. Barbecue-Smith's remarks 
sounded strangely like works, 
doubt. 
 
Like it." leaned forward, 
raised marked points made them, beating 
time, were, discourse. "Before go 
concentrate subject wish inspired about. Let us say 
writing humble ten minutes go 
think nothing supporting little brothers 
dull work well patiently done, mind 
great philosophical truths 
soul transformation evil 
golden hung little quotation 
"Then off. Two three hours later wake again, 
find inspiration done work. Thousands words, 
words, lie me. type neatly 
ready 
 
"It sounds wonderfully said Denis. 
 
"It is. great splendid divine things life 
wonderfully marks "When 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith continued, "I 
turning pages Dictionary Quotations Shakespeare 
comes hand. sets speak; 
Universe shall come flowing in, continuous 
see 
 
Denis nodded. Mr. Barbecue-Smith put hand pocket pulled 
notebook. "I train said, turning 
pages. "Just dropped corner carriage. 
find train good work. cleared 
read: 
 
"The Mountain Road may air pure there, 
one gets 
 
"The Things Really Matter happen 
 
Denis reflected, way Infinite sometimes repeated 
itself. 
 
Yes, Believing also believe 
God, see God, even things seem 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith looked notebook. "That last one," 
said, "is particularly subtle beautiful, don't think? Without 
Inspiration could never hit that." 
solemn 
commented addressed next 
 
"The candle gives Light, also 
 
Puzzled appeared Mr. Barbecue-Smith's forehead. "I don't 
exactly know said. "It's One could 
apply it, course Higher 
Lower Classes revolution. Yes, suppose 
that's is. it's it's rubbed 
chin thoughtfully. sounded again, seemed 
dinner growing roused Mr. Barbecue-Smith 
turned Denis. 
 
"You understand advise cultivate Inspiration. 
Let work you; turn 

 
sound feet stairs. Mr. Barbecue-Smith got up, 
laid hand instant Denis's shoulder, said: 
 
"No now. Another time. remember, rely absolutely 
discretion matter. sacred things one 
doesn't wish generally 
 
"Of course," said Denis. "I quite 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VII. 
 
Crome beds ancient pieces Huge 
like shining coloured 
Beds carved beds painted Beds 
rare Beds every date fashion 
time Sir Ferdinando, built house, time 
late eighteenth century, last family, 

 
finest Anne's bed. Sir Julius, son Sir Ferdinando, 
made wife's first Early 
expended art making 
it. body bed like great square 
roses carved high relief wooden 
among black 
carved golden roses 
four seated top 
supported wooden carved 

 
Anne reading bed. Two stood little table beside 
her, rich light face, bare arm shoulder took 
warm sort quality surface. 
carved golden shone among profound 
soft light, falling bed, 
broke among lingered broad 
blown absurd little 

 
discreet door. looked up. "Come in, come in." 
face, round within bell golden hair, 
round opening door. still, suit 
made 
 
Mary. "I thought I'd look moment say 
said, sat edge bed. 
 
Anne closed book. "That sweet you." 
 
"What looked book. 
isn't it?" tone Mary pronounced word 
implied almost infinite accustomed London 
associate people liked things, 
knew things world, 
mostly French. 
 
"Well, I'm afraid like it," said Anne. nothing 
said. silence followed rather one. Mary 
bottom Leaning 
back Anne waited wondered 
coming. 
 
"I'm awfully afraid said Mary last, bursting 
suddenly speech. pronounced words 
breath, new air almost 
phrase finished. 
 
"What's about?" 
 
"I said 
 
"Oh, see," said Anne. "But what?" 
 
Mary explain. "The natural began 
Anne cut 
 
"Yes, yes. understand. old 
rest. them?" 
 
"That's it," said Mary. "I'm afraid them. It's always dangerous 
repress one's I'm beginning symptoms 
like ones read books. constantly dream I'm 
falling sometimes even dream I'm 
It's symptoms 
 
"Are they?" 
 
"One may become one's careful. You've idea 
serious don't get rid time." 
 
"It sounds said Anne. "But don't see 
anything help you." 
 
"I thought I'd like talk you." 
 
"Why, course; I'm happy, Mary 
 
Mary drew deep breath. "I began 
"I presume may take granted intelligent 
young woman twenty-three lived society 
twentieth century 
 
"Well, confess still 
 
"But 
 
"No, many that's 
 
rather, getting rid 
 
"Exactly." 
 
"So much fundamental said Mary. 
expressed every feature round young face, 
large blue eyes. "We come next possessing 
experience. hope agreed knowledge desirable 
ignorance 
 
Obedient one could 
get whatever answer Anne gave assent proposition. 
 
"And equally hope, marriage is." 
 
"It is." 
 
said Mary. "And 
 
"Exactly." 
 
"There would therefore seem one 
 
"But knew that," Anne exclaimed, "before 
 
"Yes, it's said Mary. "One must things 
question 
 
"But question come in? You've reached possible 
could done. 
remains information someone 
like really rather someone you're love with, may express 

 
"But that's question comes in," Mary exclaimed. "I'm 
love 
 
you, wait till 
 
"But can't go night night I'm falling 
well. It's 
 
"Well, really course must 
something it; must find somebody 
 
"But thoughtful frown Mary's "It must somebody 
intelligent, somebody intellectual interests 
must somebody proper respect women, somebody who's 
prepared talk seriously work ideas 
work see, easy find right 

 
said Anne, "there three intelligent men 
house present time. There's Mr. Scogan, begin 
perhaps he's rather much genuine 
Gombauld Denis. Shall say choice limited last 

 
Mary nodded. "I think said, hesitated, 
certain air 
 
"What it?" 
 
"I said Mary, "whether really 
thought perhaps 
 
"It nice think me, Mary said Anne, 
smiling tight smile. "But far I'm concerned, 
entirely 
 
"I'm glad that," said Mary, looking "We 
confronted question: 
 
"I give It's matter 
 
"It's matter Mary "but 
must consider carefully 
 
"You must weighing said still 
trace smile mouth round half-closed 
eyes. "I won't run risk 
 
Mary began, "but less 
Mary's gave word special 
additional significance. uttered front 
mouth, opening people 
they, like works art, mostly 
French. important, don't think?" 
 
Anne held hand. "I won't said. "You must make 

 
Mary went 
Rather dangerous one thinks Latin attitude 
towards then, sometimes wonder whether Denis altogether 
whether isn't rather It's 
think?" 
 
"I'm said Anne. "I refuse take 
 
Mary sighed. "Well," said, "I think better go bed think 
it." 
 
said Anne. 
 
door Mary turned round. said, wondered 
said words Anne smiling curious way. 
probably nothing, reflected. Anne often smiled apparent 
probably "I hope shan't dream falling 
wells 
 
said Anne. 
 
Mary nodded. "Yes, much 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VIII. 
 
Breakfast Sunday morning hour later 
Priscilla, usually made public appearance 
presence. Dressed black cross 
well customary string round neck, 
enormous Sunday paper concealed extreme 
outer world. 
 
"I see said, mouth full, "by four 
sun would account it!" 
 
remarked Mr. Barbecue-Smith heartily one 
"so thoroughly 
 
sitting next him, woke suddenly start. 
"What?" said. "What?" 
 
"So repeated Mr. Barbecue-Smith. 
 
Jenny looked him, surprised. course 
 
beginning Mrs. Wimbush Sunday paper, 
square, face midst orange 
"I see there's new series articles next world 
said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. "This one's called 
Land 
 
echoed Mr. closing eyes. 
Land. beautiful name. 
 
Mary taken seat next night careful 
consideration decided Denis. might less talent 
Gombauld, might little lacking somehow 

 
"Are writing much asked, 
bright 
 
said Denis "I haven't brought 
 
"But mean say can't write without 
 
Denis shook head. hated talking breakfast, and, besides, 
wanted hear Mr. Scogan saying end table. 
 
scheme dealing Mr. Scogan saying, "is 
beautifully simple. present time wear 
wrong way round. would compel 
clothes, turned back 
every present world 
enforcement 
would act 
enter time would 
rightly insisted on, 
could 
 
"In said Priscilla, reading Sunday paper, "the 
children amuse 
 
"Ah, but, dear lady, that's exclaimed Mr. 
"a material truth. 

 
"Then military Mr. Scogan went on. "When 
abandoned trembled 
future war. then, finding elegant new was, 
closely 
exaggerated realized 
brilliant 
Abolish military uniform 
soon find 
 
"Is anyone coming church asked Henry Wimbush. 
one bare "I read 
know. there's Mr. sometimes worth 

 
"Thank you, thank you," said Mr. Barbecue-Smith. "I one prefer 
worship infinite church Nature. Shakespeare put 
it? books, running waved arm 
fine gesture towards window, even became 
none less none less 
aware something gone wrong 
could be? 
 
 
 
CHAPTER IX. 
 
Mr. Bodiham sitting study 
windows, narrow admitted 
light spite brilliant July room 
Brown filled row 
upon row heavy works 
generally sell 
towering structure little brown 
brown 
door. dark covered 
floor. Everything brown room, curious 

 
midst brown Mr. Bodiham sat 
man Iron grey face iron 
narrow iron iron hard ran 
nose iron thin, delicate 
brown eyes, set round 
skin dark, though hair 
covered black, turning ears 
small upper dark, 
voice, spoke especially 
raised like iron 
door 
 
nearly half-past come back church, 
weary preached passion, 
iron man beating upon souls 
souls faithful Crome made solid 
used Mr. Bodiham Crome. 
often 
 
morning often preached before, 
nature God. tried make understand God, 
fearful thing fall hands. thought 
something soft facts; still 
more, Bible. passengers 
God ship going down. 
asking brought nearer to? white fire 
angry 
 
men Nothing broke 
polite silence Crome listened Mr. 
occasional sometimes sound heavy 
front sat Henry Wimbush, calm, beautifully 
times Mr. Bodiham wanted 
shake would liked beat kill 
whole 
 
sat desk Outside windows earth 
warm calm. Everything always been. 
yet, nearly four years since preached 
Matthew "For nation shall rise nation, 
shall 
nearly four years. 
important 
world know say. copy little pamphlet 
lay small grey pages, printed type 
grown like old teeth, endless 
opened began read yet again. 
 
nation shall rise nation, 
shall 

 
centuries elapsed since Lord gave utterance 
words, single one without 
Mighty ruin 
ground, half globe, vast 
natural thousands overwhelmed flood 
fire Time again, course 
things happened, brought 
back earth. inasmuch 
signs God's wickedness 
signs times connection Second Coming. 
 
"If earnest regarded present war true sign 
approaching return, merely happens 
great war involving lives millions people, merely 
grip every country Europe, 
merely disease every kind, 
among no, reasons 
regard war true Sign Times, origin 
progress marked certain seem 
connect almost beyond doubt Christian 
relating Second Coming 
 
"Let enumerate features present war clearly 
suggest Sign near approach Second 
Lord said shall preached 
world witness unto shall end 
Although would us say degree 
regarded God sufficient, may least 
confidently hope century work 
brought condition rate True, 
larger number world's inhabitants remained 
true fact 
preached 
responsibility continued 
preached to. 
 
generally recognised 'the 
waters great river mentioned sixteenth chapter 
extinction power, 
sign near approaching end world know it. 
capture successes great 
forward destruction though must 
admitted episode proved still possesses 
Historically speaking, 
power going past last two years 
witnessed great acceleration process, 
doubt complete within sight. 
 
following words concerning 
comes world war Second 
Coming closely world war 
end return coming sudden 
like night. 
 
"Let us examine facts. history, exactly St. John's 
world war immediately 
power. fact alone would enough connect 
present conflict therefore 
point near approach Second evidence 
even solid convincing nature 
 
brought three 
come Beast, 
False identify three powers evil 
much light clearly thrown whole question. 
 
"The Beast, False 
history. work human used 
three powers long war filled last 
centuries religious 
sufficiently established, spirit issuing 
mouth spirit Beast, 
Woman, undoubtedly power, spirit 
forth. one power answers 
description False wolf 
agent devil working power 
so-called spirit issues mouth 
False spirit False 
 
"We may assume, then, three evil spirits 
False three influences real 
cause present answer clear. 
 
"The spirit spirit German 
Higher called, denies possibility 
real attempts account 
Bible natural Slowly surely, last 
eighty years, spirit Germans 
Bible faith, Germany to-day nation 
Higher Criticism thus made war 
would absolutely impossible Christian nation war 
Germany it. 
 
"We come next spirit whose influence causing 
war quite great though not, perhaps, 
immediately obvious. Since War power 
steadily declined France, Germany steadily 
To-day France state, Germany possesses powerful 
Roman minority. Two controlled states, Germany 
war six France, 
Russia, is, course, thoroughly 
state, little doubt presence 
side element essentially hostile done much 
righteous cause responsible comparative 
spirit behind war thus seen clearly enough 
opposed powers, rebellion Roman 
parts merely confirmed conclusion already 
obvious mind. 
 
"The spirit False Morality played great part war 
two evil spirits. Scrap Paper incident nearest 
obvious example adherence essentially 
end German 
end, means true 
principle applied international politics. 
 
"The predicted 
three evil spirits gone forth 
power completion, joined together make world 
war. come therefore meant 
present world. war lead 
inevitably war brought 
end personal return. 
 
"And St. 
John tells us, called Supper 
found fighting called Supper Great 
shall on. 
St. John says, 'I saw angel standing 
cried loud voice, saying fly midst 
heaven, Come gather together unto supper Great 
God; ye may eat flesh flesh 
flesh mighty men, flesh horses, sit 
them, flesh men, free small 
enemies sword 
upon horse, 'and filled 
Supper Great God. 
 
"It may soon may, men reckon time, sooner 
later, Lord come deliver world 
present woe unto called, Supper 
Supper Great God. 
then, late, God God well God 
God sent bears 
God 
too, unless make haste perhaps 
already knows moment even, 
may upon us like little while, 
angel standing sun may 
feed upon 
flesh millions God's 
ready, then; coming Lord hand. May 
object hope, moment look forward terror 

 
Mr. Bodiham closed little pamphlet leaned back chair. 
argument sound, absolutely four years 
since preached four years, England peace, 
sun people Crome wicked indifferent 
so, indeed, possible. could 
understand, would make 
remained Seated brown chair 
window, could arms 
control. hands 
bit seconds able 
began rebuke 
 
Four years, four years, all? must 
inevitably take long time up. 
episode preliminary war 
come that, course, still 
going on, away 
Egypt preparing way, perhaps, 
great extension among 
country America 
might breeding great new war 
Mr. Bodiham tried assure himself, real, genuine 
might soon then, like 
spite comfortable reasoning, remained 
Four years ago God's intention 
seemed plain. now? Now, well 
suffered too. 
 
Sudden silent Mrs. Bodiham 
noiselessly across room. black face pale 
eyes pale water glass, 
hair almost held large envelope 
hand. 
 
"This came said softly. 
 
envelope Mechanically Mr. Bodiham tore open. 
contained larger elegant 
appearance. "The House 
turned pages. 
printed Red 
marginal lines, crossed manner 
picture enclosed page little red took 
place full Mr. Bodiham turned pages. 
 
best black Ready 
nine 
experienced 
 
represented young 
faces large eyes, 
dressed evening 
black Norfolk 
 
"A large 
 

 
Special Tied string 
worn presents appearance 
complete summer wear hot 
 
gesture horror disgust Mr. Bodiham threw 
waste-paper Mrs. Bodiham looked him; pale, 
eyes reflected action without 
 
"The said quiet voice, "the village grows worse 
worse every day." 
 
"What happened now?" asked Mr. feeling suddenly 
 
"I'll tell you." pulled brown chair sat down. 
village Crome, seemed, come second 

 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Denis came 
hot light, 
things began inside him. Little black 
became movement, walking 
de like preliminary 
symptoms sat one 
pretending read. 
 
Henry Wimbush, smoking long 
trod music 
Locked together, Gombauld Anne moved 
made seem single creature, Mr. 
Scogan, solemnly round room Mary. Jenny 
sat shadow behind seemed, 
big red notebook. Priscilla Mr. 
Barbecue-Smith discussed higher things, 
disturbed noise Lower Plane. 
 
said Mr. Barbecue-Smith tone speaking 
Wild opening 
soul towards expansion towards God, 

 
"How Priscilla, 

 
hand, contraction soul towards 
self upon point Lower 
slavery mere facts; gross physical 
 
making wild man me." refrain 
Denis's mind. Yes, damn them! wild man, wild 
trouble. Wild 
word, desire. 

 
were, Anne Gombauld, moving together though 
single beast two sat 
pretending read, pretending didn't want 
pretending rather Why? business 
again. 
 
born different he? Gombauld face 
old, walls 
cities till fell. born different 
face. 
 
music stopped. single harmonious creature broke two. 
little Anne swayed across room laid 
hand Mr. Wimbush's shoulder. 
 
"A time, please, Uncle said. 
 
"A repeated, turned cabinet rolls 
trod old roll trod new, slave 
mill, beautifully well 
along, like ship moving 
forward creature, 
harmonious movements ever, across 
floor. Oh, born different 
 
"What 
 
looked up, Mary. broken 
embrace Mr. Scogan, seized Jenny 

 
"What 
 
"I don't know," said Denis looked title 
book called "The Stock 
 
"I think sensible sit read said Mary, fixing 
china eyes. "I don't know one It's 
 
Denis made him. 
heard deep voice. 
 
"Tell me, Mr know 
noise came Mr. Barbecue-Smith's chair. "This Einstein 
theory. seems whole universe. makes 
worried 
 
Mary renewed attack. contemporary like 
asked. Denis filled couldn't 
girl leave wanted listen horrible music, 
watch though made 
one misery peace. came put 
absurd like 
"What three contemporary 
like 
 
replied, one 
absolutely certain mind. 
 
several hours Denis managed go sleep night. 
Vague possessed mind. Anne 
made wretched himself, future, life 
general, universe. "This repeated 
every then, "is horribly fact 
knew disease help cure it. 
 
clothes bed, got sought relief 
wanted misery words. 
end hour, nine less complete lines emerged among 

 
"I know desire summer dark still, 
among long 
know sound life laughter 
black silent know desire, 
know." 
 
read threw sheet 
waste-paper got bed again. minutes 

 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Mr. Barbecue-Smith gone. motor away 
faint smell burning recent 
considerable come speed 
way; walking back, round side house, 
towards terrace garden. walked nobody 
yet ventured comment departed 
 
"Well?" said Anne last, turning raised inquiring 
Denis. 
 
"Well?" time someone begin. 
 
Denis declined passed Mr Scogan. "Well?" 
said. 
 
Mr. Scogan repeated question, "Well?" 
 
left Henry Wimbush make "A agreeable 
said. tone 
 
without paying much attention going, 
went down, terrace, 
house them, immensely whole 
height terrace added seventy feet 
brick lines three up, 
enhancing impression height became 
paused edge pool look back. 
 
"The man built house knew said Denis. "He 

 
"Was he?" said Henry Wimbush reflectively. "I doubt it. 
house Sir Ferdinando 
estate father, 
granted time dissolution Crome 
originally 
Sir Ferdinando content merely old 
using stone 
built grand new house 
house see now." 
 
waved hand direction house silent, 
almost Crome them. 
 
"The great thing said Mr. Scogan, seizing opportunity 
speak, "is fact it's work 
makes compromise nature, 
rebels it. tower, 
which, remember 
 
work human art, 
heart earth assumed form grown 
living stone, light 
 
"No, no, isn't nonsense sort Crome. 
look though grown 
earth, right, doubt, 
house intelligent, 
man never seem rather 
expression grand unnatural 
life. Since days William Morris that's fact England 
unable men 
solemnly played Hence 
rest it. 
cities may see, endless 
adaptations village ignorance, 
limited range materials produced possesses 
suitable 
employ wealth, technical knowledge, rich 
variety materials purpose building millions 
totally Could go 
 
Henry Wimbush took interrupted discourse. "All 
say, dear began, "is certainly just, true. 
whether Sir Ferdinando views if, 
indeed, views all, much doubt. 
building house, Sir Ferdinando was, matter fact, 
one proper placing 
one great interest life. even 
published, subject, little extremely 

whole matter treated 
great learning principle arranging 
house secure greatest possible distance 
separate Hence 
followed inevitably privies placed top 
house, connected 
ground. must thought Sir Ferdinando moved 
material merely sanitary placing 
privies position also certain excellent spiritual 
For, argues third chapter 
necessities nature base obeying 
apt forget noblest creatures universe. 
degrading effects advised 
every house room nearest heaven, well 
provided windows commanding extensive noble 
walls chamber 
containing products human wisdom, 


works, ancient testify 
human soul. Crome able put theories practice. 
top three placed 
went whole height house, 
say, seventy feet, series 
provided flowing water ground level 
base raised 
stream several hundred total 
depth top 
hundred two feet. eighteenth century, 
passion swept away sanitary 
explicit account 
left Sir Ferdinando, unaware noble privies 
ever existed. even suppose Sir Ferdinando built 
house strange splendid model merely 

 
contemplation past always Henry 
Wimbush certain grey face worked 
spoke. thought vanished privies moved 
ceased speak; light gradually died 
face, became grave, polite hat 
it. long gently melancholy thoughts 
seemed possess mind them. 
Ferdinando privies gone, Crome still 
sun shone inevitable ways God 
ways man 
 
"It one's heart exclaimed Mr. Scogan last, "to hear 
fantastic English theory privies 
build immense splendid house order put 
like think 
rolling across Europe bound 
extraordinary One going buy La 
won't get till she's dead, course, matter; he's 
prepared glass 
famous instruments 
goes too; try bribe part 
little small hope success. 
won't sell perhaps might sacrifice one 
Others bound die among 
savage another, white top hat, lead 
Others business all; giving 
continental home cultivate 
leisure greater 
ground, Cavendish, lives 
nothing solely private 
electrical discoveries half 
century. Glorious Every age presence. 
day, dear Denis," said Mr Scogan, turning bright regard 
day must become Lives 
Queer like undertake myself." 
 
Mr. Scogan paused, looked towering house, 
murmured word two three times. 
 
justification 
justifies classes wealth privilege 
sort. you're 
anything reasonable world, must class people 
safe public opinion, safe 
compelled waste time go 
name Honest Work. must class members 
think and, within obvious limits, please. must 
class people indulge 
general tolerated understood. That's 
important thing 
so; also even 
others. 
don't fear, 
disgust instinctively feel towards them. 
sort Red Indian planted midst vast 
Poor that. Within boundaries wild men 
must admitted, little little 
kindred spirits born outside pale 
offers sort refuge hatred Poor 
en anything wild 
social revolution 
drowned great sea Poor Whites. then? 
suffer go writing good 
you, unhappy Henry, allowed live house splendid 
continue quiet mines 

 
"And you," said Anne, him, "will allowed go 

 
"You may rest Mr. Scogan replied, "that shall not. shall 
Honest Work do." 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Mary puzzled Perhaps 
ears played false. Perhaps really said was, 
even 

ears never play false. 
impression distinct 
forced conclusion, Denis indeed pronounced 
improbable words. deliberately attempts 
open serious discussion. man would talk 
seriously woman 
nothing. Perhaps Gombauld would satisfactory. True, 
little least 
serious work would associate 
herself. all, 

 
Gombauld little 
stood green close beyond square 
brick building little windows set high 
walls. ladder four led 
ground, reach four 
grey lingered faint smell 
dust narrow came 
every hour day one little windows 
always alive Gombauld kind 
concentrated six seven hours day. 
pursuing something new, something could catch it. 
 
last eight years, nearly half spent 
process war, worked way industriously 
come side. begun painting 
then, little little, risen nature 
world pure form, till end painting nothing 
thoughts, abstract geometrical forms 
found process arduous 
then, quite suddenly, grew felt 
confined within narrow 
find forms could 
nature without number, subtle 
done side. 
discipline preserved falling nature 
took nature rich, elaborate forms, 
aim always work whole 
simplicity prodigious 
prodigious Memories 
achievements him. Forms living reality emerged 
built 
simple single mathematical idea. thought 

astonishing 
Gombauld it, hot Yes, would something 
could catch it. 
 
long time idea stirring 
mind. made full drawn 
idea taking shape man fallen 
horse. huge white filled upper 
half picture great body. head, lowered towards 
ground, immense body arrested eye, 
body legs, came either side picture 
like arch. ground, legs 
towering beast, lay figure man, head 
extreme arms flung wide right left. white, 
light poured point right 
beast, fallen man, round them, beyond 
behind them, night. alone universe 
themselves. body filled upper part 
legs, great midst 
limited either side. beneath lay man, 
face point arms 
towards sides picture. 
legs, eye looked intense 
below, space closed figure 
man. central gulf darkness surrounded luminous 
 
picture half finished. Gombauld work 
morning figure man, taking 
time smoke back chair till touched 
wall, looked thoughtfully 
time itself, thing knew 
it. something after, something would 
terrific could catch caught it? Would ever 
catch it? 
 
Three little Gombauld turned eyes 
towards door. Nobody ever disturbed 
one laws. "Come called. door, 
swung open, form Mary. 
dared mount didn't want 
her, retreat would easier dignified climbed 

 
"May come in?" asked. 
 

 
remaining two 
instant. "A letter came second said. "I 
thought might important, brought you." eyes, 
face candid handed letter. 
never 
 
Gombauld looked envelope put pocket 
said, "it isn't important. Thanks much 

 
Mary felt little "May 
look you've courage say last. 
 
Gombauld half case wouldn't 
begin work till finished. would give five 
minutes separated bitter end. "This best place 
see said. 
 
Mary looked picture time without saying anything. 
Indeed, didn't know say; taken 
loss. expected picture 
man horse, such, even 
word describe 
figure feet 
horse. think, 
gone. One could admire Old 
eighteen might done so. 
now, five years among best judges, 
reaction contemporary piece representation 
laughing could Gombauld 
to? felt safe admiring work before. 
didn't know think. 
 
"There's rather lot isn't there?" ventured 
last, found critical 
formula gentle time 
 
"There is," Gombauld agreed. 
 
Mary accepted serious 
discussion. put head one side eyes. 
"I think it's awfully said. "But course it's little 
looked Gombauld, 
made continued 
time picture. Mary went "When Paris 
spring saw lot admire work 
course, it's abstract abstract 

flat, know, painted pure primary 
design wonderful. He's getting abstract every day. 
He'd given third thinking 
giving second. Soon, says, blank 
That's logical conclusion. Complete 
he's it. he's reached pure he's 
going take says it's intellectual 
asked, final 
 
Gombauld dropped end trod it. 
finished said. "I've finished I'm going 
And, advancing towards her, put arm round 
shoulders turned round, away picture. 
 
Mary looked him; hair swung back, bell gold. 
eyes smiled. moment come. arm 
round her. moved slowly, almost moved 
him. "Do agree him?" 
repeated. moment might come, would cease 
serious. 
 
"I don't know. shall think it." Gombauld 
hand dropped shoulder. "Be careful going 
added 
 
Mary looked round, front open door. 
remained standing moment hand 
rested shoulder made felt lower 
administered three four kindly little 
moved forward. 
 
"Be careful going said Gombauld more. 
 
careful. door closed behind alone 
little green close. walked slowly back 

 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Henry Wimbush brought dinner printed 
bound together 
 
said, exhibiting certain 
finished printing helped set 
type last page 
 
"The famous cried Anne. writing printing 
going long could remember. 
childhood long Uncle History vague 
thing, often heard never seen. 
 
"It taken nearly thirty said Mr. Wimbush. 
years writing nearly four it's 
whole Sir Ferdinando birth death 
father William three centuries history 
Crome, written Crome, printed Crome 
 
"Shall allowed read it's asked Denis. 
 
Mr. Wimbush nodded. said. "And hope find 
added "Our room particularly 
rich ancient new light throw 
introduction 
 
"And asked Gombauld. "Sir Ferdinando rest 
crimes 

 
"Let see," Henry Wimbush rubbed chin thoughtfully. "I 
think two one violent death, four perhaps five broken 
hearts, half dozen little way 
natural children, like. No, 
whole, it's 
 
"The always respectable 
said Priscilla, note voice. "If 
write family history Why, would one long continuous blot 
beginning end." laughed helped 
another glass 
 
"If write Mr. Scogan "it wouldn't exist. 
second generation lost 

 
"After said Henry Wimbush, little wife's 
comment masters Crome, "I'll read episode 
History make admit even 
respectable way, strange 
 
"I'm glad hear it," said 
 
hear what?" asked suddenly private 
interior world like received 
smiled, nodded, last "I see," back, shut 
door behind her. 
 
Dinner party adjourned drawing-room. 
 
said Henry Wimbush, pulling chair put 
round began cautiously 
turn pages loose still book. found 
place last. "Shall asked, looking up. 
 
said Priscilla, 
 
midst silence Mr. Wimbush gave little 
preliminary started read. 
 
"The infant destined become fourth name 
Lapith born year small weighing 
three pounds first 
honour Sir Hercules 
mother, like many 
kept progress month month 
walked ten months, second year 
learnt speak number words. three years weighed 
twenty-four six, though could read write perfectly 
showed remarkable music, larger 
child two. Meanwhile, mother borne two 
children, boy girl, one died 
carried reached 
age Hercules remained child. 
 
"On twelfth birthday Hercules still three feet two 
inches head, handsome nobly 
big body, otherwise 
and, size, great strength 
hope making eminent 
time. various followed letter, 
vain. One ordered another 
third constructed little employed Holy 
young Hercules 
half hour every morning evening. course 
next three years Hercules gained perhaps two 
growth stopped remained rest life 
three feet four father, built 
hopes upon son, imagination 
military career equal found 
disappointed man. 'I brought would 
say, took violent dislike son boy dared 
scarcely come presence. temper, 
turned disappointment avoided 
company said, ashamed show himself, father 
among human took solitary 
carried rapidly year 
Hercules came age father taken 
mother, whose love increased growth father's 
long little year 
death two dozen 
attack 
 
thus found age twenty-one alone 
world, master considerable including estate 
mansion Crome. beauty intelligence childhood 
manly age, and, would 
taken place among accomplished young 
men time. well read Latin 
well merit written English, 
French, good ear music, indifferent 
used play like seated 
chair instrument music 
extremely 
hands made impossible ever perform upon 
small made him, which, 
whenever used play simple country air 
rustic music power clear raise 
spirits artificial productions 
early age practised but, though conscious 
great powers art, would never publish specimen 
writing. would say, reflected 
public read would 
Several books Sir 
single specimen illustrate qualities 

 
ancient days, yet world young, Ere fed 
fire, 
struck Flesh grown corrupt 
brought forth monstrous birth trod shrinking 
earth, Till God, impatient Gave 
again, bore 
Hero Man War; Huge 
empty Long ages Man 
grown Mind, Smiled 
bow bill, Pencil 
canvas written page 
name age age, name temple 
Art grew great grew Thus man's long progress step 
step Giant hero takes place; Giant 
dull heroic one one Man 
last pure Burns 
old fought Men 
huge matter vast 
spirit slept mind smaller 
later days soon Soul plays like 
abroad mental think Providence 
stay Man's footsteps upon way? Mankind 
understanding grace far beyond 
Hence Still led GOD'S Hand, Mankind proceeds 
towards Promised Land. time come 
along happy Golden Age 
backward turn dark historic race Men 
behold form Mind dead see, 
old. time come, wherein soul shall 
matter wholly free; light body, 
Shall grace along velvet delicate 
final Mankind shall possess earth. ah, 
still race, though 
Earth's fair Gross yet proud, Men 
Vain still 
retain giant that's small point 
stupid And, think born. Sad 
Fate those, ah, sad indeed, rare 
come man's golden glory pointing 
live 
 
"As soon came Sir Hercules set 
though means ashamed 
may judge poem quoted above, regarded 
many ways superior ordinary race found presence 
men women too, 
must abandon great world, determined retire 
absolutely were, Crome private 
world own, himself. 
Accordingly, discharged old servants house 
replaced able find suitable 
others course years 
assembled numerous household, member 
four feet high smallest among scarcely two feet 
six father's 
sold gave away large 
house, King Charles 
whatever dog 
father's also use, whether 
six black four choice 
animals New Forest 
 
thus settled household entirely 
remained find suitable companion share 
Sir Hercules heart, 
once, ages sixteen felt love. 
source bitter 
for, dared declare young lady choice, 
received laughter. picked 
shaken like child, telling run away 
more. story soon got young lady 
used tell particularly pleasant 
occasioned source 
distress written period gather 
taking life. course time, however, 
lived never again, though often fell 
dare make advances 
interested. coming estate finding 
position create world desired it, 
saw that, much desired, 
affectionate and, indeed, amorous must choose 
chosen among race find 
suitable wife was, found, matter difficulty; would 
marry none distinguished beauty gentle 
daughter Lord refused ground besides 
another young lady, 
belonging good family Hampshire, rejected 
face, like many 
Finally, almost success, 
heard reliable source Count 
possessed daughter exquisite beauty great 
three feet Setting went 
immediately arrival pay respects 
found living wife five children mean 
one quarters town. Indeed, count far 
reduced circumstances even 
travelling company 
lose performing sale 
daughter Sir Hercules arrived time save 
much grace 
beauty, end three days' made 
formal offer marriage, accepted less 
father, perceived English rich 
source marriage, 
English acted one Sir Hercules 
returned sea England, settled down, 
life happiness. 
 
household delighted felt 
first time free woman living among equals 
friendly world. many common husband, 
especially beautiful voice, power 
surprising one small, could touch without effort. 
Accompanied husband fine 
noted before, one plays would sing 

native country. Seated together found 
could four hands play music written two hands 
ordinary size, circumstance gave Sir Hercules 
pleasure. 
 
"When making music reading together, often 
did, English spent time healthful 
sometimes little boat 
often which, 
entirely new her, Filomena especially become 
perfectly Filomena husband used often go 
park, time much extensive 
now. hunted using 
thirty black kind dog which, 
course well smaller Four 
dressed white 
hunted master mistress, green 
followed either black New 
Forest picture whole horses, 
painted William whose work Sir Hercules 
much invited him, though man ordinary come 
stay mansion purpose executing picture. 
likewise painted portrait Sir Hercules lady driving 
green drawn four black Sir 
Hercules velvet coat white Filomena 
dressed large hat 
two figures gay carriage stand dark 
left picture trees fall away 
four black seen pale 
strangely sky colour 
lighted sun. 
 
"In way four years passed happily by. end time 
Filomena found great child. Sir Hercules 
God wrote 'the name Lapith 
preserved delicate race transmitted 
generations time world shall 
superiority beings uses make 
wife's brought bed son wrote poem effect. 
child Ferdinando memory 
house. 
 
"With passage months certain sense began 
minds Sir Hercules child growing 
extraordinary year weighed much Hercules 
weighed three. goes wrote 
Filomena seems eighteen months 
almost tall smallest man 
Could Ferdinando destined become man 
gigantic thought neither 
parents dared yet give open 
respective terror 
 
"On third birthday Ferdinando mother 
couple inches short father's 
first wrote Sir discussed situation. 
truth concealed Ferdinando one us. 
this, third day rejoicing 
health, strength, beauty child, together 
ruin happiness. God give us strength bear 
 
"At age eight Ferdinando large 
parents decided, though send 
beginning next profound 
peace settled upon house. Ferdinando returned summer 
larger stronger ever. One day knocked 
butler broke arm. 
wrote father. 'The thing teach 
Ferdinando, age 
already seventeen inches father, received 

 
"One summer three years later Ferdinando returned 
Crome accompanied large bought 
old man found beast 
hardly entered house 
attacked one Sir favourite seizing creature 
shaking till nearly dead. Extremely put 
Sir Hercules ordered beast chained 
Ferdinando answered dog 
his, would keep father, growing 
take animal house once, pain utmost 
Ferdinando refused mother moment 
coming room, dog her, knocked down, 
severely arm another 
instant must throat, Sir 
Hercules drawn sword animal heart. Turning 
son, ordered leave room immediately, 
remain place mother nearly 
spectacle Sir Hercules standing one foot 
gigantic sword drawn still 
commanding voice, expression face 
Ferdinando room terror 
rest entirely fashion. 
mother soon recovered effect 
mind time forth 
lived always among imaginary 
 
"The two years Ferdinando spent Continent, making Grand 
period happy even 
thought future them; able 
younger days. Lady 
Filomena lost voice Sir Hercules grown 
play He, true, still 
wife felt old and, since episode 
nervous most, please husband, would 
follow hunt distance little drawn 

 
"The day fixed Ferdinando's return came round. sick 
vague retired chamber bed. 
Sir Hercules received son alone. giant brown 
entered room. home, said Sir Hercules voice 
trembled little. 
 
hope see well, Ferdinando bent shake hands, 
again. top father's head reached 
level 
 
come alone. Two friends age accompanied 
him, young men brought thirty 
years Crome presence many members 
common race men. Sir Hercules 
laws obeyed. received young gentlemen 
grave sent servants kitchen, orders 
well cared for. 
 
"The old family dragged light 
Hercules lady accustomed small table 
twenty inches butler, could look 
edge big table, helped supper three 
servants brought Ferdinando 
 
"Sir Hercules usual grace supported 
conversation pleasures foreign art 
nature met abroad, singing 
churches city, topics 
similar nature. young men particularly 
occupied watching efforts butler 
change covered laughter 
violent repeated Sir Hercules 
affected notice, changed subject conversation 
Upon one young men asked whether true, 
heard, used hunt Sir 
Hercules replied was, proceeded describe chase 
young men laughter. 
 
"When supper over, Sir Hercules climbed chair and, 
giving excuse must see lady did, 
sound laughter followed stairs. Filomena 
lying bed listening sound 
enormous laughter tread strangely heavy feet stairs 
along Sir Hercules drew chair 
sat long time silence, holding wife's hand 
sometimes gently it. ten o'clock startled 
violent noise. breaking glass, feet, 
laughter. continuing 
several minutes, Sir Hercules rose feet and, spite 
wife's prepared go see 
light Sir Hercules way 
standing 
moment tread new noise 
louder here; shouting words 
line light visible door. Sir 
Hercules across hall towards it. approached 
door another terrific breaking glass 
could doing? Standing managed look 
middle table old 
butler, drink could scarcely keep 
dancing feet among broken glass, 
three young men sat round, 
table hands empty wine 
shouting laughing three servants leaning 
wall laughed too. Ferdinando suddenly threw 
head, surprised little man 
fell back, several 
raised up, gave 
back. old man smiled said 
Ferdinando, whole 
father Hercules wearing added one 
three laughter. 
 
"Sir Hercules would look listen further. crossed hall 
began stairs, knees painfully high 
place 
world, place Ferdinando together. 
 
"His wife still questioning glance answered, 
making old To-morrow 
silent time. 
 
"At last Filomena said, 'I want see 
 
better said Sir Going wrote 
full particular account events 
evening. still engaged task rang servant 
ordered hot water bath made ready eleven 
o'clock. finished writing went wife's room, 
preparing dose twenty times strong 
accustomed take could sleep, brought her, 
saying, 
 
took glass lay little time, drink 
immediately. tears came eyes. remember 
used sitting 
began singing softly ghost voice 
'And playing 
seems short time ago, yet long, long, long. 
drank draught and, lying back 
pillow, closed eyes. Sir Hercules kissed hand away, 
though afraid her. returned 
recorded wife's last words him, poured bath 
water brought accordance orders. 
water hot get bath once, took 
copy wished read 
died. opened book read, held 
evil though 
struck. remembered, exhibited 
young man called good family, 
quite two feet height weighed seventeen 
voice. turned pages. 
tale growing 
forced kill called 
friends last, bidding talk him, 
philosophy, love life 
away opened pen 
wrote last page died Roman 
Then, putting one foot water finding 
threw and, taking 
hand, sat one deep cut 
left lay back composed mind 
blood out, water dissolving 
little whole bath 
colour Sir Hercules felt mastered 
vague dream dream. Soon sound 
much blood small 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
coffee party generally adjourned 
windows looked east, hour day 
place whole house. large room, 
eighteenth century, white painted elegant 
middle one wall door, 
dummy books, gave access deep where, among pile 
old newspapers, Egyptian lady, 
brought back second Sir Ferdinando return Grand 
ten away first 
one might almost mistaken secret door section 
filled genuine books. Coffee-cup hand, Mr. Scogan 
standing front dummy 

 
"The bottom saying, "is taken 
fourteen Useful, little also 

looks Men Born 
Men Achieved Men Greatness 
Thrust upon Men Never Great 
ten volumes Works 
Chase, author, less 
what's this, what's this?" Mr. Scogan stood 
up. volumes 
repeated. "Ah, dear said, turning 
round, "these best books. would willingly give rest 
library them." 
 
happy multitude first Mr. Wimbush could 
afford smile 
 
"Is Mr. Scogan went on, "that possess nothing 
back opened door inside, 
though hoped find rest books behind it. 
said, shut door again. "It dust 
One comes great past, expecting 
one opening them, 
darkness dust faint smell all, 
reading like drink form 
One reads amuse one's one 
all, prevent oneself thinking. 

 
paused, thoughtfully fingers 
books. 
 
"But disagree said Mary. "About serious 
reading, 
 
"Quite right, Mary, quite right," Mr. Scogan answered. "I forgotten 
serious people room." 
 
"I like idea said Denis. "There's room us 
within it's 
 
"Yes, Biographies good, Biographies Mr 
Scogan agreed. "I imagine written elegant 
great Dr. 
himself. know classical Mr. Scogan raised 
hand let fall gesture implied words 
failed him. read 
avail 
think may have, must written biographies 
work, And, owing arrangement 
library, can't 
 
"I prefer said Anne. "A novel six 
must 
 
Mr. Scogan repeated. "You've hit right word. 
sound, bit 
life know; specimens landed 
background, always 
nature good but, like 
certain little Personally, like much better 
notion Works Mr. 
Old used call him. spent 
ten years industry modern 
European lines, able retire thirty-six handsome 
rest life devoted travel 
Mr. Scogan tapped dummy books. "And come 
great man! 
knew write Ah, Denis, could 
read wouldn't writing novel 
development young man's character, wouldn't describing 
detail, life 
would trying write book. then, 
owing peculiar arrangement library, never 
read 
 
could regret fact do," said Denis. 
 
"It Mr. Scogan continued, "the great 
delivered us 
life, said, long afford spend 
precious hours writing reading 
said again, 'I tired seeing human mind 
social prefer freely 

 
"I said Gombauld, little obscure sometimes, 
wasn't he?" 
 
"He Mr. Scogan replied, "and made seem even 
actually was. 
dark always Oh, 
shall describe them? 
shoot across pages like dressed 
extraordinary adventures still extraordinary 
relieved 
life, move subtle 
crossing immense 
immense fancy go hand hand. ideas 
present past, every possible subject, bob among 
smile gravely themselves, 
make place something new. verbal surface 
writing rich 

 
"But couldn't give us Denis broke 

 
Mr. Scogan replied, great book like sword 
remains struck fast door, coming 
writer genius enough draw forth. even 
much qualified attempt task. 
wooden prison leave, dear Denis, you." 
 
"Thank you," said Denis. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
"In time Mr. Scogan saying, 
French Court invited King's table, 
served wine handsome silver cup 
ordinary 
for, inside, curiously 
series lively amorous draught young 
lady swallowed became 
Court looked interest, every time put nose 
see whether wine 
laughed 
not, laughed 
 
"Do asked Anne, "that custom revived 

 
"I not," said Mr. Scogan. "I merely quoted 
illustration sixteenth 
century. might quoted anecdotes show customs 
fifteenth fourteenth 
indeed every century, time 
equally genial equally century 
customs cheerful 
blessed memory. astonishing 
yet, one must suppose deliberate disregard history, 
looked upon horribly pregnant normal natural 
right; previous fifteen twenty thousand years 
considered curious 
 
"I entirely Mary excitement effort bring 
say. 
 
Mr. Scogan, like policeman arresting flow held 
hand. "He know. brings next point: nature 

 

 
"The may say set 
little beginning reaction 
earlier 
ages. scientific 
past, returned. whole question became 
terribly serious one. Earnest young men wrote public 
time forth would impossible ever make 
matter. wrote thick books 
become customary serious young 
women, like Mary, calm, matters 
hint would throw youth 
amorous excitement. 
doubt. Scogan one like see, 
mingled scientific little spirit 

 
"I entirely disagree you," said Mary. isn't laughing matter; 
it's 
 
answered Mr. Scogan, "perhaps I'm old man. 
must confess cannot always regard wholly 
 
"But tell began Mary face flushed 
excitement. cheeks cheeks great ripe 
 
Mr. Scogan continued, "it seems one permanently 
amusing subjects exist. one human 
activity importance laughter pleasure 
ever slightly, misery 
 
"I entirely said Mary. silence. 
 
Anne looked watch. quarter said. "I 
wonder Ivor turn up." got and, 
leaning terrace, looked 
valley towards farther level evening light 
land revealed itself. deep bright 
lights gave new 
surface, before, picked light 
grass, trees 
surface things taken marvellous 
 
said Anne suddenly, opposite side 
valley, cloud dust flushed 
gold moving rapidly along "It's Ivor. 
One tell 
 
dust cloud descended valley lost. 
voice made heard, minute later Ivor 
came round corner house. hair waved wind 
laughed saw them. 
 
cried, embraced her, embraced Mary, nearly 
embraced Mr. Scogan. "Well, am. I've come 
Ivor's rich, little "I'm late 
dinner, 
sat there, one arm embraced large stone 
leaning head sideways hard 
attitude affection. brown, hair, 
eyes pale, improbable head 
face thin rather long, nose old 
difficult imagine Ivor might grow 
Iron now, structure 
face impressed one; expression. charming 
smile forever 
rapidly, 
slender body seemed fed spring energy. 
 
"No, you're 
 
"You're time answer said Mr. Scogan. "We arguing 
whether serious matter no. think? 

 
echoed Ivor. 
 
"I told so," cried Mary 
 
"But sense Mr. Scogan asked. 
 
"I mean One go without ever getting 

 
"I see," said Mr. Scogan. 
 
"One occupy oneself it," Ivor continued, 
everywhere. Women always wonderfully same. little, 
that's all. free hand described series ample 
can't pass stairs. put tip 
tip thumb and, hand, 
drew circle imaginary England they're 
sentiments always same. least, I've always 
found so." 
 
"I'm delighted hear it," said Mr. Scogan. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
ladies left room port Mr. Scogan 
filled glass, passed and, leaning back 
chair, looked moment silence. conversation 
round him, it; smiling 
private Gombauld noticed smile. 
 
"What's amusing you?" asked. 
 
"I looking all, sitting round said Mr. 
Scogan. 
 
"Are that?" 
 
"Not all," Mr. Scogan answered "I merely amused 

 
"And they?" 
 
"The looking one 
one trying imagine first six would 
given opportunity like 
one Mr. Scogan explained. 
"They speak, 
human beings developed logical conclusions. Hence 
value meet someone 
first time, ask question: Given 
would person 
take 
character, mental little 
thousand times. resulting gives 

 
"And asked Gombauld. 
 
"I Mr. Scogan replied, 
possible exception much stupid 
development anything character. Julius's courage 
energy, 
cruelty genius 
enormous within me. Given might 
something circumstances me. 
born brought country passed youth 
great deal utterly hard work little money. 
result now, middle age, poor thing am. 
perhaps well. Perhaps, too, it's well Denis hasn't 
permitted flower little Ivor remains 
Yes, it's better so, doubt. would 
chance 
full horror would 
pleasant interesting watch 
little swelling enormous 
fantastic flowers cruelty pride 
environment makes special food 
make differ far that, 
given proper sure making every time. 
us every ten men placed 
environment one good, intelligent, 
great. rest not. Seventy 
eighty years ago people, reading 
South cried think 
things happening nineteenth years 
since astonished find still astonishing 
twentieth century, unhappy 
treated English treated time 
To-day longer surprised things. Black 

take Since 
war wonder nothing. created environment 
little sprung up. could 
 
Mr. Scogan drank left port glass. 
 
"At went on, "the frightful horrors taking 
place every corner world. People 
dead bodies eyes 
rest. pain fear go air 
rate eleven hundred feet per second. travelling three 
seconds perfectly facts; 
enjoy life less them? certainly not. 
feel sympathy, represent 
sufferings nations individuals them. But, 
all, sympathy Precious little, unless 
person feel sympathy happens closely involved 
even don't go far. good thing too; 
one imagination vivid enough sympathy sufficiently 
sensitive really comprehend feel sufferings 
people, one would never moment's peace mind. really 
sympathetic race would much know meaning happiness. 
I've already said, aren't sympathetic race. 
beginning war used think really 
imagination sympathy, physically 
month two admit that, honestly, yet 
think vivid imagination One always alone 
fact one happens 
makes pleasure possible rest world." 
 
pause. Henry Wimbush pushed back chair. 
 
"I think perhaps ought go join said. 
 
"So said Ivor, jumping turned Mr. Scogan. 
said, "we share always 
condemned happy 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Ivor brought hands final 
hint triumphant harmony 
seventh struck along thumb left 
general effect splendid noise emerged clearly enough. 
Small details matter little long general effect good. And, 
besides, hint seventh decidedly turned round 
seat tossed hair back eyes. 
 
said. "That's best you, I'm 
 
applause gratitude heard, Mary, large china 
eyes fixed cried gasped 
new breath though 
 
Nature fortune one another Ivor 
wealth perfectly 
good possessed irresistible charm 
manner, hero amorous successes could well 
remember. extraordinary number 
beautiful could 
startling rapidly 
good medium considerable 
knowledge next world. could write verses 
extraordinary painting pictures 
style, drawing sometimes little weak, 
colour always 
and, occasion offered, could cook 
Shakespeare knowing little Latin less mind like his, 
education seemed Training would destroyed 
natural 
 
"Let's go Ivor "It's wonderful 
night." 
 
"Thank you," said Mr. Scogan, "but one prefer still 
wonderful pipe begun every time 
pulled it. perfectly 
 
Henry Wimbush also looked moment 
Ivor's direction then, without saying anything, returned 
little account books 
favourite reading. knew Sir Ferdinando's household 
expenses own. 
 
party, enrolled Ivor's consisted Anne, 
Mary, Denis, and, rather Outside warm 
moon. walked terrace, Ivor 
something 
little Spanish girl follow. atmosphere began 
Ivor put arm round Anne's dropped head 
sideways shoulder, position walked on, singing 
seemed thing world. 
Denis wondered never done it. hated Ivor. 
 
"Let's go said Ivor. embrace 
turned round shepherd little made way along 
side house entrance walk led 
lower garden. blank wall house 
tall yew trees path Somewhere 
steps right, gap yew Denis, 
headed party, way one 
fear horrible 
Suddenly behind heard 
"Oh!" sharp, dry might sound 
that, voice heard "I going 
back house." tone decided, even pronounced 
words away whatever 
been, Denis resumed forward somewhere 
behind Ivor began sing again, 
 
Ne Un 
pour un 
 
climbed kind easy 
warm darkness seemed like blood them. 
 
Pour le le 
 
"Here cried Denis. guided 
danger, moment walk 
feet. here, least 
less yew walk wider path led 
house. Looking up, could see high 
black sky 
 
de la 
 
Went Ivor, interrupted "I'm going run 
down," off, full speed, singing 

 
pour un 
 
others followed. Denis 
one might break one's 
wrong people, become like 
young dose felt certain 
within him; was, like 
rather theoretical seek express 
practical demonstration 
 
"Be shouted more, hardly words 
mouth when, sound heavy fall front 
him, followed long breath pain 
afterwards Denis almost 
told so, wouldn't 
towards 
 
Mary came hill like tremendously 
blind rush felt would never 
ground grew level beneath feet, speed 
suddenly caught extended arm brought 
abrupt 
 
"Well," said Ivor "you're caught now, 

 
made effort release herself. "It's Anne. It's 
 
Ivor burst amused laughter. "So exclaimed. "I 
seem making nothing evening. I've already made 
one laughed again, something jolly 
laughter Mary could help laughing too. 
remove arm, somehow amusing natural 
Mary made attempt escape it. walked along 
side Mary short 
able, lay head shoulder. rubbed 
mass 
hair. little began sing night trembled 
sound voice. finished kissed her. 
Anne Mary Anne. didn't seem make much difference 
was. differences detail, course; general 
effect same; and, all, general effect 
important thing. 
 
Denis made way 
 
called out. 
 
"Is you, I've hurt hand. 
I'm 
 
"My poor said. "But then," couldn't help "it 
silly start running 
 
retorted tone "of course was." 
 
sat beside grass, found 
atmosphere carried always her. 
 
"I want look 
 
felt light 
grew little universe world 
face, orange 
white, bare arms, green round darkness 
become solid utterly Anne held 
green fall, left exhibited two three red 

 
"Not said. Denis terribly 
emotion when, looking face, saw 
trace involuntary tears pain, lingered 
pulled began away 
wounded hand. match went out; worth light 
another. Anne allowed attended to, 
"Thank you," said, finished 
something tone made feel 
lost superiority him, younger he, 
suddenly, almost child. felt tremendously large 
feeling strong instinctively put 
arm her. drew leaned him, sat 
silence. Then, below, soft wonderfully clear still 
heard sound Ivor's going 

 
Ne 
de pour un 
 
rather prolonged pause. though time 
allowed giving receiving thirty 
voice on: 
 
sage et Pour un 
le pour 
 
last note died away silence. 
 
"Are better?" Denis whispered. "Are comfortable like this?" 
 
nodded questions. 
 
pour un 
Yes, decidedly, felt 
shepherd now. master, wave courage 
him, warm turned head, began 
face, first rather then, 
mouth. 
 
Anne averted kissed 
movement presented him. "No," "no, 
 
"Why not?" 
 
"It 
 
said Denis. 
 
tried explain. "Can't see," said, "it isn't 
all." true. Somehow never thought Denis 
light man might make never much 
conceived possibilities amorous him. 
young, couldn't find 
knew meant. 
 
"Why isn't asked Denis. "And, way, that's 
horrible 
 
"Because 
 
"But say is?" 
 
"It makes difference. say 
 
"I shall make say is." 
 
"All right, Denis. must another time. must go get 
hot water. It's beginning 
 
Reasons health could Denis got 
helped companion feet. took cautious 
halted leaned heavily arm. 
 
"I'll carry you," Denis never tried carry woman, 
always looked easy piece 
 
"You said Anne. 
 
"Of course can." felt larger protective ever. 
arms round ordered. and, 
picked knees lifted ground. Good 
took five steps 
almost lost burden suddenly, 
something 
 
Anne shaking laughter. "I said poor 
 
"I said Denis, without "I'll try again." 
 
"It's perfectly sweet I'd rather 
laid hand shoulder and, thus began slowly 

 
"My poor repeated, laughed again. 
silent. seemed incredible that, two minutes ago, 
holding her. 
then, child. 
being, desired 
fool suggest carrying reached house 
state profoundest 
 
helped Anne upstairs, left hands came 
drawing-room. surprised find sitting 
left them. expected that, somehow, everything 
would quite seemed prodigious time since went 
away. silent reflected, looked them. Mr. 
Scogan's pipe still sound. Henry Wimbush 
still deep account made discovery Sir 
Ferdinando habit whole summer through, 
regardless absence justifying R. Gombauld, 
reading. Jenny red 
notebook. And, seated favourite corner 
Priscilla looking pile One one 
held length and, throwing back orange 
head, looked long attentively half-closed wore 
pale 
immensely long 
angle face. 
every time Ivor's 
Spirit Life, made course 
world. back sheet 
15th March Beings 
December "A Party Souls Way Higher 
Sphere, 21st May examining drawing 
turned read Try 
tried never seen vision succeeded 
establishing communication Spirit World. 
content reported experiences others. 
 
"What done rest asked, looking 
Denis entered room. 
 
explained. Anne gone bed, Ivor Mary still 
garden. selected book comfortable chair, tried, far 
disturbed state mind would permit him, compose 
reading. utterly 
movement save stir Priscilla among papers. silent 
Denis repeated himself, silent 
 
nearly hour later Ivor Mary made appearance. 
 
"We waited see moon said Ivor. 
 
"It know," Mary technical 

 
"It beautiful trees, 
flowers, Ivor waved arms. "And moon came up, 
really much. made burst sat 
opened 
 
"There great many said Mary anyone would 
"The earth must coming summer them. 
July 
 
Ivor already begun strike played 
stars, flowers, rising moon. even put 
there. Mary looked listened parted 
lips. others pursued without appearing 
seriously July day, exactly three hundred 
fifty years ago, Sir Ferdinando seven dozen 
discovery fact gave Henry Wimbush peculiar pleasure. 
natural made delight memorial 
three hundred fiftieth anniversary seven dozen 
wished known would ordered 

 
way bed Mary paid call. light Anne's room, 
yet 
 
"Why didn't come garden Mary asked. 
 
"I fell twisted Denis helped 
 
Mary full too, relieved find 
Anne's simply accounted for. vaguely 
what, hardly 
seemed something little way 
suddenly found alone Ivor. 
course; far it. didn't like idea perhaps 
victim job. 
 
"I hope you'll better said, 
Anne stars, 
flowers, whose summer earth 
rising moon 
interesting conversation. almost everything. Nature, 
art, stars, relations 
music, Ivor, thought, interesting mind. 
 
two young ladies parted 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
nearest Roman church twenty miles away. 
Ivor, came early breakfast 
car door, ready start, quarter 
pure yellow 
green two 
protected 
weather rose, elegant 
midst body car. 
 
Mary never Roman service, thought would 
interesting experience, and, car moved great 
gates occupying spare seat 
gone. 
 
church Crome Mr. Bodiham preached 1 Kings vi. 
"And house within carved 
immediately local interest. past two years problem 
War Memorial exercised minds Crome 
enough mental energy, party spirit think 
things. Henry Wimbush library local 
county old district, 
local 
local natural history. liked think 
inspired reading, making parties Sunday 
afternoon look 
favoured idea memorial water 
party followed Mr. Bodiham 
demanding something religious second 
example, window, monument or, possible, 
three. far, however, nothing done, partly 
memorial committee never able agree, partly 
reason little money carry 
proposed Every three four months Mr. Bodiham preached 
subject. last delivered 
high time fresh 
 
"And house within carved 
 
Mr. Bodiham touched lightly thence passed 
churches general. 
dedicated fact 
human point view, complete 
Solomon might built 
could taste world's wisest 
man? might useful city 
like built house carved 
useless Why? work God. 
much talk Crome proposed War 
War Memorial was, nature, work dedicated God. 
first stage 
crowned triumph 
time embodied God might long delay 
alone could bring final peace. library, 
Mr. Bodiham condemned idea. 
works dedicated man, God. War Memorial totally 
object 
answered perfectly definition War useless work 
dedicated God carved One true, 
already existed. nothing would easier make second 
entrance second entrance would need second 
suggestions made. windows, monument 
especially latter. high 
time War Memorial might soon 
moment, like night, God might come. Meanwhile 
difficulty stood way. Funds subscribe 
according means. lost relations war might 
reasonably expected subscribe sum equal would 
pay funeral expenses relative died 
home. delay War Memorial must built 
once. appealed patriotism Christian sentiments 

 
Henry Wimbush walked home thinking books would present 
War Memorial Library, ever came existence. took path 
road. first 
village young fellows dressed 
black makes funeral every English Sunday 
assembled, 
made way Henry Wimbush, touching 
passed. returned face one 

 
Sir Ferdinando's time, reflected, time son, Sir 
Julius, young men would Sunday even 
Crome, rustic Crome. would 
would members 
conscious community. nothing, nothing except Mr. 
forbidding rare 
himself. pleasures county 
presented poor 
Country pleasures stamped 

 
queer passage, remembered, 
queer passage. Certain 
wind One summer night 
there, among 
come upon company men women, among 
men horses 
crowd. poor people must suddenly felt, 
without clothes armed 
arrested, set 
never again. old, Panic came 
extinction here? wondered. 
like ages Eve much 
thought of. liked think so. more. weary 
young men, wanted would bicycle six miles 
town. country without life own, without 
ever 
little happy burned beginning time. 
 
"And one lamp burned clear, fifteen 
hundred 
 
repeated lines himself, think 
murdered past. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Henry Wimbush's long burned 
lay slowly turned pages. 
 
"I can't decide episode read said 
thoughtfully. "Sir Ferdinando's without interest. Then, 
course, there's son, Sir Julius. suffered 
drove finally 
there's Sir turned pages 
Sir Sir I'm inclined think won't read 

 
"But must read something," insisted Mr. Scogan, taking pipe 
mouth. 
 
"I think shall read said Henry Wimbush, "and 
events led marriage daughter 
last Sir 
 
said Mr. Scogan. "We 
 
"Before begin said Henry Wimbush, looking 
book taking fitted 
must say preliminary words Sir 
Ferdinando, last death 
unfortunate Sir Ferdinando found possession 
family little increased father's temperance 
applied forthwith task it, 
ample fashion. time forty 
and, all, drunk loved away half capital, 
would soon got rid rest manner, 
good fortune become 
daughter make proposal young lady 
accepted him, less year become absolute mistress 
Crome husband. extraordinary made 
apparent Sir Ferdinando's character. grew regular economical 
even became rarely drinking 
bottle half port fortune 
began despite hard times 
(for Sir Ferdinando married height 
prosperous dignified old age, spectacle 
children's growth Lady Lapith already borne 
three seemed good reason 
bear many them, sons decline 
family seemed Sir Ferdinando's 
Providence otherwise. Napoleon, cause already infinite 
due, though perhaps indirectly, violent 
death put period existence. 
 
"Sir Ferdinando, things adopted, 
earliest days conflict French, peculiar 
method happy news reached London, 
custom purchase immediately large store and, 
taking place outgoing happened light 
first, drive country good news 
met road it, along every 
cared listen Thus, 
driven far later, 

setting news victory death, sat 
October night box 
knees two cases old 
seat. genial custom one many habits abandoned 
victories retreat 
tyrant went 
happened, however, summer Sir Ferdinando 
staying weeks capital. succession 
doubtful days; came glorious news 
much Sir joyous youth within him. 
hurried wine bought dozen 
Bath point way 
box and, seated glory beside proclaimed aloud 
passed warm liquid 
Sleeping Reading 
awakened great news. one 
much overcome patriotic emotions found 
impossible night began grow 
Sir Ferdinando found enough take 
every keep vital compelled drink 
stages well. approaching 
travelling miles last 
without manifested slightest 
Sir Ferdinando suddenly sideways seat 
fell, head road. unpleasant awakened 
brought 
guard ran back light. found Sir Ferdinando still 
blood mouth. back 
passed body, breaking arms. 
two picked up, 
dead reached next Sir Ferdinando, 
victim Lady Lapith marry again, 
determined devote rest life well-being three 
five years old, 

 
Henry Wimbush paused, put "So much 
way said. "Now begin read 

 
"One said Mr. Scogan, I've 
 
Mr. Wimbush Seated apart corner room, Ivor 
showing Mary Spirit Life. spoke together 

 
Mr. Scogan lighted pipe again. said. 
 
Henry Wimbush fired away. 
 
"It spring George Wimbush, first 
made acquaintance lovely always 
called. young man yellow hair 
face 
mind. educated Church, enjoyed 
field and, though circumstances 
comfortable pleasures 
father, East Indian destined 
political career, gone considerable expense acquiring 
pleasant little birthday gift 
son. justly when, eve George's majority, 
Bill 1832 swept existence. 
inauguration George's political career 
time got know lovely 

 
"The lovely fail impress him. 
black eyes, noble 
neck, sloping shoulders, 
blue eyes, 
hair, identical pair English 
 
conversation first meeting however, 
forbidding that, attraction exercised 
beauty, George would never courage follow 
acquaintance. looking air 
asked thought latest French 
whether liked George 
almost worse question Georgiana opened 
conversation him. asked, leaning forward 
fixing large dark eyes, 
George lose presence mind. 
enough appreciation music know hated anything 
so, credit, replied, 'I 
Georgiana smiled 'I 
I. went hear last week, course. "The 
prayer closed eyes. know anything 
said 'I hesitated, 
go speaking, decided would 
wiser fact enjoyed 
man made like 
like 
last George's estimation, almost compensated 
rest concert. smiled pleasure 
thought it. Yes, decidedly, 

 
followed first introduction paying call 
young ladies mother, small 
elegant house neighbourhood Lady Lapith 
made discreet found George's financial 
position, character, family good, asked 
hoped expected would marry 
but, prudent woman, knew advisable 
prepare George Wimbush, thought, would make 
excellent second string one 
 
"At first dinner, George's talked 
Nature. protested high mountains feeling 
human cities George agreed country 
held London season also 
noticed surprise certain distress Miss 
appetite poor, fact, exist. Two 
three 
whole looked time time 
two Georgiana seemed quite 
waved away whatever offered expression delicate 
eyes faces 
though 
objects sight thought 
dinner capital, ventured comment lack 
 
don't talk said like 
sensitive find sisters 
I. One can't think one's soul one 
 
one one must said. 
 
sighed. Death beautiful, don't 
broke corner piece began 
since, say, one must made 
little gesture little keep 
one put corner half 
 
regarded surprise. pale, looked 
thought; Perhaps 
really spiritual needed less He, clearly, 

 
"After saw liked him, Lady Lapith 
True, 
young man, one couldn't 
help him. part, thought 
especially protective 
affection. needed altogether 
spiritual world. never always pale, 
often complained talked much death, 
frequently Georgiana all; 
three ate least, talked death, 
startling appear positively 
moment, seemed, might loose 
hold material world become spirit. George thought 
continual 
 
"She however, live spite 
numerous parties pleasure which, 
company rest lovely never failed 
middle July whole household moved country. George 
invited spend month August Crome. 
 
"The list figured 
names two young men George hoped 
country air, natural might restored 
three sisters roses cheeks. 
mistaken. dinner, first evening, Georgiana ate 
two three half pale ever. 
spoke love. 
 
said, infinite 
Indiana Sir mystic 
souls jumping Love incompatible 
life. wish two people truly love one another 
live together die 
 
come, said Lady stout practical. 
would become next pray, world acted 

 
Georgiana dropped eyes. 
 
young Lady Lapith went on, 'I laughed 
countenance I'd said thing like that. young 
days souls weren't fashionable didn't think 
death 
 

 
young Lady Lapith subject; 
nothing, seemed, could stop now. young days, didn't 
eat, people told needed dose 
 
"There Georgiana sideways Lord 
shoulder. desperate successful. Lady 
Lapith stopped. 
 
"The days passed round gay 
party George alone Lord paying court 
clear received. 
George looked on, soul hell jealousy despair. 
company young men became him; shrank 
them, seeking One morning, broken away 
vague returned house alone. 
young men pool laughter 
floated him, making quiet house seem silent. 
lovely sisters still kept 
make appearance till male 
morning themselves. George sat hall 
abandoned thought. 
 
"At moment might moment might become Lady 
died, would die 
too; would go seek beyond grave. became Lady 
solution problem would simple. 
became Lady horrible thought. suppose 
love seemed incredible anyone 
could love life depended 
suppose couldn't live without him? way along 
clock struck 
last like turning 
little holding large covered tray, door 
led kitchen regions hall. deep 
George watched idle 
curiosity. across room came halt front 
seemed blank expense reached hand and, 
George's extreme little door swung open, 
foot winding Turning sideways order get 
tray narrow little rapid 
motion. door closed behind minute 
later opened without tray, hurried back 
across hall disappeared direction George 
tried thoughts, curiosity drew 
mind towards hidden door, little 
vain told matter none business, 
surprising door, mysterious staircase 
would piece 
five minutes struggled 
end time found standing 
front innocent sheet little 
glance show position 
secret looked 
eye. ordinary door let flush 
handle betrayed position, 
catch wood invited George astonished 
noticed before; seen it, 
almost obvious door library lines 
dummy books. pulled back catch 
inside. degrees made 
stone ancient wound sight. 
window admitted foot 
central tower, little window looked 
still shouting pool below. 
 
closed door went back seat. curiosity 
satisfied. Indeed, partial satisfaction 
staircase 
little business his, kept business 
his. tried read, attention 
twelve sounded harmonious Suddenly George 
rose, crossed room, opened hidden door, began 
stairs. passed first window, round, came 
another. paused moment look out; heart beat 
though unknown danger. 
doing, told himself, extremely horribly 
One turn more, half 
turn, door confronted him. halted it, could 
hear sound. Putting eye saw nothing 
stretch white wall. turned handle 
stepped across saw, 

 
"In middle pleasantly little 
Mr. Wimbush remarked small circular 
table shining 
elegant polished 
cold great deeply 
heart white brown cannon ball 
cold slender 
one another place round 
table sat three three lovely 
 
"At George's sudden entrance looked towards door, 
astonishment kept George fixed 
sat immediately facing door, gazed 
dark, enormous eyes. thumb 
right hand holding 
little stood apart rest hand. 
mouth open, never reached 
remained, suspended, two sisters 
turned round look still grasped knife 
fingers round glass. 
seemed long time, George three sisters stared 
one another silence. suddenly 
movement. Georgiana dropped knife 
movement propagated itself, grew 
sprang feet, uttering cry. wave 
panic reached turned and, something 
went, rushed room winding stairs. came 
hall, there, quiet 
house, began laugh. 
 
"At noticed sisters ate little 
Georgiana French 
'I feel little stronger said Lord 
increase 'a 
little added, nervous laugh. Looking up, 
caught George's cheeks looked hastily 
away. 
 
"In garden afternoon found moment alone. 
 
"You won't tell Promise won't tell 
would make us look besides, 
isn't it? Say won't tell 
 
said George tell 
 

 
don't care, said give twenty-four hours 

 
Lapith course; hoped better 
all, wasn't bad. 
married New Year. 
 
"My poor Mr. Wimbush added, closed book 
put away read papers oppressed 
think him." "It 
government, highly 
representative 
 
Henry Wimbush ceased speaking. silence Ivor's 
spirit became 
Priscilla, suddenly woke up. 
 
"What?" said startled one newly returned 
"what?" 
 
Jenny caught words. looked up, smiled, nodded 
"It's said. 
 
"What's 
 
"What Henry closed red notebook lying 
knees slipped band round it. "I'm going 
got up. 
 
"So said Anne, energy rise 

 
night hot Round open windows 
hung Ivor, portrait 
Being, looked darkness drew breath. 
 
"The like 
 
"It get said Henry Wimbush, cautiously 
added, 
 
"I shan't sleep, know." 
 
Priscilla turned head 
nodded slightest movement. "You must make 
said. "When can't sleep, concentrate say, 
'I sleep, go. That's power 

 
"But work Ivor "I simply cannot 
sleep night." 
 
said Mary, 
 
wonderful end decided sleep 
western tower, Ivor 
flat leads could get 
doors opened them. stars, 
would 
up, hour later two 
separate tower, crying 
across dividing 
 
Mary charm open air work 
expected Even one could fail aware 
leads extremely 
once, roused unknown 
burst sudden stars 
moon demanded looked at, one 
across could help 
next. Time passed; moon climbed higher higher 
Mary felt less first came out. 
sat looked Ivor able 
wondered. though answer mental question, 
behind farther end white form 
noiselessly form that, 
Spreading arms right left, like 
began walk forward along house. swayed 
advanced. Mary looked perhaps 
walking Suppose wake suddenly, 
spoke moved might mean death. dared look more, sank 
back listened seemed immensely 
long time sound. feet 
followed noise 
suddenly Ivor's head shoulders appeared One 
followed, other. Mary pretended wake 
start. 
 
"Oh!" said. "What here?" 
 
"I couldn't "so came along see 
One gets bored oneself Don't find so?" 
 
light Long, narrow east, 
bright orange sky pale 
soul pain, monstrous flying heavily 
below, parapet Ivor Mary 
started broad 
 
him!" cried Ivor, jumping up. 
frightened ran parapet absurd distress, 
long tail swung 
back forth turned turned again. 
upon air 
recovered dignity. left Ivor 
eye purple green, blue gold. 
handed 
 
"An said. 
 
Mary looked moment, gravely purple 
lines looked 
like large, sort 
bear head, hair like bell 
gold. face, 
whole atmosphere rather 
 
"It's extraordinary think said last, 
looking contemplation 
 
Ivor "I select you, select me. 
 
put arm round shoulders stood looking 
first begun warm colour pale light 
white young charming 
rising sun touched extremely 
then, choose think so, nothing world 
Profound beautiful 
 
"I must getting back said Ivor last. 
 

 
"I'm afraid so. soon 
 
prolonged silent farewell. 
 
"And now," said Ivor, "I repeat 
 
Mary threw arms round "You Ivor. It's dangerous. 
Please." 
 
yield last "All right," said, "I'll 
go house end." 
 
vanished door darkness still 
within house. minute later 
farther waved hand, sank down, 
behind below, house, came thin 
gone back time. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Ivor gone. behind yellow 
across England. Social amorous 
urgent character called hall hall, 
mansion, 
whole To-day to-morrow 
Saturday West Tuesday morning 
never whole summer through, 
beginning July till end September, devoted 
them. autumn went back 
London Crome little 
stream life; belonged already past. 
would would 
smile. Thursday long, long way ahead. 
would think Thursday morning Thursday morning Meanwhile 
meanwhile 
 
book Crome Ivor left, according 
custom cases, poem. 
ten minutes preceding Denis Mr. 
Scogan strolled back together gates whence 
last hall 
found book, open, Ivor's scarcely 
Mr. Scogan read 
 
"The magic 
night. soul created blue 
sea, height, eyed wings 
singing flies 
flying pain, delicate much 
much 
soul. Crome calls like voice like 
Fate tears Hard since far 
Crome soul must remembering 
 
"Very nice said Mr. Scogan, 
finished. "I troubled 
knowledge mind, 
perhaps 
 
"What could said Denis. "It's beautiful word, Ivor 
wanted say wings 
 
"You make 
 
"One much," Denis went on, "from fact beautiful 
words don't always mean ought Recently, example, 
whole poem word didn't 
mean ought meant. isn't 
it?" 
 
Mr. Scogan agreed. "And mean?" 
 
"It's word I've earliest said Denis, 
used give 
One poured drop drop 
narrow golden fierce 
list among things described 
highest degree word. 
used say I'd taken seemed 
wonderfully describe internal 
shall call 
followed drinking Later, discovered 
described spiritual 
wine body soul well. 
carminative old 

new wine year's compared 
them, them. gin 
whole table 
spread hands, 
know carminative really 
 
"Well, mean?" asked Mr. Scogan, little impatiently. 
 
said Denis, 
imagined vaguely something 
still vaguely 
like 
idea singing idea flesh, 
suggestion 
interior 
word. Instead 
 
"Do come point, dear Denis," protested Mr. Scogan. "Do come 

 
"Well, wrote poem said "I wrote poem 
effects 
 
done you," said Mr. Scogan. "There 
need 
 
"I putting forward Denis went on, "that effects 
love often similar effects could 
well example, essentially 
gives one sense 
 
     'And passion carminative 
 
line also, 
flattered myself, Everything 
word exact 
indefinite suggestion. 
 
     'And passion carminative 
 
suddenly occurred 
never actually looked word Carminative grown 
days always 
taken word rich content 
elaborate work complete 

 
     'And passion carminative 
 
first time ever committed word writing, 
felt would like authority it. small 
dictionary hand. turned C, 
car, 
repeated. Mr. Scogan laughed. Denis shook head. said, "for 
laughing matter. marked end 
death something young 
childhood believed carminative 
now, lies rest 
day, perhaps, ten years, half century, shall know 
carminative means 
 
     ne Et ne le 
 
makes one rather 
 
said Mr. Scogan thoughtfully. 
 
Denis repeated, silent time. 
said Denis last, wonder much love 
them. much mere things ideas people 
understand full beauty words. mind literary 
mind. spectacle Mr. finding 
name seems rather anything else. 
addresses leave 
unless leave can't see 
 
ne point et ne 

 
little 
 
"You're right," said Mr. Scogan. "I 
 
"You don't feel 
 
"No." 
 
"That's test literary said "the feeling 
sense words power. verbal part 
literature simply development Words man's first 
language created whole new 
wonder loved words attributed power them! 
harmonious words summoned empty hats 
spirits elements. literary men, still 
go process, verbal together, and, 
power finished trembling delight 
empty No, 
emotions empty Formulated art 
statements become example, 
lack self-evident 
truth, one would worth insist, 
chosen words 
or, de since 
put do, lack 
creation 
something And, 
may add, Half world's greatest 
simply de 
magic significance as, lack can't 
appreciate words. I'm sorry you." 
 
"A mental said Mr. Scogan reflectively. "That's 

 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
four stone little stood two 
three feet grass green close. Beneath 
perpetual shade growth long, Here, 
green family white sought 
shelter afternoon sun. stood, themselves, 
long pressed ground, though 
cool grass water. Little social burst forth, 
time time pointed tail would execute brilliant 
Suddenly prodigious 
shook wooden whole 
little crumbled wood among them. 
continuous rushed beneath 
menace, stay till safely 

 
"Don't lose Anne saying. You've frightened 
Poor sitting sideways low, 
wooden chair. right rested back chair 
supported hand. long, slender body 
curves lazy looked Gombauld 
half-closed eyes. 
 
Gombauld repeated, stamped foot again. 
round portrait 
 
"Poor Anne repeated. sound faint 

 
"Can't see make lose time?" asked. "I can't work 
like this." 
 
lose less time stopped talking feet 
little painting change. all, 
for, except 
 
Gombauld made noise like "You're said, 
"Why ask come stay here? tell 
you'd like 
 
"For simple reasons like least, you're good 
think you're good 
 
"For simple want 
make love and, do, running 
away." 
 
Anne threw back head laughed. "So think 
like man! knew gross 
awful boring men try make love don't want 
make could see 
 
Gombauld picked attacked canvas 
"I suppose you'll saying next 
didn't start made first 
innocent victim sat still never anything 
could invite on." 
 
"So like man said Anne. "It's always old story 
woman man. woman 
man, innocent poor Surely 
you're going sing old song again. It's 
always thought man 
 
said Gombauld. 
 
"Be little Anne went on. "Can't see you're simply 
That's men always 
it's feel one loose desires 
woman, desire strongly immediately accuse 
on, deliberately inviting desire. 
might well say 
deliberately feel 
cases hundred women innocent 

 
"Well, say must hundredth said 
Gombauld, without looking up. 
 
Anne shrugged shoulders gave vent sigh. "I'm loss 
know whether you're silly 
 
painting little time silence Gombauld began speak 
again. "And there's Denis," said, conversation 
though broken off. "You're playing game 
him. can't leave wretched young man 
 
Anne flushed sudden "It's perfectly 
untrue Denis," said indignantly. "I never playing 
beautifully call game him." Recovering calm, 
added ordinary voice 
"You've become protective towards poor Denis 
 
"I Gombauld replied, gravity somehow little 
"I don't like see young 
 
along road said Anne, continuing 
sentence him. admire sentiments and, believe me, share 
them." 
 
curiously Gombauld said Denis. 
happened completely untrue. Gombauld might slight 
ground never 
Denis. Poor became somewhat 
 
Gombauld painted 
desire, which, before, distracted mind, making work 
seemed kind energy. 
finished, told himself, portrait would 
painting naturally adopted first 
Seated back chair, head 
shoulders turned angle rest body, towards 
front, fallen attitude 
lazy curves lines crossed 
grace painted figure seemed 
kind soft hand lay along 
work face now; begun 
Anne's 
face would be, utterly 
lights thought emotion. mask 
sometimes face. portrait terribly 
time malicious Yes, would 
finished, Gombauld wondered would think 
it. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
sake peace quiet Denis retired earlier 
afternoon wanted work, hour 
one, recently weighed heavily body mind. 
demon upon him; possessed bored hopeless 
melancholy old knew feared 
name felt, like Ernest "a little 
mood write something rather exquisite 
gentle something little 
put little infinite. thought Anne, 
love hopeless Perhaps ideal kind 
hopeless quiet, theoretical kind love. sad mood 
could well believe it. began write. One elegant 
beneath 
 
"A love 


 
attention attracted sound outside. looked 
were, Anne Gombauld, talking, laughing 
together. crossed front, passed sight 
gate wall. way 
green close going sit again. 
pleasantly melancholy violent 
threw waste-paper 
ran "The 
 
hall saw Mr. man seemed lying Denis 
tried vain. Mr. Scogan's eye like eye 
Ancient 
 
"Not said, stretching small hand pointed 
going flower garden take 
sun. We'll go 
 
Denis abandoned himself; Mr. Scogan put hat went arm 
arm. terrace Henry Wimbush Mary 
playing solemn game descended 
here, thought Denis, Anne 
kissed her, 
tried carry failed. Life 
 
said Mr. Scogan, suddenly breaking long silence. 
what's wrong that's wrong 
you, dear Denis, you're old enough sane 
sane world great man; things are, curious 
nothing all; purposes don't 
exist. et 
 
Denis made thinking things. "After all," 
said all, Gombauld better looking I, 
and, besides, he's already somebody 
I'm still 
 
ever gets done world done Mr. 
Scogan went on. Denis tried 
Mr. Scogan's gradually compelled attention. 
am, may possibly never achieved anything. 
We're we're merely lack human 
enthusiastic People quite ready listen 
little would listen 
acting advice men 
Wherever choice made man 
reason world unhesitatingly followed 
appeals passion 


 
entered head one stood green 
wooden bench, midst continent 
here, though place one breathed 
dry instead Mr. Scogan elected 

 
example, case Luther took 
pipe began fill "There man 
reason ever one. People listened 
new performing elegant instrument, 
even him. move 
behave wanted least 
little less not. Luther 
convinced matters 
men rushed follow 
him. longer listened to; 
Luther serious, Luther Great 
War. reason power, 
move men action. Europe followed Luther 
century half war bloody It's melancholy 
Mr. Scogan lighted intense light 
smell burning tobacco began mingle 
smell 
 
"If want get men act must set 
manner. sane founders 
made means 
sane man must appear find 
is. example, informs us 
way preserve 
appeals 
customary hope 
ready, comes, beat 
time shall feel little ashamed 
myself. Scogan shrugged shoulders and, pipe hand, 
made gesture complain things 
are. fact remains 
want, then, sane reasonable forces 
sane men power Mr. Scogan's eyes shone 
ordinary and, taking pipe 
mouth, gave vent somehow rather laugh. 
 
"But don't want said Denis. sitting 
one end bench, eyes light. 
Mr. Scogan, bolt end, laughed again. 
 
wants said. form other. sort 
power literary power. people want power 
human power 
words, them, them, obey 
you. 
 
"Do you?" asked Denis 
 
"Yes," Mr. Scogan continued, "the time come. men 
intelligence learn service 
reason. can't leave world longer direction chance. 
can't allow dangerous like mad like 
Napoleon, mad himself, go appearing turning 
everything down. past didn't much matter; 
modern like Great War, 
another Luther two, whole concern go 
future, men reason must see madness world's 
proper made useful work, 
like mountain driving 
 
light said Denis. "You ought 
complete 
 
Mr. Scogan waved away "There's one thing 
said. "The men intelligence must must 
seize power direct us. 
must found Rational State." 
 
heat slowly Denis's mental 
seemed bring Mr. Scogan additional talked 
energy, hands moved sharp, precise 
eyes voice went 
Denis's ears 
mechanical noise. 
 
"In Rational heard Mr. Scogan saying, beings 
separated distinct according colour 
eyes shape according qualities 
mind Examining 
would seem almost test child 
born assign proper Duly 
child given education suitable members 
adult life, perform functions 
human beings variety capable 
 
"How many species be?" asked Denis. 
 
"A great many, Mr. Scogan "the 
subtle power go 
business. indicate 
three main species subjects Rational State 

 
paused, cleared throat, twice, 
Denis's mind vision table glass and, 
lying across one long white 
 
"The three main Mr. Scogan went on, "will 
Directing Men Faith, Among 
found capable thought, know 
attain certain degree alas, even 
among intelligent, freedom mental bondage 
time. select body drawn among 
turned attention problems practical life, 
governors Rational State. employ 
instruments power second great species men 
Faith, calling them, believe things 
passion, ready die 
wild men, fearful 
good longer allowed 


old-fashioned Man Faith Desire, creature 
circumstance, might drive men tears might 
equally well set cutting one another's 
replaced new sort still same, still 
but, ah, 
different new Man Faith 
passion, desire, enthusiasm propagation 
reasonable idea. be, 
superior 
 
Mr. Scogan though taking 
name reason, "From earliest 
years, soon, is, examining assigned 
place Men Faith 
special education eye Moulded 
long process suggestion, go world, 
generous reasonable 
above. 
ideas useful ago 
ceased useful, new generation 
new eternal truth. principal Men 
Faith move direct third great species 
consisting millions lack intelligence 
without valuable particular effort required 
thought necessary, sake 
humanity shall united single enthusiastic desire 
idea, Men Faith, simple satisfying 
sent mission ordinary times, 
high spiritual temperature would 
Men Faith quietly earnestly busy great work 
education. almost 

earliest members assured happiness 
found except work made believe 
happy, tremendously important 
everything noble lower species 
earth restored centre universe man 
earth. Oh, lot 
Rational Working eight hours day, obeying 
convinced significance 
happy, happier race men ever been. 
go life state 
never Men Faith play 
filling ever filling warm 
sad sober behind 

 
"And place Rational Denis 
inquired hand. 
 
Mr. Scogan looked moment silence. "It's difficult see 
would fit in," said last. "You couldn't 
you're independent belong larger 
none required Man Faith. 
Directing clear 
paused shook head. "No, see 
place you; 
 
Deeply Denis emitted loud laugh. "I'm 
getting here," said, got up. 
 
Mr. Scogan followed example, walked slowly away 
narrow blue flowers passage. Denis 
pulled it; dark leaves 
like passed 
bed now; round, ripe 
brown Denis thought; heads 
stuck liked fancy enough Mr. Scogan. 
 
Uttered fancy seemed less 
charming significant first occurred him. 
 
silence, growing wave sound 
fields beyond garden 

 
"It satisfactory said Mr. Scogan, strolled slowly 
"that multitude people fields 
order may talk Like every good thing 
world, leisure culture paid for. however, 
pay. Let us 
duly thankful that, dear repeated, 
knocked 
 
Denis suddenly remembered Anne. 
thought. 
 
"Shall go pay call suggested "It 
would amusing see he's now." 
 
laughed think furious Gombauld would saw 

 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Gombauld means furious Denis 
hoped expected would be. Indeed, rather pleased 
two one brown round 
pale, appeared frame open door. energy born 
irritation dying within him, returning 
elements. moment would losing temper 
Anne would keeping Yes, 
positively glad see them. 
 
"Come in, come in," called 
 
Followed Mr. Scogan, Denis climbed little ladder stepped 
looked Gombauld 
could learn nothing expression faces except 
seemed pleased see really 
wondered. 
 
Mr. Scogan, meanwhile, looking 
 
said Almost true 
character, yes, positively true. I'm 
surprised find putting business." 
pointed face, extended finger followed 
curves painted "I thought one fellows 
went exclusively masses 
 
Gombauld laughed. "This little said. 
 
"I'm said Mr. Scogan. "I one, without ever 
slightest appreciation always taken particular 
pleasure like see pictures nature 
completely pictures exclusively product 
human mind. give pleasure derive good piece 
reasoning mathematical problem 
Nature, anything reminds nature, me; 
large, utterly 
home works man; choose 
set mind it, understand anything man made 
thought. always travel never 
possibly help it. For, travelling one can't avoid even 
London, works example, occasional 
tree, flowers travel Tube see 
nothing works geometrical forms, 
straight lines human 
product friendly 
spiritual bored 
narrow 
one comfortable forget round 
blind mass earth, endless 
Yes, give Tube every time; give 
ideas, simple well made. preserve 
nature, preserve that's large complicated 
haven't courage, and, all, haven't time 
start 
 
Mr. Scogan Denis crossed farther 
side little square Anne still 
lazy low chair. 
 
"Well?" demanded, looking almost asking 
her? hardly knew himself. 
 
Anne looked him, answer echoed "Well?" another, 
laughing 
 
Denis nothing more, moment, say. Two three 
stood corner behind Anne's chair, faces turned wall. 
pulled began look 
 
"May see too?" Anne 
 
stood row wall. Anne turn round 
chair look them. big canvas man fallen 
horse, painting flowers, small 
hands back chair, Denis leaned her. behind 
side room Mr. Scogan talking away. 
long time looked saying or, rather, 
Anne looked Denis, part, looked 
Anne. 
 
"I like man don't you?" said last, looking 
inquiring smile. 
 
Denis nodded, voice, though 
cost great effort utter words, said, "I love you." 
 
remark Anne heard good many times mostly 
heard 
come perhaps words provoked 
certain surprised 
 
"My poor Denis," managed say, 
spoke. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Denis, descending 
making unsuccessful effort write something nothing 
particular, found deserted. go 
garden eye fell familiar mysterious 
large red notebook often seen Jenny quietly 
busily left lying 
temptation great. picked book slipped elastic 
band kept 
 
written capital letters 
raised sort thing one wrote 
one's Latin one still one's preparatory 
 
     "Black black 
     
 
curiously thought, smiled himself. 
opened book. saw made though 
struck. 
 
Denis severest so, least, always 
liked think 
Brown Dog himself. 
one knew better did. 
Indeed, vague way imagined nobody beside aware 
all. seemed, somehow, appear 
people appeared him; ever 
spoke among freely critical and, 
quite malicious tone accustomed talk 
them. eyes see privilege 
reserved alone. rest world surely 
almost 
 
opening red notebook 
ground, severest 
all. discovery painful one. 
 
fruit lay him. 
himself, reading (the book 
dancing Gombauld Anne. 

Denis 
appeared every one clear lines. 
expression face, assumed superiority 
feeble attitude body attitude 
dignity, given away 
things And, terrible still, 
certainty physical 
recorded 
 
Denis looked deeper book. 
Priscilla Mr. Henry Wimbush, Anne 
Mr. Scogan, Jenny represented light 
slightly was, indeed, Mary 
Ivor. scarcely glanced them. fearful desire know worst 
possessed him. turned 
nothing Seven full pages devoted 
him. 
 

got Thoughtfully closed book, 
band place. went 
this, reflected, Jenny employed 
leisure hours thought 
he, seemed, 
felt towards No, thing 
wasn't Jenny red 
book stood 
represented vast conscious world men outside himself; 
something apt 
believe in. could stand could watch 
past, still imagine one fully 
intelligent, individual among thousands. seemed, 
somehow, impossible people way 
elaborate complete his. Impossible; yet, 
would make painful discovery external world 
horrible reality consciousness red 
notebook one put 
beyond doubt fact outer world really existed. 
 
Sitting terrace, unpleasant 
truth time. Still it, strolled 
towards shabby 
across lower Odious 
thick cruel 
flat eyes piercing 
right, reflected, took illustrate 
human Animals men 
red threw piece 
stick slowly rushed towards it, thinking 
something 
 
walked on. profound shade giant tree him. Like 
great wooden spread long arms abroad. 
 
"Under spreading 
 
tried remember poem by, 
 
"The smith, man he, arms like 
 
like his; would try 

 
emerged pool lay him, 
blue various green 
summer day. Looking it, thought Anne's bare arms 
moving knees feet. 
 
"And little white legs, 
 
Oh, people's Would ever able 
call brain there, indeed, anything 
truly own, simply 
 
walked slowly round among 
surrounding yew trees, leaning back 
pleasantly executed 
mason saw Mary 
 
said, passing close say 
something. 
 
Mary looked up. answered 
tone. 
 
dark trees, atmosphere seemed 
Denis sat beside shadow 
prolonged silence. 
 
breakfast morning Mary found picture 
Great Park. sixteen 
windows 
picture right left. Ten years hard times 
deserted Fifty 
years, know old more. 
vanished vanished them. 
moment, however, Mary's mind moved 
 
back next address, written, Ivor's 
large hand, single 
 
sun, Like bright 
sleep within mystic 
Memories morning, memories night." 
 
followed three "Would mind asking one 
forward packet left 
drawer 
 
Seated Mary considered life 
love. abolition far bringing 
expected peace mind, brought nothing new 
hitherto Ivor, couldn't without 
now. hand, poem back 
picture Ivor could well without her. 
now, Mary knew thought last 
song night garden. 
 
sage et Pour un 
le pour 
 
Mary shed tears never unhappy 
life before. 
 
Denis first broke silence. "The began 
soft philosophical tone, "is universe. 
times comes contact individuals, 
forced take existence 
besides 
 
highly abstract generalisation preliminary 
personal confidence. first conversation 
lead 
 
said and, herself, added, "When one 
individual comes intimate contact another, he, 
course, case may almost inevitably receive 

 
"One Denis went on, "to spectacle 
one's one forgets spectacle presents 
people well 
 
Mary "The said, 
felt matters one individual seeks intimate contact 
another individual natural way, certain receive 
hand, 
equally grave sufferings follow unnatural 
see, it's 
 
"When think said Denis, making decided move 
desired direction, "I ignorant people's 
general, particular, opinions 
myself. minds sealed books occasionally opened 
outside world." made gesture 
drawing 
 
"It's awful said Mary thoughtfully. "One 
personal experience quite awful is." 
 
"Exactly." Denis nodded. "One 
leaned towards slightly lowered voice. "This morning, 
began, cut deep 
voice distance pleasant floated 
house. Mechanically Mary rose 
feet, Denis, little hurt exhibit desperate 
anxiety food slight interest spiritual 
followed her. made way house without 
speaking. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
"I hope said Henry Wimbush dinner, "that next 
Monday Bank expected help 

 
cried Anne. "The forgotten it. 
Couldn't put stop it, Uncle 
 
Mr. Wimbush shook head. said, "I fear 
liked put end years ago; 
claims Charity 
 
"It's charity Anne murmured "it's 
 
Mr. Wimbush went on, "the Fair become institution. Let 
see, must years since started it. modest 
affair then. made sweeping movement hand 
silent. 
 
spoke highly Mr. Wimbush's public spirit still continued 
tolerate Fair. Beginning sort church 
Charity Fair grown thing 
miscellaneous side real 
genuine fair grand local St. 
people neighbouring even 
county town, park Bank Holiday 
local hospital fact alone 
prevented Mr. Wimbush, Fair cause 
putting stop 
park garden. 
 
"I've made arrangements Henry Wimbush went on. "Some 
larger put to-morrow. 
arrive 
 
"So there's said Anne, turning rest party. 
"You'll something. special favour you're allowed 
choose slavery. job tea usual, Aunt 

 
"My said Mrs. Wimbush, her, "I important 
things think Fair. need doubt 
shall best Monday comes encourage 
 
"That's said Anne. Priscilla encourage 
do, 
 
"I won't anything stand watch people 

 
"Then you'll look children's 
 
"All right," Mary agreed. "I'll look children's 
 
"And Mr. 
 
Mr. Scogan reflected. "May allowed tell asked 
last. "I think good telling 
 
"But can't tell 
 
"Can't Mr. Scogan surveyed himself. 
 
"You'll dressed up. still 
 
"I'm ready suffer 
 
said turning Gombauld, "You must lightning 
said. portrait five 
 
"It's pity I'm said Gombauld, laugh. "I could throw 
picture extra 
 
Mary "Nothing said "by speaking 
serious subjects. And, all, whatever personal 
views may be, perfectly serious 
 
"And 
 
Denis made "I said, 
"I'll one men wear thing 
go telling people way tea walk 

 
"No, no," said Anne. "That won't do. must something 
that." 
 
"But what? good taken, nothing 

 
"Well, then, must concluded Anne. "You must write poem 
Bank We'll print Uncle 
press sell 
 
Denis worth 
 
Anne shook head. repeated firmly. pay 

 
"And there's said Mr Wimbush. said, raising 
voice, "what do?" 
 
Denis thought suggesting might draw 
execution, decided would wiser go ignorance 
mind red notebook. Could really 
true looked like that? 
 
"What do," Jenny "what do?" frowned 
thoughtfully face smiled. 
"When said, "I learnt play 
 
"The 
 
Jenny nodded, and, proof agitated knife 
like pair "If there's 
opportunity playing began. 
 
"But course," said Anne, "there's amount We'll 
put definitely That's 
 
"And good lot too," said Gombauld. "I look forward Bank 
ought 
 
"It ought indeed," Mr Scogan "But may rest assured 
won't be. holiday ever anything 
 
protested Gombauld. "My holiday Crome isn't 

 
it?" Anne turned mask towards him. 
 
"No, answered. 
 
"I'm delighted hear it." 
 
"It's nature Mr. Scogan went on; "our 
can't help Reflect moment. 
Holiday surely 
complete absolute change. agree Mr. 
Scogan glanced face face round sharp nose moved 
series rapid points 
sign continued: "A complete absolute 
well. isn't complete absolute change precisely thing 
never nature Mr. Scogan 
looked rapidly him. "Of course is. ourselves, 
specimens members society, hope 
anything like absolute tied frightful 
human society 
us fatal 
us, complete holiday question. us struggle 
take one, never succeed, may allowed 
express never succeed getting farther 

 
"You're said Anne. 
 
"I mean be," Mr. Scogan replied, and, fingers 
right hand, went on: "Look me, example. sort holiday 
passions faculties Nature 
horribly full range human 
case range within 
ten make human instrument, 
perhaps two. Thus, may certain amount 
intelligence, possess 
mathematical wholly without religious 
naturally little ambition 
Education limited 
brought society, laws; 
afraid taking holiday them, also feel painful 
try so. word, conscience well fear 
Yes, know experience. often tried take 
get away myself, boring nature, 
mental Mr. Scogan sighed. "But always without 
added, without success. youth always 
feel Here, said 
myself, two tremendously important exciting Life 
would altogether could 
feel them. try feel them. read works 
seemed nothing indeed 
always must anyone feel emotion authors 
felt writing. emotion 
written work simply attempt express 
terms intellect mystic 
rich feeling 
rich feeling. 
nothing, appears merely 
melancholy Mr. Scogan himself. "So much 
religious emotion. even greater 
pains cultivate that. looked right works art 
every part Europe. time when, venture believe, 
knew 
even Henry does. To-day, happy say, 
forgotten knowledge 
without vanity assert don't 
course, know anything later 
century periods fashionable 
am, was, Yes, repeat it, 
fact make art not. 
Confronted could tell known 
date character 
influences gone make felt 
none strange excitement is, 
informed feel it, true emotion. felt 
nothing certain interest subject 
subject felt nothing 
great spirit. Nevertheless, must gone looking 
pictures ten years would honestly admit 
merely bored me. Since given attempts take 
go old daily self resigned 
spirit bank clerk ten till six daily 
task. I'm sorry you, Gombauld, still look 
forward 
 
Gombauld shrugged shoulders. said, "my 
aren't elevated yours. personally found war quite 
thorough holiday ordinary 
common emotions ever want 
 
"Yes," Mr. Scogan thoughtfully agreed. "Yes, war certainly 
something step beyond 
almost 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
little canvas village sprung up, beyond 
boundaries green park. crowd 
men dressed mostly best, 
funeral women pale 
hung midst canvas town, gold 
sun. 
walked among head, like 
bunch 
motion air, 
worked rose thin, scarcely 
column black 
 
Denis climbed top one Sir Ferdinando's 
there, standing resting 
surveyed scene. sent prodigious 
beat 
precision sounded 
like glass Far 
Last Trump 
alternate detached 
rest music made own, 

 
Denis leaned gulf noise. threw 
noise would surely up, keep suspended, 
ball breaking Another 
fancy came him, time form. 
 
"My soul thin white sheet stretched 

 
bad. liked idea something thin 
blown 
 
"My soul thin 
 

 
"My soul pale, 
 
thin, right 
Tight life. time 
descend words actual 
went slowly. "My soul thin, 
 
terrace stood distinguished old 
Lord like English French 
long man, long nose long, 
long teeth old lower down, short covert 
long, long legs 
bent gave kind sideways 
Beside him, short stood Mr. 
conservative statesman, face like Roman 
short white hair. Young girls didn't much like going motor drives 
alone Mr. old Lord one wondered 
wasn't living island among 
distinguished persons who, one reason another, find impossible 
live England. talking Anne, one 

 
black silk proved 
old Mrs. big house side 
stood low ground, 
menaced eyes Priscilla Wimbush, 
figure dressed purple 
black recalled first-class 

 
Denis window 
eyes suddenly become innocent, 
seemed, people, yet really 
existed, themselves, 
Moreover, like them. Could one believe it? 
evidence red notebook 
 
would polite go say, "How do?" 
moment Denis want could soul 
pale would keep 
long could. Cautiously crept side 
door made way towards park. soul 
approached noise movement fair. paused moment 
stepped 
 
Hundreds people, private face real, 
thought paid saw 
more, Largest World. 
home emerged time see 
break loose home. child it; perfect 
sphere flushed Denis followed 
eyes became lost could send 
soul follow 
 
stuck started 
push way, crowd. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Mr. Scogan accommodated little canvas Dressed 
black red 
tied round black brown, 
Day. 
curtain announced presence within 
Seated table, Mr. Scogan 
received mysterious silence, movement 
finger sit opposite extend 
hands inspection. examined 
presented him, using glass pair 
way shaking head, 
tongue looked lines. Sometimes would 
though himself, preserve 
sign cross uttered words. came 
laughing grew suddenly began take 
could be, possible, 
something sort thing all? all, 
thought, shook head hands, 
beating heart, 
speak. long silent Mr. Scogan would suddenly 
look ask, question, as, 
"Have ever hit head young man 
red answer negative, could hardly 
fail be, Mr. Scogan would several times, saying, "I afraid 
so. Everything still come, still come, though can't 
far now." Sometimes, long examination, would 
"Where ignorance 'tis folly refuse 
divulge details future without 
despair. success People stood 
outside waiting privilege hearing sentence 
pronounced upon them. 
 
Denis, course round, looked curiosity crowd 
great desire 
see Mr. Scogan played part. canvas 
walls long 
Denis went borrowed 
wooden bench small Union hurried back 
Setting bench back 
climbed up, great air busy efficiency began tie 
Union top one 
canvas could see almost whole interior 
Mr. Scogan's head him; 
came clearly up. Denis looked listened 
financial death destruction 
next war. 
 
"Is going another asked old lady 
predicted end. 
 
"Very said Mr. Scogan, air quiet confidence. 
 
old lady succeeded girl dressed white 
wearing broad hat, Denis could 
see figure bare arms 
judged young Mr. Scogan looked hand, 
"You still 
 
young lady exclaimed, "Oh, 
 
"But remain added Mr. Scogan 
young lady again. interests small 
things less great, announced fact upon 
Mr. Scogan took began examine 
white "Very said, though 
It's clear day." silent. 
 
"What's asked girl. 
 
"I don't think ought tell you." Mr. Scogan shook 
brass ears 
 

 
seemed remark. it's 
clear. don't say whether settle married life 
four children whether try go 
none. specific one rather 

 
"What it? it? Oh, tell me!" 
 
white figure leant eagerly forward. 
 
Mr. Scogan sighed. "Very said, "if must know, 
must know. anything happens must blame 
curiosity. lifted sharp, 
"This written. Next Sunday afternoon 
six o'clock sitting second 
leads church lower road. moment man 
appear walking along Mr. Scogan looked hand 
though memory details scene. "A 
small man sharp exactly good looking 
precisely young, lingered word. 
"He ask you, tell way 
answer, I'll show walk towards little 
cannot read happen that." 
silence. 
 
"Is really asked white 
 
gave shoulders. "I merely tell read 
hand. Good afternoon. Yes, change. 
Thank you. Good 
 
Denis stepped tied 
Union hung air. "If could 
things like that!" thought, carried bench back 

 
Anne sitting behind long table filling thick white cups 
pile printed lay table. Denis 
took one looked poem. 
printed five hundred nice 

 
"Have sold asked tone. 
 
Anne put head one side three far, I'm 
afraid. I'm giving free copy 
tea. case it's 
 
Denis made reply, walked slowly away. looked 
hand read lines walked 

 
"This day Struck 
tossed Aunt small High 
call paper 
artificial roses round cheeks half 
year, might laugh things naked face Would 
think showed 
trod then, 
armed men home died break dull 
make prison every working day, must 
Sing know free. 
Russian bright blood whose roses spread 
red died again, 
men ancient bonds Old law, old old 
Old right wrong death; air received 
breath, little smoke died round 
lay Blood red gay flower 
fair. Sing Beneath Tree Liberty, 
Paper Nose Red within magic shade makes 
strong laugh sing 
answers laughing 
still, Within hill, 

laughter Sing Sing 
 
folded sheet carefully put pocket. thing 
Oh, decidedly, unpleasant crowd 
smell passed 
gate park wall garden. 
centre noise 
 
Heat Young polite 
voice Henry Wimbush. crowd figures black 
surrounded him. grey hat, round, 
midst moving sea, island aristocratic 
calm. 
 
Holding inch two front 
eyes, read names 
 
"Miss Miss Miss 
 
Five young persons ranged seats 
honour end old Lord Mr. 
looked eager interest. 
 
Henry Wimbush raised hand. silence. "When 
say go. said. almost simultaneous 
 
Denis pushed way Somebody 
looked down. old Mrs. 
 
see again, Mr. said rich, 
voice. little spoke, like 
Mrs. who, read 
Government needed needed never 
made collection peculiar war 
work. thirty-six trees well 
four trees could able 
eat practically whole year round. ate 
sent Government. military 
authorities called three 
fact bad year wall managed eat 
period national 
rather better, January 1st date 
Armistice ate Since Armistice relaxed 
eat two three day. 
constitution, suffered 
good cause. 
 
Denis answered vague polite noise. 
 
"So nice see young people enjoying Mrs. went 
on. "And old people too, matter. Look old Lord 
dear Mr. Isn't delightful see way enjoy 

 
Denis wasn't sure whether delightful 
all. didn't go watch two old gentlemen 
engaged moment 
seemed act for, all, 
won 
 
little thing, isn't she?" said Mrs. 
two three times. 
 
"Yes," Denis nodded agreement. said 
himself, laid phrase memory happy one. Old Mr. 
put congratulate Lord 
leaning forward showed long 
teeth, smiling. 
 
Mr. saying deep 
voice. 
 
stood hands behind 
back, one foot other. 
black polished 
 
"Very good indeed," said Lord voice seemed come 
behind teeth, voice. though dog suddenly 
begin speak. smiled again, Mr. 
 
"When say go. 
 
third heat started. 
 
"Do know, never could learn said Mrs. 
 

 
"But used able 
 
Denis imagined down, great green 
blown black no, wasn't good, wasn't good 
all. new 
last one, long 
Eve this, one bad 

 
Henry Wimbush's polite level voice pronounced 
Another young ladies in. 
 
Grown little weary sustaining conversation Mrs. 
Denis remembered duties called 
elsewhere. pushed lines made 
way along path left clear behind them. thinking 
soul pale, startled hearing 
thin, voice, speaking apparently head, 
pronounce single word 
 
looked sharply. path along walking passed 
lee wall Behind ground 
towards foot terrace one 
standing higher ground easy look dark 
Looking up, Denis saw two heads immediately 
him. recognised iron mask Mr. Bodiham pale, 
face wife. looking head, heads 

 
Mrs. Bodiham repeated, softly. 
 
turned iron mask towards solid 
"How said, though himself; "how lowered 
eyes again, fell Denis's curious face. 
abrupt movement, Mr. Mrs. Bodiham sight behind 

 
Denis continued wandered past 
streets canvas 
soul noise laughter. 
space Mary directing children's Little creatures 
round her, making others 
Mary's face 
shining immense energy started 
race. Denis looked 
 
"You're said, coming behind touching 
arm. "I've never seen 
 
turned towards face, round, honest setting 
golden bell hair swung moved head 
rest. 
 
"Do know, Denis," said, low, serious voice, 
little know there's woman 
three children thirty-one 
 
said Denis, making rapid mental 
 
"It's I've telling One 
really 
 
sudden violent announced fact 
somebody won race. Mary became centre 
dangerous time, Denis thought, move on; might 
asked something stayed long. 
 
turned back towards canvas thought tea 
making mind. Tea, tea, tea. 
horribly Anne, unusual expression 
flushed face, furiously working handle brown 
liquid 
farther corner Priscilla, royal 
encouraging momentary Denis could hear 
laughter manly voice. Clearly, told himself, 
place one wanted tea. stood 
entrance beautiful thought suddenly came him; 
went back house, went without 
noiselessly opened little doors 
cool within would find 
bottle gin water, 
cups well 
 
minute later walking briskly Within 
house quiet cool. Carrying 
care, went There, glass 
corner table beside him, settled chair volume 
nothing, found, like du 
settling troubled spirits. 
required 
rest. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Towards fair became hour 
dancing begin. one side village space 
off. hung round cast piercing 
white light. one corner sat and, obedient 
two three hundred across dry 
ground, wearing away grass feet. Round 
alive motion night seemed 
light reached it, every 
lonely figure couple would cross 
bright moment visible existence, 
quickly come. 
 
Denis stood entrance watching 
crowd. slow brought round round 
him, though passing 
Priscilla, still wearing still encouraging 
time dancing one 
Lord stayed 
took place dinner 
bent knees ever, 
village Mr. Scogan round another. Mary 
embrace young farmer heroic 
looking him, talking, Denis could see, 
wondered. Seated corner 
among Jenny performing upon 
eyes smiled herself. whole life 
seemed expressing loud long rolls 
Looking her, Denis remembered 
red wondered sort figure cutting now. 
sight Anne Gombauld eyes 
almost shut were, sustaining wings 
movement Male female 
created were, Anne Gombauld, hundred 
together old Male 
Female created them. Denis sat alone 
coupled he; 
 
Somebody touched shoulder looked up. Henry 
Wimbush. 
 
"I never showed said. "Some ones 
lying quite close here. Would like come see 
them?" 
 
Denis got up, walked together music 
grew behind them. higher notes faded altogether. 
steady on, 
ears. Henry Wimbush 
 
"Here said, and, taking electric pocket, 
cast two three sections tree 
lying 
little ground. 
 
"Very said Denis, rather 
 
sat faint white rising behind 
trees, indicated position music 
nothing 
 
"I shall said Henry Wimbush, "when comes last 
end." 
 
"I believe it." 
 
"I know is," Mr. Wimbush continued, "but spectacle 
numbers state agitation moves 
certain rather excitement. fact is, 
don't much interest me. They're aren't line. follow 
me? could never take much interest, example, collection 
postage 
line. no. don't know anything them; they're 
line. don't interest me, give emotion. It's rather 
people, I'm afraid. I'm home 
jerked head sideways towards "The trouble 
people events present never know anything 
them. know contemporary Nothing. 
know people see round me? Nothing. think 
anything else world, five 
time, things can't guess at. know, may suddenly 
try murder moment's time." 
 
said Denis. 
 
Mr. Wimbush continued, "the little know past 
certainly know nothing present, neither 
know anything future. It's living 
people, one dealing unknown One 
hope find anything long series 
disagreeable boring human involving terrible expense 
time. It's current find anything 
except years 
study, involving endless number unpleasant 
No, give past. doesn't it's 
black white, get know 
and, all, reading. reading know 
great deal St. Dr. weeks 
made thoroughly acquainted interesting 
spared tedious process getting 
know personal 
living now. gay delightful life would one could get rid 
human Perhaps, future, 
attained state confess am, like 

perhaps, possible who, like 
myself, desire it, live dignified surrounded 
delicate silent entirely secure 
human beautiful 
 
Denis agreed. "But desirable human 
like love 
 
black darkness shook head. "The pleasures 
even much said polite level 
voice. "It seems doubtful whether equal pleasures 
private reading Human highly 
valued past reading common 
books difficult world, 
must remember, becoming reading becomes 
habitual number people 
discover books give pleasures social 
life none present people search 
pleasure naturally tend large make 
future natural tendency seek 
quiet. proper study mankind 
 
"I sometimes think may be," said wondering Anne 
Gombauld still dancing together. 
 
said Mr. Wimbush, "I must go see 
well got began walk slowly 
towards white "If people Henry Wimbush 
went on, "this would extremely Nothing would 
read book ball 
took place century ago. one would say; pretty 
ball takes place to-day, one finds 
oneself involved it, one sees thing true light. 
turns merely this." waved hand direction 
"In went pause, "I 
found myself, quite involved series 
amorous could made 
fortune them, even tell you, style, 
details would 
assure you, 
seemed less exciting 
incident actual life. night 
window old house seemed me, 
actually performing rather dangerous action 
much taken shall put 
catching go business Monday morning. 
Adventures take 
qualities Live them, life 
like rest. literature become charming ball 
would come 
entrance stood there, 
light. "Ah, Henry Wimbush 
 
Anne Gombauld still dancing together. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
ten o'clock. already 
last lights put out. To-morrow would 
would away. 
worn grass, shabby brown wide green 
park, would Crome Fair over. 
 
edge pool two figures 
 
"No, no, no," Anne saying breathless leaning 
turning head side side effort escape 
"No, please. raised voice become 

 
Gombauld relaxed embrace little. "Why not?" said. "I 
 
sudden effort Anne freed herself. "You 
"You've tried take unfair advantage me." 
 
echoed Gombauld genuine surprise. 
 
"Yes, unfair advantage. attack I've dancing two 
hours, I'm still drunk movement, I've lost 
head, I've got mind left It's 
bad making love someone you've 
 
Gombauld laughed White done 
it." 
 
said Anne, "I completely try 
shall box ears. Shall take turns round 
"The night 
 
answer Gombauld made noise. slowly, side 
side. 
 
"What like painting Anne began 
detached tone. 
 
"Oh, damn Gombauld almost 
 
stood, leaning attitude despair 
parapet terrace, Denis seen them, two pale figures 
far seen 
beginning promised endless 
sight much; couldn't stand it. 
another moment, felt, would burst 
 
house, almost ran Mr. Scogan, 
walking hall smoking final 
 
said Mr. Scogan, catching hardly 
conscious was, Denis stood 
moment like "What's Mr. Scogan went on. 
"you look 
 
Denis shook head without 
 
eh?" Mr. Scogan arm. "I 
know said. "It's 
point all? What's good continuing 
one's last along everything 
Yes, yes. know exactly It's 
one allows oneself allow oneself 
all, know there's ultimate point. 
difference 
 
point suddenly woke up. "What?" said, 
"What?" breaking away 
dashed stairs, two steps time. 
 
Mr. Scogan ran foot stairs called him. "It 
makes difference, none whatever. Life gay same, 
whatever whatever added, 
raising voice Denis already far hearing, 
even been, mind to-night proof 
Mr. Scogan replaced pipe 
teeth resumed "Under 
repeated himself. begin 
life really wondered. pipe burned 
conclusion took drink gin went 
bed. ten minutes 
 
Denis mechanically and, silk 
justly proud, lying face 
bed. Time passed. last looked up, candle 
left burned almost 
looked nearly half-past one. head 
eyes felt though 
blood beating within ears loud got 
up, opened door, noiselessly along passage, began 
mount stairs towards higher Arrived 
quarters hesitated, turning right 
opened little door end Within 
dust old 
advanced cautiously 
hands. ladder went leads 
western found set feet 
lifted sky 
him, breathed cool air night. moment 
standing 
looking terrace seventy feet 
below. 
 
climbed look 
commit yet hardly knew. 
tears came eyes thought it. misery assumed 
certain lifted wings kind 
mood might done almost anything, 
however advanced towards farther drop 
sheer good perhaps one might clear 
narrow terrace yet another thirty feet 
ground below. paused corner tower, looking 
gulf below, towards rare stars 
moon. made gesture hand, muttered something, 
could afterwards remember fact said 
aloud gave utterance peculiarly terrible significance. 
looked 
 
"What doing, questioned voice somewhere 
close behind him. 
 
Denis uttered cry frightened surprise, nearly went 
parapet good heart beating 
pale when, recovering himself, turned round direction 
voice come. 
 
"Are 
 
profound shadow slept eastern parapet 
tower, saw something previously 
someone lying it. Since first 
night tower, Mary slept every 
sort manifestation 
 
"It gave went on, "to wake see 
arms there. earth 
 
Denis laughed said. hadn't 
did, would lying pieces bottom 
certain that, now. 
 
"You hadn't got designs me, Mary jumping 
rapidly conclusions. 
 
"I didn't know here," said Denis, laughing bitterly 
before. 
 
"What matter, 
 
sat edge reply went 
laughing frightful improbable tone. 
 
hour later head Mary's she, 
affectionate solicitude wholly running 
fingers hair. told everything, 
hopeless 
averted 
solemnly promised never think again. 
soul sad sympathy 
Mary generously receiving 
sympathy Denis found even kind 
also giving it. told Mary everything 
Mary, told return 
everything, nearly everything, own. 
 
"Poor sorry her. Still, might guessed 
Ivor wasn't precisely monument 
 
"Well," "one must put good face it." wanted 
wouldn't allow silence. 
 
"Do asked Denis really think 

 
"I'm sure it," Mary answered another long 
pause. 
 
"I don't know it," said last, utterly 
 
better go advised Mary. "It's thing, 

 
"But I've arranged stay three weeks more." 
 
"You must 
 
"I suppose you're right." 
 
"I know said Mary, recovering firm 
"You can't go like this, you?" 
 
"No, can't go like 
 
Immensely Mary invented plan action. 
church clock struck three. 
 
"You must go bed said. "I'd idea 
 
Denis cautiously descended 
stairs. room candle long ago 
extinction. got bed fell almost once. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
Denis called, spite parted 
dropped state sleep becomes 
pleasure almost condition might 
remained another hour disturbed violent 
door. 
 
"Come in," without opening eyes. 
hand seized shoulder 
 
"Get up, get up!" 
 
painfully apart, saw Mary standing him, 

 
"Get up!" repeated. "You must go send Don't 

 
threw 
 
Denis dressed quickly could ran road village 
post office. Satisfaction within returned. sent 
long would hours answer ordering 
back town urgent business. act performed, 
decisive step rarely took decisive felt 
pleased himself. appetite came 

 
said Mr. Scogan. "I hope you're 
 

 
"You rather worried last night." 
 
Denis tried laugh away "Was lightly asked. 
 
"I said Mr. Scogan, "that nothing worse mind. 
happy man." 
 
"One happy Denis thinking 

 
looked window. Great floated high 
blue wind stirred among trees, shaken 
like sun. Everything seemed 
thought would soon leaving 
beauty felt momentary 

 
repeated going helped 
agreeable mixture 
 
Breakfast over, Denis repaired terrace, and, sitting there, 
raised enormous possible assaults 
Mr. Scogan, showed desire go talking 
Universe. Secure behind pages, 
light brilliant morning emotions last night seemed 
somehow rather seen embracing 
Perhaps didn't mean much all. even did, 
shouldn't felt strong enough strong enough 
mere friendly acquaintance. even 
weren't strong 
 
"What time think telegram asked Mary suddenly, 
upon top paper. 
 
Denis started "I don't know all," said. 
 
"I said Mary, "because there's good train 
would nice could catch it, wouldn't it?" 
 
agreed felt though making 
arrangements Train leaves 
gone. No, he'd let 
hurried like this. sight 
Mr. Scogan looking out, expression, 
window made more. long 
kept last take another cautious 
found himself, 
confronted Anne's malicious smile. standing 
woman swaying grace 
movement arrested seemed movement. 
 
"How long standing there?" asked, done 
her. 
 
"Oh, half hour, said "You 
deep didn't like disturb you." 
 
"You look lovely morning," Denis exclaimed. first time 
ever courage utter personal remark kind. 
 
Anne held hand though ward blow. "Don't me, 
please." sat bench beside him. nice boy, 
thought, quite violent really 
becoming rather "Why don't wear white 
asked. "I like much white 
 
Denis replied rather 
business wrong spirit. preparing scheme 
conversation back proper Mr. Scogan 
suddenly house, crossed terrace 
came halt front bench 

 
"To go interesting conversation began, 
"I become convinced various parts concern 
would mind, Denis, moving shade 
right?" "And 
would shift inches left, dear you. 
think, 
 
"You said Anne. Denis 
 
taking coffee library 
telegram Denis took orange envelope 
tore open. once. Urgent family 
business." family 
Wouldn't best thing put 
pocket without saying anything it? looked up; Mary's large blue 
china eyes fixed upon him, 
deeply ever, hesitated horrible 
 
"What's telegram about?" Mary asked 
 
lost head, "I'm "I'm afraid means 
shall go back town once." frowned telegram 

 
"But that's absurd, cried Anne. standing 
window talking Denis's words came swaying 
across room towards him. 
 
"It's repeated 
 
"But you've short Anne 
 
"I know," said, utterly Oh, could 
Women supposed 
 
"If must go, put Mary firmly. 
 
"Yes, looked telegram inspiration. "You 
see, it's urgent family explained. 
 
Priscilla got chair excitement. "I distinct 
last said. "A distinct 
 
"A mere said Mary, Mrs. Wimbush 
conversation. "There's good train looked 
clock "You'll nice time 
 
"I'll order motor once." Henry Wimbush rang bell. funeral 
well way. awful. 
 
"I wretched said Anne. 
 
Denis turned towards really look abandoned 
came 
action, something he'd let things 

 
"I shall miss said Mr. Scogan. 
 
Mary looked clock again. "I think perhaps ought go 
said. 
 
Denis left room. Never again, said himself, never 
would anything West 
then, 
finally, London. thought journey him. 
earth going London got there? climbed 
stairs. time lay 
 
car whole party assembled 
see go. Mechanically tapped 
hung stirred left. 
sudden smile lighted face. 
 
ready said, quoting 
exquisite looked quickly round face face. Nobody 
climbed 
 
 
 
 
 
 
MYSTERIOUS AFFAIR STYLES 
 
 

 
 
 
 
CONTENTS 
 
      I.     GO STYLES 
      II.    16TH 17TH JULY 
      III.   NIGHT TRAGEDY 
      IV.    POIROT 
      V.     "IT ISN'T STRYCHNINE, IT?" 
      VI.    INQUEST 
      VII.   POIROT PAYS DEBTS 
      VIII.  FRESH SUSPICIONS 
      IX.    DR. BAUERSTEIN 
          ARREST 
         CASE PROSECUTION 
        LAST LINK 
       POIROT EXPLAINS 
 
 
 
 
 
 
CHAPTER I. GO STYLES 
 
 
intense interest aroused public known time 
"The Styles somewhat Nevertheless, view 
attended it, asked, 
friend Poirot family themselves, write account 
whole story. This, trust, effectually silence 
rumours still 
 
therefore briefly set circumstances led 
connected affair. 
 
home and, 
months rather Home, given month's 
sick near relations friends, trying make 
mind do, ran across John Cavendish. seen 
little years. Indeed, never known particularly 
well. good fifteen years one thing, though 
hardly looked years. boy, though, often stayed 
Styles, mother's place 
 
good old times, ended inviting 
Styles spend leave there. 
 
"The delighted see 

 
"Your mother keeps asked. 
 
"Oh, yes. suppose know married 
 
afraid showed surprise rather Mrs. Cavendish, 
married John's father two sons, 
handsome woman remembered her. certainly could 
day less seventy now. recalled 
somewhat inclined social 
opening playing Lady 
generous woman, possessed considerable 
fortune own. 
 
Styles Court, purchased Mr. Cavendish 
early married life. completely wife's 
much that, left place 
well larger part arrangement 
distinctly unfair two however, 
always generous them; indeed, young 
time father's always thought 
mother. 
 
Lawrence, delicate qualified 
doctor early profession lived 
home pursuing literary though verses never 
marked success. 
 
John practiced time finally settled 
congenial life country married 
two years ago, taken wife live Styles, though 
entertained suspicion would preferred mother 
increase would enabled home 
own. Mrs. Cavendish, however, lady liked make 
plans, expected people fall them, 
case certainly whip hand, namely: 
 
John noticed surprise news mother's 
smiled rather 
 
little said "I tell you, 
Hastings, it's making life jolly difficult us. 
remember 
 
"No." 
 
"Oh, suppose time. She's 
great precisely 
young beautiful, game make them." 
 
"You going 
 
"Oh, turned pretext 
second cousin something though didn't seem 
particularly keen acknowledge fellow 
absolute anyone see that. He's got great black beard, 
patent 
once, took know she's always 
running hundred 
 
nodded. 
 
"Well, course war turned hundreds thousands. 
doubt fellow useful her. could knocked us 
when, three months ago, suddenly announced 
Alfred fellow must least twenty 
years younger It's simply fortune 
mistress, she's married him." 
 
"It must difficult situation all." 
 
It's 
 
Thus came that, three days later, descended train 
Styles St. Mary, absurd little station, apparent reason 
existence, midst green fields country 
John Cavendish waiting platform, 
car. 
 
"Got drop two still, see," remarked. owing 

 
village Styles St. Mary situated two miles 
little station, Styles Court lay mile side it. 
still, warm day early July. one looked flat 
country, lying green peaceful afternoon sun, seemed 
almost impossible believe that, far away, great war 
running appointed course. felt suddenly another 
world. turned lodge John said: 
 
"I'm afraid you'll find quiet here, 
 
"My dear fellow, that's 
 
"Oh, it's pleasant enough want lead idle life. 
volunteers twice week, lend hand wife 
works regularly five every morning 
keeps steadily It's jolly good life taking 
weren't fellow Alfred 
car suddenly, glanced watch. "I wonder we've 
time pick Cynthia. No, started hospital 
now." 
 
That's 
 
"No, Cynthia daughter old 
married came 
girl left mother came 
Cynthia us nearly two years now. 
works Red Cross Hospital seven miles away." 
 
spoke last words, drew front fine old house. 
lady stout flower bed, 

 
here's wounded Mr. 
 
Miss Howard shook hands almost 
impression blue eyes face. 
woman deep voice, almost manly 
large sensible square body, feet 
last good thick conversation, 
soon found, telegraphic 
 
grow like house Can't keep even Shall press 
in. Better 
 
"I'm sure shall delighted make 

 
"Don't say it. Never does. Wish hadn't 
 
"You're said John, tea 
out?" 
 
fine day house." 
 
"Come then, you've done enough to-day. 'The 
worthy know. Come 
 
"Well," said Miss Howard, drawing "I'm 
inclined agree you." 
 
led way round house tea spread shade 
large 
 
figure rose one came steps 
meet us. 
 
"My wife, said John. 
 
shall never forget first sight Mary Cavendish. slender 
form, bright vivid sense 
fire seemed find expression wonderful eyes 
remarkable eyes, different woman's 
ever intense power 
nevertheless conveyed impression wild spirit 
things burnt memory. 
shall never forget them. 
 
greeted words pleasant welcome low clear 
voice, sank chair feeling distinctly glad 
accepted John's Mrs. Cavendish gave tea, 
quiet remarks first impression thoroughly 
woman. always 
humorous manner, certain incidents 
Home, way which, flatter myself, greatly amused John, 
course, good fellow though is, could hardly called brilliant 

 
moment well remembered voice floated open French 
window near 
 
"Then you'll write tea, I'll write Lady 
second day, myself. shall wait hear 
case Lady might open 
first day, Mrs. second. there's 
school 
 
murmur man's voice, Mrs. Inglethorp's rose 

 
"Yes, tea quite well. 
Alfred 
 
French window swung open little handsome 
old lady, somewhat cast stepped 
man followed her, suggestion deference 
manner. 
 
Mrs. Inglethorp greeted 
 
"Why, isn't delightful see again, Mr. Hastings, 
years. Mr. 
 
looked curiosity certainly struck 
rather note. wonder John 
one ever seen. wore 
curious 
struck might look natural strangely 
place real life. voice rather deep placed 
wooden hand mine said: 
 
"This Mr. Then, turning 
think little 
 
fondly him, substituted another every 
demonstration care. Strange otherwise 
sensible 
 
presence Mr. Inglethorp, sense 
hostility seemed settle upon company. Miss Howard, 
particular, took pains conceal feelings. Mrs. Inglethorp, 
however, seemed notice nothing 
remembered old, lost nothing intervening years, 
poured steady flood conversation, mainly subject 
organizing take place 
Occasionally referred husband question 
days manner never 
first took firm dislike him, flatter 
first judgments usually fairly 
 
Presently Mrs. Inglethorp turned give instructions letters 
Evelyn Howard, husband addressed voice: 
 
"Is regular profession, Mr. 
 
"No, war 
 
"And return 
 
Either fresh start 
 
Mary Cavendish leant forward. 
 
"What would really choose profession, could consult 

 
"Well, 
 
"No secret asked. "Tell drawn Every 
one something 
 
"You'll laugh me." 
 
smiled. 
 

 
"Well, I've always secret 
 
"The real 
 
"Oh, means. really, awfully 
drawn it. came across man once, famous 
quite me. marvellous little fellow. 
used say good detective work mere matter 
system based course rather 
further. funny little man, great wonderfully 

 
good detective story remarked Miss Howard. 
nonsense written, Criminal discovered last Every one 
Real know once." 
 
"There great number 
 
"Don't mean people right it. family. 
couldn't really them. They'd know." 
 
said, much "you think mixed 
crime, say murder, you'd able spot murderer right 
 
"Of course should. able prove 
I'm certain I'd know. I'd feel came near 
me." 
 
"It might 
 
violent crime. Associate man." 
 
"Not case Mrs. Cavendish's clear voice startled 
me. "Dr. Bauerstein saying yesterday that, owing general 
ignorance uncommon poisons among medical profession, 
probably cases poisoning quite 
 
"Why, Mary, cried Mrs. Inglethorp. "It 
makes feel walking grave. Oh, there's 

 
young girl V. A. D. uniform ran lightly across 
 
"Why, Cynthia, late to-day. Mr. 
 
Cynthia young creature, full life 
tossed little V. A. D. great 
loose waves hair, 
hand held claim tea. dark eyes 
would 
 
flung ground beside John, handed 
smiled me. 
 
grass, do. It's ever much 
 
dropped 
 
"You work don't you, Miss 
 
nodded. 
 
"For 
 
"Do you, then?" asked, smiling. 
 
"I like see cried Cynthia dignity. 
 
"I got cousin remarked. "And 

 
"I don't Sisters know, Mr. Hastings. 
You've I'm thank heaven, work 

 
"How many people asked, smiling. 
 
Cynthia smiled too. 
 
"Oh, said. 
 
called Mrs. Inglethorp, "do think could write 
notes me?" 
 
Aunt 
 
jumped promptly, something manner reminded 
position dependent one, Mrs. Inglethorp, kind 
might allow forget it. 
 
turned me. 
 
"John show room. Supper half-past 
given late dinner time now. Lady 
late Lord same. 
agrees one must set example quite 
war nothing scrap waste paper, even, 
saved sent away 
 
expressed John took house 
broad right left different wings 
building. room left wing, looked 
park. 
 
John left me, minutes later saw window walking 
slowly across grass arm arm Cynthia heard Mrs. 
Inglethorp call girl started ran back 
house. moment, man stepped shadow 
tree walked slowly direction. looked 
dark melancholy face. violent emotion 
seemed him. looked window passed, 
recognized him, though changed much fifteen years 
elapsed since last John's younger brother, Lawrence 
Cavendish. wondered brought singular 
expression face. 
 
dismissed mind, returned contemplation 
affairs. 
 
evening passed pleasantly night 
enigmatical woman, Mary Cavendish. 
 
next morning bright full 
anticipation delightful visit. 
 
see Mrs. Cavendish 
take spent charming afternoon 
returning house 
 
entered large hall, John us 
saw face something disturbing 
followed in, shut door us. 
 
"Look here, Mary, there's row 
Alfred Inglethorp, she's off." 
 

 
John nodded gloomily. 
 
see went here's 
 
Miss Howard lips set together, carried 
small looked excited slightly 

 
"At burst out, "I've spoken 
 
"My dear cried Mrs. Cavendish, "this can't 
 
Miss Howard nodded 
 
Afraid said things Emily won't forget 
forgive Don't mind they've bit. Probably 
water back, said right out: old woman, 
there's fool like old man's twenty years 
younger you, don't fool married 
for. Well, don't let much it. Farmer 
got pretty young wife. ask Alfred much time 
went on, going 
warn you, whether like not. man would soon murder 
bed look you. He's bad say 
like me, remember I've told you. He's bad 
 
"What say?" 
 
Miss Howard made extremely expressive 
 

accuse sooner left 
house better. I'm off." 
 
"But now?" 
 
"This 
 
moment sat stared her. Finally John Cavendish, finding 
went look wife 
followed him, something Mrs. Inglethorp 
think better it. 
 
left room, Miss Howard's face changed. leant towards 
eagerly. 
 
"Mr. Hastings, you're trust you?" 
 
little laid hand arm, sank voice 

 
"Look her, Mr. Hastings. poor They're lot 
them. Oh, know I'm talking about. isn't 
one that's hard trying get money her. I've 
protected much could. I'm way, they'll impose 
upon her." 
 
"Of course, Miss said, "I'll everything can, I'm 
sure you're excited 
 
interrupted slowly shaking 
 
man, trust me. I've lived world rather longer 
have. ask keep eyes open. You'll see 
 
motor came open window, Miss Howard 
rose moved door. John's voice sounded outside. hand 
turned head shoulder, 
me. 
 
all, Mr. Hastings, watch 
 
time more. Miss Howard swallowed eager 
chorus 
 
motor drove away, Mrs. Cavendish suddenly detached 
moved across drive meet tall bearded 
man evidently making house. colour rose 
cheeks held hand him. 
 
"Who that?" asked instinctively man. 
 
"That's Dr. said John 
 
"And Dr. 
 
"He's staying village rest bad nervous 
He's London clever 
greatest living 
 
"And he's great friend put Cynthia, 
 
John Cavendish frowned changed subject. 
 
"Come Hastings. rotten business. 
always rough tongue, friend England 
Evelyn 
 
took path walked 
village woods one side 
 
passed one gates way home again, pretty 
young woman type coming opposite direction bowed 
smiled. 
 
"That's pretty remarked 
 
John's face 
 
"That Mrs. 
 
"The one Miss 
 
said John, rather unnecessary 
 
thought old lady big house, vivid 
wicked little face smiled ours, vague chill 
crept me. aside. 
 
really glorious old said John. 
 
nodded rather gloomily. 
 
"Yes, it's fine property. It'll mine mine 
rights, father made decent will. 
shouldn't damned hard now." 
 
up, you?" 
 
"My dear Hastings, don't mind telling I'm end 

 
brother help you?" 
 
He's gone every ever had, rotten 
verses fancy No, we're mother's 
always awfully good us, must say. is, now. Since 
marriage, broke off, 
 
first time felt that, Evelyn Howard, something 
gone presence 
security air seemed 
suspicion. sinister face Dr. Bauerstein 
vague suspicion every one everything filled 
mind. moment approaching evil. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER II. 16TH 17TH JULY 
 
 
arrived Styles 5th July. come events 
16th 17th month. convenience reader 
incidents days exact manner 
possible. subsequently trial process 
long tedious 
 
received letter Evelyn Howard couple days 
telling working nurse big hospital 
town fifteen miles away, 
let know Mrs. Inglethorp show wish 

 
fly peaceful days Mrs. Cavendish's 
and, part, preference 
society Dr. Bauerstein. saw man cannot 
always asking house, often went long 
him. must confess quite unable see 

 
16th July fell Monday. day famous 
taken place Saturday, connection 
Mrs. Inglethorp War 
poem, held night. busy morning 
arranging Hall village take 
place. late spent afternoon resting 
garden. noticed John's manner somewhat seemed 
excited 
 
tea, Mrs. Inglethorp went lie rest efforts 
evening Mary Cavendish single 
 
quarter Mrs. Inglethorp called us 
late supper early night. rather get 
ready time; motor waiting 
door. 
 
great success, Mrs. Inglethorp's 
receiving applause. also 
Cynthia took part. return us, asked 
supper party, remain night friends 
acting 
 
following morning, Mrs. Inglethorp stayed bed breakfast, 
rather appeared mood 
swept Lawrence party. 
 
charming invitation Mrs. Lady 
know. came 

 
Mary excused plea engagement Dr. 
Bauerstein. 
 
pleasant drove away Lawrence suggested 
return barely mile way, 
pay visit Cynthia Mrs. Inglethorp replied 
excellent idea, several letters write 
would drop us there, could come back Cynthia 

 
detained suspicion hospital porter, Cynthia 
appeared us, looking cool sweet long white 
took us introduced us fellow 
rather individual, Cynthia 
addressed 
 
"What lot exclaimed, eye round 
small room. "Do really know what's all?" 
 
something Cynthia. single person 
comes says that. really thinking prize 
first individual _not_ say: lot 
know next thing you're going say is: many people 

 
guilty laugh. 
 
"If people knew easy poison one 
mistake, wouldn't it. Come on, let's tea. We've got 
sorts secret stories No, 
poison big right." 
 
tea, assisted Cynthia wash afterwards. 
put away last knock came door. 
Cynthia suddenly stern 
forbidding expression. 
 
"Come in," said Cynthia, sharp professional tone. 
 
young rather scared looking nurse appeared bottle 
waved towards Cynthia somewhat 
enigmatical 
 
really 
 
Cynthia took bottle examined severity judge. 
 
"This sent morning." 
 

 
read rules outside 
 
gathered little expression 
least message 
dreaded 
 
"So can't done finished Cynthia. 
 
"Don't think could possibly let us 
 
"Well," said Cynthia "we time 
shall 
 
little nurse Cynthia promptly took 
placed table outside door. 
 
laughed. 
 
must 
 
"Exactly. Come little see outside 
there." 
 
followed Cynthia friend pointed different 
me. Lawrence remained moments Cynthia 
called shoulder come join us. looked 
watch. 
 
"Nothing do, 
 
"No." 
 
"All right. lock go." 
 
seen Lawrence quite different light afternoon. Compared 
John, difficult person get know. 
opposite brother almost every respect, unusually 
Yet certain charm manner, fancied that, 
one really knew well, one could deep affection him. 
always fancied manner Cynthia rather 
side inclined him. 
gay enough afternoon, together like couple 
children. 
 
drove village, remembered wanted 
accordingly pulled post office. 
 
came again, little man 
drew aside suddenly, loud 
arms kissed 
 
"Mon cried. "It indeed mon 
 
exclaimed. 
 
turned 
 
"This pleasant meeting me, Miss Cynthia. old 
friend, Monsieur Poirot, seen 
 
"Oh, know Monsieur Poirot," said Cynthia "But idea 
friend 
 
"Yes, indeed," said Poirot "I know Mademoiselle Cynthia. 
charity good Mrs. Inglethorp here." Then, 
looked "Yes, friend, kindly extended 
seven who, alas, 
native land. always remember 
 
Poirot extraordinary looking little man. hardly 
five feet, four carried great dignity. head 
exactly shape always little 
one side. 
almost believe dust would 
caused pain Yet 
little man who, sorry see, 
time one members Belgian 
achieved 
triumphs cases day. 
 
pointed little house inhabited fellow 
promised go see early date. 
raised hat Cynthia, drove away. 
 
"He's dear little said Cynthia. "I'd idea knew him." 
 
"You've entertaining replied. 
 
And, rest way home, various 
triumphs Hercule Poirot. 
 
arrived back cheerful entered hall, Mrs. 
Inglethorp came boudoir. looked flushed upset. 
 
"Oh, it's you," said. 
 
"Is anything matter, Aunt asked Cynthia. 
 
"Certainly not," said Mrs. Inglethorp sharply. "What 
be?" catching sight Dorcas, going 
called bring boudoir. 
 
"Yes, old servant hesitated, added "Don't 
think, you'd better get You're looking 
 
"Perhaps you're right, now. I've letters 
must finish lighted fire room told 
you?" 
 
"Yes, 
 
"Then I'll go bed directly 
 
went boudoir again, Cynthia stared her. 
 
wonder what's up?" said Lawrence. 
 
seem heard her, without word turned 
went house. 
 
suggested quick game supper and, Cynthia 
ran upstairs fetch 
 
Mrs. Cavendish coming stairs. may 
she, too, looking odd 
 
good walk Dr. asked, trying appear 
indifferent could. 
 
"I didn't replied abruptly. "Where Mrs. Inglethorp?" 
 
"In 
 
hand seemed nerve 
went rapidly past stairs 
across hall boudoir, door shut behind her. 
 
ran court moments later, pass 
open boudoir window, unable help following 
scrap Mary Cavendish saying voice woman 
controlling 
 
"Then won't show me?" 
 
Mrs. Inglethorp replied: 
 
"My dear Mary, nothing 
 
"Then show me." 
 
"I tell imagine. concern 

 
Mary Cavendish replied, rising 
 
"Of course, might known would him." 
 
Cynthia waiting me, greeted eagerly 
 
"I say! There's awful I've got 
 
"What kind 
 
Aunt Emily hope she's found 
 
"Was Dorcas there, then?" 
 
"Of course not. near real old 
wish knew 
 
thought Mrs. face, Evelyn Howard's 
wisely decided hold peace, whilst Cynthia exhausted every possible 
hypothesis, cheerfully Emily send away, 
never speak again." 
 
anxious get hold John, nowhere seen. 
Evidently something momentous occurred afternoon. tried 
forget words but, would, could 
dismiss altogether mind. Mary Cavendish's 
concern 
 
Mr. Inglethorp came 
face ever, strange man struck 

 
Mrs. Inglethorp came last. still looked 
somewhat constrained silence. Inglethorp 
unusually quiet. rule, surrounded wife little 
placing back, altogether playing 
part devoted husband. Immediately Mrs. Inglethorp 
retired boudoir again. 
 
coffee here, called. "I've five minutes 
catch 
 
Cynthia went sat open window drawing-room. Mary 
Cavendish brought coffee us. seemed 
 
"Do young people want enjoy 
asked. "Will take Mrs. Inglethorp coffee, pour 
out." 
 
"Do said Inglethorp. "I take 
poured out, went room carrying carefully. 
 
Lawrence followed him, Mrs. Cavendish sat us. 
 
three sat time silence. glorious night, hot 
Mrs. Cavendish gently 
 
"It's almost murmured. "We shall 
 
Alas, harmonious moments never 
sound well known, heartily 
voice hall. 
 
"Dr. exclaimed Cynthia. "What funny time 
 
glanced Mary Cavendish, seemed quite 
delicate cheeks 
 
Alfred Inglethorp doctor in, 
latter fit state 
drawing-room. truth, presented sorry literally 

 
"What doing, cried Mrs. Cavendish. 
 
"I must make said doctor. "I really mean 
come in, Mr. Inglethorp 
 
"Well, Bauerstein, said John, 
hall. "Have coffee, tell us to." 
 
"Thank you, laughed rather described 
discovered rare species place, 
efforts obtain lost slipped 
neighbouring 
 
"The sun soon added, "but I'm afraid appearance 

 
Mrs. Inglethorp called Cynthia hall, 
girl ran out. 
 
"Just carry despatch-case, you, I'm going 
 
door hall wide one. risen Cynthia did, 
John close me. therefore three witnesses could 
swear Mrs. Inglethorp carrying coffee, yet 
hand. 
 
evening utterly entirely presence Dr. 
Bauerstein. seemed man would never go. rose last, 
however, breathed sigh relief. 
 
"I'll walk village you," said Mr. Inglethorp. "I must 
see agent estate turned John. "No one 
need sit up. take 
 
 
 
CHAPTER III. NIGHT TRAGEDY 
 
 
make part story clear, following plan 
first floor Styles. reached 
door B. communication right wing, 

 
seemed middle night awakened Lawrence 
Cavendish. candle hand, agitation face 
told something seriously wrong. 
 
"What's asked, sitting bed, trying collect 
scattered 
 
"We afraid mother ill. seems kind 
fit. locked in." 
 
"I'll come once." 
 
sprang and, pulling followed Lawrence 
along passage right wing house. 
 
John Cavendish joined us, one two servants standing 
round state excitement. Lawrence turned 
brother. 
 
"What think better do?" 
 
thought, character apparent. 
 
John handle Mrs. Inglethorp's door 
effect. obviously locked bolted inside. whole 
household aroused now. sounds 
interior room. Clearly something must done. 
 
going Mr. Inglethorp's room, sir," cried Dorcas. "Oh, 
poor 
 
Suddenly realized Alfred Inglethorp 
alone given sign presence. John opened door 
room. dark, Lawrence following 
feeble light saw bed slept in, 
sign room 
 
went straight connecting door. That, too, locked bolted 
inside. 
 
"Oh, sir," cried Dorcas, hands, "what ever shall 
do?" 
 
"We must try break door in, suppose. It'll job, 
Here, let one go wake tell 
go Dr. Wilkins once. then, we'll try door. 
Half moment, though, isn't door Miss Cynthia's 
 
"Yes, sir, that's always It's never 
 
"Well, might see." 
 
ran rapidly Cynthia's room. Mary Cavendish 
there, shaking must unusually sound 
trying wake her. 
 
moment two back. 
 
"No good. That's bolted too. must break door. think one 
shade less solid one 
 
heaved together. framework door 
long time resisted last felt give 
beneath finally, burst 
open. 
 
together, Lawrence still holding Mrs. 
Inglethorp lying bed, whole form agitated violent 
one must table beside 
her. however, limbs fell back upon 

 
John strode across room, Turning one 
sent 
went across mother whilst door gave 

 
turned Lawrence, suggest better leave 
need services, words 
lips. Never seen look man's face. 
white candle held shaking hand 
eyes, 
kindred stared head point 
wall. though seen something turned 
instinctively followed direction eyes, could see 
nothing still 
row surely harmless enough. 
 
violence Mrs. Inglethorp's attack seemed 
able speak short 
 
"Better lock in." 
 
shadow fell bed and, looking up, saw Mary Cavendish standing 
near door arm around Cynthia. seemed supporting 
girl, looked utterly unlike herself. face 
heavily 
 
"Poor Cynthia quite said Mrs. Cavendish low clear 
voice. herself, noticed, dressed white land 
must later thought. saw faint daylight 
showing windows, clock 
pointed close upon five o'clock. 
 
cry bed startled me. fresh access pain seized 
unfortunate old violence terrible 
Everything confusion. round her, powerless 
help final convulsion lifted bed, 
appeared rest upon head body 
extraordinary manner. vain Mary John tried administer 
moments body peculiar 
fashion. 
 
moment, Dr. Bauerstein pushed way 
room. one instant stopped dead, staring figure 
bed, and, instant, Mrs. Inglethorp cried 
voice, eyes fixed 
 
fell back 
 
doctor reached bed, seizing arms worked 
applying knew artificial 
issued short sharp orders wave 
hand drove us door. watched him, though 
think knew hearts late, nothing 
could done now. could see expression face 
little hope. 
 
Finally abandoned task, shaking head gravely. moment, 
heard footsteps Dr. Mrs. Inglethorp's 
little man, came in. 
 
words Dr. Bauerstein explained happened 
passing lodge gates car came out, run house 
fast could, whilst car went fetch Dr. 
faint gesture hand, indicated figure bed. 
 
murmured Dr. "Poor dear Always 
far warned her. 
heart far strong. said her, 
zeal good works great. Nature 

 
Dr. Bauerstein, noticed, watching local doctor 
still kept eyes fixed spoke. 
 
"The peculiar violence, Dr. sorry 
time witness them. 

 
"Ah!" said Dr. Wilkins 
 
"I like speak said Dr. Bauerstein. 
turned John. "You 
 
"Certainly not." 
 
leaving two doctors alone, 
heard key turned lock behind us. 
 
went slowly stairs. violently 
certain talent Dr. Bauerstein's manner started 
wild mind. Mary Cavendish laid hand upon 
arm. 
 
"What it? Dr. Bauerstein seem 
 
looked her. 
 
"Do know think?" 
 
"What?" 
 
looked round, others lowered 
voice "I believe I'm certain Dr. 
Bauerstein it." 
 
shrank wall, eyes 
Then, sudden cry startled me, cried out: "No, 
that!" breaking me, fled stairs. 
followed her, afraid going found leaning 
deadly waved away impatiently. 
 
"No, me. I'd rather alone. Let quiet 
minute two. Go 
 
obeyed John Lawrence 
joined them. silent, suppose thoughts 
us last broke saying: 
 
"Where Mr. Inglethorp?" 
 
John shook head. 
 
"He's house." 
 
eyes _was_ Alfred absence strange 
remembered Mrs. Inglethorp's dying words. lay 
beneath them? could told us, 
 
last heard doctors descending stairs. Dr. Wilkins 
looking important trying conceal 
manner calm. Dr. Bauerstein remained 
background, grave bearded face Dr. Wilkins 
two. addressed 
 
"Mr. Cavendish, like consent 
 
"Is asked John gravely. pain crossed 
face. 
 
said Dr. Bauerstein. 
 
"You mean 
 
"That neither Dr. Wilkins could give death certificate 

 
John bent head. 
 
"In case, alternative 
 
"Thank you," said Dr. Wilkins "We propose 
take place to-morrow rather glanced 
"Under circumstances, afraid inquest hardly 
necessary, beg won't 
distress 
 
pause, Dr. Bauerstein drew two keys 
pocket, handed John. 
 
"These keys two locked and, 
opinion, would better kept locked 
 
doctors 
 
turning idea head, felt moment 
come it. Yet little so. John, 
knew, horror kind 
preferred never meet trouble might 
difficult convince plan. Lawrence, 
hand, less felt 
might count upon doubt moment 
come take 
 
said, "I going ask 
 
"Well?" 
 
"You remember speaking friend Belgian here? 
famous 
 
"Yes." 
 
"I want let call investigate 
 

 
"Yes, time advantage foul 
 
cried Lawrence "In opinion whole thing 
Wilkins hadn't idea thing, 
Bauerstein put head. But, like 
Bauerstein's got Poisons 
course sees 
 
confess surprised Lawrence's seldom 
anything. 
 
John hesitated. 
 
"I can't feel do, said last. "I'm inclined 
give free hand, though prefer wait bit. 
don't want unnecessary 
 
"No, no," cried "you need fear that. Poirot 
discretion 
 
"Very well, then, way. leave hands. 
Though, seems clear enough case. God 
forgive him!" 
 
looked watch. six o'clock. determined lose time. 
 
Five delay, however, allowed myself. spent 
library discovered medical book gave description 
strychnine 
 
 
 
CHAPTER IV. POIROT 
 
 
house occupied village quite close 
park One could save time taking narrow path 
long grass, cut winding I, 
accordingly, went way. nearly reached 
attention arrested running figure man approaching me. 
Mr. Inglethorp. intend explain 

 
eagerly. 
 
"My poor 
 
"Where asked. 
 
kept late last night. one o'clock we'd finished. 
found I'd forgotten all. didn't want 
household, gave 
 
"How hear asked. 
 
knocked tell him. poor 
noble character. 
 
wave swept me. consummate man 

 
"I must hurry on," said, thankful ask whither 

 
minutes knocking door Leastways 
 
Getting answer, repeated impatiently. window 
cautiously opened, Poirot looked out. 
 
gave exclamation surprise seeing me. brief words, 
explained tragedy occurred, wanted 
 
friend, let in, shall 
affair whilst 
 
moments door, followed 
room. installed chair, related whole 
story, keeping back nothing, omitting circumstance, however 
whilst made careful deliberate 
 
told Mrs. Inglethorp's dying words, 
quarrel day before, scrap 
conversation Mary 
former quarrel Mrs. Inglethorp Evelyn Howard, 

 
hardly clear could repeated several times, 
occasionally go back detail forgotten. 
Poirot smiled kindly me. 
 
"The mind so? Take time, mon 

arrange facts, proper place. 
importance put one 
importance, face, 

 
"That's "but going decide 
important, always seems difficulty 
me." 
 
Poirot shook head arranging 
exquisite care. 
 
"Not so. One fact leads 
next fit that? next 
little Ah, something link 
there. search. little 
curious fact, possibly little detail 
put made gesture hand. "It 

 

 
"Ah!" Poirot shook fiercely 
it. Peril detective says: 
matter. forget way lies 
Everything 
 
"I know. always told that. That's gone 
details thing whether seemed not." 
 
"And pleased you. good memory, given 
facts order present them, say 
make upset. 
circumstance omitted one fact 
paramount 
 
"What that?" asked. 
 
"You told Mrs. Inglethorp ate well last night." 
 
stared him. Surely war affected little man's brain. 
carefully engaged coat putting on, 
seemed wholly task. 
 
"I don't said. "And, anyway, don't 
 
"You first 
 
"I can't see said, rather "As far remember, 
didn't eat much. obviously taken 
appetite away. 
 
"Yes," said Poirot thoughtfully, "it 
 
opened took small despatch-case, turned 
me. 
 
"Now ready. proceed study matters 
Excuse me, mon ami, dressed haste, tie 
one side. Permit me." it. 
 
y Now, shall 
 
hurried village, turned lodge Poirot 
stopped moment, gazed beautiful 
park, still morning 
 
"So beautiful, beautiful, yet, poor family, plunged 
sorrow, 
 
looked spoke, aware 
prolonged 
 
family sorrow Mrs. Inglethorp's 
death realized lack 
dead woman gift commanding love. 
death shock distress, would 

 
Poirot seemed follow nodded head gravely. 
 
"No, right," said, "it though blood 
kind generous 
mother. Blood remember 
 
"Poirot," said, "I wish would tell wanted know 
Mrs. Inglethorp ate well last turning 
mind, can't see anything 
 
silent minute two walked along, finally 
said: 
 
"I mind telling know, habit 
explain end reached. present Mrs. 
Inglethorp died strychnine administered 

 
"Yes?" 
 
"Well, time coffee 
 
"About eight 
 
drank half-past 
much later. Well, strychnine fairly rapid poison. effects would 
felt soon, probably hour. Yet, Mrs. Inglethorp's 
case, symptoms manifest five o'clock 
next nine heavy taken time 
might effects, though hardly extent. 
Still, possibility taken account. But, according 
you, ate little yet symptoms develop 
early next curious circumstance, 
friend. Something may arise explain it. 
meantime, remember it." 
 
house, John came met us. face looked weary 

 
"This dreadful business, Monsieur Poirot," said. 
explained anxious 
 
"I comprehend 
 
"You see, suspicion far. nothing go 
 
matter 
 
John turned me, taking 
so. 
 
"You know fellow Inglethorp 
 
"Yes. met him." 
 
John flung match adjacent flower bed, proceeding 
much Poirot's feelings. it, buried 
 
"It's jolly difficult know treat him." 
 
"That difficulty exist pronounced Poirot quietly. 
 
John looked puzzled, quite understanding 
saying. handed two keys Dr. Bauerstein given me. 
 
Monsieur Poirot everything wants see." 
 
"The asked Poirot. 
 
"Dr. Bauerstein considered 
 
Poirot nodded thoughtfully. 
 
"Then sure. Well, matters us." 
 
went together room tragedy. convenience 
plan room principal articles it. 
 
Poirot locked door inside, proceeded minute 
inspection room. one object 
remained door, 
Poirot, however, seem grateful 

 
"What you, friend," cried, "that remain 
say yes, stuck 
 
explained afraid 
 
already practically 
army likely No, come 
aid search. put little case need 
it." 
 
so, round table window, 
for, top up, 
floor. 
 
cried Poirot. "Ah, friend, one may live 
big house yet 
 
piece resumed search. 
 
small purple despatch-case, key 
engaged attention time. took key 
passed saw nothing 
however. ordinary key bit twisted 
wire 
 
Next, examined framework door broken in, 
bolt really went door 
opposite leading Cynthia's room. door also 
stated. However, went length it, opening 
several times; utmost 
making noise. Suddenly something bolt seemed 
attention. examined carefully, then, 
whipping pair small case, drew 
minute carefully sealed tiny 
 
chest tray spirit lamp 
small it. small quantity dark remained 
empty cup drunk stood 
near it. 
 
wondered could overlook this. 
clue worth Poirot finger 
made 
 
it." 
 
passed floor, table bed 
books, bunch keys, 
coffee-cup lay scattered about. 
 
"Ah, said Poirot. 
 
"I must confess see nothing particularly curious it." 
 
"You not? Observe broken two 
lie fell. see, coffee-cup absolutely 

 
"Well," said "I suppose one must stepped it." 
 
said Poirot, odd voice. "Some one stepped it." 
 
rose walked slowly across 
stood 

 
"Mon said, turning me, stepped 
reason either 
contained strychnine far 
contain 
 
made reply. knew good asking 
explain. moment two roused himself, went 
picked bunch keys floor, 
round fingers finally selected one, bright 
tried lock purple 
opened moment's closed 
it, slipped bunch keys, well key 
originally stood pocket. 
 
"I authority go papers. 

 
made careful examination 
Crossing room window, round 
hardly visible dark brown seemed interest 
went examining 
going far smell it. 
 
Finally, poured drops coco test 
carefully. next proceeding take little notebook. 
 
"We found said, writing points 
interest. Shall enumerate them, you?" 
 
"Oh, you," replied 
 
"Very well, then. One, coffee-cup ground 
two, key three, 

 
"That may done time 
 
"No, still coffee. Four, 
fragment dark green two, 

 
"Ah!" cried. "That sealed 
 
"Yes. may turn piece one Mrs. Inglethorp's 
quite shall see. Five, 
pointed large candle grease 
floor "It must done since yesterday, 
otherwise good would removed 
hot One best hats 

 
"It likely done last night. perhaps 
Mrs. Inglethorp dropped 
 
"You brought one candle room?" 
 
"Yes. Lawrence Cavendish carrying it. upset. 
seemed see something indicated 
absolutely him." 
 
"That said Poirot quickly. "Yes, 
eye sweeping whole length candle 
made great perceive white 
whereas Monsieur Lawrence's still 
hand, Mrs. Inglethorp 
room, 
 
said, "what 
 
friend made rather reply, urging use 
natural 
 
"And sixth asked. "I suppose sample 
 
"No," said Poirot thoughtfully. "I might included 
six, not. No, sixth point keep 

 
looked quickly round room. "There nothing done 
here, think, stared earnestly long dead 
"The fire 
might us 
 
hands began sort grate 
greatest Suddenly, 
gave faint 
 
"The 
 
quickly handed him, skill small piece 
half charred paper. 
 
mon cried. "What think that?" 
 
scrutinized exact 
 
puzzled. unusually quite unlike ordinary 
Suddenly idea struck me. 
 
cried. "This fragment 
 
"Exactly." 
 
looked sharply. 
 
"You 
 
"No," said "I expected it." 
 
piece paper, watched put away 
case, care everything. 
brain 
destroyed it? person left candle grease 
anyone gained doors 
bolted inside. 
 
"Now, friend," said Poirot "we go. like ask 
questions name is, not?" 
 
passed Alfred Inglethorp's room, Poirot delayed long 
enough make brief fairly comprehensive examination it. 
went door, Mrs. 
Inglethorp's room before. 
 
took boudoir expressed wish see, 
went search Dorcas. 
 
returned her, however, boudoir empty. 
 
"Poirot," cried, "where you?" 
 
"I here, friend." 
 
stepped outside French window, standing, apparently 
lost various flower 
 
murmured. Observe 
eye. 
also, recently done; 
so?" 
 
"Yes, believe yesterday afternoon. come 
here." 
 
moment's satisfaction 
 
"Yes, affair 
 
"And know fine equal 

 
shrugged shoulders. really arguing 
chose take line. 
 
"You things been. Well, come 
interview brave 
 
Dorcas standing boudoir, hands folded front her, 
grey hair rose waves white 
model picture good old-fashioned 
 
attitude towards Poirot, inclined 
soon broke drew forward chair. 
 
seated, 
 
"Thank you, sir." 
 
"You mistress many years, so?" 
 
years, sir." 
 
"That long time, faithful service. much attached 
her, not?" 
 
"She good mistress me, sir." 
 
"Then object answering questions. put 
Mr. Cavendish's full 
 
"Oh, certainly, sir." 
 
"Then begin asking events yesterday 
afternoon. mistress 
 
"Yes, sir. don't know Dorcas hesitated. Poirot 
looked 
 
"My good Dorcas, necessary know every detail 
quarrel fully possible. think 
mistress lies dead, necessary 
know her. Nothing bring back 
life, hope, foul bring murderer 

 
that," said Dorcas "And, names, there's 
house none us could ever ill day 
first _he_ 
 
Poirot waited indignation then, 
tone, asked: 
 
"Now, first heard it?" 
 
"Well, sir, happened going along hall outside 
 
"What time that?" 
 
"I couldn't say sir, wasn't long way. 
Perhaps four may bit later. Well, sir, 
said, happened passing along, heard voices loud 
angry here. didn't exactly mean is. 
stopped. door mistress speaking sharp 
clear, heard said quite 'You 
me, deceived said. didn't hear Mr. Inglethorp 
replied. spoke good bit lower answered: 
dare you? kept fed you! owe 
everything me! me! bringing 
upon didn't hear said, went on: 
say make difference. see duty 
mind made up. need think fear 
scandal husband wife deter 
thought heard coming out, went 
 
"You sure Mr. Inglethorp's voice 
 
"Oh, yes, sir, whose could be?" 
 
"Well, happened 
 
came back quiet. five o'clock, 
Mrs. Inglethorp rang bell told bring cup 
boudoir. looking white 
upset. says, great sorry 
that, says. feel better nice hot cup tea, 
something hand. don't know letter, 
piece paper, writing it, kept staring 
it, almost couldn't believe written there. 
herself, though forgotten 
says me: 
trust man, Dorcas, they're worth hurried off, got 
good strong cup tea, me, said she'd feel better 
she'd drunk it. 'I don't know says. 
husband wife dreadful thing, Dorcas. I'd rather 
Mrs. Cavendish came then, didn't say 
more." 
 
"She still letter, whatever was, "Yes, sir." 
 
"What would likely 
 
"Well, don't know, sir, expect would lock purple 
case 
 
"Is usually kept important 
 
"Yes, sir. brought every morning, took 
every night." 
 
"When lose key it?" 
 
"She missed yesterday sir, told look 
carefully it. much put it." 
 
"But 
 
"Oh, yes, sir." 
 
Dorcas looking curiously and, tell truth, 
I. lost Poirot smiled. 
 
"Never mind, Dorcas, business know things. key 
drew pocket key found 
lock upstairs. 
 
eyes looked though would head. 
 
"That's it, sir, right enough. find it? looked 
everywhere it." 
 
"Ah, see place yesterday 
to-day. Now, pass another subject, mistress dark green 

 
Dorcas rather startled unexpected question. 
 
"No, sir." 
 
"Are quite 
 
"Oh, yes, sir." 
 
"Has anyone else house got green 
 
Dorcas reflected. 
 
"Miss Cynthia green evening 
 
dark 
 
"A light green, sir; sort call it." 
 
"Ah, want. nobody else anything 
 
"No, know 
 
Poirot's face trace whether disappointed 
otherwise. merely 
 
leave pass on. reason believe 
mistress likely take sleeping last 
 
"Not night, sir, know 
 
"Why know 
 
"Because box empty. took last one two days ago, 
didn't made up." 
 
"You quite sure that?" 
 
sir." 
 
"Then cleared way, mistress didn't ask 
sign paper 
 
"To sign No, sir." 
 
"When Mr. Mr. Lawrence came yesterday evening, 
found mistress busy writing suppose give 
idea letters 
 
"I'm afraid sir. evening. Perhaps Annie 
could tell you, though she's girl. Never cleared 
away last night. That's happens I'm 
look 
 
Poirot lifted hand. 
 
left, Dorcas, leave little longer, pray 
you. like examine them." 
 
"Very well, sir." 
 
"What time go last 
 
"About six o'clock, sir." 
 
"Thank you, Dorcas, ask you." rose strolled 
window. "I admiring flower many 
employed here, way?" 
 
three now, sir. Five, had, war, kept 
place be. wish could seen then, 
sir. fair sight was. there's old young 
woman 
Ah, dreadful 
 
"The good times come again, Dorcas. least, hope so. Now, 
send Annie here?" 
 
"Yes, sir. Thank you, sir." 
 
"How know Mrs. Inglethorp took sleeping asked, 
lively Dorcas left room. "And lost key 

 
"One thing time. sleeping knew this." 
suddenly produced small use 

 
"Where find it?" 
 
"In drawer Mrs. Inglethorp's Number 
Six 
 
"But suppose, last taken two days ago, 
much 
 
not, notice anything strikes peculiar 

 
examined 
 
"No, can't say do." 
 
"Look 
 
read taken 
required. Mrs. No, see nothing 
 
"Not fact chemist's name?" 
 
"Ah!" exclaimed. "To sure, 
 
"Have ever known send box like that, without 
printed name?" 
 
"No, can't say 
 
becoming quite Poirot 
 
explanation quite simple. yourself, 
friend." 
 
proclaimed approach time 
reply. 
 
Annie girl, evidently 
intense mingled certain enjoyment 
tragedy. 
 
Poirot came point once, 
 
"I sent you, thought might able tell 
something letters Mrs. Inglethorp wrote last night. many 
there? tell names 
 
Annie considered. 
 
"There four letters, sir. One Miss Howard, one 
Mr. lawyer, two don't think remember, 
yes, one 
one, don't 
 
urged Poirot. 
 
Annie brains vain. 
 
"I'm sir, it's clean gone. don't think noticed 
it." 
 
"It said Poirot, sign 
"Now want ask something else. 
Mrs. Inglethorp's room coco it. 
every 
 
"Yes, sir, put room every evening, 
fancied it." 
 
"What it? Plain 
 
"Yes, sir, made two 
it." 
 
"Who took room?" 
 
"I did, sir." 
 

 
"Yes, sir." 
 
"At time?" 
 
"When went draw rule, sir." 
 
"Did bring straight kitchen then?" 
 
"No, sir, see there's much room gas Cook used 
make putting 
used bring up, put table door, take 
room 
 
"The door left wing, not?" 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
"And table, side door, 

 
"It's side, sir." 
 
"What time bring last 
 
"About say, sir." 
 
"And take Mrs. Inglethorp's room?" 
 
"When went shut up, sir. eight o'clock. Mrs. Inglethorp came 
bed I'd 
 
8 o'clock, coco standing table 
left 
 
"Yes, sir." Annie growing face, 

 
"And _was_ salt it, sir, wasn't me. never took salt 
near it." 
 
"What makes think salt it?" asked Poirot. 
 
tray, sir." 
 
"You saw salt 
 
"Yes. Coarse kitchen never noticed took 
tray up, came take room saw 
once, suppose ought taken again, asked Cook 
make Dorcas out, 
thought maybe coco right, salt gone 
took in." 
 
utmost difficulty controlling excitement. Unknown 
herself, Annie provided us important piece evidence. 
would realized kitchen 
strychnine, one deadly poisons known mankind. 
Poirot's calm. 
next question disappointed me. 
 
"When went Mrs. Inglethorp's room, door leading 
Miss Cynthia's room 
 
Yes, sir; always was. never 
 
"And door Mr. Inglethorp's notice 
bolted too?" 
 
Annie hesitated. 
 
"I couldn't rightly say, sir; shut couldn't say whether 
bolted not." 
 
"When finally left room, Mrs. Inglethorp bolt door 
you?" 
 
"No, sir, then, expect later. usually lock 
night. door passage, is." 
 
"Did notice candle grease floor room 

 
Oh, no, sir. Mrs. Inglethorp didn't 

 
large candle grease floor, 
think would sure seen it?" 
 
"Yes, sir, would taken piece 
hot 
 
Poirot repeated question put 
 
"Did mistress ever green 
 
"No, sir." 
 
call 
 
"Not green, sir." 
 
anyone else 
 
Annie reflected. 
 
"No, sir." 
 
"You sure that?" 
 
"Quite sure." 
 
want know. Thank 
 
nervous Annie took room. 
excitement burst forth. 
 
"Poirot," cried, "I congratulate you! great 
 
"What great 
 
"Why, coco coffee 
explains course take effect early 
morning, since coco drunk middle night." 
 
"So think well say, Hastings, 

 
"Of salt tray, else could 
 
"It might replied Poirot 
 
shrugged shoulders. going take matter way, 
good arguing him. idea crossed mind, 
first time, poor old Poirot growing old. Privately thought 
lucky associated one type 
mind. 
 
Poirot surveying quietly eyes. 
 
"You pleased me, mon ami?" 
 
"My dear Poirot," said "it dictate you. 
right opinion, mine." 
 
"A remarked Poirot, rising briskly 
feet. "Now finished room. way, whose 
smaller desk 
 
"Mr. 
 
"Ah!" tried roll top perhaps one 
Mrs. Inglethorp's keys would open it." tried 
turning practiced hand, finally uttering 
satisfaction. open 
back roll ran rapid eye neatly 
filed papers. surprise, examine them, merely 
man 
Mr. 
 
was, Poirot's estimation, highest praise 
could 
 
felt friend 

 
"There desk, might been, 
mon might eyes wandered round 
boudoir nothing tell us. yield much. 
this." 
 
pulled envelope pocket, tossed 
me. rather curious document. plain, dirty looking old 
envelope words across it, apparently 
following it. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER V. "IT ISN'T STRYCHNINE, IT?" 
 
 
"Where find this?" asked Poirot, lively curiosity. 
 
"In waste-paper 
 
"Yes, Mrs. mean?" 
 
Poirot shrugged shoulders. 
 
"I cannot 
 
wild idea flashed across me. possible Mrs. Inglethorp's 
mind fantastic idea 
And, so, also possible might taken 

 
theories Poirot, words 
distracted me. 
 
said, "now examine 
 
"My dear earth good that, know 

 
"Oh, la miserable cried Poirot 
 
laughed apparent raising arms heaven 
could consider worst possible 
 
"And, said, increasing "as Mrs. Inglethorp 
took coffee upstairs her, see expect 
find, unless consider likely shall discover packet 
strychnine coffee 
 
Poirot once. 
 
come, friend," said, arms mine. 
Allow interest 
respect 
 
humorous forced went 
together tray remained 
left them. 
 
Poirot made scene night before, listening 
carefully, position various 
 
"So Mrs. Cavendish stood poured out. Yes. came 
across window sat Mademoiselle Cynthia. Yes. 
three cup half 
would Mr. Lawrence one 
 
"John saw put there." 
 
One, two, three, four, where, then, cup Mr. 
Inglethorp?" 
 
"He take 
 
"Then accounted for. One moment, friend." 
 
infinite care, took drop two grounds 
separate test turn 
so. curious change. expression gathered 
describe half puzzled, half 
 
said last. "It clearly 
mistaken. Yes, altogether mistaken. Yet 

 
And, characteristic dismissed whatever 
mind. could told beginning 
coffee bound end blind 
restrained all, though old, Poirot 
great man day. 
 
said John Cavendish, coming hall. "You 
breakfast us, Monsieur Poirot?" 
 
Poirot observed John. Already almost restored 
normal shock events last night 
temporarily, soon swung back 
man little sharp contrast brother, 
had, perhaps, much. 
 
Ever since early hours morning, John hard work, 
sending first gone Evelyn 
papers, generally occupying 
melancholy duties death 
 
"May ask things said. "Do 
point mother died natural must prepare 

 
"I think, Mr. said Poirot "that would well 
false tell views 
members 
 
"My brother Lawrence convinced making fuss 
nothing. says everything points simple case 
heart 
 
"He does, he? murmured 
Poirot softly. "And Mrs. Cavendish?" 
 
faint cloud passed John's face. 
 
"I least idea wife's views subject 
 
answer brought momentary train. John broke 
rather awkward silence saying slight 
 
"I told you, didn't I, Mr. Inglethorp 
 
Poirot bent head. 
 
"It's awkward position us. course one treat 
hang all, one's rise sitting eat 
possible 
 
Poirot nodded 
 
"I quite understand. difficult situation you, Mr. 
Cavendish. would like ask one question. Mr. Inglethorp's reason 
returning last night was, believe, forgotten 
so?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
"I suppose quite sure _was_ 
take all?" 
 
"I idea. never thought always keep 
hall I'll go see it's now." 
 
Poirot held hand faint smile. 
 
"No, no, Mr. Cavendish, late now. certain would 
find it. Mr. Inglethorp take it, ample time replace 
now." 
 
"But 
 
"I think nothing. anyone look morning 
return, seen there, would valuable point 
favour. all." 
 
John looked 
 
"Do said Poirot "I assure need 
let trouble you. Since kind, let us go 

 
Every one assembled circumstances, 
naturally cheerful party. reaction shock 
always think suffering it. 
good breeding naturally much 
usual, yet could help wondering really 
matter great difficulty. red eyes, signs secretly 
indulged felt right opinion Dorcas 
person affected personal side tragedy. 
 
pass Alfred Inglethorp, acted 
manner felt know 
suspected him, wondered. Surely could unaware 
fact, conceal would. feel secret stirring fear, 
confident crime would go Surely 
suspicion atmosphere must warn already marked 
man. 
 
every one suspect him? Mrs. watched 
sat head table, 
soft grey white falling 
slender hands, looked however, 
face could silent, 
hardly opening lips, yet queer way felt great 
strength us all. 
 
little looked tired ill, 
thought. manner 
asked feeling ill, answered 
 
"Yes, I've got 
 
"Have another cup coffee, said Poirot 
"It revive you. de jumped 
took 
 
"No said Cynthia, watching him, picked 
 
"No abandon eh?" 
 
"No, never take 
 
murmured Poirot himself, brought back 

 
heard him, glancing curiously little man saw 
face working suppressed eyes 
green heard seen something affected 
it? usually 
must confess nothing ordinary attracted 
attention. 
 
another moment, door opened Dorcas 
 
"Mr. Wells see you, sir," said John. 
 
remembered name lawyer Mrs. 
Inglethorp written night before. 
 
John rose immediately. 
 
turned us. "My mother's 
explained. lower voice: "He also understand. 
Perhaps would like come me?" 
 
acquiesced followed room. John strode ahead 
took opportunity 
 
"There inquest then?" 
 
Poirot nodded seemed absorbed thought; much 
curiosity 
 
"What it? attending say." 
 
"It true, friend. much 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Because Mademoiselle Cynthia take sugar 
 
cannot 
 
"But serious. Ah, something 
understand. instinct right." 
 
"What 
 
"The instinct led insist examining 

 
followed John study, closed door behind us. 
 
Mr. Wells pleasant man keen eyes, 
typical lawyer's mouth. John introduced us both, explained 
reason presence. 
 
"You understand, added, "that strictly 
private. still hoping turn need 
investigation 
 
"Quite so, quite so," said Mr. Wells "I wish could 
spared pain course it's 
quite unavoidable absence doctor's 
 
"Yes, suppose so." 
 
man, Bauerstein. Great authority 
 
said John certain manner. 
added rather "Shall appear 
us, mean?" 
 

 
slight pause lawyer went 
 
evidence simply mere matter 
 
"I see." 
 
faint expression relief swept John's face. puzzled me, 
saw occasion it. 
 
"If know nothing pursued Mr. "I 
thought give us plenty time doctor's 
report. take place 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Then arrangement suit you?" 
 

 
"I need tell you, dear Cavendish, 

 
"Can give us help it, Poirot, 
speaking first time since entered room. 
 

 
"Yes, heard Mrs. Inglethorp wrote last night. 
received letter morning." 
 
"I did, contains information. merely note asking 
call upon morning, wanted advice matter great 

 
"She gave hint matter might be?" 
 

 
"That said John. 
 
"A great agreed Poirot gravely. 
 
silence. Poirot remained lost thought minutes. 
Finally turned lawyer again. 
 
"Mr. one thing like ask is, 
professional event Mrs. Inglethorp's 
death, would 
 
lawyer hesitated moment, replied: 
 
"The knowledge public property soon, Mr. Cavendish 

 
"Not all," John. 
 
"I see reason answer question. 
last will, dated August last year, various unimportant 
servants, etc., gave entire fortune Mr. John 

 
"Was question, Mr. unfair 
Mr. Lawrence Cavendish?" 
 
"No, think so. see, terms father's will, 
John property, Lawrence, death, 
would come considerable sum money. Mrs. Inglethorp left 
money knowing would keep 
Styles. was, mind, fair equitable 
 
Poirot nodded thoughtfully. 
 
"I see. right saying, not, English law 
revoked Mrs. Inglethorp 
 
Mr. Wells bowed head. 
 
"As proceed, Monsieur Poirot, document 

 
said Poirot. reflected moment, asked: "Was 
Mrs. Inglethorp aware 
 
"I know. may been." 
 
"She said John "We discussing matter 
wills revoked marriage 
 
"Ah! One question, Mr. say last Mrs. 
Inglethorp, then, made several former 
 
"On average, made new least said Mr. 
Wells "She given changing mind 
one, another member 

 
suggested Poirot, unknown you, made new 
favour one not, sense word, 
member say Miss Howard, 

 
"Not 
 
"Ah!" Poirot seemed exhausted questions. 
 
drew close him, John lawyer 
question going Mrs. Inglethorp's papers. 
 
"Do think Mrs. Inglethorp made leaving money Miss 
asked low voice, curiosity. 
 
Poirot smiled. 
 
"No." 
 
"Then 
 

 
John Cavendish turned Poirot. 
 
"Will come us, Monsieur going 
mother's papers. Mr. Inglethorp quite willing leave entirely 
Mr. Wells myself." 
 
matters much," murmured lawyer. "As 
course, finish 

 
"We look desk boudoir explained John, 
"and go bedroom afterwards. kept important papers 
purple despatch-case, must look 
 
"Yes," said lawyer, "it quite possible may later 
one 
 
"There later Poirot spoke. 
 
"What?" John lawyer looked 
 
pursued friend "there _was_ one." 
 
"What now?" 
 

 

 
"Yes. See here." took charred fragment found 
grate Mrs. Inglethorp's room, handed lawyer 
brief explanation found it. 
 
"But possibly old 
 
"I think so. fact almost certain made 
earlier yesterday 
 
"What?" broke simultaneously men. 
 
Poirot turned John. 
 
"If allow send prove 
you." 
 
"Oh, don't 
 
Poirot raised hand. 
 
"Do ask you. Afterwards shall question much please." 
 
"Very well." rang bell. 
 
Dorcas answered due course. 
 
tell come round speak here." 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
Dorcas 
 
waited silence. Poirot alone seemed perfectly 
forgotten corner 
 
outside proclaimed 
approach John looked Poirot. latter 
nodded. 
 
"Come inside, said John, "I want speak you." 
 
came slowly French window, 
stood near could. held cap hands, 
carefully round round. back much though 
probably old eyes sharp 
intelligent, slow rather cautious speech. 
 
said John, "this gentleman put questions 
want 
 
sir," 
 
Poirot stepped forward eye swept 
faint 
 
"You planting bed round south side 
house yesterday afternoon, not, 
 
"Yes, sir, 
 
"And Mrs. Inglethorp came window called you, not?" 
 
"Yes, sir, 
 
"Tell words exactly happened that." 
 
"Well, sir, nothing much. told go bicycle 
village, bring back form will, don't 
know wrote him." 
 
"Well?" 
 
"Well, did, sir." 
 
"And happened 
 
"We went sir." 
 
"Did Mrs. Inglethorp call 
 
"Yes, sir, 
 
"And then?" 
 
"She made us come right in, sign names bottom long 
she'd 
 
"Did see anything written asked 
Poirot sharply. 
 
"No, sir, bit paper 
 
"And signed told you?" 
 
"Yes, sir, first 
 
"What 
 
"Well, sir, slipped long put inside 
sort purple box standing 
 
"What time first called you?" 
 
"About four, say, sir." 
 
"Not Couldn't half-past 
 
"No, shouldn't say so, sir. would likely bit 
it." 
 
"Thank you, do," said Poirot 
 
glanced master, nodded, lifted 
finger low cautiously 
window. 
 
looked other. 
 
"Good murmured John. "What extraordinary 
 

 
"That mother made day 
 
Mr. Wells cleared remarked 
 
"Are sure Cavendish?" 
 
"What mean?" 
 
"Your mother, tell me, violent quarrel one 
yesterday 
 
"What mean?" cried John again. voice, 
gone 
 
"In consequence mother suddenly hurriedly 
makes new will. contents shall never know. 
told one provisions. morning, doubt, would 
chance. 
takes secret grave. Cavendish, much fear 
there. Monsieur Poirot, sure agree 
facts 
 
not," interrupted John, "we grateful 
Monsieur Poirot matter. him, never 
known will. suppose, may ask you, 
first led suspect 
 
Poirot smiled answered: 
 
"A old planted bed 
 
John, think, would pressed questions further, 
moment loud motor turned 
window swept past. 
 
cried John. me, went hurriedly 
hall. 
 
Poirot looked me. 
 
"Miss explained. 
 
"Ah, glad come. woman head heart 
too, Hastings. Though good God gave 
 
followed John's example, went hall, Miss Howard 
mass 
head. eyes fell me, sudden 
shot me. woman warned earnestly, 
whose warning had, alas, paid soon, 
dismissed mind. 
proved justified manner, felt known 
Alfred Inglethorp well. wondered whether, remained 
Styles, tragedy would taken place, would man 
feared 
 
relieved shook hand, well remembered 
painful eyes met mine 
crying could tell 
manner old 
 
moment got come night duty. Hired car. 
way get here." 
 
"Have anything eat morning, asked John. 
 
"No." 
 
"I thought not. Come along, cleared away yet, 
they'll make fresh turned me. "Look her, 
Hastings, you? Wells waiting me. Oh, here's Monsieur Poirot. 
He's helping us, know, 
 
Miss Howard shook hands Poirot, glanced 
shoulder John. 
 
"What 
 
us 
 
"Nothing taken prison 
 

 
Alfred Inglethorp, 
 
"My dear careful. Lawrence opinion mother 
died heart 
 
retorted Miss Howard. "Of course Alfred 
Inglethorp murdered poor always told 
 
"My dear don't so. Whatever may think 
better say little possible present. inquest isn't 

 
"Not Miss Howard gave truly 
"You're man 
country then. he's sense, won't stay wait 

 
John Cavendish looked 
 
"I know is," accused him, "you've listening 
Never should. know? Nothing enough 
make dangerous. ought father doctor. 
little Wilkins greatest fool even ever 
seen. Heart Sort thing would say. Anyone sense 
could see husband poisoned her. always said he'd 
murder bed, poor soul. he's done it. 
murmur silly things 
ought ashamed yourself, John 
 
"What want do?" asked John, unable help faint smile. 
all, can't local police station 

 
"Well, might something. Find it. He's 
Dare say fly papers. Ask Cook she's missed 
 
occurred forcibly moment Miss 
Howard Alfred Inglethorp keep peace 
them, likely prove task, 
John. could see expression face fully 
appreciated difficulty position. moment, sought 
refuge left room 
 
Dorcas brought fresh tea. left room, Poirot came 
window standing, sat facing Miss Howard. 
 
said "I want ask 
 
said lady, 
 
"I want able count upon 
 
"I'll help hang Alfred replied 
good him. Ought drawn like 
good old 
 
"We one then," said Poirot, "for I, too, want hang 

 
Inglethorp?" 
 

 
"No question another. Poor Emily never murdered _he_ came 
along. don't say wasn't surrounded was. 
after. life safe enough. along 
comes Mr. Alfred within two 
 
me, Miss said Poirot earnestly, "if Mr. 
Inglethorp man, shall escape me. hang 
high 
 
"That's said Miss Howard 
 
"But must ask trust me. help may valuable 
me. tell why. Because, house 
eyes 
 
Miss Howard new note crept 
voice. 
 
"If mean fond was. know, Emily 
selfish old woman way. generous, always 
wanted return. never let people forget done 
way missed love. Don't think ever realized it, 
though, felt lack it. Hope not, anyway. different 
took stand first. many pounds year I'm 
worth you. Well good. piece 
pair theatre didn't 
offended Said wasn't 
couldn't explain. Anyway, kept so, 
whole one could allow fond 
her. watched her. guarded lot them, 
comes along, years devotion 
go 
 
Poirot nodded 
 
"I understand, understand 
think lack fire 
trust me, so." 
 
John stuck head invited us come 
Mrs. Inglethorp's room, Mr. Wells finished looking 
desk boudoir. 
 
went stairs, John looked back door, 
lowered voice 
 
"Look here, what's going happen two 
 
shook head 
 
"I've told Mary keep apart can." 
 
"Will able so?" 
 
"The Lord knows. There's one thing, Inglethorp won't 
keen meeting her." 
 
"You've got keys still, haven't you, Poirot?" asked, reached 
door locked room. 
 
Taking keys Poirot, John unlocked it, passed in. 
lawyer went straight desk, John followed him. 
 
"My mother kept important papers despatch-case, 
said. 
 
Poirot drew small bunch 
 
me. locked it, morning." 
 
"But it's locked now." 
 

 
John lifted spoke. 
 
cried Poirot, "And 
keys flung upon case. Suddenly 
lock 
 
"What?" 
 
Poirot laid case again. 
 
"But forced it? they? door 
burst us 
 
Poirot answered 
 
question. Why? Ah, knew. Since 
hour ago. door ordinary 
Probably passage would fit it." 
 
stared one another Poirot walked 
calm, noticed hands, 
long force habit mechanically 
shaking 
 
"See here, like said last. "There something 
piece evidence, slight perhaps, still 
enough clue connect murderer crime. vital 
destroyed discovered 
significance Therefore, took great 
coming here. Finding case obliged force it, 
thus presence. take must 
something great 
 
"But it?" 
 
"Ah!" cried Poirot, gesture 
document kind, without doubt, possibly scrap paper Dorcas 
saw hand yesterday afternoon. anger burst forth 
animal guessed 
like never left case here. 
carried away me. Ah, gone. 
yet must leave 
stone 
 
rushed like room, followed soon 
sufficiently recovered But, time reached 
top stairs, sight. 
 
Mary Cavendish standing staircase staring 
hall direction 
 
"What happened extraordinary little friend, Mr. 
rushed past like mad 
 
"He's rather something," remarked really 
know much Poirot would wish saw faint smile 
gather Mrs. Cavendish's expressive mouth, try 
turn conversation saying: "They haven't met yet, they?" 
 

 
"Mr. Inglethorp Miss 
 
looked rather manner. 
 
"Do think would disaster 
 
"Well, don't you?" said, rather taken 
 
"No." smiling quiet way. "I like see good 
up. would clear air. present thinking 
much, saying 
 
"John doesn't think so," remarked. "He's anxious keep 
 
"Oh, 
 
Something tone fired me, out: 
 
"Old John's awfully good 
 
studied curiously minute two, said, great 

 
"You loyal friend. like that." 
 
friend too?" 
 
"I bad friend." 
 
"Why say that?" 
 
"Because true. charming friends one day, forget 

 
don't know me, said 
best 
 
seem charming Dr. 
 
Instantly words. face impression 
steel curtain coming real woman. Without 
word, turned went swiftly stairs, whilst stood like 
her. 
 
recalled matters frightful row going below. 
could hear Poirot shouting vexed think 
vain. little man appeared taking 
whole house confidence, proceeding I, one, 
doubted could help 
friend lose head moments excitement. 
stepped briskly stairs. sight Poirot almost 
immediately. drew aside. 
 
"My dear said, "is Surely don't want whole 
house know actually playing 

 
"You think so, 
 
"I sure it." 
 
"Well, well, friend, guided you." 
 
little late now." 
 

 
looked felt quite though 
still thought rebuke wise one. 
 
"Well," said last, "let us go, mon 
 
"You finished here?" 
 
"For moment, yes. walk back 
 

 
picked little went open 
window drawing-room. Cynthia coming in, 
Poirot stood aside let pass. 
 
me, one 
 
"Yes?" turned 
 
"Did ever make Mrs. Inglethorp's 
 
slight flush rose face, answered rather 
 
"No." 
 

 
flush Cynthia replied: 
 
"Oh, yes, make sleeping once." 
 

 
Poirot produced empty box contained 
 
nodded. 
 
"Can tell 
 
"No, bromide 
 
"Ah! Thank you, good morning." 
 
walked briskly away house, glanced 
once. often noticed that, anything excited him, eyes 
turned green like shining like now. 
 
"My friend," broke last, "I little idea, 
probably utterly impossible idea. in." 
 
shrugged shoulders. privately thought Poirot rather 
much given fantastic case, surely, truth 
plain apparent. 
 
"So explanation blank remarked. 
"Very simple, said. really wonder think 
myself." 
 
Poirot appear listening me. 
 
"They made one discovery, 
thumb shoulder direction Styles. "Mr. Wells told 
going 
 
"What it?" 
 
desk boudoir, found Mrs. 
dated marriage, leaving fortune Alfred 
Inglethorp. must made time engaged. 
came quite surprise John Cavendish also. 
written one printed forms, witnessed two 

 
"Did Mr. Inglethorp know it?" 
 
"He says not." 
 
"One might take remarked "All 
wills Tell me, words 
envelope help discover made yesterday 

 
Poirot smiled. 
 
"Mon ami, ever, writing letter, arrested 
fact know spell certain 
 
"Yes, suppose every one 
 
"Exactly. not, case, tried word twice 
edge spare scrap paper, see 
looked right? Well, Mrs. Inglethorp did. notice 
word first one subsequently 
make sure, tried 
sentence, thus: 'I Now, tell me? told 
Mrs. Inglethorp writing word 
afternoon, and, fragment paper found grate fresh 
mind, possibility document almost certain 
contain once. possibility 
confirmed general 
boudoir swept morning, near desk several 
brown mould earth. weather perfectly fine 
days, ordinary would left heavy 
 
"I strolled window, saw beds 
newly mould beds exactly similar 
floor boudoir, also learnt 
planted yesterday afternoon. sure one, possibly 
two sets 
entered boudoir, Mrs. Inglethorp merely wished speak 
would probability stood window, 
would come room all. quite convinced 
made fresh will, called two 
witness Events proved right 

 
"That could help "I must confess 
conclusions drew words quite 

 
smiled. 
 
"You gave much imagination. Imagination good 
servant, bad master. explanation always 

 
know key 

 
"I know it. guess turned correct. 
observed piece twisted wire 
suggested possibly 
Now, lost Mrs. Inglethorp would 
replaced bunch found 
obviously new bright, led 
hypothesis somebody else inserted original key lock 

 
"Yes," said, Inglethorp, without 
 
Poirot looked curiously. 
 
"You sure 
 
"Well, Every fresh circumstance seems establish 

 
"On said Poirot quietly, "there several points 

 
"Oh, come 
 
"Yes." 
 
"I see one." 
 
"And that?" 
 
"That house last night." 
 
English say! chosen one point 
mind tells him." 
 
"How that?" 
 
"Because Mr. Inglethorp knew wife would poisoned last 
night, would certainly arranged away house. 
excuse obviously one. leaves us two 
either knew going happen 
reason 
 
"And asked 
 
Poirot shrugged shoulders. 
 
"How know? without doubt. Mr. Inglethorp, 
say, somewhat necessity 
make 
 
shook head, 
 
"We agree, eh?" said Poirot. "Well, let us leave it. Time 
show us right. let us turn aspects case. 
make fact doors bedroom 
bolted 
 
considered. "One must look 
 

 
"I put way. doors eyes 
told us presence candle grease floor, 
destruction will, prove night one 
entered room. agree 
 
Put 
 
"Well," said, "as person entered 
window, means, follows door must 
opened inside Mrs. Inglethorp herself. 
conviction person question husband. would 
naturally open door 
 
Poirot shook head. 
 
"Why bolted door leading 
unusual proceeding violent quarrel 
afternoon. No, last person would 
 
"But agree door must opened Mrs. 
Inglethorp 
 
"There another may forgotten bolt door 
passage went bed, got later, towards 
morning, bolted 
 
seriously 
 
"No, say so, might be. Now, turn another 
make scrap conversation overheard 
Mrs. Cavendish 
 
"I forgotten that," said thoughtfully. "That enigmatical 
ever. seems incredible woman like Mrs. Cavendish, proud 
last degree, interfere violently 
certainly 
 
astonishing thing woman breeding 
do." 
 
"It certainly agreed. "Still, need 
taken 
 
burst Poirot. 
 
"What always told you? Everything must taken account. 
fact fit theory go." 
 
"Well, shall see," said, 
 
"Yes, shall see." 
 
reached Leastways Poirot upstairs 
room. offered one tiny Russian 
occasionally amused notice away used 
carefully little china momentary annoyance 

 
Poirot placed two front open window 
commanded view village street. fresh air warm 
going hot day. 
 
Suddenly attention arrested looking young man 
street great pace. expression face 
curious terror agitation. 
 
said. 
 
leant forward. 
 
said. "It Mr. chemist's coming 
here." 
 
young man came halt Leastways and, 
moment, door. 
 
"A little cried Poirot window. "I 
 
follow him, ran swiftly stairs opened 
door. Mr. Mace began once. 
 
"Oh, Mr. Poirot, I'm sorry heard you'd 
come back 
 
"Yes, 
 
young man dry lips. face working curiously. 
 
"It's village old Mrs. Inglethorp dying suddenly. 
lowered voice it's 
 
Poirot's face remained quite 
 
doctors tell us that, Mr. 
 
"Yes, young man hesitated, 
agitation much him. clutched Poirot arm, sank 
voice "Just tell this, Mr. Poirot, 
isn't strychnine, it?" 
 
hardly heard Poirot replied. Something evidently 
nature. young man closed door 
Poirot's eyes met mine. 
 
"Yes," said, gravely. "He evidence give 

 
went slowly upstairs again. opening lips, Poirot 
stopped gesture hand. 
 
"Not now, now, mon need reflection. mind 
well." 
 
ten minutes sat dead silence, perfectly still, except 
several expressive motions time 
eyes grew steadily last heaved deep sigh. 
 
"It well. bad moment passed. arranged 
One must never permit confusion. case clear 

Hercule two facts 
 
"And they?" 
 
"The first state weather yesterday. 

 
"But glorious you're pulling 

 
"Not all. registered degrees 
forget that, friend. key whole 
 
"And second asked. 
 
"The important fact Monsieur Inglethorp peculiar 
clothes, black beard, uses 
 
cannot believe 
 
"I absolutely serious, friend." 
 
"But 
 
"No, 
 
"And supposing jury returns Murder 
Alfred Inglethorp. becomes then?" 
 
"They would shaken twelve stupid men happened make 
one thing, country jury 
anxious take responsibility upon itself, Mr. Inglethorp stands 
practically position local added 
"I allow it!" 
 
would allow it?" 
 
"No." 
 
looked extraordinary little man, divided annoyance 
tremendously sure himself. though read 
thoughts, nodded gently. 
 
"Oh, yes, mon ami, would say." got laid hand 
shoulder. complete change. Tears 
came eyes. "In this, see, think poor Mrs. 
Inglethorp dead. 
good us owe 
 
Poirot swept on. 
 
"Let tell this, Hastings. would never forgive let 
Alfred Inglethorp, husband, arrested word 
could save him!" 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VI. INQUEST 
 
 
interval Poirot 
Twice Mr. also took long 
country. rather taking 
confidence, could least guess 
driving at. 
 
occurred might making 
so, finding called Leastways 
Wednesday evening, walked fields, hoping meet 
him. sign him, hesitated go right 
farm itself. walked away, met 

 
Hall, you?" asked. 
 
"Yes. I'm looking friend mine thought might walked 
way." 
 
"A little waves hands One 

 
"Yes," said eagerly. "He here, then?" 
 
"Oh, he's here, right enough. too. Friend yours, 
he? Ah, gentlemen pretty 
ever. 
 
"Why, gentlemen Hall come asked, 
could. 
 

 
does, names, mind. liberal gentleman 
Oh, thank you, sir, I'm sure." 
 
walked sharply. Evelyn Howard right then, 
experienced sharp thought Alfred 
Inglethorp's another woman's money. 
face bottom crime, 
Probably judicious mixture both. 
 
one point, Poirot seemed curious 
twice observed thought Dorcas must made error 
fixing time suggested repeatedly 
4 o'clock heard voices. 
 
Dorcas Quite hour, even more, elapsed 
time heard voices 5 o'clock, 
taken tea 
 
inquest held Friday Arms 
Poirot sat together, required give evidence. 
 
gone through. jury viewed body, John 
Cavendish gave evidence 
 
questioned, described early hours 
morning, circumstances mother's death. 
 
medical evidence next taken. breathless 
every eye fixed famous London known 
one greatest authorities day subject 
 
brief words, result Shorn 
medical amounted fact 
Mrs. Inglethorp met death result strychnine 
Judging quantity must taken 
less strychnine, probably one 
slightly over. 
 
"Is possible could swallowed poison 
asked 
 
"I consider Strychnine used domestic 
purposes, poisons are, restrictions placed 

 
"Does anything examination lead determine poison 

 
"No." 
 
"You arrived Styles Dr. 
 
"That so. motor met outside lodge 
hurried fast 
 
"Will relate us exactly happened 
 
"I entered Mrs. Inglethorp's room. moment 
typical turned towards me, gasped out: 

 
strychnine administered Mrs. Inglethorp's 
coffee taken 
 
strychnine fairly rapid action. 
symptoms appear one two hours 
certain conditions, none which, however, appear 
present case. presume Mrs. Inglethorp took 
coffee dinner eight o'clock, whereas symptoms 
manifest early hours morning, which, 
face it, points taken much later 

 
"Mrs. Inglethorp habit drinking cup coco 
middle night. Could strychnine administered 
that?" 
 
"No, took sample coco remaining 
strychnine 
 
heard Poirot softly beside me. 
 
"How know?" whispered. 
 

 
"I doctor would 
considerably surprised 
 
"Why?" 
 
strychnine unusually bitter 
detected solution 1 
strongly Coco would quite powerless mask it." 
 
One jury wanted know objection applied coffee. 
 
"No. Coffee bitter taste would probably cover 
taste 
 
"Then consider likely administered 
coffee, unknown reason action 
 
"Yes, but, cup completely possibility 

 
concluded Dr. Bauerstein's evidence. Dr. Wilkins 
points. Sounded possibility repudiated 
said, suffered weak heart, 
otherwise enjoyed perfect health, cheerful 
would one last people take 
life. 
 
Lawrence Cavendish next called. evidence quite 
mere repetition brother. 
step down, paused, said rather 
 
"I like make suggestion 
 
glanced replied 
 
Mr. Cavendish, arrive truth 
matter, welcome anything may lead 
 
"It idea explained Lawrence. "Of course may 
quite wrong, still seems mother's death might 
accounted natural 
 
"How make out, Mr. Cavendish?" 
 
"My mother, time death, time it, 
taking containing 
 
"Ah!" said 
 
jury looked up, interested. 
 
"I continued Lawrence, "that cases 
effect administered time, ended 
causing death. Also, possible may taken 
medicine 
 
"This first heard deceased taking strychnine 
time death. much obliged you, Mr. 
 
Dr. Wilkins recalled idea. 
 
"What Mr. Cavendish suggests quite impossible. doctor would tell 
same. Strychnine is, certain sense, 
would quite impossible result sudden death 
way. would long period symptoms 
would attracted attention. whole thing 
 
"And second Mrs. Inglethorp may 
taken 
 
even four would resulted death. Mrs. 
Inglethorp always extra large amount medicine made 
time, dealt Cash 
would take nearly whole bottle account 
amount strychnine found 
 
"Then consider may dismiss way 
causing 
 
supposition 
 
interrupted suggested 
made medicine might committed 
 
course, always replied doctor. 
 
Dorcas, next witness called, even 
medicine newly made up. contrary, 
Mrs. Inglethorp taken last dose day death. 
 
question finally abandoned, Coroner 
proceeded task. Dorcas 
awakened violent ringing bell, 
subsequently roused household, passed subject 
quarrel preceding afternoon. 
 
evidence point substantially Poirot 
already heard, repeat here. 
 
next witness Mary Cavendish. stood 
spoke low, clear, perfectly composed voice. answer 
question, told how, alarm clock aroused 
4.30 usual, startled sound 
something heavy 
 
"That would table commented 
 
"I opened continued Mary, "and minutes 
bell rang Dorcas came running woke husband, 
went room, 
 
Coroner interrupted her. 
 
"I really think need trouble point. 
know known subsequent 
obliged would tell us overheard quarrel day 

 

 
faint voice. raised hand 
adjusted neck, turning head little 
so. quite thought flashed across 
"She gaining 
 
"Yes. continued Coroner deliberately, "that 
sitting reading bench outside long window 
boudoir. so, not?" 
 
news glancing sideways Poirot, fancied 
news well. 
 
pause, mere hesitation moment, 
answered: 
 
"Yes, so." 
 
"And boudoir window open, not?" 
 
Surely face grew little answered: 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Then cannot failed hear voices inside, especially 
raised fact, would 

 

 
"Will repeat us overheard 
 
"I really remember hearing 
 
"Do mean say hear 
 
"Oh, yes, heard hear 
faint spot colour came "I habit 
listening private 
 
Coroner 
 
"And remember nothing all? Mrs. 
one word phrase make realize _was_ private 

 
paused, seemed still calm ever. 
 
remember. Mrs. Inglethorp said remember 
exactly causing scandal husband 
 
"Ah!" Coroner leant back satisfied. "That corresponds 
Dorcas heard. excuse me, Mrs. Cavendish, although realized 
private conversation, move remained 

 
caught momentary gleam eyes raised them. 
felt certain moment would willingly torn 
little lawyer, replied 
quietly 
 
"No. comfortable was. fixed mind 
 
"And tell 
 
"That all." 
 
examination over, though doubted Coroner entirely 
satisfied it. think suspected Mary Cavendish could tell 

 
Hill, shop next called, sold 
form afternoon 17th William 
Styles. 
 
William succeeded her, testified 
document. fixed time William 
opinion rather 
 
Cynthia came next. had, however, little tell. 
known nothing awakened Mrs. Cavendish. 
 
"You hear table 
 
"No. fast 
 
Coroner smiled. 
 
"A good conscience makes sound observed. "Thank you, Miss 
all." 
 
"Miss 
 
Miss Howard produced letter written Mrs. Inglethorp 
evening Poirot had, course already seen it. 
added nothing knowledge tragedy. following 

 
                                             STYLES COURT 
                               hand written  July 17th 
     dear Evelyn 
 
     bury found hard forgive 
     things said 
 
     dear husband old woman & fond 
 
     
 
          Emily 
 
 
handed jury scrutinized 
 
"I fear help us much," said sigh. "There 
mention events 
 
me," said Miss Howard "It shows 
clearly enough poor old friend found she'd 
made fool 
 
"It says nothing kind Coroner pointed out. 
 
"No, Emily never could bear put wrong. 
know her. wanted back. wasn't going I'd 
right. went round about. people do. Don't believe 
myself." 
 
Mr. Wells smiled So, noticed, several jury. Miss 
Howard obviously quite public character. 
 
great waste continued 
lady, glancing jury 
time know perfectly 
 
Coroner interrupted agony 
 
"Thank you, Miss Howard, all." 
 
fancy breathed sigh relief 
 
came day. Coroner called Albert 
chemist's 
 
agitated young man pale face. answer 
questions, explained qualified 
recently come particular assistant 
formerly called army. 
 
Coroner proceeded business. 
 
"Mr. lately sold strychnine 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
"When this?" 
 
Monday night." 
 

 
"No, sir, Monday, 
 
"Will tell us sold it?" 
 
could heard pin 
 
"Yes, sir. Mr. Inglethorp." 
 
Every eye turned simultaneously Alfred Inglethorp 
started slightly, damning words fell 
young man's lips. half thought going rise 
chair, remained seated, although well acted 
expression astonishment rose face. 
 
"You sure say?" asked Coroner 
 
"Quite sure, sir." 
 
"Are habit selling strychnine 

 
wretched young man 
 
"Oh, no, course not. But, seeing Mr. Inglethorp 
Hall, thought harm it. said poison 

 
human nature endeavour please 
"The might result custom transferred 
local 
 
"Is customary anyone purchasing poison sign 
 
"Yes, sir, Mr. Inglethorp so." 
 
"Have got book here?" 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
and, words stern Coroner 
dismissed wretched Mr. 
 
Then, breathless silence, Alfred Inglethorp called. 
closely drawn around 

 
Coroner went straight point. 
 
"On Monday evening last, purchase strychnine purpose 
poisoning 
 
Inglethorp replied perfect 
 
"No, not. dog Styles, except 
perfect 
 
"You deny absolutely purchased strychnine Albert Mace 
Monday 
 
"I do." 
 
"Do also deny 
 
Coroner handed register signature 

 
"Certainly do. hand-writing quite different mine. 
show you." 
 
took old envelope pocket, wrote name it, 
handing jury. certainly utterly 
 
"Then explanation Mr. 
 
Alfred Inglethorp replied 
 
"Mr. Mace must 
 
Coroner hesitated moment, said: 
 
"Mr. Inglethorp, mere matter form, would mind telling us 
evening Monday, July 
 
can't 
 
"That absurd, Mr. said Coroner sharply. 
again." 
 
Inglethorp shook head. 
 
"I cannot tell you. idea 
 
"In 
 
"I really can't 
 
face grew 
 
company 
 
"No." 
 
"Did meet anyone 
 
"No." 
 
"That said Coroner dryly. "I take 
decline say time Mr. Mace positively 
recognized entering shop purchase 
 
"If like take way, 
 
"Be careful, Mr. Inglethorp." 
 
Poirot 
 
murmured. "Does man 

 
Inglethorp indeed creating bad impression. 
would convinced child. however, passed briskly 
next point, Poirot drew deep breath relief. 
 
"You discussion wife Tuesday 
 
me," interrupted Alfred Inglethorp, "you 
quarrel dear wife. whole story absolutely 
untrue. absent house entire 
 
"Have anyone testify that?" 
 
"You said Inglethorp 
 
Coroner trouble reply. 
 
"There two witnesses swear heard 
Mrs. Inglethorp." 
 
witnesses 
 
puzzled. man spoke quiet assurance 
looked Poirot. expression 
face could understand. last convinced 
Alfred Inglethorp's 
 
"Mr. said "you heard wife's dying 
words repeated here. explain way?" 
 
"Certainly can." 
 
"You 
 
"It seems simple. room Dr. Bauerstein 
much height and, like me, 
light, suffering was, poor wife me." 
 
"Ah!" murmured Poirot himself. "But idea, that!" 
 
"You think whispered. 
 
"I say that. truly ingenious 
 
"You read wife's last words 
were, contrary, appeal me." 
 
Coroner reflected moment, said: 
 
"I believe, Mr. Inglethorp, poured coffee, 
took wife 
 
"I poured out, yes. take her. meant so, 
told friend hall door, laid 
coffee hall table. came hall 
minutes later, 
 
statement might, might not, true, seem 
improve matters much Inglethorp. case, ample 
time introduce poison. 
 
point, Poirot two men 
sitting together near door. One little, sharp, dark, 
man, tall fair. 
 
questioned Poirot put lips 
 
"Do know little man is?" 
 
shook head. 
 
"That Detective Inspector James Japp Scotland 
man Scotland Yard too. Things moving quickly, 
friend." 
 
stared two men certainly nothing 
policeman them. never suspected 
official 
 
still startled recalled 

 
Murder person persons 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VII. POIROT PAYS DEBTS 
 
 
came Arms, Poirot drew aside gentle 
pressure arm. understood object. waiting 
Scotland Yard men. 
 
Poirot stepped forward, 
shorter two. 
 
"I fear remember me, Inspector 
 
"Why, isn't Mr. cried turned 
man. "You've heard speak Mr. 
worked forgery remember, 
run Ah, great days, Then, 
remember pretty you! 
half police Europe. 
Mr. Poirot here." 
 
friendly indulged in, drew 
introduced Japp, who, turn, 
introduced us Superintendent 
 
"I need hardly ask here, remarked Poirot. 
 
Japp closed one eye 
 
"No, Pretty clear case say." 
 
Poirot answered 
 
"There differ you." 
 
"Oh, said opening lips first time. 
whole thing clear man's caught 
could fool me!" 
 
Japp looking attentively Poirot. 
 
fire, remarked 
met there's man's judgment I'd sooner take 
his. I'm greatly he's got something 
Isn't so, 
 
Poirot smiled. 
 
"I drawn certain 
 
Summerhaye still looking rather Japp continued 
Poirot. 
 
"It's way," said, "so far, we've seen case 
outside. That's disadvantage case 
kind, out, speak, lot 
depends spot first thing, that's Mr. Poirot's 
start us. shouldn't soon even, 
hadn't fact smart doctor 
spot, gave us tip you've 
spot first, may picked little 
evidence Mr. Inglethorp murdered wife sure 
stand here, anyone hinted contrary I'd laugh 
face. must say surprised jury didn't bring 
Murder right off. think would have, hadn't 
seemed holding 
 
though, warrant arrest pocket now," 
suggested Poirot. 
 
kind wooden came expressive 

 
"Perhaps have, perhaps remarked dryly. 
 
Poirot looked thoughtfully. 
 
"I 
 
"I dare observed Summerhaye 
 
Japp regarding Poirot 
 
"Can't go little further, Mr. good 
you. You've Yard doesn't want 
make know." 
 
Poirot nodded gravely. 
 
"That exactly thought. Well, tell this. Use 
Arrest Mr. Inglethorp. bring case 
dismissed 
fingers 
 
face grew grave, though Summerhaye gave 
 
me, literally could conclude 
Poirot 
 
Japp taken gently 
 
"I it, Mr. Poirot. I'd take word, there's others 
asking devil mean it. Can't give 
little go 
 
Poirot reflected moment. 
 
"It said last. "I admit wish it. 
forces hand. would preferred work dark 
present, say word Belgian 
whose day past, Alfred Inglethorp must 
friend knows. See, 
then, good Japp, go 
 
"Well, half hour. We're seeing Coroner doctor 

 
Call last house go 
you. Styles, Mr. Inglethorp give you, 
give proofs shall satisfy 
case could possibly 
 
"That's said Japp "And, behalf I'm 
much obliged you, though I'm bound confess can't present see 
possible evidence, always 
long, then, 
 
two detectives strode away, Summerhaye 
face. 
 
"Well, friend," cried Poirot, could get word, "what 
think? Mon warm moments court; 
figure man would refuse say 
anything all. Decidedly, policy 
 
explanations besides 
remarked. case true, could defend 
except 
 
"Why, thousand ingenious cried Poirot. say 
committed murder, think seven plausible 
Far convincing Mr. Inglethorp's 
 
could help 
 
"My dear Poirot, sure capable thinking 
But, spite heard say 
surely cannot still believe possibility Alfred Inglethorp's 

 
"Why much before? Nothing 
 
"But evidence 
 
"Yes, 
 
turned gate Leastways proceeded 
familiar stairs. 
 
"Yes, yes, continued Poirot, almost himself. 
evidence usually vague 
whole thing cut No, 
friend, evidence 
defeated 
 
"How make out?" 
 
long evidence vague 
hard But, anxiety, criminal 
drawn closely one cut set Inglethorp 
 
silent. minute two, Poirot continued: 
 
"Let us look matter like this. man, let us say, 
sets poison wife. lived saying 
therefore, altogether 
Well, set it? goes boldly village 
chemist's strychnine name, 
story dog bound proved absurd. employ 
poison night. No, violent quarrel 
her, whole household naturally 
directs suspicions upon him. shadow 
yet knows chemist's assistant must necessarily come 
forward facts. ask believe man could 
wished commit causing 
would act 
 
began. 
 
see. tell you, mon ami, me. 

 
"But believe innocent, explain buying 

 
"Very _not_ buy it." 
 
"But Mace recognized him!" 
 
"I beg pardon, saw man black beard like Mr. 
wearing like Mr. Inglethorp, dressed 
Mr. Inglethorp's rather could recognize man 
probably seen distance, since, remember, 
village Mrs. Inglethorp 
dealt 
 
"Then 
 
"Mon ami, remember two points laid Leave 
first one moment, 
 
"The important fact Alfred Inglethorp peculiar clothes, 
black beard, uses 
 
"Exactly. suppose anyone wished pass John 
Lawrence Cavendish. Would 
 
"No," said thoughtfully. "Of course 
 
Poirot cut short 
 
"And would tell you, 
men. make successfully one 
two broad would need certain 
case Alfred Inglethorp, 
changed. clothes, beard, hide 
points personal appearance. Now, 
first instinct divert suspicion 
himself, so? best that? throwing 
one else. instance, man ready hand. 
Everybody believe Mr. Inglethorp's 
conclusion would but, make sure 
thing must tangible actual buying 
that, man peculiar appearance Mr. 
Inglethorp, Remember, young Mace never 
actually spoken Mr. Inglethorp. doubt man 
clothes, beard Alfred Inglethorp?" 
 
"It may so," said, Poirot's "But, 
case, say six o'clock Monday 

 
"Ah, said Poirot, down. "If arrested, 
probably would speak, want come that. must make 
see gravity position. is, course, something 
behind silence. murder wife, 
is, nevertheless, something 
quite apart 
 
"What be?" won Poirot's views moment, 
although still faint conviction obvious 
correct one. 
 
"Can asked Poirot, smiling. 
 
"No, you?" 
 
"Oh, yes, little idea sometime turned 

 
"You never told me," said 
 
Poirot spread hands 
 
me, mon ami, precisely turned 
"Tell see must 
 
said really quite indifferent 
fate Alfred Inglethorp, thought good would 
harm. 
 
Poirot, watching gave sigh. 
 
friend," said, changing subject, Mr. 
Inglethorp, evidence inquest strike you?" 
 
"Oh, pretty much 
 
"Did nothing strike peculiar it?" 
 
thoughts Mary Cavendish, 
 
"In way?" 
 
"Well, Mr. Lawrence Cavendish's evidence 
 

 
"Oh, No, don't think so. He's always nervous 
 
"His suggestion mother might poisoned accidentally 
means strike 

 
"No, can't say did. doctors course. 
quite natural suggestion 
 
"But Monsieur Lawrence told 
started studying taken 
 
"Yes, that's true. never thought that." rather "It 

 
Poirot nodded. 
 
"From first, behaviour household, 
alone would likely recognize symptoms strychnine 
yet find member family 
theory death natural 
Monsieur John, could understood it. technical 
knowledge, nature Monsieur 
now, to-day, puts forward suggestion must 
known food thought this, mon 
 
"It's agreed. 
 
"Then Mrs. continued Poirot. "That's another 
telling make 
 
"I don't know make it. seems 
Alfred Inglethorp. Yet looks 
 
Poirot nodded reflectively. 
 
"Yes, One thing certain, overheard good deal 
willing 
 
"And yet last person one would accuse 

 
"Exactly. One thing evidence shown me. made mistake. 
Dorcas quite right. quarrel take place earlier 
afternoon, four o'clock, 
 
looked curiously. never understood 
point. 
 
"Yes, good deal peculiar came continued Poirot. 
"Dr. Bauerstein, now, _he_ dressed hour 
astonishing one commented 
 
"He said doubtfully. 
 
good, bad remarked Poirot. 
"It covers everything, explains nothing. shall keep eye 
clever Dr. 
 
find inquired 
 
"Mon replied Poirot "when find people 
telling out! Now, unless much 
inquest to-day most, two persons speaking truth 
without 
 
"Oh, come now, won't Lawrence, Mrs. Cavendish. 
there's Miss Howard, surely speaking 
 
them, One, grant you, 
 
words gave unpleasant Miss Howard's evidence, 
unimportant was, given 
manner never occurred doubt 
Still, great respect Poirot's 
occasions described 

 
"Do really think so?" asked. "Miss Howard always seemed 
essentially so." 
 
Poirot gave curious could quite seemed 
speak, himself. 
 
"Miss too," continued, "there's nothing 

 
"No. strange never heard sound, sleeping next 
whereas Mrs. Cavendish, wing building, 
distinctly heard table 
 
"Well, she's 
 
"Ah, yes, must famous 
 
quite like tone voice, moment smart 
knock reached looking window perceived 
two detectives waiting us below. 
 
Poirot seized hat, gave and, 
carefully imaginary dust 
joined detectives 
set Styles. 
 
think appearance two Scotland Yard men rather 
John, though course 
realized matter time. Still, presence 
detectives brought truth home anything else could 
done. 
 
Poirot conferred Japp low tone way up, 
latter requested household, 
exception servants, assembled together 
drawing-room. realized significance this. Poirot 
make good. 
 
Personally, Poirot might excellent reasons 
belief Inglethorp's man type 
Summerhaye would require tangible doubted Poirot 
could 
 
long door 
Japp Poirot set every one. 
Scotland Yard men eyes. think 
first time realized thing bad 
tangible reality. read 
To-morrow daily papers, England, would 
news staring 
 
          TRAGEDY 
 
          LADY 
 
would pictures Styles, "The family leaving 
village things 
one read hundred happen people, 
now, house, murder 
front us "the detectives charge case." well-known 
passed rapidly mind interval 
Poirot opened 
 
think every one little surprised 
one official detectives took 
 
said Poirot, though 
deliver "I asked come 
together, certain object. object, concerns Mr. Alfred 
Inglethorp." 
 
Inglethorp sitting little think, 
every one drawn chair slightly away gave 
faint start Poirot pronounced name. 
 
"Mr. said Poirot, addressing directly, "a dark 
shadow resting shadow 
 
Inglethorp shook head 
 
"My poor murmured. "Poor 
 
"I think, said Poirot "that quite 
realize terrible may you." Inglethorp 
appear understand, "Mr. Inglethorp, standing 
grave 
 
two detectives saw official caution 
say used evidence you," actually hovering 
lips. Poirot went on. 
 
"Do understand now, 
 
mean?" 
 
"I said Poirot deliberately, "that suspected poisoning 

 
little ran round circle plain speaking. 
 
"Good cried Inglethorp, starting up. "What monstrous 

 
"I watched quite realize 
nature evidence Mr. Inglethorp, 
knowing told you, still refuse say 
six o'clock Monday 
 
Alfred Inglethorp sank buried face 
hands. Poirot approached stood him. 
 
cried 
 
effort, Inglethorp raised face hands. Then, slowly 
deliberately, shook head. 
 
"You 
 
"No. believe anyone could monstrous accuse 
say." 
 
Poirot nodded thoughtfully, like man whose mind made up. 
 
said. "Then must speak you." 
 
Alfred Inglethorp sprang again. 
 
speak? broke abruptly. 
 
Poirot turned face us. I, 
Hercule Poirot, affirm man entered chemist's 
purchased strychnine six o'clock Monday last Mr. 
Inglethorp, six o'clock day Mr. Inglethorp 
Mrs. back home neighbouring produce 
less five witnesses swear seen together, either 
six and, may know, Mrs. 
home, least two half miles distant 
absolutely question 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VIII. FRESH SUSPICIONS 
 
 
moment's silence. Japp, least 
surprised us, first speak. 
 
"My cried, "you're mistake, Mr. 
witnesses right, suppose?" 
 
prepared list must 
see them, course. find right." 
 
"I'm sure that." Japp lowered voice. "I'm much obliged you. 
pretty arresting would been." turned 
Inglethorp. "But, you'll excuse me, sir, couldn't say 

 
"I tell interrupted Poirot. "There certain 

 
"A malicious utterly untrue one," interrupted Alfred Inglethorp 
agitated voice. 
 
"And Mr. Inglethorp anxious scandal revived 
present. right?" 
 
"Quite right." Inglethorp nodded. "With poor Emily yet 
wonder anxious lying rumours 

 
me, sir," remarked Japp, "I'd sooner amount 
rumours arrested venture think poor 
lady would felt same. And, hadn't Mr. Poirot 
here, arrested would been, sure eggs 
 
"I murmured Inglethorp. "But know, 
shot 
glance Evelyn Howard. 
 
"Now, sir," said Japp, turning briskly John, "I like see 
lady's please, I'll little 
Don't anything. Mr. Poirot, here, 
show way." 
 
went room, Poirot turned made sign 
follow upstairs. caught arm, drew aside. 
 
go Stand side 
door. move till Then, turning rapidly, rejoined 
two 
 
followed instructions, taking position door, 
wondering earth lay behind 
stand particular spot looked thoughtfully 
front me. idea struck me. exception 
Cynthia every one's room left 
anything it? report came stood 
faithfully minutes passed. Nobody came. Nothing 
happened. 
 
must quite twenty minutes Poirot rejoined me. 
 
"You 
 
"No, I've stuck like 
 
"Ah!" "You've seen nothing all?" 
 
"No." 
 
"But probably heard big mon ami?" 
 
"No." 
 
"Is Ah, vexed usually 
made slight know Poirot's 
left hand, went table 
 
looked vexed 
him. 
 
"Never mind, old triumph 
excited you. tell you, surprise us all. must 
affair Inglethorp's Mrs. thought, 
make hold tongue going 
now? Scotland Yard 
 
interview showed 
disappointed 
 
said, looking window. "Here's Dr. Bauerstein. 
believe you're right man, Poirot. don't like him." 
 
"He observed Poirot 
 
"Oh, clever must say see 
never saw 
described doctor's "He looked regular 
head 
 
"You saw him, then?" 
 
"Yes. course, didn't want come 
Mr. Inglethorp 
 
"What?" Poirot caught violently shoulders. "Was Dr. Bauerstein 
Tuesday Here? never told me? 
tell me? Why? Why?" 
 
appeared absolute 
 
"My dear Poirot," "I never thought would interest 
you. didn't know 
 
first Dr. Bauerstein 
Tuesday night Hastings, 
alters 
 
never seen upset. hold me, mechanically 
pair still "Yes, 
alters 
 
Suddenly seemed come decision. 
 
said. "We must act once. Mr. Cavendish?" 
 
John Poirot went straight him. 
 
"Mr. Cavendish, important business new 
clue. May take 
 
"Why, course. mean 
 
"If please." 
 
John rang bell, ordered round car. another ten minutes, 
park along high road 
 
"Now, Poirot," remarked "perhaps tell 
about?" 
 
"Well, mon ami, good deal guess yourself. course 
realize that, Mr. Inglethorp it, whole position 
greatly changed. face face entirely new 
know one person buy poison. 
cleared away manufactured real ones. 
ascertained anyone household, exception Mrs. 
Cavendish, playing you, could Mr. 
Inglethorp Monday evening. way, statement 
put coffee hall. one took much notice 
different significance. must 
find take coffee Mrs. Inglethorp 
passed hall whilst standing there. account, 
two people positively say go near 
Cavendish, Mademoiselle 
 
"Yes, so." felt heart. Mary 
Cavendish could certainly rest suspicion. 
 
"In clearing Alfred continued Poirot, "I obliged 
show hand sooner intended. long might thought 
pursuing him, criminal would Now, 
careful. turned abruptly. "Tell 
me, Hastings, suspicions 
 
hesitated. tell truth, idea, wild itself, 
twice morning flashed brain. rejected 
absurd, nevertheless 
 
"You couldn't call murmured. "It's utterly 

 
"Come now," urged Poirot "Do fear. Speak mind. 
always pay attention 
 
then," out, "it's suspect Miss Howard 
telling 
 
"Miss 
 
laugh 
 
"Not all. 
 
"I can't help continued "that we've rather 
left possible simply strength 
away place. But, all, fifteen 
miles away. car would half hour. say positively 
away Styles night 
 
"Yes, friend," said Poirot "we can. One first 
actions ring hospital 
 
"Well?" 
 
"Well, learnt Miss Howard afternoon duty Tuesday, 
coming kindly offered 
remain night duty, offer gratefully accepted. 
that." 
 
"Oh!" said, rather continued, "it's 
extraordinary Inglethorp started 
suspecting her. can't help feeling she'd anything him. 
idea might know something destroying will. 
might burnt new one, earlier one 
favour. terribly bitter him." 
 
"You consider 
 
wondered really whether quite 
sane 
 
Poirot shook head 
 
"No, no, wrong there. nothing 
Miss Howard. excellent specimen 
English 
 
hatred Inglethorp seems almost idea 
ridiculous one, intended poison that, 
way, Mrs. Inglethorp got hold mistake. don't 
see could done. whole thing absurd 
ridiculous last 
 
right one thing. always wise suspect 
everybody prove 
Now, reasons Miss 
Howard's deliberately poisoned Mrs. Inglethorp?" 
 
"Why, devoted exclaimed. 
 
cried Poirot "You argue like child. 
Miss Howard capable poisoning old lady, would quite 
equally capable No, must look elsewhere. 
perfectly correct assumption 
Alfred Inglethorp violent quite wrong 
draw it. drawn 
believe correct, speak 
paused minute, went on. "Now, way one 
objection Miss Howard's 
 
"And is?" 
 
"That possible way could Mrs. Inglethorp's death benefit Miss 
Howard. murder without 
 
reflected. 
 
Mrs. Inglethorp made Poirot shook 
head. 
 
"But suggested possibility Mr. 
 
Poirot smiled. 
 
"That reason. want mention name person 
actually mind. Miss Howard occupied much 
position, used name 
 
"Still, Mrs. Inglethorp might done so. Why, will, made 
afternoon death 
 
Poirot's shake head energetic stopped. 
 
"No, friend. certain little ideas will. 
tell Miss Howard's 
 
accepted though really see could 
positive matter. 
 
"Well," said, "we Miss Howard, then. 
partly fault ever came suspect her. said 
evidence inquest set off." 
 
Poirot looked puzzled. 
 
"What say evidence 
 
"Don't John Cavendish 

 
seemed little recovered himself. "By 
way, Hastings, something want me." 
 
it?" 
 
time happen alone Lawrence Cavendish, want 
say him. 'I message you, Poirot. says: 
extra rest Nothing more. 
Nothing 
 
extra rest 
right?" asked, much 
 

 
"But mean?" 
 
"Ah, leave find out. access facts. 
say him, see 
 
"Very it's extremely 
 
running now, Poirot directed car 

 
Poirot went inside. minutes 
back again. 
 
said. "That business." 
 
"What there?" asked, lively curiosity. 
 
"I left something 
 
"Yes, what?" 
 
"The sample coco took 
 
"But already cried, "Dr. Bauerstein 
tested, laughed possibility 
strychnine it." 
 
"I know Dr. Bauerstein replied Poirot quietly. 
 
"Well, then?" 
 
"Well, fancy again, all." 
 
another word subject could him. 
 
proceeding respect puzzled 
could see neither reason it. However, 
confidence him, one time rather fully 
restored since belief Alfred Inglethorp's 

 
funeral Mrs. Inglethorp took place following day, 
Monday, came late breakfast, John drew aside, 
informed Mr. Inglethorp leaving morning, take 
quarters Arms completed plans. 
 
"And really it's great relief think he's going, 
continued honest friend. "It bad enough before, thought 
he'd done it, I'm hanged isn't worse now, feel 
guilty fellow. fact is, we've treated 
course, things look black him. don't 
see anyone could blame us jumping conclusions did. 
Still, is, wrong, there's 
feeling one ought make one 
doesn't like fellow bit better one before. whole 
damned I'm thankful he's take 
off. It's good thing Styles wasn't leave 
him. Couldn't bear think fellow here. He's welcome 

 
"You'll able keep place right?" asked. 
 
"Oh, yes. death duties, course, half father's 
money goes place, Lawrence stay us 
present, share well. shall first, 
course, because, told you, bit 
myself. Still, wait now." 
 
general relief Inglethorp's approaching 
genial breakfast experienced since tragedy. Cynthia, 
whose young spirits naturally looking quite pretty 
self again, all, exception Lawrence, seemed 
quietly opening 
new hopeful future. 
 
papers, course, full tragedy. 
biographies every member household, subtle 
usual familiar police clue. 
Nothing spared us. time. war 
newspapers seized crime 
fashionable "The Mysterious Affair topic 
moment. 
 
Naturally house 
constantly consistently denied 
admission, continued village grounds, 
lay wait members 
lived Scotland Yard men came 
went, reserved Towards 
end know. would 
whole thing remain 
 
breakfast, Dorcas came rather asked 
might words me. 
 
it, 
 
"Well, it's this, sir. You'll seeing Belgian gentleman 
to-day nodded. "Well, sir, know asked 
particular mistress, anyone else, green 
 
"Yes, yes. found interest 
 
"No, that, sir. since I've remembered young 
Lawrence still 
It's front sir. 
great chest, full old clothes fancy not. 
came sudden like might green amongst them. 
So, you'd tell Belgian 
 
"I tell him, 
 
"Thank much, sir. nice gentleman is, sir. quite 
different class two detectives London, goes 
about, asking questions. don't hold foreigners rule, 
newspapers say make brave isn't 
ordinary run certainly he's polite spoken 

 
Dear old stood there, honest face 
mine, thought fine specimen old-fashioned 
servant fast dying out. 
 
thought might well go village once, look 
met coming house, gave 
message. 
 
"Ah, brave look chest, 
examine 
 
entered house one one 
hall, went straight 
 
Sure enough, chest, fine old 
brass full every imaginable type 

 
Poirot everything floor 
one two green varying Poirot shook 
head all. seemed somewhat search, 
though expected great results it. Suddenly gave 

 
"What it?" 
 

 
chest nearly there, right 
magnificent black 
 
said Poirot. turned hands, examining 
remarked. "Yes, quite 
 
moment's replaced chest, 
things top before, made way briskly 
went straight found Dorcas busily 

 
Poirot wished good morning went on: 
 
"We looking chest, Dorcas. much obliged 
it. is, indeed, fine collection there. 
often used, may 
 
"Well, sir, often though time time 
young gentlemen call 'a funny 
sometimes, sir. Mr. Lawrence, he's wonderful. shall never 
forget night came think called 
sort Eastern King was. big paper knife 
hand, says, 
specially it's head 
I'm Miss Cynthia, call 
sort take 
be. real sight You'd never believed pretty young 
lady like could made Nobody would 
known her." 
 
"These must great said Poirot "I 
suppose Mr. Lawrence wore fine black beard chest upstairs, 

 
"He beard, sir," replied Dorcas, smiling. "And well know 
it, borrowed two black make I'm 
sure looked wonderfully natural distance. didn't know 
beard all. must got quite lately, 
think. red know, nothing else way hair. 
Burnt use 'tis getting again. 
Miss Cynthia once, and, oh, trouble 
 
"So Dorcas knows nothing black said Poirot 
thoughtfully, walked hall again. 
 
"Do think eagerly. 
 
Poirot nodded. 
 
"I do. notice 
 
"No." 
 
"Yes. cut exactly shape Mr. found one 
two Hastings, affair 
 
"Who put chest, 
 
"Some one good deal remarked Poirot dryly. "You 
realize chose one place house hide 
presence would Yes, must 
must intelligent suspect us 
intelligent all." 
 

 
mon ami, great assistance me." 
 
pleased times hardly 
thought Poirot appreciated true worth. 
 
"Yes," continued, staring thoughtfully, "you 

 
naturally Poirot's next words 

 
"I must observed reflectively. 
 
"You me," 
 

 
showed it. Poirot hurried explain himself. 
 
"You quite take meaning. known working me. 
want somebody associated us way." 
 
"Oh, see. 
 
"No, think not." 
 
"The dear fellow isn't perhaps said thoughtfully. 
 
"Here comes Miss said Poirot suddenly. "She 
black books, since cleared Mr. Inglethorp. Still, 

 
barely civil, Miss Howard assented Poirot's 
request conversation. 
 
went little Poirot closed door. 
 
"Well, Monsieur Poirot," said Miss Howard "what it? 
it. I'm 
 
"Do remember, asked help me?" 
 
"Yes, do." lady nodded. "And told I'd help 
hang Alfred Inglethorp." 
 
"Ah!" Poirot studied "Miss Howard, ask one 
question. beg reply 
 
"Never tell replied Miss Howard. 
 
"It this. still believe Mrs. Inglethorp poisoned 

 
"What mean?" asked sharply. "You needn't think pretty 
explanations influence I'll admit wasn't 
bought strychnine chemist's that? dare say 
fly paper, told 
 
"That said Poirot 
 
"What would put poor Emily way 
well I'm convinced it, doesn't matter 
it." 
 
"Exactly. convinced it," said Poirot quietly. "I 
put question another form. ever heart 
hearts believe Mrs. Inglethorp poisoned 
 
"Good cried Miss Howard. always told man 
Haven't always told would murder 
Haven't always hated like 
 
said Poirot. "That bears little idea 
 
"What little 
 
"Miss Howard, remember conversation took place 
day arrival here? repeated me, 
sentence impressed much. remember 
crime committed, anyone loved 
felt certain would know instinct 
criminal was, even quite unable prove it?" 
 
"Yes, remember saying that. believe too. suppose think 

 
"Not all." 
 
"And yet pay attention instinct Alfred 
Inglethorp." 
 
"No," said Poirot "Because instinct Mr. 
Inglethorp." 
 
"What?" 
 
"No. wish believe committed crime. believe capable 
committing it. instinct tells commit it. 
tells go 
 
staring him, made slight affirmative 
movement hand. 
 
"Shall tell Mr. 
trying believe wish believe. 
trying 
tells another 
 
"No, no, no!" cried Miss Howard hands. "Don't 
say it! Oh, don't say it! isn't can't true. don't know 
put 
 
"I right, not?" asked Poirot. 
 
"Yes, must can't 
impossible. must Alfred Inglethorp." 
 
Poirot shook head gravely. 
 
"Don't ask it," continued Miss Howard, "because shan't tell 
you. won't admit it, even myself. must mad think 
thing." 
 
Poirot nodded, satisfied. 
 
"I ask nothing. enough thought. 
too, working together towards 
common end." 
 
"Don't ask help you, wouldn't lift finger 

 
"You help spite yourself. ask 
able help yourself. 
thing want you." 
 
"And is?" 
 
"You 
 
Evelyn Howard bowed head. 
 
"Yes, can't help that. always hoping 
shall proved 
 
"If wrong, well said Poirot. "No one 
pleased But, right? right, Miss 
Howard, whose side then?" 
 
"I don't know, don't 
 
"Come now." 
 
"It could hushed up." 
 
"There must up." 
 
"But Emily broke off. 
 
"Miss said Poirot "this unworthy you." 
 
Suddenly took face hands. 
 
"Yes," said quietly, "that Evelyn Howard 
flung head Evelyn 
side Let cost words, 
walked firmly room. 
 
said Poirot, looking her, valuable 
woman, Hastings, got brains well 
 
reply. 
 
marvellous thing," Poirot. "It neither 
explained 
 
"You Miss Howard seem know talking 
observed "Perhaps don't realize still 

 
so, mon ami?" 
 
"Yes. me, you?" 
 
Poirot studied attentively moment two. Then, intense 
surprise, shook head 
 
"No, friend." 
 
"Oh, look here, not?" 
 
enough 
 
"Well, think unfair keep back facts me." 
 
"I keeping back facts. Every fact know 
possession. draw deductions them. time 
question 
 
"Still, would interesting know." 
 
Poirot looked earnestly, shook head. 
 
"You see," said 
 
"It intelligence requiring now," pointed out. 
 
"The two often go said Poirot 
 
remark seemed utterly even take 
trouble answer it. decided made interesting 
important doubt would keep 
myself, surprise Poirot ultimate result. 
 
times one's duty assert 
 
 
 
CHAPTER IX. DR. BAUERSTEIN 
 
 
opportunity yet passing Poirot's message 
Lawrence. now, strolled still 
saw Lawrence 
knocking couple ancient about, still 
ancient 
 
struck would good opportunity deliver message. 
Otherwise, Poirot might relieve it. true 
quite gather flattered Lawrence's 
reply, perhaps little part, 
soon perceive significance. Accordingly him. 
 
"I've looking you," remarked 
 
"Have you?" 
 
"Yes. truth is, I've got message 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"He told wait alone you," said, 
voice watching corner 
eye. always rather good called, believe, 
creating 
 
"Well?" 
 
change expression dark face. 
idea 
 
"This dropped voice still extra 
rest 
 
"What earth mean?" Lawrence stared quite 

 
"Don't know?" 
 
"Not you?" 
 
compelled shake head. 
 
"What extra 
 
"I don't know." 
 
better ask Dorcas, one wants know 
It's business, mine. don't know anything 
except we've got never used, 
perfect Old You're you, 

 
shook head. 
 
"You miss really perfect bit old pure delight 
handle it, even look it." 
 
"Well, tell Poirot?" 
 
"Tell don't know he's talking about. It's double 
me." 
 
"All right." 
 
moving towards house suddenly called 
back. 
 
"I say, end Say again, you?" 
 
extra rest sure 
don't know asked 
 
shook head. 
 
"No," said "I wish 
 
sounded house, went together. 
Poirot asked John remain already seated 
table. 
 
consent, mention tragedy 
war, outside 
handed round, Dorcas left room, Poirot suddenly leant 
forward Mrs. Cavendish. 
 
me, unpleasant 
little "little becoming perfect 
would like ask one two 
 
"Of me? 
 
"You amiable, want ask this: door 
leading Mrs. Inglethorp's room Mademoiselle Cynthia, 
say?" 
 
"Certainly replied Mary Cavendish, rather surprised. "I 
said 
 

 
"Yes." looked 
 
"I explained Poirot, "you sure merely 

 
"Oh, see No, don't know. said meaning 
could open it, believe doors 
found bolted 
 
"Still, far concerned, door might equally well 

 
"Oh, 
 
"You happen notice, entered Mrs. 
Inglethorp's room, whether door bolted not?" 
 
believe was." 
 
"But see it?" 
 
"No. 
 
"But interrupted Lawrence suddenly. "I happened notice 
_was_ 
 
"Ah, it." Poirot looked 
 
could help rejoicing that, once, one "little 
come 
 
lunch Poirot accompany home. consented rather 

 
"You so?" asked walked 
park. 
 
"Not all," said 
 
"That well. great 
 
quite intended. hoped would 
observed manner. Still, words 
went towards 
 
"I gave Lawrence said. 
 
"And entirely 
 
"Yes. quite sure idea 
 
expected Poirot but, surprise, 
replied thought, 
pride forbade ask questions. 
 
Poirot another 
 
Cynthia lunch to-day? that?" 
 
"She hospital again. resumed work 
 
"Ah, little pretty too. 
like pictures seen would rather like see 
think would show me?" 
 
"I sure would It's interesting little 
 
"Does go every 
 
"She off, comes back lunch 
times off." 
 
"I remember. Women great work Mademoiselle 
Cynthia yes, little one." 
 
"Yes. believe passed quite 
 
doubt. all, responsible work. suppose 
strong poisons there?" 
 
"Yes, showed us. kept locked little 
believe careful. always take 
key leaving room." 
 
near window, 
 
"No, right side room. Why?" 
 
Poirot shrugged shoulders. 
 
"I wondered. all. come in?" 
 
reached 
 
"No. think I'll getting back. shall go round long way 

 
woods round Styles walk across 
open park, pleasant cool 
hardly breath faint 
strolled little way, finally flung 
foot grand old thoughts mankind 
kindly even Poirot absurd 
fact, peace world. 
 
thought crime, struck far 
off. 
 
again. 
 
Probably, thought, really never happened. course, 
bad dream. truth matter Lawrence 
murdered Alfred Inglethorp absurd 
John make fuss it, go shouting out: "I tell 
won't it!" 
 
woke start. 
 
realized awkward For, 
twelve feet away me, John Mary Cavendish standing 
facing other, evidently And, quite 
unaware could move 
speak John repeated words aroused dream. 
 
"I tell you, Mary, won't it." 
 
Mary's voice came, cool 
 
"Have right 
 
"It talk mother buried 
Saturday, 
 
shrugged shoulders, "if village 

 
"But I've enough fellow hanging about. He's 

 
"A blood bad thing. looked 
ordinary 
 
Fire eyes, voice. wonder blood rose 
John's face 
 

 
"Well?" tone change. 
 
died voice. 
 
understand continue see Bauerstein 
express 
 
"If 
 
"You defy me?" 
 
"No, deny right 
friends 
 
John fell back pace. colour slowly face. 
 
"What mean?" said, voice. 
 
"You said Mary quietly. "You see, don't you, 
right dictate choice 
 
John glanced stricken look face. 
 
"No right? right, said stretched 
hands. 
 
moment, thought expression came 
face, suddenly turned almost fiercely away. 
 

 
walking away John sprang her, caught 
arm. 
 
voice quiet love fellow 

 
hesitated, suddenly swept across face strange 
expression, old yet something young 
it. might Egyptian smiled. 
 
freed quietly arm, spoke shoulder. 
 
swiftly passed little 
leaving John standing though turned 
 
Rather stepped forward, dead branches 
feet so. John took granted 
come upon scene. 
 
Hastings. seen little fellow safely back 
little good, though, 
 
"He considered one finest detectives day." 
 
"Oh, well, suppose must something it, then. rotten 
world is, 
 
"You find so?" asked. 
 
"Good Lord, There's terrible business start with. Scotland 
Yard men house like Never know 
won't turn next. every paper 
say! know 
whole crowd staring lodge gates morning. Sort 
chamber horrors business seen nothing. 
Pretty isn't it?" 
 
up, said "It can't last 
 
"Can't it, last long enough us never able 
hold heads again." 
 
"No, no, you're getting 
 
make man 
stared wherever there's 
worse that." 
 
"What?" 
 
John lowered voice: 
 
"Have ever thought, it? 
can't help feeling sometimes must 
could done it? Inglethorp's 
way, there's one one, us." 
 
Yes, indeed, enough man! One us? Yes, 
surely must so, 
 
new idea suggested mind. Rapidly, considered it. 
light Poirot's mysterious fitted 
in. Fool thought possibility before, 
relief us all. 
 
"No, said, "it isn't one us. could be?" 
 
"I know, but, still, else there?" 
 
"Can't 
 
"No." 
 
looked cautiously round, lowered voice. 
 
"Dr. whispered. 
 

 
"Not all." 
 
"But earthly interest could mother's 
 
"That don't see," "but I'll tell this: Poirot thinks 
so." 
 
he? know?" 
 
told Poirot's intense excitement hearing Dr. Bauerstein 
Styles fatal night, 
 
"He said alters I've thinking. 
know Inglethorp said put coffee Well, 
Bauerstein Isn't possible that, 
Inglethorp brought hall, doctor dropped something 
coffee 
 
said John. "It would 
 
"Yes, 
 
"And then, could know No, old fellow, don't 
think 
 
remembered something else. 
 
"You're quite right. wasn't done. 
told coco sample Poirot taken 
 
John interrupted done. 
 
"But, look here, Bauerstein 
 
"Yes, yes, that's point. didn't see either now. Don't 
Bauerstein it! Bauerstein's 
nothing could substitute 
ordinary coco send course 
would find one would dream suspecting 
Bauerstein, think taking another Poirot," added, 
recognition. 
 
"Yes, bitter taste coco won't 
 
"Well, we've word that. 
He's one world's greatest 
 
"One world's greatest what? Say again." 
 
"He knows poisons almost explained. "Well, 
idea is, perhaps he's found way making strychnine 
may strychnine all, obscure 
one ever heard of, produces much 
 
yes, might be," said John. "But look here, could 
got wasn't 
 
"No, admitted 
 
then, suddenly, dreadful possibility flashed mind. 
hoped would occur John also. glanced sideways 
him. drew deep breath relief, 
terrible thought flashed across mind this: 
Dr. Bauerstein might 
 
Yet surely could Surely woman beautiful Mary 
Cavendish could Yet beautiful women known 
poison. 
 
suddenly remembered first conversation tea day 
gleam eyes said poison 
woman's agitated fatal Tuesday 
Mrs. Inglethorp discovered something Bauerstein, 
threatened tell stop denunciation 
crime 
 
remembered enigmatical conversation Poirot 
Evelyn Howard. monstrous 
possibility Evelyn tried 
 
Yes, fitted in. 
 
wonder Miss Howard suggested up." understood 
unfinished sentence heart 
agreed her. Would Mrs. Inglethorp preferred go 
rather terrible fall upon name 
Cavendish. 
 
"There's another thing," said John suddenly, unexpected sound 
voice made start makes doubt 
say 
 
"What's that?" asked, thankful gone away subject 
poison could introduced 
 
"Why, fact Bauerstein demanded needn't 
done so. Little Wilkins would quite content let go 
heart 
 
"Yes," said doubtfully. "But don't know. Perhaps thought 
safer long run. one might talked afterwards. 
Home Office might ordered whole thing would 
come out, then, would awkward position, 
one would believed man reputation could 
deceived calling heart 
 
"Yes, that's admitted John. added, "I'm 
see motive could been." 
 

 
"Look here," said, "I may altogether wrong. And, remember, 

 
"Oh, goes without 
 
passed little gate 
garden. Voices rose near hand, tea spread 
day 
 
Cynthia back placed chair beside her, 
told Poirot's wish visit 
 
"Of I'd love see it. He'd better come tea one 
day. must fix him. He's dear little man! 
made take tie day, put 
again, said wasn't 
 
laughed. 
 
"It's quite him." 
 
"Yes, isn't it?" 
 
silent minute two, then, glancing direction 
Mary Cavendish, voice, Cynthia said: 
 
"Mr. 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"After tea, want talk you." 
 
glance Mary set thinking. fancied two 
existed little first time, occurred 
wonder girl's future. Mrs. Inglethorp made 
provisions kind her, imagined John Mary would 
probably insist making home rate 
end war. John, knew, fond her, would sorry 
let go. 
 
John, gone house, face 
wore frown 
 
can't think they're They've 
every room things inside out, 
down. really suppose took advantage 
out. shall go fellow Japp, next see him!" 
 
Miss Howard. 
 
Lawrence make show something. 
 
Mary Cavendish said nothing. 
 
tea, invited Cynthia come 
woods together. 
 
"Well?" soon protected eyes 

 
Cynthia flung down, tossed 
piercing turned hair 
gold. 
 
"Mr. always kind, know 
 
struck moment Cynthia really charming 
Much charming Mary, never said things kind. 
 
"Well?" asked hesitated. 
 
"I want ask shall do?" 
 

 
"Yes. see, Aunt Emily always told provided for. 
suppose didn't think likely 
_not_ provided don't know do. think ought 
go away 
 
"Good no! don't want part you, I'm sure." 
 
Cynthia hesitated moment, grass tiny hands. 
said: "Mrs. Cavendish does. me." 
 
you?" cried, 
 
Cynthia nodded. 
 
"Yes. don't know why, can't bear me; _he_ 
 
"There know you're said "On contrary, John 
fond you." 
 
"Oh, meant Lawrence. Not, course, care whether 
Lawrence not. Still, it's rather one 
you, isn't it?" 
 
"But do, Cynthia said "I'm sure 
mistaken. Miss 
 
Cynthia nodded rather gloomily. "Yes, John me, think, 
course ways, wouldn't unkind 
Lawrence never speaks help it, Mary hardly bring 
civil me. wants stay on, to, 
doesn't want me, don't know do." Suddenly 
poor child burst 
 
don't know possessed me. beauty, perhaps, sat there, 
perhaps sense relief 
someone obviously could connection 
perhaps honest pity youth Anyway, 
leant forward, taking little hand, said 
 
me, 
 
hit upon sovereign remedy sat 
once, drew hand away, said, 
 
"Don't 
 
little 
 
"I'm asking honour becoming 

 
intense surprise, Cynthia burst called 

 
"It's perfectly sweet you," said, "but know don't want 

 
"Yes, do. I've 
 
"Never mind you've don't really want don't 

 
"Well, course, it," said "But don't see 
anything laugh at. There's nothing funny 
 
"No, indeed," said Cynthia. might accept next time. 
you've 
 
And, final burst vanished 

 
Thinking struck profoundly 

 
occurred suddenly would go village, look 
Bauerstein. Somebody ought keeping eye fellow. 
time, would wise suspicions might 
remembered Poirot relied 
Accordingly, went little house card 
inserted window, knew tapped door. 
 
old woman came opened it. 
 
"Good said "Is Dr. Bauerstein in?" 
 
stared me. 
 

 
what?" 
 
"About him." 
 
"What him?" 
 
"He's 
 

 
"No, took 
 
"By "Do mean they've arrested him?" 
 
"Yes, that's it, 
 
waited hear more, tore village find Poirot. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER ARREST 
 
 
extreme Poirot in, old Belgian 
answered knock informed believed gone London. 
 
earth could Poirot 
sudden decision part, already made mind 
parted hours 
 
steps Styles Poirot away, 
uncertain act. not, 
probability, cause it? questions could 
meantime do? announce arrest 
openly Styles, not? Though acknowledge myself, 
thought Mary Cavendish weighing me. Would terrible 
shock her? moment, set aside utterly suspicions her. 
could heard hint 
it. 
 
course, possibility able permanently 
conceal Dr. Bauerstein's arrest her. would announced every 
newspaper Still, shrank out. 
Poirot could asked 
possessed go London way? 
 
spite myself, opinion 
would never suspecting 
Poirot put head. Yes, decidedly, little man 
 
decided take John confidence, 
leave make matter public not, thought fit. 
 
gave vent prodigious news. 
 
"Great right, then. couldn't believe time." 
 
"No, astonishing get used idea, see 
makes everything fit in. Now, do? course, 
generally known 
 
John reflected. 
 
"Never said last, "we won't say anything present. 
say, known soon 
 
intense surprise, getting early next morning, 
eagerly opening newspapers, word 
column mere "The Styles Poisoning 
nothing further. rather supposed that, 
reason other, Japp wished keep papers. 
worried little, suggested possibility 
might arrests come. 
 
breakfast, decided go village, see Poirot 
returned but, could start, well-known face 
one windows, well-known voice said: 
 
mon 
 
"Poirot," exclaimed, relief, seizing hands, 
dragged room. "I never glad see 
said nothing anybody John. right?" 
 
"My friend," replied Poirot, "I know talking 
 
"Dr. Bauerstein's arrest, course," answered impatiently. 
 
"Is Bauerstein arrested, then?" 
 
"Did know it?" 
 
"Not least world." But, moment, "Still, 
surprise me. all, four miles 

 
"The asked, puzzled. "What got it?" 
 
Poirot shrugged shoulders. 
 

 
"Not me. doubt cannot see 
proximity coast got murder Mrs. 
Inglethorp." 
 
"Nothing all, course," replied Poirot, smiling. "But 
speaking arrest Dr. 
 
"Well, arrested murder Mrs. 
 
"What?" cried Poirot, apparently lively "Dr. Bauerstein 
arrested murder Mrs. Inglethorp?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
would good told that, 

 
"Well, one exactly told me," "But 
 
"Oh, yes, mon 
 

 

 
"Not poisoning Mrs. Inglethorp?" 
 
"Not unless friend Japp taken leave replied 
Poirot 
 
thought thought too?" 
 
Poirot gave one conveyed wondering full 
sense utter absurdity idea. 
 
"Do mean asked, slowly new idea, 
"that Dr. Bauerstein 
 
Poirot nodded. 
 
"Have never suspected it?" 
 
"It never entered 
 
"It strike peculiar famous London doctor 
bury little village like this, habit 
walking hours night, fully 
 
"No," "I never thought thing." 
 
"He is, course, German said Poirot thoughtfully, 
practiced long country nobody thinks 
anything naturalized fifteen years ago. 
clever course." 
 
"The cried indignantly. 
 
"Not all. is, contrary, Think stands 
lose. admire man myself." 
 
could look Poirot's philosophical way. 
 
"And man Mrs. Cavendish 
cried indignantly. 
 
"Yes. fancy found remarked Poirot. "So 
long names together, 
doctor's passed 
 
"Then think never really cared her?" asked 
perhaps, circumstances. 
 
course, cannot say, tell private 
opinion, 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Well, this: Mrs. Cavendish care, never 
cared one little Dr. 
 
"Do really think so?" could disguise pleasure. 
 
"I quite sure it. tell 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"Because cares one else, mon 
 
"Oh!" mean? spite myself, agreeable spread 
me. vain man women concerned, remembered 
certain lightly thought time, perhaps, 
certainly seemed 
 
pleasing thoughts interrupted sudden entrance Miss 
Howard. glanced round hastily make sure one else 
room, quickly produced old sheet brown paper. 
handed Poirot, words: 
 
"On top hurriedly left room. 
 
Poirot sheet paper uttered exclamation 
satisfaction. spread table. 
 
"Come here, Hastings. tell me, 
 
medium sheet paper, rather though 
time. attracting Poirot's 
attention. bore printed stamp Messrs. 
well-known addressed 
Cavendish, Esq., Styles Court, Styles St. Mary, 

 
"It might might said, studying thing 
minute two. "It certainly isn't 
 
replied Poirot, paper again. also, 
way thinking. depend upon it!" 
 
"Where come asked curiously. "Is 
 
so. mine. deduced 
existence, set Miss Howard search it, and, see, 

 
"What mean top 
 
"She replied Poirot promptly, "that found top 

 
"A funny place piece brown 
 
"Not all. top excellent place brown paper 
kept myself. Neatly 
nothing 
 
"Poirot," asked earnestly, "have made mind 

 
say, believe know 
 
"Ah!" 
 
proof beyond 
sudden energy, caught arm, 
hall, calling French Dorcas, 
Mademoiselle Dorcas, un moment, 
 
Dorcas, quite came 
 
"My good Dorcas, little prove 
justified, magnificent Tell me, Monday, Tuesday, 
Dorcas, Monday, day anything go wrong 
Mrs. Inglethorp's 
 
Dorcas looked surprised. 
 
"Yes, sir, mention it, though don't know 
came hear it. such, must wire 
through. man came put right Tuesday morning." 
 
long drawn exclamation Poirot led way back 

 
"See you, one ask outside reason 
enough. flesh weak, consolation find one 
right Ah, friend, like giant 

 
And, truth, run did, 
stretch outside long window. 
 
"What remarkable little friend asked voice behind me, 
turned find Mary Cavendish smiled, 
I. "What about?" 
 
can't tell you. asked Dorcas question bell, 
appeared delighted answer 

 
Mary laughed. 
 
"How He's going Isn't coming back 

 
"I don't know. I've given trying guess he'll 
 
"Is quite Mr. 
 
"I honestly don't know. Sometimes, feel sure mad 
then, find method 

 
"I see." 
 
spite Mary looking thoughtful morning. 
seemed grave, almost 
 
occurred would good opportunity 
subject Cynthia. began rather thought, 
gone far stopped 
 
"You excellent doubt, Mr. Hastings, 
case talents quite thrown away. Cynthia run risk 
me." 
 
began hoped hadn't 
stopped me, words unexpected quite drove 
Cynthia, mind. 
 
"Mr. said, "do think husband happy 

 
considerably taken murmured something it's 
business think anything sort. 
 
"Well," said quietly, "whether business not, 
tell _not_ 
 
said nothing, saw finished. 
 
began slowly, walking room, head little 
figure swaying gently 
stopped suddenly, looked me. 
 
"You don't know anything me, you?" asked. "Where come 
from, married fact? Well, 
tell you. make father you. kind, 
sure 
 
Somehow, quite might been. remembered 
Cynthia begun much way. Besides, 
father role 
young man. 
 
"My father said Mrs. Cavendish, "but mother 

 
said, "now 
 
what?" 
 
"A hint something always 
you." 
 
"My mother beautiful, believe. don't know, never 
saw her. died quite little child. believe 
tragedy connected took 
sleeping draught mistake. However may be, father 
Shortly afterwards, went Consular Service. 
Everywhere went, went him. twenty-three, 
nearly world. splendid loved it." 
 
smile face, head thrown back. seemed 
living memory old glad days. 
 
"Then father died. left badly off. go live 
old "You understand 
say deadly life girl brought 
been. deadly it, almost drove 
paused minute, added different "And met John 

 
"Yes?" 
 
"You imagine that, point view, good 
match me. honestly say fact weighed 
me. No, simply way escape 

 
said nothing, moment, went on: 
 
"Don't misunderstand me. quite honest him. told him, 
true, liked much, hoped come like 
more, way world calls 
him. declared satisfied him, 
 
waited long time, little frown gathered forehead. 
seemed looking back earnestly past days. 
 
"I cared first. suppose 
well Almost once, drifted pleasing 
thing pride, must 
made murmur went "Oh, yes, 
matters we've come parting 

 
"What mean?" 
 
answered 
 
"I mean going remain 
 
"You John going live here?" 
 
"John may live here, shall not." 
 
"You going leave him?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
"But why?" 
 
paused long time, said 
 
want 
 
And, spoke, sudden vision broad tracts 
freedom would 
mean nature Mary Cavendish. seemed see 
moment was, proud wild creature, civilization 
little cry broke 
 
"You don't know, don't know, hateful place prison 
me!" 
 
"I said, don't anything 
 
"Oh, voice 
 
suddenly said thing could tongue 
 
"You know Dr. Bauerstein 
 
instant passed like mask face, 
expression. 
 
"John kind break morning." 
 
"Well, think?" asked 
 
"Of what?" 
 
"Of 
 
"What think? Apparently German 
told 
 
face voice absolutely cold 
care, not? 
 
moved away step two, one flower 
 
"These quite dead. must again. Would mind 
you, Mr. walked quietly past 
window, cool little 
 
No, surely could care Bauerstein. woman could act 
part 
 
Poirot make appearance following morning, 
sign Scotland Yard men. 
 
But, arrived new piece rather 
lack evidence. tried trace fourth letter, 
Mrs. Inglethorp written evening preceding death. 
efforts abandoned matter, hoping 
might turn one day. 
shape communication, arrived second post 
firm French music acknowledging Mrs. Inglethorp's 
unable trace certain series Russian 
last hope means Mrs. 
Inglethorp's correspondence fatal evening, 
 
tea, strolled tell Poirot new 
found, out. 
 
London 
 
"Oh, no, taken train see 
young lady's 
 
"I told Wednesday one day 
wasn't Well, tell look us to-morrow morning, you?" 
 

 
But, following day, sign Poirot. getting 
really treating us fashion. 
 
Lawrence drew aside, asked going 
see him. 
 
"No, don't think come wants see us." 
 
"Oh!" Lawrence looked Something unusually nervous 
excited manner roused curiosity. 
 
"What it?" asked. "I could go there's anything 
 
"It's nothing much, going, tell 
dropped voice think I've found extra 

 
almost forgotten enigmatical message 
curiosity aroused 
 
Lawrence would say more, decided would descend 
high horse, seek Poirot Leastways 
 
time received smile. Monsieur Poirot Would 
accordingly. 
 
Poirot sitting table, head buried hands. sprang 

 
"What it?" asked "You ill, 
 
"No, no, ill. decide affair great 
 
"Whether catch criminal not?" asked 
 
But, great surprise, Poirot nodded gravely. 
 
speak great Shakespeare says, 

 
trouble correct 
 
"You serious, Poirot?" 
 
"I serious. serious things 

 
"And is?" 
 
"A woman's mon said gravely. 
 
quite know say. 
 
"The moment said Poirot thoughtfully, "and know 
do. For, see you, big stake one I, 
Hercule Poirot, would attempt it!" tapped 

 
minutes respectfully, effect, 
gave Lawrence's message. 
 
cried. "So found extra good. 
intelligence would Monsieur 
Lawrence 
 
think highly Lawrence's 
contradict Poirot, gently took task 
instructions Cynthia's days off. 
 
"It true. head However, young 
lady kind. sorry showed 
everything kindest way." 
 
"Oh, well, that's right, then, must go tea Cynthia 
another day." 
 
told letter. 
 
"I sorry that," said. "I always hopes letter. 
no, be. affair must 
tapped forehead. "These little grey 
say here." Then, suddenly, asked: "Are judge 

 
"No," said, rather "I know two 
alike, that's far science 
 
"Exactly." 
 
unlocked little took photographs laid 
table. 
 
"I numbered them, 1, 2, 3. describe me?" 
 
studied proofs 
 
"All greatly see. No. 1, say, man's 
thumb first No. 2 much 
quite different every way. No. paused 
seem lot confused here, 
No. 
 

 
"Yes." 
 
"You recognize beyond 
 
"Oh, 
 
Poirot nodded, gently taking photographs locked 
again. 
 
"I said, "that usual, going 
 
"On contrary. No. 1 Monsieur Lawrence. No. 
2 Mademoiselle Cynthia. important. merely 
obtained No. 3 little 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"It is, see, highly may noticed sort 
extending across picture. describe 
special etc., 
well-known process means obtain 
photograph object short space 
time. Well, friend, seen remains 
tell particular object 
 
"Go really 
 
No. 3 represents highly surface tiny 
bottle top poison Red Cross 
Hospital sounds like house 
 
"Good exclaimed. "But Lawrence Cavendish's 
it? never went near poison day 

 
"Oh, yes, 
 
together whole time." 
 
Poirot shook head. 
 
"No, friend, moment together. 
moment could together, would 
necessary call Monsieur Lawrence come join 

 
"I'd forgotten that," "But 
 
"Long 
 
"Long enough what?" 
 
Poirot's smile became rather 
 
"Long enough gentleman studied medicine 
natural interest 
 
eyes Poirot's pleasantly got 
little watched 
 
"Poirot," said, "what particular little 
 
Poirot looked window. 
 
said, shoulder, continuing 

 
"Good said quite quietly. surprised. 
expected answer. 
 
"They use pure strychnine 
occasionally official Strychnine 
used 
remained since 
 
"How manage take 
 
"I dropped hat explained Poirot 
permitted hour, so, spite many 
Mademoiselle Cynthia's colleague go fetch 
me." 
 
"Then knew going 
 
"No, all. merely realized possible, 
story, Monsieur Lawrence go poison 
possibility 
 
"Poirot," said, "your deceive me. 
important 
 
"I know," said Poirot. "But one thing strike me. doubt 
struck too." 
 
"What that?" 
 
"Why, altogether much strychnine case. 
third time run it. strychnine Mrs. 
Inglethorp's strychnine sold across 
Styles St. Mary strychnine, one 
and, know, like 

 
could reply, one opened door 
stuck head in. 
 
"There lady below, asking Mr 
 
"A 
 
jumped up. Poirot followed narrow stairs. Mary Cavendish 
standing 
 
"I old woman "and 
Lawrence told Monsieur Poirot thought would call 
you." 
 
said Poirot, "I thought come honour 

 
"I day, ask me," promised him, smiling. 
 
"That well. need father 
started ever Poirot always 

 
stared minutes, though seeking read 
deeper meaning words. turned away. 
 
walk back us too, Monsieur Poirot?" 
 

 
way Styles, Mary talked fast struck 
way nervous Poirot's eyes. 
 
weather sharp wind almost 
Mary little, black 
coat wind trees made like 
great giant 
 
walked great door Styles, knowledge came 
us something wrong. 
 
Dorcas came running meet us. crying 
hands. aware servants together background, 
eyes ears. 
 
"Oh, Oh, don't know tell 
 
"What it, asked impatiently. "Tell us once." 
 
"It's wicked They've arrested arrested 
Mr. 
 

 
saw strange look come eyes. 
 
"No, sir. Mr. 
 
Behind me, wild Mary Cavendish fell heavily me, 
turned catch met quiet triumph Poirot's eyes. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER CASE PROSECUTION 
 
 
trial John Cavendish murder took place 
two months later. 
 
intervening weeks say little, admiration 
sympathy went Mary Cavendish. ranged 
side, mere idea 
fought 
 
expressed admiration Poirot, nodded thoughtfully. 
 
"Yes, women show best 
brings them. pride 
jealousy 
 

 
"Yes. realized unusually jealous 
saying, pride jealousy laid aside. thinks 
nothing husband, terrible fate hanging 
him." 
 
spoke looked earnestly, remembering 
last afternoon, whether speak. 
"a woman's felt glad 
decision taken hands. 
 
now," said, "I hardly believe it. see, 
last minute, thought 
 
Poirot 
 
"I know 
 
"But old friend 
 
murderer probably old friend," observed Poirot 
"You cannot mix sentiment 
 
"I must say think might given 
 
mon ami, so, _was_ old 
friend." 
 
rather this, remembering busily passed 
John believed Poirot's views concerning Bauerstein. 
He, way, charge brought him. 
Nevertheless, although clever time, 
charge could brought home him, wings 
pretty well future. 
 
asked Poirot whether thought John would intense 
surprise, replied that, contrary, extremely likely 

 
"But, 
 
"Oh, friend, said along 
one thing know man quite another matter 
prove so. And, case, terribly little evidence. 
whole trouble. I, Hercule Poirot, know, lack last 
link unless find missing shook 
head gravely. 
 
"When first suspect John Cavendish?" asked, minute 
two. 
 
"Did suspect all?" 
 
"No, 
 
"Not fragment conversation overheard Mrs. 
Cavendish subsequent lack 

 
"No." 
 
"Did put two two together, reflect 
Alfred Inglethorp remember, 
denied must either Lawrence 
John. Now, Lawrence, Mary Cavendish's conduct 
if, hand, John, whole thing 
explained quite 
 
cried, light breaking upon me, "it John 
mother 
 
"Exactly." 
 
"And known 
 
Mrs. Cavendish's behaviour could explained 
way." 
 
"And yet say may 
 
Poirot shrugged shoulders. 
 
"Certainly do. police court proceedings, shall hear case 
probability advise 
reserve sprung upon us trial. 
way, word caution give you, friend. 
must appear case." 
 
"What?" 
 
"No. nothing it. found 
last link must remain behind Mrs. Cavendish 
must think working husband, him." 
 
"I say, that's playing bit low down," 
 
"Not all. deal clever man, 
must use means slip 
careful remain 
discoveries made Japp, Japp 
take called upon give evidence 
smiled probably witness 
 
could hardly believe ears. 
 
"It quite en continued Poirot. enough, give 
evidence one 
 

 
"The one relates destruction will. John Cavendish 
destroy 
 
Poirot true go details police 
court proceedings, involves many 
merely state John Cavendish reserved 
duly committed trial. 
 
September found us London. Mary took house 
Poirot included family party. 
 
given job War Office, able see 

 
weeks went by, state Poirot's grew worse worse. 
talked still hoped 
might remain so, happiness could Mary, John 

 
September 15th John Cavendish appeared Old 
charged "The Murder Emily 
"Not 
 
Sir Ernest famous K. C., engaged defend 
him. 
 
Mr. K. C., opened case 
 
murder, said, one. 
neither less deliberate poisoning fond 
trusting woman mother. 
Ever since supported him. wife lived 
Styles Court every surrounded care attention. 
kind generous 
 
proposed call witnesses show 
end financial also 
carrying certain Mrs. neighbouring 
wife. come taxed 
afternoon death, quarrel part 
previous day, prisoner purchased 
strychnine village chemist's wearing disguise means 
hoped throw crime upon another wit, 
Mrs. Inglethorp's husband, bitterly Luckily 
Mr. Inglethorp, able produce 
 
afternoon July continued immediately 
quarrel son, Mrs. Inglethorp made new will. 
found destroyed grate bedroom following morning, 
evidence come light showed drawn 
favour husband. Deceased already made 
favour marriage, Mr. expressive 
prisoner aware that. induced 
deceased make fresh will, old one still could 
say. old lady, might possibly forgotten 
former one; seemed may idea 
revoked marriage, conversation 
subject. Ladies always well legal 
had, year before, executed favour 
would call evidence show prisoner 
ultimately handed coffee fatal night. 
Later evening, sought admission room, 
occasion, doubt, found opportunity destroying 
which, far knew, would render one favour valid. 
 
prisoner arrested consequence discovery, 
room, Detective Inspector brilliant 
identical strychnine sold village 
chemist's supposed Mr. Inglethorp day 
would jury decide whether damning facts 
constituted overwhelming proof prisoner's 
 
And, jury decide, quite 
Mr. sat forehead. 
 
first witnesses prosecution mostly 
called medical evidence taken first. 
 
Sir Ernest famous England 
manner asked two 
questions. 
 
"I take it, Dr. Bauerstein, strychnine, acts 
 
"Yes." 
 
"And unable account delay 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Thank you." 
 
Mr. Mace handed Counsel sold 
"Mr. Inglethorp." admitted knew Mr. 
Inglethorp sight. never spoken him. witness 

 
Alfred Inglethorp called, denied purchased poison. 
also denied wife. Various witnesses testified 
accuracy 
 
evidence, taken, 
Dorcas called. 
 
Dorcas, faithful denied 
could John's voice heard, declared, 
teeth everything, Mr. Inglethorp 
boudoir rather smile passed across 
face prisoner knew well useless 
gallant was, since object defence deny 
point. Mrs. Cavendish, course, could called upon give 
evidence husband. 
 
various questions matters, Mr. asked: 
 
"In month June last, remember parcel arriving Mr. 
Lawrence Cavendish 
 
Dorcas shook head. 
 
"I don't remember, sir. may done, Mr. Lawrence away 
home part 
 
"In event parcel arriving whilst away, 
would done it?" 
 
"It would either put room sent him." 
 
"By you?" 
 
"No, sir, leave hall table. would Miss Howard 
would attend anything like that." 
 
Evelyn Howard called and, examined points, 
questioned 
 
"Don't remember. Lots come. Can't remember one special one." 
 
"You know sent Mr. Lawrence Cavendish 
whether put room?" 
 
"Don't think sent him. remembered 
was." 
 
parcel arrived addressed Mr. Lawrence Cavendish, 
afterwards remark 
 
"No, don't think so. think one taken charge it." 
 
"I believe, Miss Howard, found sheet brown 
held piece Poirot examined 
Styles. 
 
"Yes, 
 
"How come look it?" 
 
"The Belgian detective employed case asked search 
it." 
 
"Where discover it?" 
 
"On top 
 
"On top prisoner's 
 
believe so." 
 
"Did find 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Then must know found it?" 
 
"Yes, prisoner's 
 
"That 
 
assistant testified 
June 29th, supplied black beard Mr. L. Cavendish, 
ordered letter, postal order 
No, kept letter. transactions entered 
books. sent beard, Cavendish, Esq., 
Styles Court." 
 
Sir Ernest rose 
 
"Where letter written 
 
"From Styles Court." 
 
"The address sent 
 
"Yes." 
 
"And letter came there?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
Like beast fell upon him: 
 
"How know?" 
 
don't 
 
"How know letter came notice 

 

 
"Ah, _not_ notice yet affirm 
confidently came Styles. might, fact, 

 

 
"In fact, letter, though written stamped might 

 
witness admitted might case, Sir Ernest 
signified satisfied. 
 
Elizabeth second Styles, stated 
gone bed remembered bolted front door, instead 
leaving Mr. Inglethorp 
accordingly gone Hearing slight 
noise West wing, along passage, seen 
Mr. John Cavendish knocking Mrs. Inglethorp's door. 
 
Sir Ernest made short work her, 
contradicted Sir Ernest sat 
satisfied smile face. 
 
evidence candle grease floor, 
seeing prisoner take coffee boudoir, proceedings 
adjourned following day. 
 
went home, Mary Cavendish spoke bitterly 

 
"That hateful man! drawn around poor 
twisted every little fact made seem 
 
"Well," said "it way 
 
"Yes," said suddenly dropped voice. "Mr. 
Hastings, could 
no, could 
 
puzzled, soon alone Poirot asked 
thought Sir Ernest driving at. 
 
"Ah!" said Poirot "He clever man, Sir 
 
"Do think believes Lawrence 
 
"I think believes cares No, trying 
create confusion minds jury 
divided opinion brother it. 
make quite much evidence Lawrence 
sure 
 
Japp first witness called trial 
gave evidence relating 
earlier events, 
 
information received, Superintendent Summerhaye 
searched prisoner's room, temporary absence 
house. chest hidden beneath 
first, pair similar worn 
Mr. 
 
already recognized chemist's tiny 
bottle blue glass, containing white 

 
fresh piece evidence discovered detectives since police 
court proceedings long, almost new piece 
found Mrs. Inglethorp's book, reversed 
showed clearly words: . . die 
possessed leave beloved husband Alfred placed 
beyond question fact destroyed favour 
deceased lady's husband. Japp produced charred fragment 
paper recovered this, discovery 
beard completed evidence. 
 
Sir yet come. 
 
"What day searched prisoner's room?" 
 
24th 
 
week 
 
"Yes." 
 
"You found two objects, say, chest 
drawer 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Does strike unlikely man committed 
crime keep evidence unlocked drawer anyone 

 
"He might 
 
"But said whole week since crime. would 
ample time remove destroy them." 
 

 
"There perhaps it. Would he, would plenty 
time remove destroy them?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Was pile things hidden heavy 

 

 
"In words, winter prisoner 
would likely go 
 
"Perhaps not." 
 
answer question. Would week 
hot summer, likely go drawer containing winter 
Yes, 
 
"No." 
 
"In case, possible articles question might 
put third person, prisoner quite 
unaware 
 
"I think 
 
"But 
 
"Yes." 
 
"That all." 
 
evidence followed. Evidence financial difficulties 
prisoner found end July. Evidence 
Mrs. Mary, must bitter 
hearing woman Evelyn Howard right 
facts, though Alfred Inglethorp caused 
conclusion person 
 
Lawrence Cavendish put low voice, answer 
Mr. questions, denied ordered anything 
June. fact, June 29th, staying away, 

 
Sir chin forward. 
 
"You deny ordered black beard June 
 
"I do." 
 
"Ah! event anything happening brother, 
Styles 
 
question called flush Lawrence's pale face. 
judge gave vent faint murmur 
prisoner leant forward 
 
cared nothing 
 
question, please." 
 
"I said Lawrence quietly, "that 
 
"What mean brother children. 
it, wouldn't you?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Ah, that's said "And 
you'd good money too, wouldn't you?" 
 
Sir protested judge, "these questions 

 
Sir Ernest shot arrow 
 
"On Tuesday, 17th July, went, believe, another 
visit Red Cross Hospital 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Did happened alone 
poison examine 
 
done so." 
 
"I put so?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
Sir Ernest fairly shot next question him. 
 
"Did examine one bottle 
 
"No, think so." 
 
"Be careful, Mr. Cavendish. referring little bottle 

 
Lawrence turning 
 
sure 
 
"Then account fact left unmistakable 
impress it?" 
 
manner highly nervous 
 
suppose must taken 
 
"I suppose abstract contents 
 
"Certainly not." 
 
"Then take up?" 
 
"I studied doctor. things naturally interest me." 
 
"Ah! poisons you, they? Still, waited 
alone gratifying 
 
"That pure chance. others there, done 

 
"Still, others there?" 
 
"No, 
 
"In fact, whole afternoon, alone couple 
minutes, say, two 
minutes displayed 

 
Lawrence 
 

 
satisfied expressive Sir Ernest 
 
"I nothing ask you, Mr. 
 
bit caused great excitement court. 
heads many women present busily laid 
together, became loud judge 
threatened court cleared immediate silence. 
 
little evidence. hand-writing called 
upon opinion signature 
chemist's poison declared unanimously 
certainly gave view might 
prisoner admitted 
might prisoner's hand-writing 
 
Sir Ernest speech opening case defence 
long one, full force emphatic 
manner. said, course long experience, 
known charge murder rest evidence. 
entirely greater part practically 
Let take testimony heard 
strychnine found drawer prisoner's 
room. drawer unlocked one, pointed out, 
submitted evidence prove prisoner 
concealed poison there. was, fact, wicked 
malicious attempt part third person fix crime 
prosecution unable produce 
evidence support prisoner 
ordered black beard quarrel taken 
place prisoner freely admitted, 
financial embarrassments grossly 
 
learned Ernest nodded Mr. 
stated prisoner innocent man, would 
come forward inquest explain he, Mr. 
Inglethorp, thought 
facts actually occurred this. 
returning house Tuesday evening, 
told violent quarrel Mr. 
Mrs. Inglethorp. suspicion entered prisoner's head 
anyone could possibly mistaken voice Mr. 
Inglethorp. naturally concluded two 

 
prosecution Monday, July prisoner 
entered chemist's shop village, Mr. Inglethorp. 
contrary, time lonely spot called 
summoned note, 
terms, threatening reveal certain matters 
wife unless complied prisoner had, 
accordingly, gone appointed spot, waiting 
half hour returned home. met 
one way back could truth story, 
luckily kept note, would produced evidence. 
 
statement relating destruction will, 
prisoner formerly practiced perfectly well aware 
made favour year revoked 
would call evidence show 
destroy will, possible might open quite 
new view case. 
 
Finally, would point jury evidence 
people besides John Cavendish. would direct attention 
fact evidence Mr. Lawrence Cavendish quite 
strong, stronger brother. 
 
would call 
 
John well Sir 
skilful told tale well. note 
received handed jury 
readiness admitted financial difficulties, 
value 
 
close examination, paused, said: 
 
"I like make one thing clear. utterly reject 
Sir Ernest insinuations brother. brother, 
crime 
 
Sir Ernest merely smiled, noted sharp eye John's protest 
produced favourable impression jury. 
 
began. 
 
"I understand say never entered head 
witnesses inquest could possibly mistaken voice 
Mr. Inglethorp. 
 
"No, don't think so. told quarrel 
mother Mr. Inglethorp, never occurred 
really case." 
 
"Not servant Dorcas repeated certain 
must 
 
"I recognize them." 
 
"Your memory must unusually 
 
"No, and, think, said meant. 
paid little attention mother's actual 
 
Mr. triumph 
passed subject note. 
 
"You produced note Tell me, nothing 
familiar hand-writing it?" 
 
"Not know 
 
"Do think bears marked resemblance 

 
"No, think so." 
 
"I put 
 
"No." 
 
"I put that, anxious prove conceived idea 
rather incredible appointment, wrote note 
order bear 
 
"No." 
 
"Is fact that, time claim waiting 
solitary spot, really chemist's 
shop Styles St. Mary, purchased strychnine name 
Alfred Inglethorp?" 
 
"No, 
 
"I put that, wearing suit Mr. Inglethorp's clothes, 
black beard his, signed 
register 
 
"That absolutely 
 
"Then leave remarkable similarity hand-writing 
note, register, own, consideration 
said Mr. sat air man done 
duty, nevertheless deliberate 
 
this, growing late, case adjourned till Monday. 
 
Poirot, noticed, looking profoundly 
little frown eyes knew well. 
 
"What it, Poirot?" 
 
"Ah, mon ami, things going 
 
spite myself, heart gave relief. Evidently 
John Cavendish 
 
reached house, little friend waved aside Mary's offer 
tea. 
 
"No, thank you, mount room." 
 
followed him. Still went across desk took 
small patience drew chair table, 
and, utter began solemnly build card 
 
dropped said 
 
"No, mon ami, second steady 
all. employment requires precision 
precision fingers goes precision brain. never 
needed 
 
"What asked. 
 
great table, Poirot carefully built 

 
"It this, mon build card houses seven stories 
last link spoke 
you." 
 
could quite tell say, held peace, began 
slowly building again, speaking so. 
 
"It 

 
watched card house rising hands, story story. 
never hesitated really almost like 
trick. 
 
"What steady hand you've remarked. "I believe I've seen 
hand shake once." 
 
"On occasion without observed Poirot, 
great 
 
towering 
discovered lock Mrs. Inglethorp's 
bedroom stood 
things usual hand shook like 
must 
 
stopped suddenly. Poirot, uttering 
putting hands 
eyes swayed apparently suffering 

 
"Good cried. "What taken 

 
"No, no," "It 
 
"Oh!" exclaimed, much "One 
 
"Ah, no!" replied Poirot "This time idea 
friend, given me!" 
 
Suddenly arms, kissed 
recovered surprise ran room. 
 
Mary Cavendish entered moment. 
 
"What matter Monsieur rushed past crying out: 
'A love Heaven, direct And, 
could answer, dashed 
 
hurried window. True enough, was, 
street, turned Mary 
gesture despair. 
 
stopped policeman another minute. goes, round 

 
eyes stared one another. 
 
"What 
 
shook head. 
 
"I don't know. building card houses, suddenly said 
idea, rushed 
 
"Well," said Mary, "I expect back 
 
night fell, Poirot returned. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER LAST LINK 
 
 
POIROT'S abrupt departure us Sunday morning 
wore away, still three o'clock 
prolonged outside drove us window, see 
Poirot car, accompanied Japp 
little man absurd bowed 
exaggerated respect Mary Cavendish. 
 
permission hold little 
necessary every one 
 
Mary smiled 
 
"You know, Monsieur Poirot, every way." 
 
"You amiable, 
 
Still Poirot us bringing 
forward so. 
 
"Miss Mademoiselle Cynthia. Monsieur Lawrence. good 
Dorcas. must delay proceedings minutes 
Mr. Inglethorp sent 
 
Miss Howard rose immediately seat. 
 
"If man comes house, leave it!" 
 
"No, no!" Poirot went low voice. 
 
Finally Miss Howard consented return chair. minutes 
later Alfred Inglethorp entered room. 
 
company assembled, Poirot rose seat air 
popular bowed 
 
know, called Monsieur John 
Cavendish investigate case. examined bedroom 
deceased which, advice kept 
consequently exactly tragedy 
first, fragment green second, 
near window, still thirdly, empty box bromide 

 
"To take fragment green material first, found caught 
bolt door room adjoining one 
occupied Mademoiselle Cynthia. handed fragment 
police consider much importance. 
recognize piece torn green land 
 
little stir excitement. 
 
"Now one person Styles worked 
Cavendish. Therefore must Mrs. Cavendish entered 
room door Mademoiselle 
Cynthia's room." 
 
"But door bolted cried. 
 
"When examined room, yes. first place 
word it, since tried particular door 
reported confusion would ample 
opportunity shoot bolt took early opportunity 
begin with, fragment corresponds 
exactly tear Mrs. Cavendish's Also, 
Mrs. Cavendish declared heard, room, fall 
table bed. took early opportunity testing 
statement friend Monsieur left wing 
building, outside Mrs. Cavendish's door. myself, company 
went room, whilst I, 
apparently knocked table question, found 
that, expected, Monsieur heard sound all. 
confirmed belief Mrs. Cavendish speaking truth 
declared room time 
tragedy. fact, convinced that, far 
room, Mrs. Cavendish actually room 
alarm 
 
shot quick glance Mary. pale, smiling. 
 
"I proceeded reason Mrs. Cavendish 
room. say seeking something 
yet found it. Suddenly Mrs. Inglethorp seized 
arm, bed 
table, bell. Mrs. Cavendish, 
drops grease up, 
quickly Mademoiselle Cynthia's room, closing door 
behind her. passage, servants must 
find is. Already footsteps 
along two do? Quick 
thought, back young girl's room, 
shaking hastily aroused household come 
passage. busily Mrs. Inglethorp's door. 
occurs nobody Mrs. Cavendish arrived rest, 
find one saw come 
looked Mary Cavendish. right, 
 
bowed head. 
 
"Quite right, understand that, thought would 
husband good facts, would done so. 
seem bear upon question 

 
"In sense, correct, cleared mind many 
left free see facts true 

 
"The cried Lawrence. "Then you, Mary, destroyed 

 
shook head, Poirot shook also. 
 
"No," said quietly. "There one person could possibly 
destroyed Inglethorp 
 
exclaimed. "She made 

 
mon ami, Mrs. Inglethorp. Because, 
way account fact that, one days 
year, Mrs. Inglethorp ordered fire lighted room." 
 
gave never think fire 
Poirot 
 
"The temperature day, degrees 
Yet Mrs. Inglethorp ordered Why? wished destroy 
something, could think way. remember that, 
consequence War practiced Styles, waste paper 
thrown away. therefore means destroying thick document 
will. moment heard fire lighted Mrs. 
Inglethorp's room, conclusion destroy 
important will. discovery 
charred fragment grate surprise me. not, 
course, know time question made 
afternoon, admit that, learnt fact, fell 
came conclusion Mrs. Inglethorp's 
determination destroy arose direct consequence 
quarrel afternoon, therefore quarrel took 
place after, making will. 
 
know, wrong, forced abandon idea. 
faced problem new Now, 4 o'clock, Dorcas 
overheard mistress saying 'You need think 
fear scandal husband wife deter me." 
words 
husband, Mr. John Cavendish. 5 o'clock, hour 
later, uses almost words, standpoint different. 
admits Dorcas, 'I don't know do; scandal husband 
wife dreadful 4 o'clock 
completely mistress herself. 5 o'clock violent distress, 
speaks great 
 
matter drew one 
convinced correct. second spoke 
concerned 
 
"Let us 4 o'clock, Mrs. Inglethorp quarrels 
son, threatens denounce 
way, overheard greater part conversation. Mrs. 
Inglethorp, consequence conversation validity 
makes favour husband, two 
5 o'clock, Dorcas finds mistress state considerable 
slip Dorcas 
hand, orders fire room 
then, 4.30 5 o'clock, something occurred 
occasion complete revolution feeling, since anxious 
destroy will, make it. 

 
"As far know, quite alone Nobody 
entered left boudoir. occasioned sudden change 

 
"One guess, believe guess correct. Mrs. 
Inglethorp know this, later 
asked Dorcas bring some. opposite corner room 
stood anxious find 
and, according theory, tried keys 
one fitted know. therefore opened desk, 
searching came across something slip 
paper Dorcas saw hand, never meant 
Mrs. Inglethorp's eyes. hand, Mrs. Cavendish believed 
slip paper clung 
written proof demanded 
Mrs. Inglethorp assured her, quite truly, nothing 
matter. Mrs. Cavendish believe her. thought 
Mrs. Inglethorp Mrs. Cavendish 
resolute woman, and, behind mask 
jealous husband. determined get hold paper 
resolution chance came happened 
pick key Mrs. Inglethorp's despatch-case, 
lost morning. knew kept 
important papers particular case. 
 
"Mrs. Cavendish, therefore, made plans woman driven 
desperate jealousy could done. time evening 
door leading Mademoiselle Cynthia's room. Possibly 
applied found opened quite noiselessly 
tried it. put project early hours 
morning since servants accustomed hearing 
move room time. dressed completely land 
made way quietly Mademoiselle Cynthia's room 
Mrs. Inglethorp." 
 
paused moment, Cynthia 
 
"But anyone come room?" 
 
"Not 
 

 

 
"You addressed us 
noise next door Mademoiselle Cynthia admitted 
two Either sleep 
indeed artificial means. 
 
"With latter idea mind, examined 
carefully, remembering Mrs. Cavendish brought 
Mademoiselle Cynthia coffee night before. took sample 
result. counted cups 
carefully, event one removed. Six persons 
taken coffee, six cups duly found. confess 
mistaken. 
 
"Then discovered guilty grave 
Coffee brought seven persons, six, Dr. 
Bauerstein evening. changed face 
whole affair, one cup servants noticed 
nothing, since took coffee, brought 
seven knowing Mr. Inglethorp never drank it, whereas 
Dorcas, cleared away following morning, found six 
strictly speaking found five, sixth one 
found broken Mrs. Inglethorp's room. 
 
"I confident missing cup Mademoiselle Cynthia. 
additional reason belief fact 
cups found contained Mademoiselle Cynthia never took 
coffee. attention attracted story Annie 
tray coco took every night Mrs. 
Inglethorp's room. accordingly secured sample sent 

 
"But already done Dr. said Lawrence 
quickly. 
 
"Not exactly. asked report whether strychnine 
was, not, present. tested, did, 

 
"For 
 
"Yes. report. Mrs. Cavendish administered 
safe, Mrs. Inglethorp Mademoiselle 
Cynthia. possible 
Imagine feelings suddenly 
taken ill immediately word 
believed sleeping draught administered 
perfectly doubt one terrible moment 
must feared Mrs. Inglethorp's death lay door. 
seized influence 
quickly drops coffee-cup used Mademoiselle Cynthia 
large brass discovered later Monsieur 
Lawrence. remains coco dare many eyes 
upon her. Guess relief strychnine mentioned, 
discovers tragedy doing. 
 
"We able account symptoms strychnine poisoning 
long making appearance. taken 
strychnine delay action poison 
 
Poirot paused. Mary looked him, colour slowly rising 
face. 
 
"All said quite true, Monsieur Poirot. 
awful hour life. shall never forget it. wonderful. 
understand 
 
"What meant told could safely confess 
Poirot, would trust me." 
 
"I see everything now," said Lawrence. "The taken top 
poisoned coffee, amply accounts 
 
"Exactly. coffee not? come 
little difficulty here, since Mrs. Inglethorp never drank it." 
 
"What?" cry surprise 
 
"No. remember speaking Mrs. 
Inglethorp's peculiar points 
still strong coffee, 
found little 
happened plain me, two minutes placed 
little case table near window, table, up, 
upon floor precisely identical exactly 
way, Mrs. Inglethorp laid cup coffee 
reaching room night before, table played 
trick. 
 
"What happened next mere guess work part, say 
Mrs. Inglethorp picked broken cup placed table 
bed. Feeling need kind, heated 
drank there. faced new 
know coco contained coffee never 
Yet strychnine must administered seven 
nine o'clock evening. third medium medium 
suitable taste strychnine extraordinary 
one thought it?" Poirot looked round room, 
answered 
 
"Do mean murderer introduced strychnine 
cried. 
 
"There need introduce it. already 
strychnine killed Mrs. Inglethorp identical 
strychnine prescribed Dr. make clear you, 
read extract book found 
Red Cross Hospital 
 
 
     following become famous text 
      . . . . .  
      Bromide . . . . . . .                  
      . . . . . . . . . .                 
      
 
 
solution hours greater part strychnine 
salt bromide lady England 
lost life taking similar strychnine 
collected taking last dose swallowed 
nearly it!" 
 
"Now was, course, bromide Dr. 
remember mentioned empty box bromide 
One two introduced full bottle medicine 
would effectually precipitate strychnine, book 
cause taken last learn later 
person usually poured Mrs. Inglethorp's medicine always 
extremely careful shake leave 
bottom 
 
case, evidences tragedy 
intended take place Monday evening. day, Mrs. Inglethorp's 
bell wire neatly Monday evening Mademoiselle Cynthia 
night friends, Mrs. Inglethorp would 
quite alone right wing, completely shut help 
kind, would died, probability, medical aid could 
hurry time village 
Mrs. Inglethorp forgot take next 
day away home, 
actually taken twenty-four hours later anticipated 
owing delay final last 
link 
 
Amid breathless held three thin paper. 
 
"A letter 
little terms, possible Mrs. Inglethorp, warned 
time, would was, realized danger, 
manner it." 
 
silence, Poirot together paper and, 
clearing throat, read: 
 

 
'You anxious hearing nothing. 
to-night instead last night. understand. There's good 
time coming old woman dead way. one 
possibly bring home crime me. idea 
must 
false 
 
friends, letter off. Doubtless writer 
question 
know hand-writing 
 
almost broke silence. 
 
"You get it?" 
 
chair Poirot aside. quick movement 
part, fell 
 
said Poirot, "let introduce 
Mr. Alfred 
 
 
 
CHAPTER POIROT EXPLAINS 
 
 
old said, "I've half mind you! 
mean 
 
sitting Several days lay behind us. 
room below, John Mary together more, Alfred 
Inglethorp Miss Howard last, Poirot 
myself, could relieve still burning curiosity. 
 
Poirot answer moment, last said: 
 
"I deceive you, mon most, permitted deceive 

 
"Yes, why?" 
 
"Well, difficult explain. see, friend, nature 
countenance conceal 
feelings told ideas, first 
time saw Mr. Alfred Inglethorp gentleman would 
expressive then, 
chances catching him!" 
 
"I think give credit 
 
"My friend," Poirot, "I implore you, 
help extremely 
beautiful nature have, made 
 
"Well," little "I still think might 
given 
 
"But did, friend. Several would take them. Think 
now, ever say believed John Cavendish 
not, contrary, tell would almost certainly 

 
"Yes, 
 
"And immediately afterwards speak difficulty 
bringing murderer plain 
speaking two entirely different 
 
"No," said, "it plain me!" 
 
"Then continued Poirot, "at beginning, repeat 
several times didn't want Mr. Inglethorp arrested 
conveyed something you." 
 
"Do mean say suspected long ago that?" 
 
"Yes. begin with, whoever else might benefit Mrs. Inglethorp's 
death, husband would benefit getting away 
that. went Styles first day, 
idea crime committed, knew 
Mr. Inglethorp fancied would hard find anything 
connect it. arrived realized 
Mrs. Inglethorp burnt there, 
way, cannot friend, tried best force 
significance bedroom fire 
 
"Yes, said impatiently. "Go on." 
 
"Well, friend, say, views Mr. Inglethorp's 
much was, fact, much evidence 
inclined believe done it." 
 
"When change 
 
"When found efforts made clear him, 
efforts made get Then, discovered 
Inglethorp nothing Mrs. fact 
John Cavendish interested quite sure." 
 
"But why?" 
 
this. Inglethorp carrying 
Mrs. silence perfectly But, 
discovered known village John 
attracted pretty wife, silence bore quite 
different nonsense pretend 
afraid possible scandal could attach him. 
attitude gave furiously think, slowly forced 
conclusion Alfred Inglethorp wanted 
moment, equally determined 

 
minute. don't see wished 
 
mon ami, law country man 
never tried 
man See here, knew 
position bound conceived 
exceedingly clever idea preparing lot manufactured evidence 
himself. wished would produce 
safe 
 
"But still don't see managed prove yet go 
chemist's 
 
Poirot stared surprise. 
 
"Is poor yet realized 
Miss Howard went chemist's 
 
"Miss 
 
"But, easy her. 
good height, voice deep moreover, remember, 
Inglethorp distinct resemblance 
them, especially simplicity itself. 
clever 
 
"I still little exactly bromide business 
remarked. 
 
reconstruct far possible. inclined 
think Miss Howard master mind affair. remember 
father Possibly 
him, may taken idea one 
many books lying Mademoiselle Cynthia studying 
Anyway, familiar fact addition 
bromide mixture containing strychnine would cause 
latter. Probably idea came quite suddenly. Mrs. 
Inglethorp box bromide occasionally took 
night. could easier quietly dissolve one 
Mrs. Inglethorp's large bottle medicine 
came risk practically tragedy 
take place nearly later. anyone seen either 
touching forgotten time. 
Miss Howard departed 
house. lapse time, defeat suspicion. 
Yes, clever left alone, possible 
crime might never brought home them. 
satisfied. tried 
 
Poirot tiny eyes fixed 
 
"They arranged plan throw suspicion John Cavendish, buying 
strychnine village signing register 

 
"On Monday Mrs. Inglethorp take last dose 
Monday, therefore, six o'clock, Alfred Inglethorp 
seen number people spot far removed Miss 
Howard previously made bull story Mrs. 
account holding tongue afterwards. six o'clock, 
Miss Howard, Alfred Inglethorp, enters chemist's 
story strychnine, writes name 
Alfred Inglethorp John's previously 
studied carefully. 
 
"But, never John, too, prove writes 
takes 
spot exceedingly unlikely anyone see 
him. 
 
"So far, goes well. Miss Howard goes back Alfred 
Inglethorp returns Styles. nothing compromise 
way, since Miss Howard strychnine, which, 
all, wanted blind throw suspicion John Cavendish. 
 
"But Mrs. Inglethorp take medicine 
night. broken bell, Cynthia's Inglethorp 
makes 
 
"Mrs. Inglethorp out, write 
who, fears, may panic plan. 
probable Mrs. Inglethorp returned earlier expected. Caught 
act, somewhat hastily 
fears remains room may open again, 
Mrs. Inglethorp might catch sight letter could 
up. goes little 
Mrs. Inglethorp open desk, discover 
document. 
 
"But this, know, happened. Mrs. Inglethorp reads it, 
becomes aware husband Evelyn Howard, though, 
sentence warning 
mind. knows ignorant 
danger decides say nothing husband, 
writes asking come 
also determines destroy immediately made. 
keeps fatal 
 
"It discover letter, then, husband forced lock 

 
"Yes, enormous risk ran see fully realized 
importance. letter absolutely nothing 
connect 
 
"There's one thing can't make out, didn't destroy 
got hold it?" 
 
"Because dare take risk keeping 

 
"I don't 
 
"Look point view. discovered 
five short minutes could taken five 
minutes immediately arrival 
time Annie stairs, would seen anyone 
passed going right Figure enters 
room, door means one 
much 
keys nowhere seen. terrible blow him, 
means presence room cannot concealed 
sees clearly everything must risked sake 
damning piece evidence. Quickly, forces lock 
turns papers finds looking for. 
 
"But fresh dare keep piece paper 
him. may seen leaving may paper 
found him, certain Probably, minute, too, 
sounds Mr. Wells John leaving boudoir. 
must act quickly. hide terrible slip 
contents kept case, sure 
means destroying it; dare keep 
it. looks round, think, mon ami?" 
 
shook head. 
 
"In moment, torn letter long thin rolling 
hurriedly amongst 

 
uttered 
 
"No one would think looking Poirot "And 
able, come back destroy solitary piece 
evidence him." 
 
time, Mrs. Inglethorp's 
cried. 
 
Poirot nodded. 
 
"Yes, friend. discovered owe 
fortunate discovery you." 
 
"To me?" 
 
"Yes. remember telling hand shook 

 
"Yes, don't 
 
"No, know, friend, remembered earlier 
morning, together, 
objects And, already 
would need again, 
meantime, one else touched them." 
 
"Dear me," "so explanation extraordinary 
rushed Styles, found still there?" 
 
"Yes, race time." 
 
"But still can't understand Inglethorp fool leave 
plenty opportunity destroy it." 
 
"Ah, saw that." 
 

 
"Yes. remember taking household 
confidence 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Well, friend, saw one chance. sure 
Inglethorp criminal not, reasoned 
would paper him, would hidden somewhere, 
sympathy household could effectually prevent 
destroying it. already making 
matter public secured services ten 
would watching aware 
would dare seek destroy document. 
therefore forced depart house, leaving 

 
"But surely Miss Howard ample opportunities aiding him." 
 
"Yes, Miss Howard know existence. 
accordance plan, never spoke Alfred 
Inglethorp. supposed deadly enemies, John 
Cavendish safely convicted neither dared risk 
meeting. course watch kept Mr. Inglethorp, hoping 
sooner later would lead 
clever take paper safe since 
one thought looking first week, likely 
would afterwards. lucky might never 
able bring 
 
"I understand now; first begin suspect Miss 

 
"When discovered told lie inquest 
letter received Mrs. Inglethorp." 
 
"Why, lie about?" 
 
"You saw recall general 
 

 
"You then, Mrs. Inglethorp wrote 
hand, left large clear spaces words. look 
date top letter notice 
quite different see mean?" 
 
"No," "I 
 
"You see letter written 
day Miss Howard's written 
turn 
 
"But why?" 
 
"That exactly asked myself. Miss Howard suppress 
letter written produce one 
wish show letter Why, again? 
suspicion mind. remember saying 
wise beware people telling 
 
"And cried "after that, gave two reasons 
Miss Howard could committed 
 
"And good reasons too," replied Poirot. "For long time 
remembered significant 
Alfred Inglethorp could committed 
crime reasons 
And, then, rather 
hatred concealed opposite emotion. was, 
tie passion long came 
Styles. already arranged infamous 
marry rich, rather foolish old lady, induce make 
leaving money him, gain ends 
conceived crime. gone would probably 
left England, lived together poor money. 
 
"They suspicion 
directed him, would making quiet 
different 
possession. suspicion her. 
notice paid coming going house. 
strychnine John's room. puts beard 
see sooner later duly 
 
"I don't quite see tried fix blame remarked. 
"It would much easier bring crime home 

 
"Yes, mere chance. evidence arose 
pure must, fact, distinctly 
pair 
 
"His manner observed thoughtfully. 
 
"Yes. course, back that?" 
 
"No." 
 
"You understand believed Mademoiselle Cynthia guilty 

 
"No," exclaimed, 
 
"Not all. nearly idea. mind 
asked Mr. Wells first question will. 
bromide made up, clever male 
Dorcas us. really 
evidence anyone 
 
"You 
 
"No. Shall tell made Monsieur Lawrence turn pale 
first entered mother's room fatal because, 
whilst mother lay there, obviously saw, 
shoulder, door Mademoiselle Cynthia's room 
 
"But declared saw cried. 
 
said Poirot dryly. "And confirmed 
suspicion not. Mademoiselle 
 
"But her?" 
 
"Because love her." 
 
laughed. 
 
Poirot, quite happen know fact that, 
far love her, positively her." 
 
"Who told that, mon ami?" 
 

 

 
"She said mind all." 
 
"Then certainly mind much," remarked Poirot. "They like 

 
"What say Lawrence great surprise me," said. 
 
"But why? obvious. Monsieur Lawrence make 
face every time Mademoiselle Cynthia spoke laughed 
taken long head Mademoiselle Cynthia 
love Monsieur John. entered mother's room, saw 
obviously jumped conclusion Mademoiselle 
Cynthia knew something matter. nearly driven 
First coffee-cup feet, remembering 
gone mother night before, 
determined chance testing 
Thenceforward, quite upheld theory 
natural 
 
"And 
 
"I fairly certain Mrs. Cavendish hidden it, 
make sure. Monsieur Lawrence know 
but, reflection, came conclusion could find 
extra coffee-cup anywhere lady love would cleared suspicion. 
perfectly right." 
 
"One thing more. Mrs. Inglethorp mean dying 
 
"They were, course, 
 
"Dear me, Poirot," said "I think explained 
everything. glad ended Even John 
wife 
 
me." 
 
"How you?" 
 
"My dear friend, realize simply solely 
trial brought together again? John Cavendish still 
loved wife, Also, equally love 
him. drifted far arose 
married without love. knew it. 
sensitive man way, would force upon 
want him. And, love 
unusually proud, pride held drifted 
Mrs. deliberately cultivated 
friendship Dr. Bauerstein. remember day John 
Cavendish's arrest, found big 
 
"Yes, quite understood 
 
me, mon ami, understand 
trying decide whether would clear John Cavendish once. 
could cleared might meant failure 
real entirely dark real 
attitude last partly accounts 

 
"Do mean could saved John Cavendish brought 

 
"Yes, friend. decided favour 'a woman's 
Nothing great danger passed 
could brought two proud souls together again." 
 
looked Poirot silent little 
man! earth Poirot would thought trial murder 

 
"I perceive thoughts, mon said Poirot, smiling me. "No one 
Hercule Poirot would attempted thing! wrong 
it. happiness one man one woman greatest 
thing world." 
 
words took back earlier events. remembered Mary lay 
white exhausted come 
sound bell below. started up. Poirot opened 
door, meeting agonized eyes nodded gently. "Yes, 
said. "I brought back you." stood aside, 
went seen look Mary's eyes, John Cavendish 
caught wife arms. 
 
"Perhaps right, Poirot," said gently. "Yes, greatest 
thing world." 
 
Suddenly, door, Cynthia in. 
 

 
"Come in," said, springing up. 
 
came in, sit down. 
 
wanted tell 
 
"Yes?" 
 
Cynthia little then, suddenly 
"You kissed first Poirot, rushed 
room again. 
 
"What earth mean?" asked, surprised. 
 
nice kissed Cynthia, 
rather pleasure. 
 
"It means discovered Monsieur Lawrence dislike 
much replied Poirot 
 

 
"Here is." 
 
Lawrence moment passed door. 
 
Monsieur called Poirot. "We must congratulate you, 
so?" 
 
Lawrence smiled man love sorry 
Cynthia looked 
 
sighed. 
 
"What it, mon ami?" 
 
said "They two delightful 
 
"And neither you?" finished Poirot. "Never mind. 
yourself, friend. may hunt together again, 

 
 
END 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECRET 
 

 
 
               LEAD 
               LIVES 
               HOPE MAY EXPERIENCE 
               SECOND HAND 
               DANGERS 
               
 
 
 
CONTENTS 
 
     
          Young Adventurers, 
         Mr. Whittington's Offer 
        Set Back 
         Jane Finn? 
     V      Mr. Julius P. Hersheimmer 
         Plan Campaign 
        House Soho 
       Adventures Tommy 
         Tuppence Enters Domestic Service 
     X      Enter Sir James Peel Edgerton 
         Julius Tells Story 
        Friend Need 
       
        Consultation 
         Tuppence Receives Proposal 
        Adventures Tommy 
       Annette 
      Telegram 
        Jane Finn 
         Late 
        Tommy Makes Discovery 
       Street 
      Race Time 
       Julius Takes Hand 
        Jane's Story 
       Mr. Brown 
      Supper Party 
     
 
 
 
 

 
2 p.m. afternoon May 7, Lusitania 
struck two succession rapidly, 
boats possible speed. women 
children turn. still clung 
others clutched children 
closely One girl stood alone, slightly apart 
rest. quite young, seem 
afraid, grave, eyes looked straight ahead. 
 
"I beg 
 
man's voice beside made start turn. noticed 
speaker amongst first-class 
hint mystery appealed imagination. 
spoke one. anyone spoke quick 
Also nervous way looking shoulder 
suspicious glance. 
 
noticed greatly 
evidently state 
fear. yet strike kind man would 
afraid meet 
 
"Yes?" grave eyes met 
 
stood looking kind desperate 
 
"It must muttered himself. way." 
aloud said "You 
 
"Yes." 
 
"A patriotic 
 
girl 
 
"I guess you've right ask thing! course 
 
"Don't wouldn't knew much 
I've got trust must 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Because children looked round lowered 
voice. "I'm carrying important papers. may make 
difference war. papers 
GOT They've chance me. 
take them?" 
 
girl held hand. 
 
must warn you. may I've followed. 
don't think have, one never knows. so, danger. 
nerve go it?" 
 
girl smiled. 
 
"I'll go right. I'm real proud 

 
I'll personal column 
Times, beginning end three days there's 
you'll know I'm out. take packet 
American deliver hands. 

 
"Quite 
 
"Then going say took hand his. 
Good luck you," said louder tone. 
 
hand closed oilskin packet 
 
Lusitania settled decided list answer 
quick command, girl went forward take place 
 
 
 
CHAPTER I. YOUNG ADVENTURERS, 
 
"TOMMY, old 
 
old 
 
two young people greeted 
Street Tube so. 
united ages would certainly 

 
"Not seen simply continued young man. "Where 
to? Come me. We're getting bit 
Let's get it." 
 
girl started walking Street towards 

 
"Now then," said Tommy, "where shall 
 
faint anxiety tone escape 
ears Miss Prudence known intimate friends 
mysterious reason once. 
 
"Tommy, you're 
 
"Not bit it," declared Tommy 
 
"You always said Tuppence 
persuade Sister doctor ordered 
forgotten write 
 
Tommy 
 
"I think Wasn't old rage found 
bad sort really, old Mother Good old 
like everything else, suppose?" 
 
Tuppence sighed. 
 
"Yes. too?" 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
months 
 
hinted Tuppence. 
 

 
"Oh, 
 
"No, old thing, cost 
plain, garden living is, assure you, 

 
"My dear interrupted Tuppence, "there nothing know 
cost living. us 
pay own. That's it!" Tuppence led way upstairs. 
 
place full, wandered looking table, 
catching ends conversation so. 
 
know, sat CRIED told couldn't 
flat all." "It simply BARGAIN, like 
one brought 
 
one murmured Tommy. "I passed two 
street to-day talking one called Jane Finn. 
ever hear name?" 
 
moment two elderly ladies rose collected 
Tuppence one 
 
Tommy ordered tea Tuppence ordered tea 
 
"And mind tea comes separate added 
 
Tommy sat opposite her. head revealed shock 
red hair. face pleasantly 
yet face gentleman 
brown suit well near end 

 
essentially couple sat there. 
Tuppence claim beauty, character charm 
lines little face, determined chin large, 
grey eyes looked black 
wore small bright green black hair, 
extremely short rather shabby revealed pair 
appearance presented attempt 

 
tea came last, Tuppence, fit 
poured out. 
 
"Now then," said Tommy, taking large "let's get 
Remember, haven't seen since time hospital 

 
"Very well." Tuppence helped liberally 
Miss Prudence fifth daughter 
Cowley Little Miss Cowley left 
(and home life early war came 
London, entered First month: 
six hundred forty-eight every day. Second month: Promoted 
aforesaid Third month: Promoted 
Fourth month: Promoted cutting bread Fifth month: 
Promoted one floor duties Sixth 
month: Promoted waiting table. Seventh month: Pleasing appearance 
nice striking promoted waiting 
Eighth month: Slight check career. Sister Bond ate Sister 
Grand clearly important 
matters cannot highly 
mighty Ninth month: Promoted sweeping 
found friend childhood Lieutenant Thomas Beresford 
seen five long years. meeting 
Tenth month: pictures 
company one namely: Lieutenant 
Thomas Beresford. Eleventh twelfth duties 
resumed entire success. end year left hospital 
that, Miss Cowley drove 
trade delivery last 
quite young 
 
"What that?" inquired Tommy. "Perfectly way 
brass hats drove War Office 
War 
 
"I've forgotten name now," confessed Tuppence. "To 
way career. next entered Government office. 
several tea parties. intended become 
land girl, way 
Armistice clung office 
true touch many long months, but, alas, 
last. Since I've looking job. 
 
"There's much said Tommy "and 
great deal less went France again, know. 
sent got wounded second time, 
went hospital there. got stuck Egypt till 
Armistice happened, kicked heels time longer, and, 
told you, finally got And, ten long, weary months I've 
job aren't And, were, 
wouldn't give 'em me. good know 

 
Tuppence nodded gloomily. 
 
"What 
 
Tommy shook head. 
 
"I shouldn't like I'm perfectly certain wouldn't 
like me!" 
 

 
Tommy shook head. 
 
"Oh, Tommy, even 
 
"I've got old uncle who's less he's 
 
"Why not?" 
 
adopt once. 
 
"I think remember hearing it," said Tuppence slowly. "You 
refused 
 
Tommy 
 
"Yes, would bit rough know, 
had. Old boy hated get away her. 
bit 
 
"Your mother's dead, isn't she?" said Tuppence gently. 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
Tuppence's large grey eyes looked 
 
"You're good sort, Tommy. always knew it." 
 
said Tommy "Well, that's position. I'm 

 
"So I've hung long could. I've round. I've 
answered I've tried every mortal blessed thing. I've 
saved it's good. shall go 

 
"Don't want to?" 
 
"Of course don't want What's good 
Father's awfully fond you've idea worry 
delightful early view short 
smoking imagine thorn flesh 
heaved sigh relief war took off. see, 
seven us home. It's 
always don't want go back, 
Tommy, else do?" 
 
Tommy shook head silence, Tuppence burst 
out: 
 
money, think money morning, 
dare say it's me, 
 
here," agreed Tommy feeling. 
 
"I've thought every imaginable way getting too," continued 
Tuppence. "There left it, marry it, make 
it. First ruled out. haven't got rich elderly 
homes always help old 
ladies pick old gentlemen, case 
turn one 
ever asked quite lot never said 
 
pause. 
 
"Of course," resumed Tuppence, best chance. made 
mind marry money quite thinking girl 
I'm know." paused. "Come now, can't say I'm 
added sharply. 
 
"Certainly not," agreed Tommy "No one would ever think 
sentiment connection you." 
 
"That's replied Tuppence. "But dare say mean 
right. Well, I'm ready never meet 
rich boys know hard 
 
"What inquired Tommy. 
 
"I fancy keeps bicycle shop time explained Tuppence. 
"No, could marry rich 
 
"I'm like you. don't know 
 
"That doesn't matter. always get know one. Now, see 
man coat come Ritz can't rush say: 
here, you're I'd like know 
 
"Do suggest 
 
"Don't tread pick 
something like that. thinks want know she's 
manage 
 
"You manly murmured Tommy. 
 
"On proceeded Tuppence, "my millionaire would probably 
run difficulties. 
MAKE 
 
"We've tried that, Tommy reminded her. 
 
"We've tried ways, yes. suppose try 
Tommy, let's 
 
replied Tommy cheerfully. "How 
 
"That's difficulty. could make known, people might 
hire us commit crimes them." 
 
commented Tommy. coming 

 
"The moral Tuppence pointed out, "would mine. 
must admit there's difference 
hired it." 
 
"There wouldn't least difference 
 
"Perhaps not. shouldn't I'm 
 
always remarked Tommy. 
 
"Don't Look here, Tommy, shall Shall form business 

 
company 
 
"That Let's call 

 
"Don't know. Never 
 
"I always got mixed up, used put credit 
side, vice fired out. Oh, 
joint struck phrase come across 
middle old It's got 
one think joint 
 
name Young Adventurers, 
idea, 
 
"It's well feel might something 
it." 
 
"How propose get touch 
 
replied Tuppence "Have got bit paper 
Men usually seem have. like 

 
Tommy handed rather shabby green Tuppence began 
writing 
 
"Shall officer, twice wounded 
 
"Certainly not." 
 
"Oh, well, dear boy. assure sort 
thing might touch heart elderly might adopt 
you, would need young 
all." 
 
"I don't want 
 
"I forgot prejudice it. you! 
papers full type thing. 
this? young adventurers Willing 
anything, go anywhere. Pay must might well make 
clear might reasonable offer 

 
"I think offer get answer would pretty 
UNreasonable 
 
You're That's ever much unreasonable 
offer pay How's that?" 
 
"I shouldn't mention pay again. looks rather 
 
"It couldn't look eager perhaps right. 
I'll read straight through. young adventurers Willing 
anything, go anywhere. Pay must good. unreasonable offer 
would strike read it?" 
 
"It would strike either else written 

 
"It's half insane thing read morning beginning 
signed tore handed 
Tommy. "There are. Times, think. Reply Box expect 
five Here's half 
 
Tommy holding paper thoughtfully. faced burned deeper 
 
"Shall really try it?" said last. "Shall we, 
fun 
 
"Tommy, you're knew would Let's drink 
poured cold tea two 
 
"Here's joint may 
 
"The Young Adventurers, responded Tommy. 
 
put cups laughed rather Tuppence rose. 
 
"I must return 
 
"Perhaps time strolled round agreed Tommy 
"Where shall 
 
o'clock to-morrow. Tube station. suit you?" 
 
"My time replied Mr. Beresford 
 
"So long, 
 
old thing." 
 
two young people went opposite directions. Tuppence's 
situated called Southern 
reasons economy take 
 
across St. James's Park, man's voice behind 
made start. 
 
me," said. "But may speak 
 
 
 
CHAPTER II. MR. WHITTINGTON'S OFFER 
 
TUPPENCE turned words hovering tip tongue 
remained man's appearance manner bear 
first natural hesitated. read 
thoughts, man said 
 
"I assure mean 
 
Tuppence believed him. Although 
inclined particular motive 
first attributed him. looked down. 
big man, clean heavy eyes small 
shifted glance direct 
 
"Well, it?" asked. 
 
man smiled. 
 
"I happened part conversation young 
gentleman 
 
it?" 
 
think may use you." 
 
Another inference forced Tuppence's 
 
"You followed here?" 
 
"I took 
 
"And way think could use me?" 
 
man took card pocket handed 
 
Tuppence took scrutinized carefully. bore 
"Mr. Edward name words 
address city office. Mr. Whittington spoke 
again: 
 
"If call upon to-morrow morning eleven o'clock, 
lay details proposition you." 
 
"At eleven said Tuppence doubtfully. 
 
"At eleven 
 
Tuppence made mind. 
 
"Very well. I'll there." 
 
"Thank you. Good 
 
raised hat walked away. Tuppence remained 
minutes him. gave curious movement 
shoulders, rather shakes himself. 
 
"The adventures murmured herself. "What want 
do, There's something you, Mr. Whittington, 
don't like all. But, hand, I'm least bit afraid 
you. I've said before, shall doubtless say again, little 
Tuppence look herself, thank 
 
short, sharp head walked briskly 
result however, turned aside direct 
route entered post office. pondered 
telegraph form hand. thought possible five 
spent unnecessarily action, decided risk 
waste 
 
pen black beneficent 
Government provided, Tuppence drew Tommy's pencil 
retained wrote "Don't put explain 
addressed Tommy one 
short month would unless kindly fortune permitted 
renew 
 
"It may catch him," murmured. it's worth 
 
handing set briskly home, 
buy three new 
 
Later, tiny top house 
reflected future. Co., 
earthly need could 
excitement made Tuppence rate, country 
again. held 
 
long time Tuppence went sleep night, and, 
length did, Mr. Whittington set 
pile bore 
resemblance hospital 
 
wanted five minutes eleven Tuppence reached 
offices Co. 
arrive time would look Tuppence 
decided walk end street back again. so. 
eleven plunged building. 
Co. top floor. 
Tuppence chose walk up. 
 
Slightly breath, came halt outside ground glass door 
painted across 
 
Tuppence response voice turned 
handle walked small rather dirty outer office. 
 
clerk got high desk near window 
came towards 
 
"I appointment Mr. said Tuppence. 
 
"Will come way, please." crossed door 
it, opened door stood aside let 
pass in. 
 
Mr. Whittington seated behind large desk covered papers. 
Tuppence felt previous judgment something wrong 
Mr. Whittington. combination prosperity 
eye 
 
looked nodded. 
 
"So you've turned right? That's good. Sit down, you?" 
 
Tuppence sat chair facing him. looked particularly small 
morning. sat eyes whilst 
Mr. Whittington amongst papers. Finally pushed 
away, leaned 
 
"Now, dear young lady, let us come business." large face 
smile. "You want work? Well, work offer 
you. say down, expenses Mr. 
Whittington leaned back chair, thrust 

 
Tuppence eyed 
 
"And nature demanded. 
 
pleasant all." 
 
"Where to?" 
 
Mr. Whittington smiled again. 
 

 
"Oh!" said Tuppence thoughtfully. said: "Of course, 
father heard would somehow don't see Mr. 
Whittington role gay 
 
"Yes," continued Whittington. "What could put 
clock back few, one 
charming de Paris 
 
Tuppence interrupted him. 
 
"A 
 
"Exactly. Avenue de 
 
Tuppence knew name well. Nothing could 
several American friends there. ever puzzled. 
 
"You want go 
 
"That Possibly three 
 
"And all? 
 
whatever. would, course, go character 
would hold communication friends. 
request absolute time way, 
English, not?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
speak slight American 
 
"My great hospital little American girl. dare say 
picked her. soon get again." 
 
"On contrary, might pass American. 
Details past life England might difficult 
Yes, think would decidedly better. 
 
"One moment, Mr. seem taking consent 

 
Whittington looked surprised. 
 
thinking assure 

terms 
 
said Tuppence. "That's it. terms almost 
Mr. Whittington. cannot see way worth 
amount money you." 
 
said Whittington softly. "Well, tell you. could doubtless 
obtain one else much willing pay 
young lady sufficient intelligence presence mind 
sustain part well, also one sufficient discretion 
ask many 
 
Tuppence smiled little. felt Whittington 
 
"There's another thing. far mention Mr. 
Beresford. come in?" 
 
"Mr. 
 
"My said Tuppence dignity. "You saw us together 

 
"Ah, yes. I'm afraid shan't require 
 
"Then it's Tuppence rose. "It's that's 
is. Good morning, Mr. 
 
minute. Let us see something can't Sit 
again, paused 
 
Tuppence's conscience gave passing remembered 
seized hurriedly first name came 
head. 
 
"Jane said paused 
effect two simple words. 
 
faded Whittington's face. purple 
stood forehead. behind 
sort leaned forward 

 
"So that's little it?" 
 
Tuppence, though utterly taken nevertheless kept head. 
meaning, naturally 
felt imperative end up" 
it. 
 
Whittington went on: 
 
playing me, you, time, like 
Knew time wanted for, kept 
it, eh?" down. red colour face. 
eyed "Who's 
 
Tuppence shook head. doubtful long could 
sustain realized importance 
unknown Rita it. 
 
"No," replied perfect truth. knows nothing me." 
 
eyes still bored like 
 
"How much know?" shot out. 
 
"Very little indeed," answered Tuppence, pleased note 
Whittington's uneasiness augmented instead 
knew lot might raised doubts mind. 
 
snarled Whittington, "you knew enough come 

 
"It might Tuppence pointed out. 
 
"It's isn't it, would two girls name like 
that?" 
 
might hit upon continued Tuppence, 
intoxicated success 
 
Mr. Whittington brought fist upon desk 
 
much know? much 
 
last five words took Tuppence's fancy especially 
breakfast supper night before. present part 
rather order, 
deny sat smiled air one 
situation thoroughly well hand. 
 
"My dear Mr. said, "let us means lay 
upon table. pray heard say yesterday 
proposed live seems 
proved live admit knowledge 
certain name, perhaps knowledge ends there." 
 
perhaps snarled Whittington. 
 
"You insist me," said Tuppence, gently. 
 
"As said said Whittington 
come point. can't play innocent me. know great 
deal you're willing 
 
Tuppence paused moment admire said 

 
"I shouldn't like contradict you, Mr. 
 
"So come usual 
 
Tuppence far Whittington 
complete success, mention impossible sum might 
idea flashed across brain. 
 
say little something down, fuller discussion 
matter 
 
Whittington gave ugly glance. 
 
eh?" 
 
Tuppence smiled 
 
no! Shall say payment services 
 
Whittington 
 
"You see," explained Tuppence still "I'm fond 

 
"You're that's Whittington, 
sort unwilling "You took right. Thought 
quite little enough brains 
 
Tuppence, "is full 
 
"All continued Whittington, "some one's say 
isn't Oh, come in." 
 
clerk followed discreet knock room, laid paper 

 
message come you, sir." 
 
Whittington read it. frown gathered 
 
do, Brown. go." 
 
clerk closing door behind him. Whittington turned 
Tuppence. 
 
"Come to-morrow time. I'm busy now. Here's fifty go 

 
rapidly notes, pushed across table 
Tuppence, stood up, obviously impatient go. 
 
girl counted notes manner, secured 
rose. 
 
"Good morning, Mr. said "At least, 
say." 
 
"Exactly. Whittington looked almost genial again, 
aroused Tuppence faint 
clever charming young 
 
Tuppence lightly stairs. wild possessed her. 
neighbouring clock showed time five minutes 
 
"Let's give Tommy murmured Tuppence, hailed 
 
drew outside tube station. Tommy within 
eyes opened extent hurried forward 
assist Tuppence smiled 
remarked slightly affected voice: 
 
thing, you, old I've got nothing smaller 

 
 
 
CHAPTER III. SET BACK 
 
moment quite triumphant ought been. 
begin with, resources Tommy's somewhat 
end lady 
still holding varied 
hand, prevailed upon move on, one last 
demand gentleman thought giving him? 
 
"I think you've given much, said Tuppence "I 
fancy wants give 
 
possibly remark induced driver move away. 
 
"Well," said Mr. Beresford, length able relieve feelings, 
"what want take taxi 
 
"I afraid might late keep said Tuppence 
gently. 
 
Oh, Lord, give up!" said Mr. 
Beresford. 
 
"And really continued Tuppence, opening eyes 
"I haven't got anything smaller 
 
"You part well, old 
fellow wasn't taken 
 
"No," said Tuppence thoughtfully, "he didn't believe it. That's 
curious part speaking truth. one believe it. found 
morning. let's go 
 
Tommy 
 
"How 
 
"On second thoughts, prefer It's shan't 
take another Come 
 
"Is new brain really 
inquired Tommy. 
 
"Your last supposition correct one. come money, 
shock much me! particular form mental 
trouble eminent recommends unlimited 
Let's go get 
 
old girl, really come you?" 
 
"Oh, Tuppence open "Look here, 
here, 
 
"Great dear girl, don't wave like that!" 
 
They're five times better 
one's ten times 
 
Tommy 
 
"I must drinking Tuppence, 
really behold large quantity notes waved 
dangerous 
 
so, O Now, come 
 
"I'll come anywhere. doing? Holding 
 
"All good time. awful place is. There's 
huge bearing us. would terrible killed 

 
room?" inquired Tommy, reached opposite 
safety. 
 
"The other's Tuppence. 
 
"That's mere wicked Come 
 
"Are sure get things want there?" 
 
"That extremely now? course 
much good you, 
 
"And tell me," said Tommy, unable restrain curiosity 
longer, sat state surrounded many 
Tuppence's 
 
Miss Cowley told him. 
 
"And curious part is," "that really invent 
name Jane didn't want give poor 
case get mixed anything 
 
"Perhaps that's so," said Tommy slowly. "But didn't invent it." 
 
"What?" 
 
"No. told you. Don't remember, said yesterday I'd 
overheard two people talking female called Jane Finn? That's 
brought name mind 
 
"So did. remember now. Tuppence 
silence. Suddenly aroused herself. 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"What like, two men 
 
Tommy frowned effort 
 
"One big fat sort Clean 
 
"That's him," cried Tuppence, "That's 
man 
 
"I can't remember. didn't notice really 
name caught 
 
"And people say don't Tuppence 

 
Tommy become serious. 
 
"Look here, Tuppence, old girl, going lead to?" 
 
replied 
 
"I know that. You've got one idea head. mean is, 
next going keep game up?" 
 
"Oh!" Tuppence laid "You're right, Tommy, bit 

 
"After all, know, can't bluff forever. You're sure slip 
sooner later. And, anyway, I'm sure isn't 
know." 
 
saying you'll tell unless given 
money. Now, there's nothing could tell, don't really know 

 
said Tommy doubtfully. "Well, anyway, going do? 
Whittington hurry get rid morning, next time 
he'll want know something parts money. He'll 
want know much know, got information from, 
lot things can't with. going 
it?" 
 
Tuppence frowned 
 
"We must think. Order coffee, Tommy. 
brain. Oh, lot 
 
"You made rather matter, 
flatter choice judicious yours. 
Two "One one 
 
Tuppence coffee deeply air, 
Tommy spoke her. 
 
"Be quiet. I'm 
 
said Tommy, silence. 
 
said Tuppence last. "I've got plan. Obviously we've 
got find all." 
 
Tommy 
 
"Don't find Whittington. must discover 
him, can't it, 
knows me, saw minute two 
He's likely recognize you. all, one young man much like 

 
"I repudiate remark I'm sure pleasing features 
distinguished appearance would single 
 
"My plan Tuppence went "I'll go alone to-morrow. 
I'll put like to-day. doesn't matter don't 
get money once. Fifty pounds ought last us 
 
even 
 
"You'll hang outside. come shan't speak 
case he's I'll take stand somewhere near, 
comes building I'll drop something, 

 
go 
 
him, course, think 
 
thing one reads books. somehow feel real 
life one feel bit standing street hours 
nothing do. People wonder I'm to." 
 
"Not city. Every one's Probably one even 
notice all." 
 
"That's second time you've made sort remark. Never mind, 
forgive you. Anyway, rather 

 
"Well," said Tuppence "I thought perhaps 
silk 
 
Tommy. "There's limit fifty 
let's dinner show to-night 
 

 
day passed evening even so. Two 
notes dead. 
 
met arrangement following morning proceeded 
Tommy remained opposite side road Tuppence plunged 
building. 
 
Tommy strolled slowly end street, back again. 
came building, Tuppence across 
road. 
 

 
"Yes. What's up?" 
 
"The place can't make anyone 
 
"That's 
 
it? Come me, let's try again." 
 
Tommy followed her. passed third floor landing young clerk 
came office. hesitated moment, addressed 
Tuppence. 
 
wanting 
 
"Yes, please." 
 
"It's closed down. Since yesterday afternoon. Company wound up, 
say. I've ever heard myself. office 

 
you," Tuppence. "I suppose don't know Mr. 
Whittington's 
 
left rather 
 
"Thank much," said Tommy. "Come on, Tuppence." 
 
descended street gazed one another 

 
"That's torn it," said Tommy length. 
 
"And never suspected it," Tuppence. 
 
up, old thing, can't 
 
"Can't it, Tuppence's little chin shot "Do 
think end? so, you're wrong. It's 
 
"The beginning what?" 
 
"Of Tommy, don't see, scared enough 
run away like this, shows must lot Jane Finn 
Well, we'll get bottom it. We'll run 
We'll 
 
"Yes, there's one left 
 
"No, that's we'll start again. Lend bit 
Thanks. Wait Tuppence handed 
back surveyed piece paper 
written satisfied 
 
"What's that?" 
 

 
"You're going put thing all?" 
 
"No, it's different one." handed slip paper. 
 
Tommy read words 
 
information respecting Jane Finn. Apply 
 
 
 
CHAPTER IV. JANE FINN? 
 
next day passed slowly. necessary 
Carefully forty pounds last long time. Luckily 
weather dictated Tuppence. 
picture house provided evening. 
 
day Thursday 
advertisement duly Friday letters might expected 
arrive Tommy's 
 
bound promise open letters 
repair National 
colleague would meet ten o'clock. 
 
Tuppence first red 
velvet seat, gazed eyes saw 
familiar figure enter room. 
 
"Well?" 
 
"Well," returned Mr. Beresford favourite 

 
"Don't Aren't 
 
Tommy shook head deep somewhat 
 
"I didn't want disappoint you, old thing, telling right off. 
It's bad. Good money sighed. "Still, is. 
advertisement two 
 
"Tommy, almost Tuppence. "Give me. 
could 
 
"Your language, Tuppence, They're particular 
National Government show, know. remember, 
pointed before, 
 
"I ought finished Tuppence 
 
"That intended say. sure 
enjoyed full reaction joy despair 
kindly provided free charge, let us get mail, 
saying 
 
Tuppence two precious 
scrutinized carefully. 
 
paper, one. looks We'll keep last 
open 
 
are. One, two, three, 
 
Tuppence's little thumb open 

 
 
"DEAR SIR, 
 
advertisement paper, may able 
use you. Perhaps could call see 
address eleven o'clock to-morrow morning. 
 
truly, 
 

 
 
said Tuppence, referring address. 
"That's Road way. Plenty time get 
 
"The said Tommy, "is plan campaign. turn 
assume presence Mr. Carter, 
wish good morning says: take 
seat, reply promptly 
Mr. Carter turns purple face 
out: usual fee fifty 
road proceed next address repeat 

 
"Don't absurd, Tommy. letter. Oh, 

 
"A hundred pounds instead 
 
"I'll read it: 
 
"DEAR SIR, 
 
glad would call round 
somewhere 
 
truly, 
 
P. 
 
 
said Tommy. "Do smell American millionaire 
unfortunate events we'll call It's 
good leads free food 
 
Tuppence nodded 
 
"Now Carter. We'll 
 
Terrace proved row Tuppence 
called looking rang bell No. 27, 
answered door. looked respectable Tuppence's 
heart Upon Tommy's request Mr. Carter, showed 
small study ground floor left them. Hardly minute 
however, door opened, tall man 
face tired manner entered room. 
 
"Mr. Y. said, smiled. smile distinctly 
"Do sit down, you." 
 
obeyed. took chair opposite Tuppence smiled 
something quality smile 
made girl's usual readiness desert her. 
 
seem inclined open conversation, Tuppence 
forced begin. 
 
"We wanted is, would kind tell us anything 
know Jane 
 
"Jane Finn? Mr. Carter appeared "Well, question is, 
know her?" 
 
Tuppence drew up. 
 
"I don't see that's got anything it." 
 
has, know, really smiled tired 
way, continued reflectively. "So brings us again. 
know Jane Finn? 
 
"Come now," continued, Tuppence remained silent. "You must know 
SOMETHING leaned forward little, 
weary voice held hint tell 
 
something magnetic Mr. Carter's personality. 
Tuppence seemed shake free effort, said: 
 
"We couldn't that, could we, 
 
surprise, companion back up. eyes 
fixed Mr. Carter, tone spoke held unusual note 

 
"I dare say little know won't good you, sir. 
is, you're welcome it." 
 
cried Tuppence surprise. 
 
Mr. Carter round chair. eyes asked question. 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"Yes, sir, recognized once. Saw France 
soon came room, 
 
Mr. Carter held hand. 
 
"No names, please. I'm known Mr. Carter here. It's house, 
way. She's willing lend sometimes it's case 
working strictly unofficial lines. Well, looked one 
going tell 
 
ahead, Tuppence," directed Tommy. "It's 
 
"Yes, little lady, it." 
 
Tuppence it, telling whole story 
forming Young Adventurers, 
 
Mr. Carter listened silence tired manner. 
passed hand across lips though hide 
smile. finished nodded gravely. 
 
"Not much. Quite you'll excuse saying 
so, you're curious young don't might succeed 
others believe 
 
paused moment, went on. 
 
"Well, it? You're would like 
work me? quite know. Expenses paid, 
moderate 
 
Tuppence gazed him, lips eyes growing wider 

 
"What do?" 
 
Mr. Carter smiled. 
 
"Just go you're now. FIND JANE 
 
"Yes, Jane 
 
Mr. Carter nodded gravely. 
 
"Yes, you're entitled know that, 
 
leaned back chair, crossed legs, brought 
fingers together, began low 
 
way, nearly always bad 
concern you. sufficient say early days 
certain document came draft secret 
like. drawn ready 
signature various representatives, drawn 
time neutral country. dispatched England special 
messenger selected purpose, young fellow called 
hoped whole affair kept secret nothing 
would out. kind hope usually disappointed. 
Somebody always 
 
England carried precious 
papers oilskin packet wore next 
particular Lusitania Danvers 
among list body 
beyond possible doubt. oilskin packet 

 
"The question was, taken him, 
passed another's incidents 
strengthened possibility latter theory. 
struck ship, moments 
Danvers seen speaking young American girl. one actually 
saw pass anything her, might done so. seems 
quite likely entrusted papers girl, believing 
she, woman, greater chance bringing safely 
 
"But so, girl, done 
later advice America seemed likely Danvers 
closely way over. girl 
she, turn, either 
forced handing precious 
 
"We set work trace out. proved 
name Jane Finn, duly appeared among list 
girl seemed vanished 
little help us. 
call teacher small 
school West. made Paris, 
going join staff offered services 
correspondence accepted. 
seen name list saved 
staff hospital naturally surprised arriving 
take hearing way. 
 
"Well, every effort made trace young vain. 
across nothing could heard 
set foot England. use made draft might 
easily therefore came conclusion 
Danvers had, all, destroyed it. war entered another 
diplomatic aspect changed accordingly, treaty never 
Rumours existence emphatically denied. 
disappearance Jane Finn forgotten whole affair lost 

 
Mr. Carter paused, Tuppence broke 
 
"But again? 
 
hint came Mr. Carter's manner. 
 
"Because seems papers destroyed all, 
might to-day new deadly 
 
Tuppence Mr. Carter nodded. 
 
"Yes, five years ago, draft treaty weapon 
to-day weapon us. gigantic 
terms made public, would mean might possibly 
bring another Germany extreme 
possibility, believe myself, 
document undoubtedly number statesmen cannot 
afford way present moment. party 
cry Labour would Labour Government 
juncture would, opinion, grave British trade, 
mere nothing REAL 
 
paused, said 
 
"You may perhaps heard read influence 
work behind present Labour 
 
Tuppence nodded. 
 
"That truth. gold country 
specific purpose Revolution. certain man, 
man whose real name unknown us, working dark 
behind Labour 
man BEHIND he? know. always 
spoken title one thing 
certain, master criminal age. marvellous 
organization. Peace war originated 
him. 
 
"A naturalized asked Tommy. 
 
"On contrary, every reason believe 
would seeks attain 
supreme power himself, kind unique 
history. clue real personality. reported 
even ignorant it. come across 
always played part. Somebody else assumes 
chief afterwards always find 
servant remained 
Mr. Brown escaped us more." 
 
"Oh!" Tuppence "I 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"I remember Mr. Whittington's office. called Brown. 
don't 
 
Carter nodded thoughtfully. 
 
"Very curious point name usually mentioned. 
describe all?" 
 
"I really didn't notice. quite like anyone 
 
Mr. Carter tired manner. 
 
"That description Mr. Brought telephone 
message man Whittington, he? Notice telephone outer 

 
Tuppence thought. 
 
"No, don't think 
 
"Exactly. Mr. Brown's way giving order 
overheard whole conversation course. 
Whittington handed money, told come 
following 
 
Tuppence nodded. 
 
"Yes, undoubtedly hand Mr. Mr. Carter paused. "Well, 
is, see Possibly 
finest criminal brain age. don't quite like it, know. 
You're young things, you. shouldn't like anything 
happen you." 
 
"It Tuppence assured 
 
"I'll look her, sir," said Tommy. 
 
"And I'll look YOU," retorted Tuppence, manly 

 
"Well, then, look said Mr. Carter, smiling. "Now 
let's get back business. There's something mysterious 
draft treaty haven't yet. We've threatened 
plain unmistakable terms. Revolutionary element good 
declare it's hands, intend produce 
given moment. hand, clearly fault 
many provisions. Government consider mere bluff 
part, and, rightly stuck policy 
absolute I'm sure. 
seem indicate menace real one. 
position much though got hold 
couldn't read know 
draft treaty wasn't nature 
won't there's SOMETHING. course, Jane Finn 
may dead don't think so. curious thing 
THEY'RE TRYING GET INFORMATION GIRL US." 
 
"What?" 
 
"Yes. One two little things up. story, little 
lady, idea. know we're looking Jane Finn. Well, 
they'll produce Jane Finn 
Tuppence Mr. Carter smiled. "No one knows least 
looks like, that's right. She's 
real business get much information possible 
us. See 
 
"Then paused supposition 
Jane Finn wanted go 
 
Mr. Carter smiled ever. 
 
"I believe know," said. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER V. MR. JULIUS P. HERSHEIMMER 
 
 
"WELL," said Tuppence, recovering herself, "it really seems though 
meant be." 
 
Carter nodded. 
 
"I know I'm myself. sort 
thing. Fate seems chosen mixed this." 
 
Tommy indulged 
 
"My don't wonder Whittington got wind Tuppence 
myself. look here, sir, we're 
taking awful lot time. give us 
clear out?" 
 
"I think not. working ways, failed. 
bring imagination open mind task. Don't 
succeed. one thing 

 
Tuppence frowned 
 
"When interview Whittington, time 
them. information big early 
new year. Government contemplating legislative action 
deal effectually strike They'll get wind 
soon, haven't it's possible may bring 
things head. hope myself. less time 
mature plans better. I'm warning haven't 
much time you, needn't cast fail. 
It's easy proposition anyway. That's all." 
 
Tuppence rose. 
 
"I think ought exactly count upon 
for, Mr. Mr. Carter's lips slightly, replied 
within reason, detailed information point, 
OFFICIAL RECOGNITION. mean get trouble 
can't officially help it. You're 

 
Tuppence nodded 
 
"I quite understand that. I'll write list things want 
know I've time think. 
 
"Yes, Miss Tuppence. want say 
 
"Not exactly. We've got plenty go present, 
want 
 
"It waiting you." 
 
"Yes, sure don't want rude Government 
you've got anything it, know one really devil 
time getting anything it! fill blue 
form send in, then, three months, send us green 
one, won't much use, it?" 
 
Mr. Carter laughed 
 
"Don't Miss Tuppence. send personal demand here, 
money, notes, shall sent return 
shall say rate three hundred equal sum 
Mr. Beresford, course." 
 
Tuppence upon him. 
 
"How kind. love I'll keep beautiful accounts 
expenses credit, balance right side, 
red line drawn sideways 
really know 
 
"I'm sure do. Well, good luck 
 
shook hands them, another minute descending 
steps Terrace heads 
 
Tell once, 
 
Tommy murmured name 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence, 
 
"And tell you, old he's IT!" 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence again. added 
 
"I like him, don't you? looks awfully tired yet 
feel he's like keen 
gave me, Tommy, me. can't believe it's 

 
Mr. Beresford 
 
That's Yes, we're We've got 
 
"And joint venture really 
 
"It's respectable thought would be," said Tuppence 
thoughtfully. 
 
haven't got time it? Let's 

 
thought sprang minds each. Tommy first. 
 
P. 
 
"We never told Mr. Carter hearing him." 
 
"Well, wasn't much till we've seen him. Come on, we'd 
better take 
 
"Now who's 
 
"All expenses paid, remember. in." 
 
"At rate, shall make better effect arriving way," said 
Tuppence, leaning back "I'm sure never arrive 

 
"We've ceased Tommy pointed out. 
 
"I'm sure said Tuppence 
 
inquiring Mr. Hersheimmer, taken 
impatient voice cried "Come answer 
stood aside let pass in. 
 
Mr. Julius P. Hersheimmer great deal younger either Tommy 
Tuppence him. girl put 
middle height, built match face 
one could mistaken anything 
American, though spoke little 
 
"Get Sit tell right away know 

 
"Your 
 
"Sure thing. Jane 
 
"Is 
 
"My father mother brother explained Mr. 
Hersheimmer 
 
"Oh!" cried Tuppence. "Then know is?" 
 
Mr. Hersheimmer brought fist table. 
"I'm darned Don't you?" 
 
"We receive information, give it," said Tuppence 

 
"I guess know that. read. thought maybe back 
history after, you'd know now?" 
 
"Well, wouldn't mind hearing back said Tuppence 

 
Mr. Hersheimmer seemed grow suddenly 
 
"See here," "This isn't demanding 
threatening crop ears British 
quit funny business, I'll sing beautiful big 
British policeman see 
 
Tommy explain. 
 
"We haven't contrary, we're trying find 
her. We're employed so." 
 
Mr. Hersheimmer leant back chair. 
 
said 
 
Tommy fell demand far gave guarded 
disappearance Jane Finn, possibility 
mixed "some political alluded 
Tuppence inquiry commissioned find 
her, added would therefore glad details Mr. 
Hersheimmer could give them. 
 
gentleman nodded approval. 
 
"I guess that's right. mite London gets 
know little old New York. questions 
I'll 
 
moment Young Adventurers, Tuppence, 
recovering herself, plunged boldly breach 
detective 
 
"When last see cousin, mean?" 
 
"Never seen responded Mr. Hersheimmer. 
 
"What?" demanded Tommy, 
 
Hersheimmer turned him. 
 
"No, sir. said before, father mother brother 
might correct view 
didn't always get together. aunt 
made mind marry Finn, poor school teacher 
West, father Said made seemed 
fair way do, she'd never see cent it. Well, 
Aunt Jane went West never heard again. 
 
"The old man pile up. went went 
played bit railroads, tell made Wall 
Street sit up!" paused. "Then got 
dollars. Well, would believe it, conscience got Kept 
knocking saying: Aunt Jane, way 
worried some. see, figured Finn would never 
make good. wasn't sort. End was, hired man hunt 
down. Result, dead, Finn dead, they'd left 
Lusitania way 
saved right, didn't seem able hear 
side. guessed weren't any, thought I'd 
come along over, speed things up. Scotland Yard 
first thing. rather off, Scotland 
Yard would make even sent man 
round morning get I'm Paris 
see doing. guess go 
them, ought get 
 
energy Mr. Hersheimmer bowed it. 
 
"But say now," "you're anything? 
court, something young American girl might 
find rules regulations war time rather get 
it. that's case, there's thing 
country, I'll buy off." 
 
Tuppence him. 
 
"That's good. work together. Shall 
here, go 
 
Tuppence expressed preference latter, Julius bowed 
decision. 
 
given place Sole card brought 
Hersheimmer. 
 
Japp, Scotland Yard again. Another man time. 
expect tell didn't tell first hope 
haven't lost Western place 
burned copy 
existence. got principal there." 
 
dread swept Tuppence. 
 
don't know name man came 
 
"Yes, do. No, Half second. Oh, 
Inspector Brown. Quiet, sort 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VI. PLAN CAMPAIGN 
 
might profit drawn events next 
say person known 
Scotland photograph Jane Finn, would 
utmost value police her, lost beyond 
"Mr. 
 
immediate result set back effect 
Julius Hersheimmer Young went 
Tommy Tuppence felt known young 
American lives. abandoned discreet 
inquiry revealed whole history 
joint young man declared 

 
turned Tuppence close 
 
"I've always kind idea English girls mite 
Old-fashioned know, scared move round 
without guess I'm bit behind 
 
confidential relations Tommy Tuppence 
took forthwith order, Tuppence put it, 
keep touch Jane living relation. "And put like 
that," added Tommy, could 

 
Nobody did, great thing. 
 
"And now," said young lady morning 
"to 
 
Mr. Beresford put Daily Mail, reading, 
somewhat unnecessary requested 
colleague 
 
all, Tommy, we've got something 
 
Tommy sighed. 
 
"Yes, fear even dear old Government support us 
Ritz 
 
said before, must 
 
"Well," said Tommy, Daily Mail again, "DO it. shan't 
stop you." 
 
"You see," continued Tuppence. "I've 
 
interrupted fresh applause. 
 
"It's well sit Tommy. would 
harm little brain work too." 
 
"My union, Tuppence, permit work 11 

 
"Tommy, want something thrown you? absolutely essential 
without delay map plan 
 

 
"Well, let's it." 
 
Tommy laid paper finally aside. "There's something simplicity 
truly great mind you, Tuppence. Fire ahead. I'm 
 
"To begin said Tuppence, "what go 
 
said Tommy 
 
Tuppence energetic "We two distinct 

 
"What they?" 
 
know one 
 

 
"Yes. I'd recognize 
 
said Tommy "I don't call much clue. 
don't know look him, it's thousand one 
running 
 
"I'm sure that," replied Tuppence thoughtfully. "I've often 
noticed start happening go happening 
extraordinary way. dare say it's natural law 
haven't found out. Still, say, can't rely that. 
places London simply every one bound turn sooner 
later. One ideas take 
stand every day tray 
 
"What inquired practical Tommy. 
 
"How like man! mere food 
 
"That's well. You've good 
one's got better appetite have, Tuppence, 
you'd all. But, honestly, don't think 
much idea. Whittington London all." 
 
"That's true. Anyway, think clue No. 2 
 
"Let's hear it." 
 
"It's nothing much. Christian Whittington mentioned 
day." 
 
"Are proposing third female 
answering name 
 
"I not. propose reason logical manner. man, 
way over, wasn't he? it's likely 
woman 
 
"I don't see all." 
 
"I absolutely certain would woman, 
one," replied Tuppence 
 
"On technical points bow murmured Mr. 
Beresford. 
 
"Now, obviously woman, whoever was, 
 
"How make out?" 
 
"If would known Jane Finn got 
 
Proceed, O 
 
"Now there's chance, admit it's chance, woman 
may 
 
"And so?" 
 
"If so, we've got hunt Lusitania till 
find her." 
 
"Then first thing get list 
 
"I've got it. wrote long list things wanted know, sent 
Mr. Carter. got reply morning, among things 
official statement saved 
How's clever little 
 
marks industry, great point is, 

 
"That's don't know," confessed Tuppence. 
 
"Don't know?" 
 
"Yes. Look here." Together bent "You see, 
Christian names given. They're nearly Mrs. 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"That murmured thoughtfully. 
 
Tuppence gave characteristic 
 
"Well, we've got get it, that's all. We'll start 
London note addresses 
live London put 
 
Five minutes later young couple emerged 
seconds later taxi bearing Road, 
residence Mrs. Edgar whose name figured first 
list seven Tommy's 
 
house, standing back road 
support front garden. Tommy paid 
accompanied Tuppence front door bell. 
ring it, arrested hand. 
 
"What going say?" 
 
"What going Why, shall don't know. It's 

 
"I thought much," said Tommy satisfaction. "How like 
stand aside, see easily mere male 
deals pressed bell. Tuppence withdrew 
suitable 
 
looking servant, extremely dirty face pair 
eyes answered door. 
 
Tommy produced notebook 
 
"Good morning," said briskly cheerfully. "From 
new Voting Mrs. Edgar lives here, 
not?" 
 
said 
 
name?" asked Tommy, pencil 
 

 
Tommy. sons 
 

 
"Thank you." Tommy closed notebook "Good 
morning." 
 
servant first 
 
"I thought perhaps you'd come observed 
shut door. 
 
Tommy rejoined 
 
"You see, Tuppence," observed. play 
 
"I don't mind admitting you've 
never thought that." 
 
"Good wasn't it? repeat 
 
found young couple 
obscure collected Mary 
one change address, forced 
listen long lecture universal suffrage American 
lady whose Christian name proved 
 
"Ah!" said Tommy, long draught "I feel better. 
next 
 
notebook lay table them. Tuppence picked up. 
 
"Mrs. read, South Audley Miss 
Road, She's lady's far remember, 
probably won't there, and, anyway, she's 
 
"Then lady clearly indicated first port 
 
"Tommy, I'm getting 
 
up, old always knew outside chance. And, 
anyway, we're draw blank London, there's 
fine England, Scotland us." 
 
said Tuppence, spirits "And expenses 
But, oh, Tommy, like things happen quickly. far, 
succeeded morning dull 

 
"You must Tuppence. Remember 
Mr. Brown reported be, it's wonder 
ere done us death. That's good sentence, quite literary 
it." 
 
"You're really less 
certainly queer Mr. Brown yet upon us. 
see, pass way 
 
"Perhaps doesn't think us worth suggested young 
man 
 
Tuppence received remark great 
 
"How are, Tommy. though didn't 
 
Tuppence. meant work like dark, 
suspicion 
 
echoed Tuppence rose. 
 
South Audley 
Park No. 20 second floor. 
 
Tommy time born practice. 
formula elderly woman, looking like 
servant, opened door him. 
 
name?" 
 

 
Tommy it, interrupted him. 
 
"No, 
 
"Oh, French way, see." paused, plunged "We 
Rita Vandemeyer, suppose that's 
 
"She's mostly called that, sir, 
 
"Thank you. That's all. Good morning." 
 
Hardly able contain Tommy hurried stairs. 
Tuppence waiting angle turn. 
 
"You 
 
"Yes. Oh, 
 
Tommy arm 
 
"I know, old thing. feel 
 
lovely think really 
cried Tuppence 
 
hand still reached entrance hall. 
footsteps stairs them, voices. 
 
Suddenly, Tommy's complete surprise, Tuppence dragged 
little space side lift shadow 
 
"What 
 

 
Two men came stairs passed 
Tuppence's hand closed Tommy's arm. 
 
them. might recognize me. don't know 
man is, two 
 
 
 
CHAPTER VII. HOUSE SOHO 
 
WHITTINGTON companion walking good pace. Tommy started 
pursuit once, time see turn corner 
street. vigorous soon enabled gain upon them, 
time he, turn, reached corner distance 
small streets comparatively 
judged wise content keeping 
sight. 
 
new one him. Though familiar 
course novel reading, never attempted 
appeared that, actual 
practice, proceeding difficulties. 
instance, suddenly hail books, simply 
another, promised driver modern 
actual fact, Tommy 
extremely likely would second Therefore 
would run. happened actual fact young man ran 
persistently London main road 
might hope create merely running 
obscure aristocratic could feel 
policeman might stop explain 
 
juncture thoughts taxi flag turned 
corner street ahead. Tommy held breath. Would hail it? 
 
drew sigh relief allowed pass 
course one designed bring quickly possible 
Street. length turned it, proceeding 
direction, Tommy slightly increased pace. Little little 
gained upon them. little chance 
attracting notice, anxious possible catch 
word two conversation. completely 
spoke low traffic drowned voices 

 
Bond Street Tube station crossed road, Tommy, 
faithfully entered big 
went first floor, sat small table 
window. late, place out. Tommy took seat 
table next them, sitting directly behind Whittington case 
recognition. hand, full view second man 
studied fair, weak, unpleasant face, 
Tommy put either Russian 
probably fifty years age, shoulders little 
eyes, small shifted 
 
already Tommy contented ordering 
cup coffee. Whittington ordered substantial 
lunch then, 
moved chair little table began talk earnestly 
low voice. man joined in. Listen would, Tommy could 
catch word there; seemed 
directions orders big man 
latter seemed time time 
Whittington addressed Boris. 
 
Tommy caught word several times, also 
Jane Finn mention. Suddenly, 
room, got one phrase Whittington speaking. "Ah, 
don't know She's would swear 
mother. gets voice right every time, that's 
really principal thing." 
 
Tommy hear reply, response Whittington said 
something sounded "Of 
 
lost again. presently became distinct 
whether two raised 
Tommy's ears getting could tell. 
two words certainly effect upon 
uttered Boris "Mr. 
 
Whittington seemed him, merely laughed. 
 
"Why not, name 
choose Ah, like meet 

 
ring Whittington's voice replied: 
 
"Who may met 
 
retorted other. "That children's 
know say 
invented us with. might so." 
 
"And might not." 
 
"I indeed true us amongst us, 
unknown chosen so, keeps secret well. 
idea good one, yes. never know. look 
US MR. also Among 
midst us. one knows 
 
effort Russian shook looked 
watch. 
 
"Yes," said Whittington. "We might well go." 
 
called asked bill. Tommy 
moments later following two men stairs. 
 
Whittington hailed directed driver go 

 
here, Whittington's driven 
another drawing obedience Tommy's 
hand. 
 
directed young man. "Don't lose it." 
 
elderly chauffeur showed interest. merely jerked 
flag. drive Tommy's taxi came rest 
departure platform Tommy behind 
took first-class single 
Tommy same. Boris glancing 
"You nearly half 
 
words aroused new train thought Tommy's mind. 
Clearly Whittington making journey alone, 
remained London. Therefore left choice 
would follow. could follow 
Boris, glanced announcement board 
train left ten past. 
Whittington Boris walking gave 
one doubtful look them, hurried adjacent telephone 
dared waste time trying get hold Tuppence. 
probability still neighbourhood South Audley 
remained another rang Ritz asked 
Julius Hersheimmer. Oh, young 
American another 
unmistakable accents came 
 
"That you, Beresford speaking. I'm I've 
followed Whittington another man here. time explain. 
Whittington's get 
then?" 
 
reply 
 
I'll 
 
telephone rang off. Tommy put back sigh 
relief. opinion Julius's power felt 
instinctively American would arrive time. 
 
Whittington Boris still left them. Boris 
remained see friend off, well. Tommy 
pocket thoughtfully. spite assured him, 
yet acquired habit going considerable sum 
money him. taking first-class 
left pocket. hoped 
Julius would arrive better provided. 
 
meantime, minutes 
Supposing Julius get time. Doors 
Tommy felt cold waves despair pass him. hand fell 
shoulder. 
 
"Here am, son. British traffic Put wise 
right away." 
 
"That's getting now, big dark man. 
foreign he's talking to." 
 
"I'm them. two 
 
Tommy thought question. 
 
"Got money you?" 
 
Julius shook head, Tommy's face fell. 
 
"I guess haven't three four hundred dollars 
explained American. 
 
Tommy gave faint relief. 
 
"Oh, Lord, don't talk 
aboard Here's ticket. Whittington's man." 
 
said Julius train starting 
swung "So long, train 
station. 
 
Tommy drew deep breath. man Boris coming along platform 
towards him. Tommy allowed pass took chase 
more. 
 
Boris took tube far 
walked finally turning mean 
streets round Soho. Tommy followed judicious distance. 
 
reached length small houses 
sinister air midst Boris looked round, 
Tommy drew back shelter friendly place 
almost deserted. consequently traffic passed 
way. way looked round Tommy's 
imagination. shelter watched go 
steps particularly house 
peculiar door. opened promptly, said word 
two passed inside. door shut again. 
 
juncture Tommy lost head. ought 
done, sane man would done, remain patiently 
wait man come again. 
entirely foreign sober common sense was, rule, 
leading Something, expressed it, seemed 
brain. Without moment's pause reflection he, too, went 
far able peculiar 
 
door swung open promptness before. 
man hair stood 
 
"Well?" 
 
moment full folly began 
come home Tommy. dared seized first 
words came mind. 
 
"Mr. said. 
 
surprise man stood aside. 
 
said, thumb shoulder, door 

 
 
 
CHAPTER VIII. ADVENTURES TOMMY 
 
 
TAKEN though man's words, Tommy 
successfully carried far, hoped 
would carry yet farther. quietly passed house 
Everything house 
beyond words. paper, 
hung loose wall. every angle grey mass 

 
Tommy proceeded time reached bend 
heard man back room. 
Clearly suspicion attached yet. come house 
ask "Mr. appeared indeed reasonable natural 

 
top stairs Tommy halted consider next 
front ran narrow passage, doors opening either side 
it. one nearest left came low murmur voices. 
room directed held 
glance small immediately right, 
half concealed torn velvet directly opposite 
door and, owing also commanded good view 
upper part one or, 
two men, two feet deep three feet 
wide. attracted Tommy thought things usual 
slow steady way, deciding mention "Mr. 
request individual, probability used 
lucky use gained far 
aroused suspicion. must decide quickly next 
 
Suppose boldly enter room left passage. 
Would mere fact admitted house 
Perhaps would required, or, 
rate, proof doorkeeper clearly know 
members gang might different upstairs. 
whole seemed luck served well far, 
thing trusting far. enter 
room could hope sustain part 
sooner later almost bound himself, 
would thrown away vital chance mere 
 
repetition signal knock sounded door below, Tommy, 
mind made up, slipped quickly cautiously drew 
curtain farther across completely 
sight. several ancient material 
afforded good view. would watch events, time chose 
could, all, join assembly, behaviour 
new 
 
man came staircase tread 
quite unknown Tommy. obviously society. 
low criminal 
whole countenance new young man, though type 
Scotland Yard would recognized glance. 
 
man passed heavily stopped 
door gave repetition signal voice 
inside called something, man opened door passed in, 
affording Tommy momentary room inside. thought 
must four five people seated round long table took 
space, attention caught held tall man 
hair short, beard, 
sat head table papers front him. 
entered glanced up, correct, curiously 
precise attracted Tommy's notice, asked: 
 
"Your number, 
 
replied 
 

 
door shut again. 
 
"If isn't I'm said Tommy himself. "And 
running show darned always do. Lucky 
didn't roll in. I'd given wrong number, would 
pay. No, place me. here's 
another 
 
proved entirely different type last. 
Tommy recognized Irish Certainly Mr. Brown's 
organization common 
Irish gentleman, pale efficient German 
master Truly strange sinister 
man held finger curiously 
unknown 
 
case, exactly same. signal 
demand number, reply 
 
Two followed quick succession door below. first man 
quite unknown Tommy, put city quiet, 
man, rather second 
working classes, face vaguely familiar young man. 
 
Three minutes later came another, man commanding appearance, 
evidently well born. face, again, 
unknown though could moment put name 
it. 
 
arrival long fact Tommy concluded 
cautiously 
another knock sent back 

 
came stairs quietly almost 
Tommy young man realized presence. 
 
small man, pale, gentle almost air. 
angle hinted otherwise 
nothing indicate passed 
turned head slowly. strange light eyes seemed burn 
Tommy could hardly believe man know 
spite 
majority young could rid 
impression unusually force man. 
creature reminded 
 
moment later impression proved correct. knocked 
door done, reception different. 
bearded man rose feet, others followed 
German came forward shook hands. heels together. 
 
"We said. "We greatly much feared 
would 
 
answered low voice kind it: 
 
"There difficulties. possible again, fear. one 
meeting define policy. nothing 
Brown. here?" 
 
change voice replied slight 

 
"We received message. impossible present 
giving curious impression left 
sentence 
 
slow smile face other. looked round 
circle uneasy 
 
"Ah! understand. read works dark 
one. But, same, possible among us 
looked round again, expression fear 
swept man seemed doubtfully. 
 
Russian tapped 
 
"So it. Let us 
 
German seemed pull together. indicated place 
occupying head table. Russian 

 
"It possible said, One. Perhaps 
Number Fourteen shut 
 
another moment Tommy bare wooden 
voices within mere 
Tommy became conversation overheard 
curiosity. felt that, hook must 
hear more. 
 
sound below, seem likely 
doorkeeper would come upstairs. listening minute 
two, put head round passage deserted. Tommy 
bent removed then, leaving behind 
walked feet, 
closed door laid ear cautiously intense 
annoyance could distinguish little chance word 
voice merely served curiosity 
still farther. 
 
eyed handle door Could turn degrees 
gently room would notice 
decided great care could done. slowly, 
inch time, moved round, holding breath 
care. little little never 
last would turn farther. 
 
stayed minute two, drew deep breath, pressed 
ever slightly door Tommy 
use much force, would almost certainly 
waited voices rose little, tried again. Still 
nothing happened. increased thing 
Finally, pushed 
door remained firm, last truth upon him. locked 
bolted inside. 
 
moment two Tommy's indignation got better him. 
 
"Well, I'm said. "What dirty 
 
indignation prepared face situation. Clearly 
first thing done restore handle original 
position. let go suddenly, men inside would almost 
certain notice it, so, infinite reversed 
former went well, sigh relief young man 
rose feet. certain Tommy 
made slow admit moment, far 
abandoning conflict. still intended hear going 
locked room. one plan failed, must hunt 
another. 
 
looked round him. little farther along passage left 
second door. slipped along it. listened moment 
two, tried slipped inside. 
 
room, furnished Like 
everything else house, falling 
was, anything, 
 
interested Tommy thing hoped find, 
door two left window. 
Carefully closing door passage behind him, stepped 
across examined bolt shot across 
it. clearly used time. 
gently Tommy managed draw back without 
making much noise. repeated former 
time complete success. door swung 
mere enough Tommy hear went on. 
velvet inside door prevented 
able recognize voices reasonable amount 

 
speaking. rich Irish voice 
 
"That's well. money 

 
Another voice Tommy rather thought Boris replied: 
 
"Will guarantee 
 
"In month later guarantee 
terror shall shake British Empire 

 
pause, came accents Number 

 
shall money. Boris, see that." 
 
Boris asked question: 
 
Irish Americans, Mr. 
 
"I guess said new voice, 
I'd like point out, now, things 
getting mite There's sympathy was, 
growing disposition let Irish settle affairs without 
interference 
 
Tommy felt Boris shrugged shoulders answered: 
 
"Does matter, since money comes 
States?" 
 
"The chief difficulty landing said 
"The money conveyed easily colleague 
here." 
 
Another voice, Tommy fancied 
man whose face seemed familiar him, said: 
 
feelings could hear 
 
"That settled, then," said "Now, matter 
loan English newspaper, arranged details 

 
"I think so." 
 
"That good. official denial 

 
pause, clear voice German broke 

 
"I directed Brown, place reports 
different you. miners 
satisfactory. must hold back may trouble 

 
long time silence, broken papers 
occasional word explanation Tommy heard 
light table. 
 
date, said Number One. 
 
"The 
 
Russian seemed 
 
"That rather 
 
"I know. settled principal Labour leaders, 
cannot seem interfere much. must believe entirely 

 
Russian laughed though 
 
"Yes, said. "That true. must 
using honest 
value us. cannot make revolution without 
honest men. instinct paused, 
repeated, though phrase pleased him: revolution 
honest men. soon disposed 
 
sinister note voice. 
 
German 
 
must go. Number Fourteen see 
that." 
 

 
"That's right, moment 
I'm 
 
"You best legal talent defend you," replied 
German quietly. "But case wear fitted 
little 
 
"Oh, ain't afraid, good cause. streets 
going run blood, say." spoke 
it, sometimes, does. rolling 
anyone pick up!" 
 
Tommy heard chair Number One 
 
"Then assured 
 
so." German spoke less usual confidence. 
 
Number One's voice held suddenly dangerous 
 
"What gone 
 

 
"But what?" 
 
"The Labour Without them, say, nothing. 
declare general strike 
 
"Why not?" 
 
"As you've said, they're And, spite everything we've 
done Government eyes, I'm sure 
haven't got faith belief it." 
 

 
"I know. abuse But, whole, public opinion 
side Government. go it." 
 
fingers table. 
 
"To point, friend. given understand 
certain document existence assured 
 
"That so. document placed leaders, result 
would would publish throughout England, 
declare revolution without moment's 
Government would broken finally 
 
"Then 
 
"The document said German 
 
"Ah! know is?" 
 
"No." 
 
"Does anyone know is?" 
 
"One sure 
 
"Who 
 
"A 
 
Tommy held breath. 
 
"A girl?" voice rose "And 
made speak? ways making girl 
 
"This case said German 
 
paused moment, went on: "Where girl 
now?" 
 
"The girl?" 
 
"Yes." 
 
"She 
 
Tommy heard more. blow descended head, 

 
 
 
CHAPTER IX. TUPPENCE ENTERS DOMESTIC SERVICE 
 
Tommy set forth two men, took Tuppence's 
refrain accompanying him. However, contained 
best might, reflection reasoning 
justified events. two men undoubtedly come 
second floor flat, one slender name 
set Young Adventurers upon track 
Jane Finn. 
 
question next? Tuppence hated letting grass grow 
feet. Tommy amply joining 
chase, girl felt loose end. steps 
entrance hall small 
brass latest air 
good deal reasonable amount 
 
glanced round Tuppence's certain amount 
element girl, events got well 
small sympathetic bond seemed instantly formed. 
reflected enemy's camp, speak, 

 
"Well, remarked best approved 
style, good up?" 
 
boy 
 

 
it," said Tuppence. glanced round hall. 
effect purposely broad one case Albert miss it. 
leaned towards boy dropped voice: "I want word you, 

 
Albert ceased operations opened mouth 
 
know is?" gesture flung back 
left side coat exposed small 
extremely unlikely Albert would knowledge 
would fatal Tuppence's plans, since 
question local training corps originated 
early days war. presence Tuppence's coat 
due fact used flowers 
day two before. Tuppence sharp eyes, noted corner 
detective novel Albert's pocket, 
immediate enlargement eyes told tactics good, 
would rise 
 
Detective 
 
Albert fell it. 
 
murmured 
 
Tuppence nodded air one established 
thorough understanding. 
 
I'm inquired 
 
Albert, still demanded 
 
"One 
 
Tuppence nodded jerked thumb stairs. 
 
"No. Calls Vandemeyer. 
 
Albert's hand pocket. 
 
"A eagerly. 
 
"A say so. Ready Rita call States." 
 
repeated Albert "Oh, ain't like 

 
was. Tuppence great 
 
always said bad continued boy. 
 
"Who's inquired Tuppence 
 
She's leaving to-day. time said 
me: words, Albert, wouldn't wonder police 
come one like that. she's 
look at, ain't she?" 
 
"She's allowed Tuppence useful 
wearing way?" 
 
green isn't they?" 
 
Tuppence nodded. 
 
"That's we're for. know old man 
 
Albert shook head. 
 
B. 
 
"It seems sort familiar me." 
 
"The belonged him. Finest collection 
world. Worth million 
 
came "It sounds like 
pictures every 
 
Tuppence smiled, gratified success 
 
"We haven't exactly proved yet. we're her. 
produced guess won't get away 
goods time." 
 
Albert uttered another 
 
you, word said Tuppence suddenly. "I guess 
put wise, States know real smart 
see one." 
 
"I'll protested Albert eagerly. 
anything could do? bit 
 
Tuppence affected consider, shook head. 
 
"Not moment, I'll bear mind, son. What's 
girl say 
 
Regular turn up, Annie said, servants one 
treated accordingly, and, passing 
word round, won't find easy get 
 
she?" said Tuppence thoughtfully. "I 
 
idea brain. thought minute two, 
tapped Albert shoulder. 
 
"See here, son, got would mentioned 
you'd got young cousin, friend had, might suit 
place. get me?" 
 
"I'm said Albert "You leave me, I'll 
fix whole thing two 
 
"Some commented Tuppence, approval. "You might say 
young woman could come right away. let know, 
it's I'll round to-morrow eleven 
 
"Where let know to?" 
 
replied Tuppence 
 
Albert eyed 
 
"It must good job, business." 
 
"It sure is," Tuppence, old man 
bill. don't son. goes well, shall come 
ground 
 
promise took leave new walked briskly 
away South Audley well pleased work. 
 
time lost. went straight back Ritz 
wrote brief words Mr. Carter. dispatched this, Tommy 
yet surprise started 
expedition which, interval tea 
occupied well six o'clock, 
returned hotel satisfied Starting 
cheap passing one two 
finished day well-known 
Now, final 
Five minutes later smiled reflection 
glass. pencil slightly altered line 
that, taken conjunction new growth 
fair hair above, changed appearance felt confident 
even came face face Whittington would 
recognize her. would wear cap 
would even valuable hospital experience 
knew well nurse uniform frequently 

 
"Yes," said Tuppence reflection glass, 
"you'll do." resumed normal appearance. 
 
Dinner solitary Tuppence rather surprised Tommy's 
Julius, too, girl's mind 
easily explained. confined 
London, abrupt fully 
accepted Young Adventurers part day's work. 
quite Julius P. Hersheimmer left 
moment's notice fancied clue 
disappearance found there. energetic young 
man succeeded making lives several Scotland Yard men 
them, telephone girls learned 
know dread familiar spent three hours 
Paris returned 
idea, possibly inspired weary French true 
clue mystery found 
 
"I dare say he's dashed now," thought Tuppence. "All 
well, dull ME! bursting news, 
absolutely one tell Tommy might something. 
wonder is. Anyway, can't say. 
reminds Miss Cowley broke 
summoned small boy. 
 
Ten minutes later lady bed, 
smoking deep Williams, Boy 
which, works 
sent felt, strain 
attempting intercourse Albert, would well 
fortify good supply local 
 
morning brought note Mr. 
 
"DEAR MISS TUPPENCE, 
 
"You made splendid start, congratulate you. feel, though, 
like point 
especially pursue course people 
absolutely desperate incapable either mercy feel 
probably danger, therefore warn 
promise protection. given us valuable 
information, choose withdraw one could blame you. 
rate, think matter well decide. 
 
spite make mind go 
it, find everything lived two years 
Miss Mrs. Vandemeyer apply 
reference. 
 
"May permitted word two Stick near truth 
danger suggest 
represent are, former 
chosen domestic service profession. many 
present time. explains away voice manner 
otherwise might suspicion. 
 
way decide, good luck you. 
 
"Your sincere friend, 
 
"MR. 
 
 
Tuppence's spirits rose Mr. Carter's passed 
young lady far much confidence pay 
them. 
 
abandoned interesting part 
herself. Although doubts powers sustain 
role much common sense recognize 
force Mr. Carter's 
 
still word message Tommy, morning post 
brought somewhat dirty words: "It's 
upon it. 
 
Tuppence surveyed pride slightly 
containing new 
slight rang bell ordered placed 
drove left box room. 
repaired 
Ten minutes later Tuppence walked 
station entered 
 
minutes past eleven Tuppence entered hall 
South Audley Albert attending 
duties somewhat fashion. immediately recognize 
Tuppence. did, admiration 
 
I'd known you! 
 
like it, replied Tuppence "By way, 
cousin, not?" 
 
"Your voice too," cried delighted boy. "It's English 
No, said friend mine knew young Annie wasn't best 
She's stopped till said, really 
it's put 
 
said Tuppence. 
 
Albert suspected 
 
"She's style her, keeps silver word, 
ain't got temper. going now, Step inside 
No. 20 say?" 
 
Tuppence stern stepped inside. 
 
rang bell No. 20 conscious Albert's eyes slowly 
descending beneath level floor. 
 
smart young woman opened door. 
 
"I've come said Tuppence. 
 
"It's rotten said young woman without 
old Accused 
Me! half anyway. There's never anything 
waste-paper burns everything. She's wrong that's 
is. Swell clothes, class. Cook knows something 
won't death her. She's 
minute much speak fellow. tell 
 
Annie could tell, Tuppence never destined learn, 
moment clear voice peculiarly ring 

 

 
smart young woman jumped 
 
"Yes, ma'am." 
 
"Who talking to?" 
 
"It's young woman situation, ma'am." 
 
then. once." 
 
"Yes, ma'am." 
 
Tuppence room right long passage. 
woman standing longer first 
youth, beauty possessed 
youth must pale gold hair, 
owing slight assistance art, low neck, eyes, 
piercing electric seemed possess faculty boring 
soul person looking at. exquisite figure 
enhanced wonderful yet, despite 
swaying almost beauty face, felt 
instinctively presence something hard kind 
strength found expression voice 
quality eyes. 
 
first time Tuppence felt afraid. feared Whittington, 
woman different. watched long 
cruel line red mouth, felt 
panic pass her. usual deserted her. Vaguely 
felt woman would different 
Whittington. Mr. Carter's warning mind. Here, indeed, 
might expect 
 
Fighting instinct panic urged turn tail 
run without delay, Tuppence returned lady's firmly 

 
though first satisfactory, Mrs. Vandemeyer 
chair. 
 
"You sit down. hear wanted 
 
 
friend knows lift boy here. thought place 
might suit me." 
 
glance seemed pierce through. 
 
"You speak like educated girl?" 
 
enough, Tuppence ran imaginary career lines 
suggested Mr. Carter. seemed her, so, 
tension Mrs. Vandemeyer's attitude 
 
"I see," remarked length. "Is anyone write 

 
"I lived last Miss 
two 
 
"And thought would get money coming London, 
Well, doesn't matter me. give 
want. come 
 
"Yes, To-day, like. box 
 
"Go fetch then. It's easy place. good 
way, what's name?" 
 
ma'am." 
 
"Very well, Go away fetch shall 
cook show everything is." 
 
"Thank you, ma'am." 
 
Tuppence smart Annie evidence. hall 
magnificent hall porter Albert 
Tuppence even glance passed out. 
 
felt less done 
earlier morning. crossed mind unknown Jane 
Finn fallen hands Mrs. Vandemeyer, likely 
gone hard her. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER ENTER SIR JAMES PEEL EDGERTON 
 
TUPPENCE betrayed new duties. 
well household also 
training inevitable result girl, 
departed elsewhere newly acquired knowledge 
commanded substantial 

 
Tuppence therefore little fear proving Mrs. 
Vandemeyer's cook puzzled her. evidently went deadly terror 
girl thought probable woman 
hold her. rest, like Tuppence 
opportunity judging evening. Mrs. Vandemeyer expecting 
dinner, Tuppence accordingly laid beautifully polished 
table two. little exercised mind 
highly possible might prove Whittington. 
Although felt fairly confident would recognize her, yet 
would better pleased proved total 
However, nothing hope best. 
 
minutes past eight front door bell Tuppence went 
answer relieved see 
second two men Tommy taken upon 
follow. 
 
gave name Count Tuppence announced him, Mrs. 
Vandemeyer rose seat low quick murmur 
pleasure. 
 
"It delightful see you, Boris said. 
 
"And you, bowed low hand. 
 
Tuppence returned 
 
affecting frank 
"Who's he?" 
 
"A Russian gentleman, 
 
"Come 
 
while. want know 
 
might sweet that's all," explained 
girl, adding appearance "How take one up!" 
 
"I'm quite easy mind explained other. 
 
"You know something," thought Tuppence herself, aloud 
said: now? 
 
Whilst waiting table, Tuppence listened closely said. 
remembered one men Tommy 
last seen him. although would hardly admit it, 
becoming uneasy he? word 
kind come him? arranged leaving Ritz 
letters messages sent special messenger small 
shop near hand Albert call 
True, yesterday morning parted Tommy, 
told anxiety behalf would absurd. Still, 
strange sent word kind. 
 
But, listen might, conversation presented clue. Boris 
Mrs. Vandemeyer talked purely indifferent plays 
seen, new latest society dinner 
repaired small boudoir Mrs. Vandemeyer, stretched 
looked beautiful ever. Tuppence brought 
coffee so, heard 
Boris say: 
 
isn't she?" 
 
"She came to-day. girl seems right. 
well." 
 
Tuppence lingered moment longer door carefully 
neglected close, heard say: 
 
"Quite safe, suppose?" 
 
Boris, believe she's cousin 
hall porter, something kind. nobody even dreams 
connection friend, Mr. 
 
"For sake, careful, door isn't 
 
"Well, shut then," laughed woman. 
 
Tuppence removed 
 
dared absent longer back 
cleared away breathless speed acquired 
slipped quietly back boudoir door. 
still busy kitchen and, missed other, 
would suppose turning 
 
conversation inside carried low tone 
permit hearing anything it. dared 
door, however gently. Mrs. Vandemeyer sitting almost facing it, 
Tuppence respected powers 
 
Nevertheless, felt would give good deal 
going on. anything happened, might get 
news Tommy. moments reflected 
face went quickly along passage Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
long French windows leading ran 
length quickly window, Tuppence 
crept noiselessly along till reached boudoir window. 
thought stood little voices within plainly 

 
Tuppence listened mention anything 
could twisted apply Tommy. Mrs. Vandemeyer Russian 
seemed variance matter, finally latter 
exclaimed 
 
"With persistent end 
 
laughed woman. right kind best way 
suspicion. realize one 
sooner 
 
"In meantime, going everywhere Peel 
he, perhaps, England, 
special 
 
"I know eloquence saved men said 
Mrs. Vandemeyer "What it? may need assistance 
line day. so, fortunate friend 
perhaps would point say court." 
 
Boris got began down. 
 
"You clever woman, also guided me, 
give Peel 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer shook head gently. 
 
"I think not." 
 
"You ugly ring voice. 
 
"I do." 
 
snarled "we Mrs. 
Vandemeyer also rose feet, eyes 
 
"You said. "I one. take 
orders 
 
threw hands despair. 
 
"You Already may 
say Peel Edgerton SMELL know 
bottom sudden interest you? Perhaps even 
suspicions 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer eyed 
 
yourself, dear Boris. nothing. less 
usual seem forget commonly accounted 
beautiful woman. assure interests Peel 
 
Boris shook head doubtfully. 
 
"He studied crime man studied it. 
fancy deceive him?" 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer's eyes 
 
"If would amuse 
 
"Good 
 
added Mrs. Vandemeyer, "he extremely one 
money. know, 
 
always danger you, believe 
would sell soul money. paused, 
low, sinister voice said believe would 

 
Mrs. Vandemeyer smiled shrugged shoulders. 
 
"The price, rate, would said 
"It would beyond power anyone millionaire 
 
"Ah!" snarled "You see, 
 
"My dear Boris, take 
 
"Was 
 
"Of course." 
 
"Then say ideas dear 

 
Mrs. Vandemeyer smiled. 
 
"Let us Boris. Touch bell. 
 
Tuppence beat hasty paused moment survey 
Mrs. Vandemeyer's long glass, sure nothing 
appearance. answered bell 
 
conversation although interesting 
proved beyond doubt Rita Boris, threw 
little light present name Jane Finn 
even mentioned. 
 
following morning brief words Albert informed 
nothing waiting seemed incredible 
Tommy, well him, send word her. 
cold hand seemed close round 
fears good 
chance offered Mrs. Vandemeyer. 
 
"What day usually go out, 
 
usual day, ma'am." 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer lifted 
 
"And to-day suppose hardly wish go to-day, 
came 
 
"I thinking asking might, ma'am." 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer looked minute longer, smiled. 
 
"I wish Count could hear you. made suggestion 
last night." smile "Your request 
satisfied. understand 
go to-day. makes difference me, shall 

 
"Thank you, ma'am." 
 
Tuppence felt relief other's 
presence. admitted afraid, 
horribly afraid, beautiful woman cruel eyes. 
 
midst final Tuppence 
disturbed ringing front door bell, went answer it. 
time neither Whittington Boris, man 
striking appearance. 
 
shade average height, nevertheless conveyed 
impression big man. face, mobile, 
stamped expression power force far beyond 
seemed him. 
 
Tuppence moment whether put 
lawyer, doubts soon gave 
Sir James Peel 
 
looked renewed interest. This, then, famous 
whose name familiar England. heard said 
might one day Prime known refused office 
interests profession, remain simple Member 

 
Tuppence went back thoughtfully. great man 
impressed her. understood agitation. Peel Edgerton would 
easy man 
 
quarter hour bell Tuppence repaired 
hall show out. given piercing glance 
before. Now, handed hat conscious 
eyes through. opened door stood aside 
let pass out, stopped 
 
"Not long, eh?" 
 
Tuppence raised eyes, read glance 
something else difficult 
 
nodded though answered. 
 
hard up, suppose?" 
 
"Did Mrs. Vandemeyer tell that?" asked Tuppence 
 
"No, child. look told me. Good place here?" 
 
"Very good, thank you, sir." 
 
"Ah, plenty good places change 
harm 
 
"Do began Tuppence. 
 
Sir James already looked back 
glance. 
 
"Just said. "That's all." 
 
Tuppence went back thoughtful ever. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER JULIUS TELLS STORY 
 
DRESSED Tuppence duly forth 
out." Albert temporary Tuppence went 
make quite sure nothing come her. Satisfied 
point, made way Ritz. inquiry learnt 
Tommy yet returned. answer expected, 
another resolved appeal 
Mr. Carter, telling Tommy started 
asking something trace him. prospect 
aid revived next inquired Julius 
Hersheimmer. reply got effect returned 
half hour ago, gone immediately. 
 
Tuppence's spirits revived still more. would something see 
Julius. Perhaps could plan finding 
become Tommy. wrote note Mr. Carter Julius's 
addressing envelope door burst 
open. 
 
"What began Julius, abruptly. "I beg 
pardon, Miss Tuppence. fools office would 
Beresford wasn't since 
so?" 
 
Tuppence nodded. 
 
"You don't know is?" asked 
 
know? haven't one darned word him, though 
yesterday morning." 
 
"I expect office 
 
"But he?" 
 
"I don't know. hoped 
 
"I tell haven't one darned word since parted 

 
"What 
 
London South Western 
 
frowned Tuppence. 
 
"Why, yes. Didn't tell you?" 
 
"I haven't seen replied Tuppence impatiently. "Go 
there?" 
 
"He gave call. Told get move on, 
Said two 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence, eyes "I see. Go on." 
 
"I hurried along right away. Beresford there. pointed 
big one mine, guy Tommy 
hand told get aboard going 
Julius paused. "I thought sure you'd know 
this." 
 
said Tuppence walking down. makes 
Sit tell whole story 
fancy turns speech 
 
Mr. Hersheimmer obeyed. 
 
said. "Where shall 
 
"Where left off. 
 
"Well," began Julius, "I got one dear old-fashioned 
first-class British train off. First thing 
knew guard came along informed mighty wasn't 
handed half settled 
that. bit along next 
Whittington right enough. saw big 
fat face, thought poor little Jane felt 
real mad hadn't got gun me. I'd some. 
 
"We got right. Whittington took gave 
name drove within three minutes 
other. hired room, hired one too. far 
plain hadn't notion anyone him. 
Well, sat around hotel reading papers 
on, till time didn't hurry either. 
 
"I began think nothing doing, he'd come 
trip health, remembered hadn't changed 
dinner, though way seemed 
likely enough he'd going real business afterwards. 
 
"Sure enough, nine o'clock, did. Took car across 
pretty place way, guess I'll take Jane 
spell find paid struck along 
top too, understand. 
half hour. There's lot way 
along, degrees seemed get out, 
end got one seemed last Big house 
was, lot grounds around it. 
 
"It pretty black night, carriage drive house 
dark could hear ahead, though couldn't see him. 
walk carefully case might get 
followed. turned time see ring 
bell get admitted house. stopped was. 
beginning soon pretty near through. Also, 
almighty 
 
didn't come again, got kind 
began ground floor windows 
upstairs, first floor 
noticed window light burning 
 
"Now, opposite window, tree 
thirty foot away house, sort got 
head that, climbed tree, I'd likely able see 
room. course, knew reason Whittington 
room rather reason, fact, 
would one 
guess I'd got standing long 
anything seemed better going nothing. 
started up. 
 
"It wasn't long made mighty 
could keep bit bit 
managed it, last level window. 
 
"But disappointed. far left. could 
see sideways room. bit yard 
could command. Well, wasn't manner good me, 
going give up, 
one inside moved threw shadow little bit 

 
"After that, blood up. I'd got get look 
room. figure how. noticed long 
branch running tree right direction. could 
along it, proposition would 
mighty uncertain whether would bear decided I'd 
got risk that, started. inch 
along. swayed 
didn't think drop below, last got safely 
wanted be. 
 
"The room furnished kind bare way. 
table lamp middle room, 
sitting table, facing towards me, Whittington right enough. 
talking woman dressed hospital sitting 
back me, couldn't see face. Although 
up, window couldn't catch word 
said. Whittington seemed talking, nurse 
nodded, sometimes she'd shake 
head, though answering questions. seemed 
twice beat fist table. 
stopped now, sky clearing sudden way does. 
 
seemed get end saying. got 
up, looked towards window asked 
guess whether Anyway, came right across 
looked out. moon came behind 
scared woman would catch sight me, full 
tried move back bit. gave much 
rotten old almighty came, Julius 
P. Hersheimmer it!" 
 
"Oh, Julius," breathed Tuppence, "how Go on." 
 
"Well, luckily me, good soft bed 
put action time, sure enough. next thing 
knew, lying bed hospital nurse (not Whittington's 
one side me, little man gold 
medical man written him, other. rubbed hands 
together, raised stared him. said. 
young friend coming round again. Capital. 
 
"I usual Said: 
knew answer last well enough. There's growing 
brain. 'I think present, said little 
man, nurse left room sort way. 
caught handing look deep curiosity passed 
door. 
 
"That look gave idea. then, said, tried 
sit bed, right foot gave so. 
'A slight explained doctor. serious. You'll 
couple 
 
"I noticed walked Tuppence. 
 
Julius nodded, continued: 
 
asked again. replied dryly. 'You fell, 
considerable portion one trees, one newly planted 

 
"I liked man. seemed sense felt sure 
he, least, plumb said, sorry 
tree, guess new me. perhaps you'd 
like know 'I think facts 
call replied. begin with, wasn't 

 
"He smiled. first theory. soon altered mind. way, 
American, told name. 'And 'I 
Dr. Hall, this, doubtless know, private 
 
"I didn't know, wasn't going put thankful 
information. liked man, felt 
wasn't going give whole story. one thing probably 
wouldn't believed it. 
 
"I made mind said, 'I guess feel 
almighty owe let know wasn't 
Bill business went 
something girl. stern business, 
nervous finally explained fancied recognized 
among home, hence 
guess kind story 
said I'd finished. went on, 
frank me? now, time, 
young girl called Jane repeated name thoughtfully. 
said. 
 
"I guess showed it. 'You sure, 
Mr. Hersheimmer. uncommon name, 
likely forget 
 
"Well, laid space. I'd kind hoped 
search end. said last. there's 
another matter. darned branch thought 
recognized old friend mine talking one 
purposely didn't mention name because, course, Whittington might 
calling something quite different here, doctor 
answered once. Whittington, 
replied. here? Don't tell 

 
"Dr. Hall laughed. came see one Nurse 
fancy exclaimed. 
still went back town almost 
perhaps could speak 
say name 
 
"But doctor shook head. afraid that, too, impossible. 
Nurse left patient to-night 'I seem real 
remarked. Mr. Whittington's address 
guess I'd like look get 'I don't know 
address. write Nurse him. 
say wants it. I'd like give little 
 
"That could moment. course, girl 
really Whittington's might fall 
worth Next thing write wire 
Beresford saying was, laid 
telling come wasn't 
guarded said. However, didn't hear him, foot 
soon got right. really to-day 
said little doctor asked send word 
heard Nurse came right away back town. Say, Miss 
Tuppence, you're looking mighty 
 
"It's said Tuppence. "What happened him?" 
 
up, guess he's right shouldn't be? See here, 
guy went after. Maybe they've gone 
something like that?" 
 
Tuppence shook head. 
 
"He couldn't without things. Besides I've seen man, 
Boris Something, since. Mrs. Vandemeyer last night." 
 
"Mrs. 
 
"I course don't know that." 
 
"I'm said Julius, gave vent favourite expression. 

 
Tuppence thereupon related events last two days. Julius's 
astonishment admiration 
 
you! Fancy 
added "But say now, don't like it, Miss Tuppence, sure 
You're make wish you'd keep 
right this. we're would soon 
girl man day." 
 
"Do think I'm said Tuppence 
memories Mrs. Vandemeyer's eyes. 
 
"I said darned doesn't alter 
 
"Oh, ME!" said Tuppence impatiently. "Let's think 
happened Tommy. I've written Mr. Carter it," added, 
told letter. 
 
Julius nodded gravely. 
 
"I guess that's good far it's us get busy 

 
"What do?" asked Tuppence, spirits 
 
"I guess we'd better get track Boris. say he's 
place. likely come 
 
"He really don't know." 
 
"I see. Well, guess I'd better buy car, one, 
chauffeur hang outside. Boris comes, could make 
kind I'd him. How's that?" 
 
come 
 
chance that. I'm glad like rose. 
 
"Where 
 
"To buy car, course," replied Julius, surprised. "What make 
guess you'll we've 
 
said Tuppence "I LIKE 
 
agreed Julius. "What say I'll get one." 
 
"But can't cried Tuppence. wait ages 
 
"Little Julius affirmed Mr. Hersheimmer. "Don't worry any. 
I'll round car half 
 
Tuppence got up. 
 
"You're awfully good, Julius. can't help feeling it's rather 
hope. I'm really faith Mr. 
 
"Then 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Just idea mine." 
 
must something. There's one else. way, forgot 
tell queer thing happened morning." 
 
encounter Sir James Peel Julius 
interested. 
 
"What guy think?" asked. 
 
"I don't quite know," said Tuppence "But think that, 
without lawyer's way, trying 
warn me." 
 
"Why he?" 
 
"I don't know," confessed Tuppence. "But looked kind, 
simply awfully wouldn't mind going telling 

 
Somewhat surprise, Julius idea sharply. 
 
"See here," said, "we don't want lawyers mixed this. 
guy couldn't help us 
 
"Well, believe reiterated Tuppence 
 
"Don't think it. long. I'll back half 
 
Thirty-five minutes elapsed Julius returned. took Tuppence 
arm, walked window. 
 
"There is." 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence note reverence voice, gazed 
enormous car. 
 
"She's tell you," said Julius 
 
"How get it?" gasped Tuppence. 
 
"She sent home 
 
"Well?" 
 
"I went round said Julius. "I said reckoned car 
like worth every twenty thousand dollars. told 
worth fifty thousand dollars he'd 
get out." 
 
"Well?" said Tuppence, 
 
"Well," returned Julius, "he got out, that's all." 
 
 
 
CHAPTER FRIEND NEED 
 
FRIDAY Saturday passed Tuppence received brief 
answer appeal Mr. Carter. pointed 
Young Adventurers work 
fully warned anything happened Tommy 
could nothing. 
 
cold Somehow, without Tommy, went 
and, first time, Tuppence felt doubtful 
success. together never questioned 
minute. Although accustomed take pride 
reality relied upon Tommy 
realized time. something eminently 
sober him, common sense 
vision without Tuppence felt much like 
curious Julius, undoubtedly much 
Tommy, give feeling support. 
accused Tommy certain 
always saw difficulties 
given nevertheless really 
relied good deal judgment. might 
sure. 
 
seemed girl that, first time, realized 
sinister character mission 
begun like page Now, shorn 
seemed turning reality. 
Many times day Tuppence tears eyes 
"Little would herself, "don't 
course you're fond him. You've known life. 
there's need sentimental it." 
 
meantime, nothing seen Boris. come 
flat, Julius car waited vain. Tuppence gave 
new Whilst admitting truth Julius's 
nevertheless entirely idea appealing 
Sir James Peel Indeed, gone far look 
address Red Book. meant warn so, why? 
Surely least entitled demand looked 
Perhaps might tell something concerning Mrs. 
Vandemeyer might lead clue Tommy's 
 
Anyway, Tuppence decided, usual shake shoulders, 
worth try would. Sunday afternoon out. 
would meet Julius, persuade point view, would 
beard lion 
 
day arrived Julius needed considerable amount 
Tuppence held "It always came 
back to. end Julius gave in, proceeded car 
House 
 
door opened butler. Tuppence felt little 
all, perhaps part. 
decided ask Sir James "at adopt 
personal 
 
"Will ask Sir James see 
important message him." 
 
butler returning moment two later. 
 
"Sir James see you. step way?" 
 
room back house, furnished 
collection books magnificent one, Tuppence 
noticed one wall devoted works crime 
several old-fashioned 
open window big desk papers 
master house 
 
rose 
 
"You message me? recognized Tuppence 
you, it? Brought message Mrs. Vandemeyer, 
suppose?" 
 
"Not said Tuppence. "In fact, I'm afraid said 
quite sure getting in. Oh, way, Mr. Hersheimmer, 
Sir James Peel 
 
meet you," said American, hand. 
 
sit asked Sir James. drew forward two 
 
"Sir said Tuppence, "I dare say think 
awful coming like this. Because, course, 
it's nothing whatever you, you're important 
person, course Tommy paused 
breath. 
 
Sir James, looking across American. 
 
"No, that's Julius," explained Tuppence. "I'm rather 
makes tell really want know meant 
said mean warn Mrs. 
did, didn't you?" 
 
"My dear young lady, far recollect mentioned 
equally good obtained 
 
"Yes, know. wasn't it?" 
 
"Well, perhaps admitted Sir James gravely. 
 
"Well, want know more. want know gave 
 
Sir James smiled earnestness. 
 
lady brings action 

 
"Of course," said Tuppence. "I know lawyers always 
careful. can't say first, say 
want to." 
 
"Well," said Sir James, still then, 
young sister forced earn living, like see 
Mrs. Vandemeyer's service. felt give 
place young girl. 
tell you." 
 
"I see," said Tuppence thoughtfully. "Thank much. I'm 
REALLY know. knew perfectly bad lot 
went matter fact that's broke 
off, seeing lawyer's face, went on: "I 
think perhaps I'd better tell whole story, Sir James. I've 
sort feeling you'd know minute didn't tell truth, 
might well know beginning. 
think, 
 
"As you're bent it, I'd go right ahead replied 
American, far sat silence. 
 
"Yes, tell it," said Sir James. "I want know Tommy 
is." 
 
Thus encouraged Tuppence plunged lawyer listened 
close attention. 
 
"Very said, finished. "A great deal 
tell me, child, already known me. I've certain theories 
Jane Finn. You've done well 
far, it's rather bad know Carter 
two young things affair kind. 
way, Mr. Hersheimmer come didn't make 

 
Julius answered himself. 
 
"I'm Jane's first returning lawyer's keen 

 
"Ah!" 
 
"Oh, Sir broke Tuppence, "what think become 

 
lawyer rose, slowly down. "When arrived, 
young lady, Going Scotland 
night train days' different 
I've good mind see can't get track 
young 
 
"Oh!" Tuppence hands 
 
"All same, said before, it's bad Carter set 
two job like this. Now, don't get 
 
Prudence friends call Tuppence." 
 
"Well, Miss Tuppence, then, I'm certainly going friend. Don't 
offended think you're Youth failing 
easily Now, young Tommy 
 
"Yes." Tuppence hands. 
 
things look bad him. He's somewhere 
wasn't wanted. doubt it. don't give 
 
"And really help us? There, didn't want 
added way 
 
said lawyer, Julius another keen glance. "And 
that?" 
 
"I reckoned would good little 
business like this." 
 
"I see." paused moment. "This little business, call 
it, bears directly big business, perhaps either 
Miss Tuppence know. boy may 
valuable information give us. Therefore, must find him." 
 
"Yes, cried Tuppence. "I've tried think 
 
Sir James smiled. 
 
"And yet there's one person quite near hand probability 
knows is, events likely be." 
 
"Who that?" asked Tuppence, puzzled. 
 
"Mrs. 
 
"Yes, she'd never tell us." 
 
"Ah, come in. think quite likely shall 
able make Mrs. Vandemeyer tell want know." 
 
demanded Tuppence, opening eyes wide. 
 
"Oh, asking replied Sir James "That's 
way it, know." 
 
tapped finger table, Tuppence felt 
intense power man. 
 
"And won't asked Julius suddenly. 
 
"I think will. one two powerful Still, 
unlikely event, always possibility 
 
that's come cried Julius, bringing fist 
table "You count me, necessary, one 
million dollars. Yes, sir, one million 
 
Sir James sat subjected Julius long 
 
"Mr. said last, "that large 
 
"I guess it'll be. aren't kind offer 
to." 
 
"At present rate exchange amounts considerably two 
hundred fifty thousand 
 
"That's so. Maybe think I'm talking hat, 
deliver goods right, enough spare 
 
Sir James flushed 
 
"There question Mr. Hersheimmer. private 

 
guess mite I've feeling bad 
money question. wanted offer big reward news Jane 
days ago, institution Scotland Yard advised 
it. Said 
 
"They probably right," said Sir James dryly. 
 
"But it's Julius," put Tuppence. "He's pulling 
He's got simply 
 
"The old man piled explained Julius. "Now, let's get 
it. What's 
 
Sir James considered moment two. 
 
"There time lost. sooner strike 
turned Tuppence. "Is Mrs. Vandemeyer 
know?" 
 
"Yes, think so, Otherwise, would 
taken 
 
call upon ten o'clock. time 
supposed 
 
"About could go back 
 
"You must account. might suspicion 
stay till usual time. back 
arrive Mr. Hersheimmer wait taxi 
 
"He's got new said Tuppence 
 
better. succeed obtaining address her, 
go once, taking Mrs. Vandemeyer us necessary. 

 
"Yes." Tuppence rose feet "Oh, feel 
much 
 
"Don't build much, Miss Tuppence. Go 
 
Julius turned lawyer. 
 
"Say, then. I'll call car round 
right?" 
 
"Perhaps best plan. would unnecessary two 
cars waiting about. Now, Miss Tuppence, advice go 
good dinner, REALLY good one, mind. don't think ahead 

 
shook hands both, moment later outside. 
 
inquired Tuppence 
"Oh, Julius, isn't 
 
"Well, allow seems goods right. wrong 
useless go him. Say, shall go right away back 

 
"I must walk think. feel Drop park, 
you? Unless you'd like come too?" 
 
"I want get explained. "And send 

 
"All right. I'll meet Ritz We'll 
upstairs. can't show glad 
 
I'll get help choose He's head 
that. 
 
Tuppence walked briskly along towards first glancing 
watch. nearly six o'clock. remembered 
tea, felt excited conscious walked 
far slowly feeling 
infinitely better fresh air easy 
follow Sir James's advice, put possible events evening 
head. drew nearer nearer Park 
temptation return South Audley almost 
 
rate, decided, would harm go LOOK 
building. Perhaps, then, could resign waiting patiently 
ten o'clock. 
 
South Audley looked exactly Tuppence 
expected hardly knew, sight red brick 
slightly growing entirely unreasonable uneasiness 
possessed her. turning away heard piercing 
faithful Albert came running building join 
her. 
 
Tuppence part attention 
called presence Albert purple 
suppressed excitement. 
 
"I say, she's 
 
"Who's demanded Tuppence sharply. 
 
"The Ready Mrs. Vandemeyer. She's up, she's 
sent word get 
 
"What?" Tuppence clutched arm. 
 
"It's truth, thought maybe didn't know it." 
 
cried Tuppence, "you're hadn't 
we'd lost her." 
 
Albert flushed pleasure 
 
"There's time said Tuppence, crossing road. "I've got 
stop her. must keep broke off. 
there's telephone here, isn't there?" 
 
boy shook head. 
 
"The mostly own, there's box round 

 
"Go then, once, ring Ritz Ask Mr. 
Hersheimmer, get tell get Sir James come 
once, Mrs. Vandemeyer trying hook it. can't get him, 
ring Sir James Peel you'll find number book, 
tell what's won't forget names, you?" 
 
Albert repeated "You trust me, it'll right. 
you? Aren't afraid trust her?" 
 
"No, no, that's right. GO 
 
Drawing long breath, Tuppence entered ran 
door No. detain Mrs. Vandemeyer two men 
arrived, know, somehow done, 
must accomplish task occasioned 
precipitate Mrs. Vandemeyer suspect her? 
 
Tuppence pressed bell firmly. might 
learn something cook. 
 
Nothing happened and, waiting minutes, Tuppence pressed 
bell again, keeping finger little while. 
last heard footsteps inside, moment later Mrs. Vandemeyer 
opened door. lifted sight 
girl. 
 

 
"I touch said Tuppence "So thought 
better come home quiet 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer said nothing, drew back let Tuppence pass 
hall. 
 
"How unfortunate you," said "You better go 
 
"Oh, shall right kitchen, Cook 
 
said Mrs. Vandemeyer, rather disagreeable tone. "I 
sent out. see better go 
 
Suddenly Tuppence felt afraid. ring Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
voice like all. Also, woman slowly 
passage. Tuppence turned 
 
"I don't 
 
Then, cold steel touched Mrs. 
Vandemeyer's voice rose cold 
 
"You damned little think don't know? No, don't answer. 
struggle cry out, I'll shoot like 
 
steel pressed little harder girl's 
 
"Now then, went Mrs. Vandemeyer. "This room. 
minute, I've done you, you'll go bed told to. 
you'll yes, little you'll sleep 
 
sort last words Tuppence 
like. moment nothing done, 
walked Mrs. Vandemeyer's pistol never 
left forehead. room state wild clothes 
flung right left, hat 
stood middle floor. 
 
Tuppence pulled together effort. voice shook 
little, spoke 
 
"Come now," said. "This can't shoot me. Why, every 
one building would hear 
 
"I'd risk that," said Mrs. Vandemeyer cheerfully. "But, long 
don't sing help, you're don't think will. 
You're clever girl. deceived right. hadn't suspicion 
you! I've doubt understand perfectly well 
I'm top you're bed. Put 
hands head, value life don't move them." 
 
Tuppence obeyed good sense told 
nothing else accept situation. help 
little chance anyone hearing her, whereas 
probably quite good chance Mrs. Vandemeyer's her. 
meantime, every minute delay gained 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer laid revolver edge 
within reach hand, and, still Tuppence like case 
girl attempt move, took little bottle 
place marble poured contents glass 
filled water. 
 
"What's that?" asked Tuppence sharply. 
 
make sleep 
 
Tuppence little. 
 
"Are going poison me?" asked 
 
said Mrs. Vandemeyer, smiling 
 
"Then shan't drink it," said Tuppence firmly. "I'd much rather 
rate would make one might hear it. 
won't killed quietly like 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer stamped 
 
"Don't little really think want cry 
murder me? you've sense all, you'll realize 
poisoning wouldn't suit book all. It's sleeping 
that's all. You'll wake to-morrow morning none worse. simply 
don't want you. That's 
won't like it, tell you! rough 
choose. drink like good girl, you'll none 
worse it." 
 
heart hearts Tuppence believed her. arguments 
rang true. simple effective method getting 
way time Nevertheless, girl take 
kindly idea put sleep without much one 
bid freedom. felt Mrs. Vandemeyer gave 
last hope finding Tommy would gone. 
 
Tuppence quick mental reflections 
passed mind saw chance, 
chance, determined risk one supreme 
effort. 
 
Accordingly, suddenly bed fell knees 
Mrs. Vandemeyer, 
 
"I don't believe it," "It's know it's poison. 
Oh, don't make drink voice rose make 
drink it!" 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer, glass hand, looked 
sudden 
 
"Get up, little Don't go there. ever 
nerve play part can't stamped 
"Get up, say." 
 
Tuppence continued cling 
appeals Every minute gained good. 
Moreover, moved nearer 

 
Mrs. Vandemeyer gave sharp impatient jerked girl 

 
pressed glass girl's 
lips. 
 
Tuppence gave one last 
 
"You swear won't hurt me?" 
 
"Of course won't hurt you. Don't 
 
"Will swear it?" 
 
"Yes, said impatiently. "I swear it." 
 
Tuppence raised trembling left hand glass. 
 
"Very well." mouth opened 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer gave sigh relief, guard moment. 
Then, quick Tuppence jerked glass hard 
could. Mrs. Vandemeyer's face, 
momentary Tuppence's right hand shot grasped 
revolver lay edge next moment 
sprung back revolver pointed straight Mrs. 
Vandemeyer's heart, hand held it. 
 
moment Tuppence betrayed somewhat 
triumph. 
 
"Now who's top who's 
 
other's face minute Tuppence thought 
going spring upon her, would placed girl 
unpleasant since meant draw line actually letting 
However, effort Mrs. Vandemeyer controlled 
herself, last slow evil smile crept face. 
 
"Not then, well, girl. shall pay 
yes, shall pay it! long 
 
"I'm surprised said Tuppence 
"Did really think kind girl roll 
floor 
 
"You may said 
 
cold manner sent unpleasant chill 
Tuppence's going give it. 
 
sit down," said "Our present attitude 
little bed. Draw chair table, 
that's right. I'll sit opposite revolver front 
case Now, let's 
 
"What about?" said Mrs. Vandemeyer 
 
Tuppence eyed thoughtfully minute. remembering several 
things. words, "I believe would answer, 
"The price would given true, 
yet might truth it? Long ago, 
Whittington asked: "Who's Would Rita Vandemeyer 
prove weak spot Mr. 
 
Keeping eyes fixed steadily other's face, Tuppence replied 

 

 
Mrs. Vandemeyer started. Clearly, reply 
 
"What mean?" 
 
"I'll tell you. said long memory. long 
memory isn't half useful long dare say relieves 
feelings good deal plan sorts dreadful things 
me, Every one 
always says so. 
there's nothing unsatisfactory money, there?" 
 
"Do said Mrs. Vandemeyer "that kind 
woman sell 
 
"Yes," said Tuppence "If price big 
 
"A hundred pounds 
 
"No," said Tuppence. "I hundred 
 
economical spirit permit mention whole million 
dollars suggested Julius. 
 
flush crept Mrs. Vandemeyer's face. 
 
"What say?" asked, fingers playing 
moment Tuppence knew 
first time felt horror 
spirit. gave dreadful sense woman 
her. 
 
"A hundred thousand repeated Tuppence. 
 
light died Mrs. Vandemeyer's eyes. leaned back 
chair. 
 
said. "You haven't got it." 
 
"No," admitted Tuppence, "I know one 
 

 
"A friend mine." 
 
remarked Mrs. Vandemeyer 
 
"As matter fact is. He's American. He'll pay 
without take it's perfectly genuine 

 
Mrs. Vandemeyer sat again. 
 
"I'm inclined believe you," said slowly. 
 
silence time, Mrs. Vandemeyer 
looked up. 
 
"What want know, friend 
 
Tuppence went momentary struggle, Julius's money, 
interests must come first. 
 
"He wants know Jane Finn is," said 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer showed surprise. 
 
"I'm sure present replied. 
 
"But could find out?" 
 
"Oh, returned Mrs. Vandemeyer "There would 
difficulty that." 
 
voice shook boy, friend 
mine. I'm afraid happened him, 
 
"What's name?" 
 

 
"Never heard him. I'll ask Boris. He'll tell anything 

 
"Thank you." Tuppence felt terrific rise spirits. 
"There's one thing more." 
 
"Well?" 
 
Tuppence leaned forward lowered voice. 
 
"WHO MR. 
 
quick eyes saw sudden beautiful face. 
effort Mrs. Vandemeyer pulled together tried resume 
former manner. attempt mere 
 
shrugged shoulders. 
 
"You can't learnt much us don't know NOBODY KNOWS 
MR. BROWN 
 
"You do," said Tuppence quietly. 
 
colour deserted other's face. 
 
"What makes think that?" 
 
"I don't know," said girl "But I'm sure." 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer stared front long time. 
 
"Yes," said last, "I know. beautiful, 

 
"You said Tuppence 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer shook head. strange gleam 
eyes. 
 
"Not beautiful said soft dangerous voice. 
sometimes, lately, I've 
It's dangerous know leaned forward across table. 
name shan't brought one shall ever 
know." 
 
"I swear it. And, you'll 
 
look swept across Mrs. Vandemeyer's face. 
 
"Shall Shall ever be?" clutched Tuppence's arm. "You're sure 

 
"Quite sure." 
 
"When shall it? must 
 
"This friend mine may send 
something like that. won't terrific 

 
resolute look settled Mrs. Vandemeyer's face. 
 
"I'll it. It's great sum money, gave curious 
throw woman like me!" 
 
moment two, remained lightly 
fingers table. Suddenly started, face 
 
"What that?" 
 
"I heard 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer gazed round 
 
"If one 
 
could be?" 
 
walls might other. "I tell I'm 
don't know him!" 
 
hundred thousand said Tuppence 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer passed tongue lips. 
 
"You don't know him," reiterated 
 
terror sprang feet. hand 
pointed Tuppence's head. swayed ground dead 

 
Tuppence looked round see startled her. 
 
Sir James Peel Edgerton Julius Hersheimmer. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
SIR James past Julius hurriedly bent fallen woman. 
 
said sharply. us suddenly must given 
quickly, slip 
 
Julius hurried 
 
"Not said Tuppence shoulder. "In 
Second door 
 
Sir James Tuppence lifted Mrs. Vandemeyer carried 
bed. dashed water face, result. 
lawyer 
 
"I wish young fellow would hurry 

 
moment Julius room, carrying glass half full 
spirit handed Sir James. Tuppence lifted head 
lawyer tried force little spirit closed 
lips. Finally woman opened eyes Tuppence held glass 
lips. 
 
this." 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer brought colour back 
white revived marvellous fashion. tried sit 
fell back hand side. 
 
"It's whispered. "I 
 
lay back closed eyes. 
 
Sir James kept finger minute longer, withdrew 

 
now." 
 
three moved away, stood together talking low voices. One 
conscious certain feeling Clearly 
scheme lady question 
moment. time could nothing. 
 
Tuppence related Mrs. Vandemeyer declared willing 
identity Mr. Brown, consented 
discover reveal Jane Finn. Julius 

 
"That's right, Miss Tuppence. guess hundred 
thousand pounds look good morning lady 
night. There's nothing worry over. won't speak without 
cash anyway, 
 
certainly good deal common sense this, Tuppence 
felt little 
 
"What say said Sir James "I must 
however, cannot help wishing interrupted minute 
did. Still, cannot matter waiting 
morning." 
 
looked across figure bed. Mrs. Vandemeyer lay 
perfectly closed eyes. shook head. 
 
"Well," said Tuppence, attempt "we must wait 
morning, that's all. don't think ought leave 

 
"What leaving bright boy 
 
suppose came round it. Albert couldn't 
stop her." 
 
"I guess won't want make away 
 
"She seemed frightened 
 
Real plumb scared him?" 
 
"Yes. looked round said even walls 
 
meant said Julius interest. 
 
"Miss Tuppence right," said Sir James quietly. "We must leave 
Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
 
Julius stared him. 
 
"You think he'd get her? to-morrow morning. 
could know, 
 
"You forget suggestion said Sir James dryly. 
"We formidable believe, exercise due 
care, good chance delivered 
hands. must neglect important 
must would suggest Miss Tuppence 
go bed, I, Mr. Hersheimmer, share 
 
Tuppence protest, happening glance bed 
saw Mrs. Vandemeyer, eyes expression 
mingled fear face quite words 
lips. 
 
moment wondered whether faint heart attack 
gigantic remembering deadly could hardly 
credit looked expression disappeared 
Mrs. Vandemeyer lay before. 
moment girl fancied must it. determined 
nevertheless 
 
"Well," said Julius, "I guess we'd better make move 
way." 
 
others fell suggestion. Sir James felt Mrs. 
Vandemeyer's 
 
"Perfectly said low voice Tuppence. 
absolutely right 
 
girl hesitated moment bed. intensity expression 
surprised impressed Mrs. Vandemeyer lifted 
seemed struggling speak. Tuppence bent her. 
 
seemed unable proceed, something 
sounded like tried again. 
 
Tuppence bent lower breath. 
 
voice stopped. 
 
half-closed eyes seemed still send agonized message. 
 
Moved sudden girl said 
 
"I shan't leave shall sit night." 
 
flash relief showed descended more. Apparently 
Mrs. Vandemeyer words awakened new uneasiness 
Tuppence. meant low "Mr. Tuppence 
caught looking shoulder. big 
sinister fashion eyes. Plenty room 
man hide herself, Tuppence pulled open 
looked inside. looked 
bed. possible 
 
Tuppence gave familiar shake shoulders. absurd, 
giving way Slowly went room. Julius Sir 
James talking low voice. Sir James turned her. 
 
door please, Miss Tuppence, take 
must chance anyone entering room." 
 
gravity manner impressed them, Tuppence felt less ashamed 
attack 
 
remarked Julius suddenly, "there's Tuppence's bright boy. guess 
I'd better go ease young mind. That's Tuppence." 
 
"How get in, way?" asked Tuppence suddenly. "I forgot 

 
"Well, Albert got right. ran round Sir James 
here, came right on. boy look us, 
mite worried might happened you. He'd 
listening outside door flat, couldn't hear anything. 
suggested sending us coal lift instead ringing 
bell. sure enough landed came right along 
find you. Albert's still below, must mad 
time." Julius departed abruptly. 
 
"Now then, Miss Tuppence," said Sir James, "you know place better 
do. suggest take 
 
Tuppence considered moment two. 
 
"I think Mrs. Vandemeyer's boudoir would 
said last, led way there. 
 
Sir James looked round 
 
"This well, now, dear young lady, go bed 
get 
 
Tuppence shook head 
 
"I thank you, Sir James. dream Mr. Brown 

 
"But you'll 
 
"No, I'd rather stay 
 
lawyer gave in. 
 
Julius minutes later, Albert 
turn failed 
persuade Tuppence go bed, said 
 
"At rate, you've got something eat right away. 

 
Tuppence directed him, returned minutes cold 
three 
 
hearty girl felt inclined fancies 
half hour before. power money bribe could fail. 
 
"And now, Miss Tuppence," said Sir James, "we want hear 

 
"That's so," agreed Julius. 
 
Tuppence adventures Julius 
occasionally admiring Sir James said nothing 
finished, quiet done, Miss Tuppence," made 
flush pleasure. 
 
"There's one thing don't get said Julius. "What put 
clearing out?" 
 
"I don't know," confessed Tuppence. 
 
Sir James stroked chin thoughtfully. 
 
"The room great looks though 
Almost though got sudden warning go 
one." 
 
"Mr. Brown, said Julius 
 
lawyer looked deliberately minute two. 
 
"Why not?" said. 
him." 
 
Julius flushed 
 
"I feel mad think handed Jane's photograph 
like ever lay hands again, I'll 

 
"That likely one," said dryly. 
 
"I guess you're right," said Julius "And, case, it's 
original I'm after. think be, Sir 
 
lawyer shook head. 
 
say. I've good idea been." 
 
"You 
 
Sir James smiled. 
 
"At scene 

 
Impossible. 
 
"No, dear sir, asked anyone name Jane Finn 
there. Now, girl placed would almost certainly 
assumed 
 
you," cried Julius. "I never thought that!" 
 
"It fairly said other. 
 
"Perhaps doctor's too," suggested Tuppence. 
 
Julius shook head. 
 
"I don't think so. took once. No, I'm pretty sure Dr. 
right." 
 
say?" asked Sir James. "That 

 
"Why?" demanded Tuppence. 
 
"Because happened meet morning. I've known slightly 
years, morning ran across street. 
Staying told me." turned Julius. 
tell coming 
 
Julius shook head. 
 
Sir James. "You mention name 
afternoon, would suggested going 
information card 
 
"I guess I'm said Julius unusual "I ought 
thought false name 
 
"How could think anything falling cried 
Tuppence. "I'm sure anyone else would killed right off." 
 
"Well, guess doesn't matter now, said Julius. "We've got 
Mrs. Vandemeyer that's 
 
"Yes," said Tuppence, lack assurance voice. 
 
silence settled party. Little little magic 
night began gain hold them. sudden 
Suddenly Tuppence 
sprang cry. 
 
"I can't help it. know Mr. Brown's somewhere FEEL 
him." 
 
Tuppence, could be? open hall. 
one could come front door without seeing hearing 
him." 
 
"I can't help it. FEEL he's 
 
looked Sir James, replied 
 
"With due deference feelings, Miss Tuppence (and mine well 
see possible anyone 
flat without 
 
girl little 
 
night always rather 
 
"Yes," said Sir James. "We condition people holding 
Perhaps medium present might get marvellous 

 
"Do believe asked Tuppence, opening eyes wide. 
 
lawyer shrugged shoulders. 
 
"There truth it, without doubt. testimony 
would pass muster 
 
hours drew on. first faint Sir James 
drew aside see, slow 
rising sun sleeping city. Somehow, coming 
light, fancies past night seemed absurd. 
Tuppence's spirits revived 
 
said. "It's going day. shall find 
Tommy. Jane Finn. everything shall ask Mr. 
Carter can't made 
 
seven o'clock Tuppence go make tea. 
returned tray, containing four 
 
"Who's cup inquired Julius. 
 
"The course. suppose might call that?" 
 
tea seems kind last said Julius 
thoughtfully. 
 
"Yes, admitted Tuppence. "But, anyway, Perhaps 
you'd come, too, case springs me, anything. see, 
don't know mood wake in." 
 
Sir James Julius accompanied door. 
 
Oh, course, I've got myself." 
 
put turned it, paused. 
 
all, she's murmured 
 
replied Julius 
 
Sir James said nothing. 
 
Tuppence drew long breath heaved sigh relief 
saw Mrs. Vandemeyer lying bed. 
 
"Good morning," remarked cheerfully. "I've brought 
 
Mrs. Vandemeyer reply. Tuppence put cup table 
bed went across draw Mrs. 
Vandemeyer still lay without movement. sudden fear 
heart, Tuppence ran bed. hand lifted cold 
Mrs. Vandemeyer would never speak 
 
cry brought others. minutes Mrs. Vandemeyer 
dead evidently died 

 
"If isn't cried Julius despair. 
 
lawyer curious gleam eyes. 
 
"If replied. 
 
"You don't say, that's plumb one could 
got in." 
 
"No," admitted lawyer. "I don't see could. 
point Mr. Brown, 
 
"But 
 
"Yes, must find out." stood 
gently "We must find said quietly, 
Tuppence felt Mr. Brown would like tone 
simple words. 
 
Julius's glance went window. 
 
"The remarked. "Do 
 
Tuppence shook head. 
 
"The goes along far boudoir. there." 
 
"He might slipped suggested Julius. 
 
Sir James interrupted him. 
 
"Mr. Brown's methods meantime must send 
so, anything room might 
value 
 
three charred mass grate indicated 
Mrs. Vandemeyer burning papers eve 
Nothing importance remained, though searched 
well. 
 
"There's that," said Tuppence suddenly, pointing small, 
old-fashioned safe let wall. "It's believe, 
might something else it." 
 
key Julius swung open door, searched 
inside. time task. 
 
"Well," said Tuppence impatiently. 
 
pause Julius answered, withdrew head 
shut door. 
 
said. 
 
five minutes young doctor arrived, hastily 
Sir James, 
 
possibly 

 
Tuppence remembered glass upset. new thought drove 
found little bottle Mrs. Vandemeyer 
poured 
 
three parts full. EMPTY. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER CONSULTATION 
 
NOTHING surprising Tuppence ease 
simplicity everything owing Sir James's 
skilful doctor accepted quite readily theory Mrs. 
Vandemeyer accidentally taken doubted 
whether inquest would necessary. so, would let Sir James 
know. understood Mrs. Vandemeyer eve departure 
abroad, servants already Sir James young 
friends paying call upon her, suddenly stricken 
spent night flat, leave 
alone. know not, Sir James 
referred Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
 
Shortly afterwards nurse arrived take charge, left 
building. 
 
"And now?" asked Julius, gesture despair. "I guess we're 

 
Sir James stroked chin thoughtfully. 
 
"No," said quietly. "There still chance Dr. Hall may 
able tell us 
 
I'd forgotten him." 
 
"The chance must think told 
staying suggest call upon 
soon possible. Shall say bath 
 
arranged Tuppence Julius return 
call Sir James car. faithfully carried 
out, little eleven drew 
asked Dr. Hall, went search him. 
minutes little doctor came towards them. 
 
"Can spare us minutes, Dr. said Sir James 
"Let introduce Miss Mr. Hersheimmer, think, 
already know." 
 
gleam came doctor's eye shook hands 
Julius. 
 
"Ah, yes, young friend tree right, eh?" 
 
"I guess it's owing skilful 
 
"And heart 
 
said Julius 
 
"To come point, word asked 
Sir James. 
 
think room shall quite 

 
led way, others followed him. sat down, 
doctor looked Sir James. 
 
"Dr. Hall, anxious find certain young lady 
purpose obtaining statement her. reason believe 
one time another establishment 
hope professional 
questioning 
 
"I suppose matter 
 
Sir James hesitated moment, replied: 
 
"Yes." 
 
"I shall pleased give information power. 
young lady's Mr. Hersheimmer asked me, half 
turned Julius. 
 
"The said Sir James "is really would 
almost certainly sent assumed one. like 
know acquainted Mrs. 
 
"Mrs. Vandemeyer, 20 South Audley know 
 
"You aware 
 
"What mean?" 
 
"You know Mrs. Vandemeyer 
 
idea it! 
 
"She took last night." 
 

 
like say myself. Anyway, 
found dead morning." 
 
"Very singularly handsome woman. presume friend 
yours, since acquainted 
 
"I acquainted details found 

 
said 
 
"Yes," said Sir James, stroked chin reflectively. 
 
"This sad news, excuse say 
see bears subject 
 
"It bears way, fact Mrs. Vandemeyer 
committed young relative 
 
Julius leaned forward eagerly. 
 
"That said doctor quietly. 
 
"Under name 
 
Vandemeyer. understood Mrs. 
 
"And came you?" 
 
"As far remember June July 
 
"Was mental 
 
"She perfectly understood Mrs. 
Vandemeyer girl Lusitania 
ship sunk, suffered severe shock 

 
right track, think?" Sir James looked round. 
 
"As said before, I'm returned Julius. 
 
doctor looked curiously. 
 
"You spoke wanting statement said. 
able give 
 
said perfectly 
 
"So is. Nevertheless, want statement concerning 
events prior May 7, able give 
you." 
 
looked little man, nodded cheerfully. 
 
"It's said. "A great especially Sir 
James, matter important. is, tell 

 
"But why, man? all, why?" 
 
little man shifted benevolent glance excited young 
American. 
 
"Because Vandemeyer suffering complete loss 
 
"WHAT?" 
 
"Quite so. interesting case, interesting case. 
really, would think. several well known 
It's first case kind I've 
personal must admit I've found 
something rather little man's 
satisfaction. 
 
"And said Sir James slowly. 
 
"Nothing prior May 7, date memory good 
mine." 
 
"Then first thing 
 
"Is landing Everything 
know name, come from, was. 
couldn't even speak 
 
"But surely put Julius. 
 
"No, dear sir. Quite normal circumstances. Severe shock 
nervous system. Loss memory proceeds nearly always 
lines. suggested course. There's good man 
study Mrs. Vandemeyer opposed 
idea might result course." 
 
"I imagine said Sir James 
 
"I fell views. certain given 
cases. girl believe. seemed 
pity talked 
Besides, special treatment pursue 
cases. really matter 
 

 
"Yes, sooner later, memory suddenly 
probability girl entirely forgotten 
intervening period, take life left 

 
"And expect 
 
doctor shrugged shoulders. 
 
"Ah, cannot say. Sometimes matter months, sometimes 
known long twenty Sometimes another shock 
trick. One took away." 
 
eh?" said Julius thoughtfully. 
 
"Exactly. case little man's voice 
on, 
 
Julius seem 
thoughts Suddenly came brown study, 
hit table fist every one 
doctor all. 
 
"I've got it! guess, I'd like medical opinion plan 
I'm Say Jane cross again, 
thing ship, every one 
take on. Wouldn't Wouldn't 
give mighty big whatever 
is, start right 
 
"A interesting Mr. Hersheimmer. opinion, 
would successful. unfortunate chance 
conditions 
 
"Not nature, perhaps, I'm talking 
 

 
"Why, yes. What's Hire 
 
"A murmured Dr. Hall 
 
hire difficulty, 
Governments apt bit 
war. won't sell Still, guess got 
over. Ever heard word Well, gets every 
reckon shan't really need fire every 
one round loud enough ship 
ought enough innocent young girl like Jane. time 
she's got her, 
lot 
ought right back May, How's 
bare 
 
Dr. Hall looked Julius. Everything moment 
incapable saying eloquent 
 
"No," said Julius, answer it, "I'm 
perfectly possible. It's done every day States 
Haven't seen collision What's 
difference buying train buying Get 
properties go right 
 
Dr. Hall found voice. 
 
"But expense, dear sir." voice rose. "The 

 
doesn't worry explained Julius 
 
Dr. Hall turned appealing face Sir James, smiled 
 
"Mr. Hersheimmer well well 
 
doctor's glance came back Julius new subtle quality 
it. longer young fellow habit falling 
doctor's eyes held deference accorded really 
rich man. 
 
"Very remarkable plan. murmured. "The 
American word fear 
perhaps little behind times 
really mean carry remarkable plan 
 
"You bottom dollar do." 
 
doctor believed 
suggested thing, would grave doubts 

 
"I cannot guarantee pointed out. "Perhaps ought make 
quite 
 
that's right," said Julius. "You Jane, 
leave rest me." 
 

 
"Miss Vandemeyer, then. get long distance 
place right away, ask send up; shall run 
fetch 
 
doctor 
 
"I beg pardon, Mr. Hersheimmer. thought 
 
what?" 
 
"That Miss Vandemeyer longer 
 
 
 
CHAPTER TUPPENCE RECEIVES PROPOSAL 
 
JULIUS sprang up. 
 
"What?" 
 
"I thought aware that." 
 
"When 
 
"Let see. To-day Monday, not? must last 
evening 

 
"That Before, 
 
"Let yes, afterwards. urgent message arrived Mrs. 
Vandemeyer. young lady nurse charge left 
night 
 
Julius sank back chair. 
 
"My God, 

 
Dr. Hall looked 
 
"I don't understand. young lady all?" 
 
Tuppence shook head. speak warning glance 
Sir James made hold lawyer rose. 
 
"I'm much obliged you, Hall. We're grateful you've 
told us. I'm afraid we're position track Miss 
Vandemeyer anew. nurse accompanied suppose 
don't know is?" 
 
doctor shook head. 
 
"We've heard her, understood remain 
Miss Vandemeyer while. Surely 
girl 
 
"That remains said Sir James gravely. 
 
hesitated. 
 
"You think ought go 
 
"No, no. probability young lady 
 
doctor completely satisfied, saw Sir James 
determined say more, realized try extract 
information famous would mere waste labour. 
Accordingly, wished left 
minutes stood car 
 
"How cried Tuppence. "To think Julius must 
actually 
 
"I darned muttered Julius gloomily. 
 
"You couldn't know," Tuppence him. he?" appealed 
Sir James. 
 
"I advise said latter "No use 
crying know." 
 
"The great thing added Tuppence practical. 
 
Sir James shrugged shoulders. 
 
"You might nurse accompanied girl. 
course suggest, must confess hope much 
result. Otherwise nothing 
 
said Tuppence 
 
"We must hope said Sir James. yes, must go 

 
head eyes met almost 
shook head. Julius understood. lawyer 
considered case young face grew grave. Sir 
James took Tuppence's hand. 
 
"You must let know anything comes light. Letters 
always 
 
Tuppence stared 
 
"You going 
 
"I told you. Don't 
 
"Yes, girl hesitated. 
 
Sir James shrugged shoulders. 
 
"My dear young lady, nothing more, fear. 
ended thin air. take word nothing 
done. anything arise, shall glad advise 
way can." 
 
words gave Tuppence feeling. 
 
"I suppose you're right," said. thank much 
trying help us. 
 
Julius car. momentary pity came Sir James's 
keen eyes, gazed girl's face. 
 
"Don't Miss Tuppence," said low voice. 
isn't always One sometimes 
put work well." 
 
Something tone made Tuppence glance sharply. shook head 
smile. 
 
"No, shan't say more. Great mistake say much. Remember 
that. Never tell even person know best. 

 
strode away. Tuppence stared him. beginning 
understand Sir James's thrown hint 
fashion. exactly lay 
behind last brief mean that, all, 
abandoned case; that, would working still 

 
interrupted Julius, "get 
right in." 
 
"You're looking kind remarked started off. 
"Did old guy say anything 
 
Tuppence opened mouth shut again. Sir 
James's words sounded "Never tell even 
person know like flash came mind 
another memory. Julius safe flat, question 
pause reply, really 
found something wished keep could make 
could 
 
"Nothing replied. 
 
felt rather saw Julius throw sideways glance her. 
 
"Say, shall go 
 
"If 
 
ran trees silence. beautiful 
day. keen rush air brought new 
Tuppence. 
 
"Say, Miss Tuppence, think I'm ever going find 
 
Julius spoke voice. mood 
Tuppence turned stared surprise. nodded. 
 
"That's so. I'm getting business. Sir James to-day 
hadn't got hope all, could see that. don't like don't 
together he's pretty guess wouldn't quit 
chance would he?" 
 
Tuppence felt rather belief 
Julius also withheld something her, remained 
 
"He suggested reminded him. 
 
"Yes, fed up. 
I've half mind go back States right away." 
 
no!" cried Tuppence. "We've got find 
 
"I sure forgot said Julius "That's so. must 
find him. I've ever since started 
dreams rotten poor business. I'm quit 
them. Say, Miss Tuppence, there's something I'd like ask you." 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"You Beresford. it?" 
 
"I don't understand you," replied Tuppence dignity, adding rather 
"And, anyway, you're 
 
"Not got sort kindly feeling one 
 
"Certainly not," said Tuppence 
more." 
 
"I guess every pair lovers said sometime 
observed Julius. 
 
Tuppence. "Do look sort girl that's always 
falling love every man 
 
"You not. look sort girl that's mighty often getting 
fallen love 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence, rather taken "That's 
suppose?" 
 
let's get this. Supposing never find Beresford 

 
"All it! face facts. Supposing 
 
"And business out. going do?" 
 
"I don't know," said Tuppence 
 
"You'll darned poor 
 
"I shall right," Tuppence usual 
kind 
 
"What inquired Julius. "Got views 
 
"I intend course," replied Tuppence. "That is, 
paused, knew momentary draw back, stuck 
guns find one rich enough make worth 
while. That's isn't it? dare say despise it." 
 
"I never despise business said Julius. "What particular 
figure 
 
asked Tuppence, puzzled. "Do mean tall 
 
"No. 
 
"Oh, haven't quite worked out." 
 
"What me?" 
 

 
"Sure thing." 
 
"Oh, 
 
"Why not?" 
 
"I tell 
 
not?" 
 
"It would seem 
 
"I don't see anything unfair it. call that's all. 
admire Miss Tuppence, girl I've ever 
You're darned I'd love give real, good 
time. Say word, we'll run round right away 
fix ring business." 
 
"I gasped Tuppence. 
 
"Because 
 
"No, no, NO!" 
 
then?" 
 
Tuppence merely continued shake head 
 
"You can't reasonably expect dollars I've 
 
"Oh, isn't that," gasped Tuppence almost laugh. 
"But much, that, think I'd better say 
 
"I'd obliged you'd favour think 

 
"It's 
 
"Still, guess we'll leave like that." 
 
"Very said Tuppence 
 
Neither spoke reached Ritz. 
 
Tuppence went upstairs room. felt morally 
ground conflict Julius's vigorous personality. Sitting 
front glass, stared reflection 
minutes. 
 
murmured Tuppence length, making "Little 
Everything you've ever hoped for, go 
like little It's one chance. 
don't take it? it? it? 
 
answer question, eyes fell small 
Tommy stood shabby 
moment struggled abandoning presence, 
held lips burst fit 
 
"Oh, Tommy, cried, "I love may never see 

 
end five minutes Tuppence sat up, pushed 
back hair. 
 
"That's that," observed "Let's look facts face. 
seem fallen boy probably doesn't 
care two me." paused. 
though arguing "I don't KNOW does. He'd 
never dared say so. I've always jumped 
sentimental anybody. girls I've 
always thought so. suppose shall sleep photograph 
pillow, dream night. It's dreadful feel you've 
false 
 
Tuppence shook head 
 
"I don't know say Julius, I'm sure. Oh, fool 
I'll say American he'll insist 
upon reason. wonder find anything 
 
Tuppence's went another events 
last night carefully Somehow, seemed bound 
Sir James's enigmatical 
 
Suddenly gave great colour faded face. 
eyes, gazed front her, 
 
murmured. must going mad even 
think 
 
explained 
 
moment's reflection sat wrote note, weighing 
word so. Finally nodded head though satisfied, 
slipped envelope addressed Julius. went 
passage knocked door. 
expected, room empty. left note table. 
 
small waiting outside door returned 
it. 
 
you, 
 
Tuppence took tore open 
gave cry. telegram 
 
 
 
CHAPTER ADVENTURES TOMMY 
 
darkness fire, Tommy dragged 
slowly back life. last opened eyes, 
conscious nothing pain 
vaguely aware he? 
bedroom Ritz. 
devil matter 
 
said Tommy, tried sit up. 
sinister house Soho. uttered fell back. 
carefully. 
 
"He coming remarked voice near Tommy's recognized 
bearded efficient German, lay 
felt would pity come round 
pain head became little less felt 
quite incapable collecting Painfully tried 
happened. Obviously somebody must crept behind 
listened struck blow head. knew 
would probability give short 
Undoubtedly tight place. Nobody knew was, therefore 
need expect outside assistance, must depend solely 

 
"Well, murmured Tommy himself, repeated former 
remark. 
 
time succeeded sitting up. 
 
minute German stepped forward placed glass lips, 
brief command Tommy obeyed. draught 
made cleared brain marvellous manner. 
 
lying room meeting 
one side German, 
doorkeeper let in. others together 
little distance away. Tommy missed one face. man known Number 
One longer company. 
 
better?" asked German, removed empty glass. 
 
"Yes, returned Tommy cheerfully. 
 
"Ah, young friend, lucky 
good Conrad struck indicated doorkeeper 
man 
 
Tommy twisted head round effort. 
 
said, "so you're you? strikes 
lucky too. look feel it's almost 
pity I've enabled 
 
man bearded man said 
 
"He would run risk that." 
 
"Just replied Tommy. "I know it's fashion run 
rather believe myself." 
 
manner last Tommy Beresford one 
young distinguished special intellectual 
ability, emphatically best known 
natural caution fall like 
Tommy realized perfectly lay 
chance behind manner brains 

 
cold accents German took 
 
"Have anything say put death 
 
lots replied Tommy before. 
 
"Do deny listening 
 
"I not. must really conversation 
interesting 
 
"How get in?" 
 
"Dear old Conrad here." Tommy smiled him. "I hesitate 
suggest faithful servant, really ought 
better 
 
Conrad snarled said man beard 
swung round upon him: 
 
"He gave word. know?" 
 
"Yes," Tommy in. "How know? Don't blame poor 
fellow. hasty action given pleasure seeing 
face 
 
fancied words caused among 
German wave hand. 
 
men tell said 
 
said Tommy, "but I'm dead 
 
"You soon be, young friend," said 
 
murmur came others. 
 
Tommy's heart beat 
 
"I think not," said firmly. "I great objection 

 
got puzzled, saw look face. 
 
"Can give us reason put asked 

 
replied Tommy. "Look here, you've asking lot 
questions. Let ask one change. didn't kill 

 
German hesitated, Tommy seized advantage. 
 
"Because didn't know much obtained 
kill now, never know." 
 
emotions Boris became much him. stepped 
forward arms. 
 
"You "We give short 
Kill Kill him!" 
 
applause. 
 
"You said German, eyes Tommy. "What say 
that?" 
 
Tommy shrugged shoulders. Let ask 
questions. get Remember 
dear old Conrad wasn't it? get 
hold that? don't suppose came steps said 
first thing came 
 
Tommy pleased concluding words speech. 
regret Tuppence present appreciate full 
 
"That said working man suddenly. 

 
ugly murmur Tommy smiled 
 
"That's better. hope make success job 
don't use 
 
"You tell us betrayed said "But shall 
save no! shall tell us know. Boris, here, 
knows pretty ways making people 
 
said Tommy fighting singularly unpleasant 
feeling "You neither kill 
me." 
 
"And not?" asked Boris. 
 
"Because you'd kill lays golden replied Tommy 
quietly. 
 
momentary pause. seemed though Tommy's persistent 
assurance last longer completely sure 
themselves. man shabby clothes stared Tommy 
 
"He's you, said quietly. 
 
Tommy hated him. man seen him? 
 
German, effort, turned Tommy. 
 
"What mean?" 
 
"What think mean?" Tommy, searching 
mind. 
 
Suddenly Boris stepped forward, shook fist Tommy's face. 
 

 
"Don't get good said Tommy "That's 
worst can't keep calm. Now, ask you, look 
though thought least chance me?" 
 
looked confidently round, glad could hear 
persistent beating heart gave lie words. 
 
"No," admitted Boris last "you not." 
 
"Thank God, he's mind thought Tommy. Aloud pursued 

 
"And know something puts 
position propose 
 
"A bearded man took sharply. 
 
life liberty paused. 
 
what?" 
 
pressed forward. could heard pin 
 
Slowly Tommy spoke. 
 
"The papers Danvers brought America 
 
effect words Every one feet. 
German waved back. leaned Tommy, face purple 
excitement. 
 
got them, then?" 
 
magnificent calm Tommy shook head. 
 
"You know 
 
Tommy shook head. "Not 
 
angry words failed him. 
 
Tommy looked round. saw anger every face, 
calm assurance done one doubted something lay 
behind words. 
 
"I don't know papers believe find them. 

 

 
Tommy raised hand, silenced 
 
"I call I'm pretty sure 
known one myself. case 
produce give life liberty 

 
"And said German quietly. 
 
Tommy lay back 
 
"The said thoughtfully, "is less 
 
moment German hesitated. made sign 
 
"Take room." 
 
five minutes, Tommy sat bed room next door. 
heart beating risked would 
agonized questioning went 
within him, talked 
doorkeeper point 
 
last door opened, German called Conrad 
return. 
 
"Let's hope judge hasn't put black cap on," remarked Tommy 
"That's right, march in. prisoner 

 
German seated behind table. Tommy 
sit opposite him. 
 
"We said "on terms. papers must delivered 
us go 
 
said Tommy "How think look 
keep tied here?" 
 
"What then?" 
 
"I must liberty go business way." 
 
German laughed. 
 
"Do think little children let walk leaving 
us pretty story full 
 
"No," said Tommy thoughtfully. infinitely me, 
really think would agree plan. well, must 
arrange compromise. would attached little Conrad 
He's faithful fellow, ready 
 
"We said German "that remain here. 
One number carry instructions 
operations return report 
instruct 
 
"You're complained Tommy. "It's delicate affair, 
fellow likely not, 
shall be? don't believe one got 
 
German table. 
 
terms. Otherwise, 
 
Tommy leaned back 
 
"I like it, then. one thing 
must see 
 
"What girl?" 
 
"Jane Finn, course." 
 
looked curiously minutes, said slowly, 
though choosing words 
 
"Do know tell 
 
Tommy's heart beat little Would succeed coming face 
face girl 
 
"I shall ask tell said quietly. "Not 
many words, is." 
 
"Then see her?" 
 
Tommy paused. 
 
"To watch face ask one replied last. 
 
look eyes Tommy quite 
understand. 
 
"She able answer 
 
"That matter. shall seen face ask it." 
 
"And think tell gave short 
disagreeable laugh. ever, Tommy felt 
somewhere understand. German looked 
"I wonder whether, all, know much 
think?" said softly. 
 
Tommy felt less sure moment before. hold 
slipped little. puzzled. said spoke 
impulse moment. 
 
"There may things know not. pretended 
aware details show. equally I've got 
something don't know about. that's 
mean Danvers damned clever broke 
said much. 
 
face little. 
 
murmured. "I paused minute, waved 
"Take away. know." 
 
said Tommy. "What girl?" 
 
"That may perhaps 
 
"It must be." 
 
"We see it. one person decide that." 
 
asked Tommy. knew answer. 
 
"Mr. 
 
"Shall see him?" 
 

 
said Conrad 
 
Tommy rose Outside door 
mount stairs. followed close behind. floor 
Conrad opened door Tommy passed small room. Conrad 
gas went out. Tommy heard sound key 
turned 
 
set work examine smaller room 
one something peculiarly 
atmosphere it. realized window. walked 
round it. walls everywhere else. Four 
pictures hung wall representing scenes 
box church 
flowers, latter brought Tommy's mind 
back Mr. Brown again. sealed closed 
heavy door, felt cut world, 
sinister power seemed would, 
one could ever hear him. place living 
 
effort Tommy pulled together. sank bed 
gave reflection. head also, 
silence place 
 
said Tommy, trying himself, "I shall see 
mysterious Mr. Brown bit luck 
shall see mysterious Jane Finn also. 
 
Tommy forced admit prospect looked 
 
 
 
CHAPTER ANNETTE 
 
troubles future, however, soon faded troubles 
present. these, immediate pressing 
Tommy vigorous 
lunch seemed belong another 
recognized fact would make success 

 
twice discarded 
dignity, door. nobody answered 
 
said Tommy indignantly. "They can't mean 
fear passed mind might, 
perhaps, one making prisoner speak, 
attributed Boris. reflection dismissed idea. 
 
"It's faced "That's fellow 
shall enjoy getting even one days. bit 
spite part. I'm certain it." 
 
induced feeling would 
extremely pleasant bring something 
head. Tommy stroked head gave 
pleasures imagination. Finally bright idea flashed 
across brain. imagination Conrad 
undoubtedly house. others, possible 
exception bearded German, merely used 
Therefore, wait Conrad behind door, 
entered bring chair, one 
head. One would, course, careful hit 
then, simply walk out! met anyone way down, 
thought encounter 
affair infinitely line verbal encounter 
afternoon. Intoxicated plan, Tommy gently 
picture Devil settled position. 
hopes plan seemed simple 
 
Time went on, Conrad Night day 
prison room, Tommy's enjoyed certain 
degree accuracy, informed nine o'clock 
evening. Tommy reflected supper arrive soon 
would question waiting ten o'clock hope 
deserted him, flung bed seek consolation 
five minutes forgotten. 
 
sound key turning lock 
belonging type hero famous full 
possession Tommy merely 
wondered vaguely was. remembered, looked 
watch. eight o'clock. 
 
"It's either early morning tea deduced young man, 
"and pray God it's 
 
door swung open. late, Tommy remembered scheme 
moment later glad 
had, Conrad girl. carried 
tray set table. 
 
feeble light gas Tommy her. decided 
one beautiful girls ever seen. 
hair full rich brown, sudden gold 
though struggling 
quality face. eyes, set wide apart, 
golden recalled memory 
 
thought shot Tommy's mind. 
 
"Are Jane asked 
 
girl shook head 
 
"My name Annette, 
 
spoke broken 
 
"Oh!" said Tommy, rather taken 
 
Monsieur 
 
"Not length said Tommy. "What's that? 
 
girl nodded. Tommy dropped bed came 
contents consisted 
coffee. 
 
"The living equal observed sigh. "But 
last receive Lord made truly 

 
drew chair, girl turned away door. 
 
cried Tommy. "There lots things want ask you, 
Annette. Don't tell you're 
anything, can't believe it." 
 
"I SERVICE, related 
 
"I see," said Tommy. "You know asked now. ever 
heard name?" 
 
"I heard people speak Jane Finn, 
 
"You don't know is?" 
 
Annette shook head. 
 
"She's house, 
 
no, must go waiting me." 
 
hurried out. key turned 
 
"I wonder Tommy, continued make 
"With bit girl might help get 
here. doesn't look like one 
 
one o'clock Annette another tray, time 
Conrad accompanied her. 
 
"Good morning," said Tommy "You used 
see." 
 
Conrad 
 
"No light you, old There, there, can't always 
brains well 
know? dear smell 
 
man. "It's little enough time you'll 
talk in, 
 
remark unpleasant suggestion, Tommy it. 
sat table. 
 
said, wave hand. thy 

 
evening Tommy sat bed, Would Conrad 
accompany not, risk trying make 
her? decided must leave stone 
position 
 
eight o'clock familiar sound key turning made spring 
feet. girl alone. 
 
"I want speak you." obeyed. 
 
"Look here, Annette, want help get this." shook 
head. 
 
three floor 
 
"Oh!" Tommy secretly grateful information. "But would 
help 
 
"No, 
 
"Why not?" 
 
girl hesitated. 
 
"I people. upon them. 
quite right keep here." 
 
bad Annette. you'll help me, I'll take away 
lot them. you'd probably get good 
 
girl merely shook head. 
 
"I dare not, afraid them." 
 
turned away. 
 
anything help another girl?" cried Tommy. "She's 
age too. Won't save 
 
"You mean Jane 
 
"Yes." 
 
"It came look for? 
 
"That's it." 
 
girl looked him, passed hand across forehead. 
 
"Jane Finn. Always hear name. 
 
Tommy came forward eagerly. 
 
"You must know SOMETHING her?" 
 
girl turned away abruptly. 
 
"I know walked towards door. Suddenly 
uttered cry. Tommy caught sight picture 
laid wall night before. moment caught 
look terror eyes. changed relief. 
went room. Tommy could make nothing it. 
fancy meant attack it? Surely not. 
picture wall thoughtfully. 
 
Three days went Tommy felt strain 
telling saw one Conrad Annette, 
girl become spoke kind dark 
suspicion eyes. Tommy felt solitary 
went much longer would go gathered Conrad 
waiting orders "Mr. Perhaps, thought 
Tommy, abroad away, obliged wait 
return. 
 
evening third day brought rude 
 
barely seven o'clock heard footsteps outside 
passage. another minute door flung open. Conrad 
Number Tommy's heart sank 
sight them. 
 
said man "Got 
 
silent Conrad produced length fine next minute Number 
hands, horribly winding cord round 
Conrad held down. 
 
"What began Tommy. 
 
silent Conrad words 
lips. 
 
Number 14 proceeded task. another minute Tommy 
mere last Conrad 
 
you'd us, you? knew, 
didn't know. time 
know less right, 

 
Tommy lay silent. nothing say. failed. Somehow 
Mr. Brown seen 
Suddenly thought occurred him. 
 
"A good speech, said "But 
bonds let kind gentleman cut 
without 
 
said Number 14 we're green 
here, police We've ordered 
carriage to-morrow meantime we're 
taking 
 
said Tommy, 

 
it," said Number 
 
"With replied Tommy. "You're making sad 

 
"You don't us way said Number though 
still aren't you?" 
 
Tommy made reply. engaged wondering Mr. Brown 
discovered decided Tuppence, 
anxiety, gone disappearance 
made public gang slow put two two together. 
 
two men departed door Tommy left 
pleasant ones. Already limbs felt 
utterly could see hope anywhere. 
 
hour passed heard key softly 
door Annette. Tommy's heart beat little 
forgotten girl. possible come 
 
Suddenly heard voice: 
 
"Come it, Annette. doesn't want supper 
 
must take need 
things it." 
 
"Well, hurry up," 
 
Without looking Tommy girl went table, picked 
raised hand turned light. 
 
come that?" 
 
"I always turn out. told me. Shall it, 
Monsieur 
 
"No, come it." 
 
cried Annette, bed 
"You tied well, like 
frank tone 
moment, felt hand running lightly 
bonds, something small cold pressed 
hand. 
 
"Come on, 
 

 
door Tommy heard Conrad say: 
 
give 
 
footsteps died away. Tommy lay object 
Annette thrust hand small open. 
way avoided looking him, action 
light, came conclusion room overlooked. 
must somewhere walls. Remembering 
guarded always manner, saw probably 
observation time. said anything give 
revealed wish escape desire 
find Jane Finn, nothing could given clue 
True, question Annette proved 
personally Jane Finn, never pretended 
otherwise. question was, Annette really know 
intended primarily point could 
come conclusion. 
 
vital question drove others. Could he, 
bound was, manage cut cautiously 
open cord bound two 
together. awkward business, drew pain 
knife cut slowly 
went cut flesh last felt 
cord hands free, rest easy. Five minutes 
later stood difficulty, owing 
first care bind sat 
edge bed think. Conrad taken key door, 
could expect little assistance Annette. 
room door, consequently would wait 
two men returned fetch him. Tommy 
Moving infinite caution dark room, found 
famous picture. felt economical pleasure 
first plan would nothing 

 
night passed slowly. Tommy lived hours, 
last heard stood drew deep breath, 
clutched picture firmly. 
 
door faint light outside. Conrad went 
straight towards gas light it. Tommy deeply 
entered first. would pleasant get even 
Number 14 followed. stepped across Tommy 
brought picture terrific force head. Number 14 went 
broken glass. minute Tommy 
slipped pulled door. key turned 
withdrew Conrad door 
inside 
 
moment Tommy hesitated. sound one stirring 
floor below. voice came stairs. 
 
it?" 
 
Tommy felt small hand thrust his. Beside stood Annette. 
pointed ladder apparently led 
 
dragged another 
moment standing Tommy 
looked round. 
 
"This won't do. It's regular There's way out." 
 
girl put finger lips. crept top 
ladder 
 
beating door German another 
trying force door in. Annette explained 
 
"They think still inside. cannot hear Conrad 
says. door 
 
"I thought could hear went room?" 
 
"There next room. clever 
think anxious get in." 
 
look 
 
me." bent down. Tommy saw 
end long piece string handle big 
arranged carefully, turned Tommy. 
 
"Have key 
 
"Yes." 
 
"Give me." 
 
handed her. 
 
"I going down. think go 
BEHIND see you?" 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"There's big shadow Stand behind 
it. Take end string hand. I've let others 

 
time ask anything more, lightly 
ladder midst loud 
 
"Mon Mon y 
 
German turned oath. 
 
"Get this. Go 
 
cautiously Tommy swung back 
long turn well. behind 
still stairs. 
 
"AH!" Annette appeared something. "Mon 
la 
 
German her. unlocked door. Conrad 
out, 
 
"Where he? got him?" 
 
"We seen one," said German sharply. face "Who 
mean?" 
 
Conrad gave vent another oath. 
 
"He's got away." 
 
would passed us." 
 
moment, smile Tommy pulled 
came above. men pushing 
ladder disappeared darkness 
above. 
 
Quick flash Tommy dashed 
stairs, pulling girl him. one hall. 
last door swung 
open. Annette 
 
Tommy stood run upstairs again? madness 
possessed stood ground. 
would go without her. 
 
suddenly exclamation 
German, voice, clear 
 
would thought it?" 
 
Tommy still stood ground. command 
fancied was. 
 
then, louder still, words floated him: 
 
"This terrible house. want go back 

 
Tommy run back stairs. wanted go leave her. 
why? must try get away him. 
heart Conrad stairs, uttering savage cry 
sight him. came others. 
 
Tommy stopped rush straight blow 
caught point fell like 
second man body fell. higher staircase 
Tommy's realized 
would good health get house soon 
possible. regards Annette could nothing. got even 
one satisfaction. blow good one. 
 
door, behind him. square deserted. 
front house Evidently 
taken London that, body found many miles 
house Soho. driver jumped tried bar 
Tommy's way. Tommy's fist shot out, driver 

 
Tommy took heels soon. front door opened 
hail followed him. Fortunately none hit him. 
turned corner 
 
"There's one thing," thought himself, "they can't go 
They'll police do. wonder dared 
there." 
 
heard footsteps behind him, 
pace. got would safe. would 
policeman really wanted invoke aid 
police could possibly without it. meant 
general another moment reason bless 
started 
alarm dashed street. Tommy drew back 
minute pleasure seeing two 
German one, industriously red 
 
Tommy sat quietly allowed moments 
recovered breath. strolled gently 
opposite direction. glanced watch. little 
half-past rapidly growing light. next corner 
passed policeman cast suspicious eye him. Tommy 
felt slightly Then, passing hand face, 
laughed. three guy must 

 
without Bath establishment 
knew open night. emerged busy daylight feeling 
more, able make plans. 
 
First all, must square nothing since 
yesterday. turned shop ordered eggs 
coffee. Whilst read morning paper 
front him. Suddenly long article 
described behind Russia, 
arrived thought unofficial 
career firmly asserted he, 
leaders, author Russian 
Revolution. 
 
centre page 
 
"So that's Number 1 is," said Tommy mouth full eggs 
"Not doubt it, must push on." 
 
paid breakfast, 
sent name, message minutes 
later presence man go name 
"Mr. frown face. 
 
"Look here, you've business come asking way. 
thought distinctly 
 
"It was, sir. judged important lose time." 
 
briefly possible detailed experiences 
last days. 
 
through, Mr. Carter interrupted give 
orders left 
face. nodded Tommy finished. 
 
"Quite right. Every moment's Fear shall late anyway. 
wouldn't Would clear once. Still, may left 
something behind clue. say you've recognized 
Number 1 That's important. want something 
badly prevent Cabinet falling 
others? say two faces familiar you? One's Labour man, 
think? look see spot him." 
 
minute later, Tommy held one up. Mr. Carter exhibited surprise. 
 
"Ah, Shouldn't thought it. 
fellow, think give good handed another 
photograph Tommy, smiled other's "I'm right, 
then. he? Prominent 
course. We've suspected couldn't get proof. Yes, you've done 
well, young man. 29th, say, date. gives us 
little little time 
 
Tommy hesitated. 
 
Mr. Carter read 
 
"We deal General Strike menace, think. It's 
we've got draft treaty turns 
done. England plunged Ah, what's that? 
Come on, Beresford, we'll go look house 

 
Two duty front house Soho. inspector 
reported Mr. Carter low voice. latter turned Tommy. 
 
"The thought. might well go it." 
 
Going deserted house seemed Tommy 
character dream. Everything been. prison 
room broken meeting 
room long table. nowhere trace papers. 
Everything kind either destroyed taken away. 
sign Annette. 
 
"What tell girl puzzled me," said Mr. Carter. "You 
believe deliberately went 
 
"It would seem so, sir. ran upstairs getting door 

 
must belong then; but, woman, didn't feel 
like standing see young man evidently 
she's them, wouldn't gone 
 
"I can't believe she's really one them, sir. 

 
suppose?" said Mr. Carter smile made Tommy 
flush hair. admitted beauty rather 

 
"By way," observed Mr. Carter, "have shown Miss 
Tuppence She's letters you." 
 
afraid might get bit go 

 
Mr. Carter shook head. 
 
"Then wonder me." 
 
Mr. Carter looked him, Tommy explained. 
nodded thoughtfully. 
 
that's rather curious point. Unless mention Ritz 
accidental 
 
"It might been, sir. must found suddenly 
way." 
 
"Well," said Mr. Carter, looking round him, "there's nothing 
done here. lunch me?" 
 
sir. think I'd better get back 
Tuppence." 
 
"Of course. Give kind regards tell believe you're 
killed readily next time." 
 
Tommy 
 
"I take lot sir." 
 
"So said Mr. Carter dryly. "Well, Remember you're 
marked man now, take reasonable care 
 
"Thank you, sir." 
 
taxi briskly Tommy stepped in, swiftly borne 
anticipation startling 
Tuppence. 
 
she's to. way, 
suppose that's Annette meant didn't get 
time." thought little, seemed prove 
Mrs. Vandemeyer girl intimate terms. 
 
taxi drew Ritz. Tommy burst sacred 
enthusiasm received informed Miss 
Cowley gone quarter hour ago. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER TELEGRAM 
 
moment, Tommy strolled ordered 
four days' imprisonment taught 
anew value good 
 
middle conveying particularly choice Sole 
la mouth, caught sight Julius entering 
room. Tommy waved succeeded attracting 
other's attention. sight Tommy, Julius's eyes seemed though 
would head. strode 
Tommy's hand seemed latter quite unnecessary 
 
"Is really you?" 
 
"Of course is. shouldn't be?" 
 
"Why shouldn't be? Say, man, don't know you've given 
guess we'd solemn another 

 
"Who thought demanded Tommy. 
 

 
"She remembered good dying young, suppose. 
must certain amount original 
Tuppence, way?" 
 
here?" 
 
"No, fellows office said she'd gone out." 
 
dropped car hour 
ago. But, say, can't shed British calm yours, get 
it? God's earth time?" 
 
"If you're here," replied Tommy, now. It's going 
long 
 
Julius drew chair opposite side table, summoned 
hovering dictated turned Tommy. 
 
ahead. guess you've 
 
"One replied Tommy plunged 
 
Julius listened Half placed 
forgot end heaved long sigh. 
 
you. Reads like 
 
"And home said Tommy, stretching hand 

 
Julius, "I don't mind admitting we've 
adventures too." 
 
He, turn, assumed role Beginning 
unsuccessful passed return 
London, buying car, growing Tuppence, 
call upon Sir James, previous 
night. 
 
"But killed her?" asked Tommy. "I don't quite 
 
"The doctor took replied Julius dryly. 
 
"And Sir think?" 
 
legal likewise human replied Julius. 
"I say went detail events 
morning. 
 
memory, eh?" said Tommy interest. "By explains 
looked spoke questioning her. Bit 
slip part, wasn't sort thing fellow would 
likely 
 
"They didn't give sort hint Jane 
 
Tommy shook head 
 
"Not word. I'm bit know. ought got 

 
"I guess you're lucky all. bluff 
goods right. ever came think 

 
"I think something," said Tommy 
 
moment's pause, Tommy Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
death. 
 
"There's doubt 
 
"I believe not. least call heart failure induced 
It's right. don't want 
worried guess Tuppence even 
Sir James got 
 
"Mr. Tommy. 
 
"Sure thing." 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"All said thoughtfully, "Mr. Brown hasn't got 
don't see got out." 
 
"How thought magnetic 
influence Mrs. Vandemeyer commit 
 
Tommy looked 
 
Julius. Distinctly good. Especially 
leaves real Mr. Brown flesh blood. think 
young detectives must get work, study 
solution 
mystery them. Let's go round scene crime. wish 
could get hold Tuppence. Ritz would enjoy spectacle 
glad 
 
Inquiry office revealed fact Tuppence yet 
returned. 
 
"All same, guess I'll look round said Julius. 
"She might 
 
Suddenly boy spoke Tommy's 
 
"The young gone away train, think, sir," murmured 

 
"What?" Tommy round upon him. 
 
small boy became before. 
 
"The sir. heard tell driver Charing Cross look 

 
Tommy stared him, eyes opening wide surprise. 
small boy "So thought, asked 

 
Tommy interrupted him: 
 
"When ask 
 
"When took sir." 
 
"A 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
"When that?" 
 
"About half-past sir." 
 
"Tell exactly 
 
small boy drew long breath. 
 
"I took telegram No. lady there. opened 
gave said, jolly 
look sharp, name isn't Henry, 

 
"Never mind said Tommy impatiently. "Go on." 
 
"Yes, sir. brought them, told looked 
something. looks says. 
get begins hat 
front glass, two almost quick 
was, seed going steps heard 
call told you." 
 
small boy stopped Tommy continued 
him. moment Julius rejoined him. held open letter 
hand. 
 
"I say, turned gone 

 

 
"Yes, has. went taxi Charing Cross 
hurry getting eye fell letter Julius's 
hand. left note you. That's right. 
to?" 
 
Almost held hand letter, 
Julius folded placed pocket. seemed trifle 

 
"I guess nothing it. It's something 
asked let know 
 
"Oh!" Tommy looked puzzled, seemed waiting more. 
 
"See here," said Julius suddenly, "I'd better put asked Miss 
Tuppence marry morning." 
 
"Oh!" said Tommy felt Julius's words 
totally moment brain. 
 
"I'd like tell you," continued Julius, "that suggested 
anything kind Miss Tuppence, made clear didn't 
want way 
 
Tommy roused himself. 
 
"That's right," said quickly. 
years. Nothing more." hand shook ever 
little. "That's quite right. Tuppence always said 
looking 
 
stopped face Julius way 

 
"Oh, guess it'll dollars trick. Miss Tuppence 
put wise right away. There's her. ought 
along together well." 
 
Tommy looked curiously minute, though 
speak, changed mind said nothing. Tuppence 
Well, not? lamented fact knew rich men? 
openly avowed intention marrying money 
ever meeting young American millionaire 
given unlikely would slow avail 
it. money. always said so. blame 
true 
 
Nevertheless, Tommy blame her. filled 
utterly well SAY things like 
REAL girl would never marry money. Tuppence utterly 
would delighted never saw 
rotten 
 
Julius's voice broke 
 
"Yes, ought get along together well. I've heard girl 
always refuses sort 
 
Tommy caught arm. 
 
say 
 
"Sure thing. Didn't tell that? without 
kind reason it. eternal call it, I've 
heard. come round right enough. Likely enough, 

 
Tommy interrupted regardless 
 
"What say demanded 
 
Julius handed him. 
 
"There's earthly clue she's assured 
Tommy. "But might well see don't believe me." 
 
note, Tuppence's well-known writing, ran follows: 
 
 
"DEAR JULIUS, 
 
"It's always better things black white. don't feel 
think marriage Tommy found. Let's leave 
till then. 
 

 

 
 
Tommy handed back, eyes feelings 
sharp felt Tuppence noble 
refused Julius without True, 
note signs could excuse that. read 
almost like bribe Julius efforts find 
Tommy, supposed really meant way. 
Tuppence, girl world touch saw 
thoughts brought sudden 
 
"As pulling together, "there's hint 
she's to. 
 
small boy came Tommy produced five 
 
"One thing more. remember young lady 

 
Henry gasped spoke. 
 
"She ball threw made 
sort noise like sir." 
 
"Very said Tommy. "Here's five Come on, 
Julius. must find 
 
hurried upstairs. Tuppence left key door. room 
left it. ball orange 
white. Tommy 
 
"Come once, Moat House, great 
 
looked Julius spoke 
 
"You didn't send it?" 
 
"Of course not. mean?" 
 
"I guess means said Julius quietly. got her." 
 
"WHAT?" 
 
"Sure thing! signed name, fell like 

 
"My shall do?" 
 
"Get go Right There's time It's 
almighty luck didn't take wire her. we'd 
probably never traced her. we've got 

 
energy Julius Left himself, Tommy would 
probably sat think things good 
decided plan action. Julius Hersheimmer about, 

 
muttered handed Tommy 
Tommy abandoned favour 

 
"Here are. King's St. must 
made mistake. King's CHARING 
that's train went by. that's gone. 
damned slow train too." 
 
"What 
 
Tommy shook head. 
 
like, we'd better stick train. great 
thing keep 
 
Julius 
 
"That's so. gets think innocent young girl 

 
Tommy nodded thinking. moment two, said: 
 
"I say, Julius, want for, 
 
don't get you?" 
 
"What mean don't think it's game 
explained Tommy, strain mental 
"She's that's is. She's immediate 
danger, anything, she'd damned useful 
them. long they've got her, they've got whip hand us. 
 
"Sure thing," said Julius thoughtfully. "That's so." 
 
added Tommy, "I've great faith 
Tuppence." 
 
journey many 
change twice, small 
deserted station solitary porter, Tommy addressed 

 
"Can tell way Moat 
 
"The Moat It's step here. big house near sea, 
mean?" 
 
Tommy assented listening 
prepared leave station. 
beginning turned 
road. Suddenly Tommy 
 
ran back station porter anew. 
 
"Look here, remember young lady arrived earlier 
train, She'd probably ask way Moat 
House." 
 
described Tuppence well could, porter shook 
head. Several people arrived train question. could 
call mind one young lady particular. quite certain 
one asked way Moat House. 
 
Tommy rejoined Julius, explained. settling 
like felt convinced going 
enemy three start. Three hours 
enough Mr. Brown. would possibility 
telegram found. 
 
way seemed took wrong turning went nearly 
half mile direction. past seven o'clock 
small boy told Moat past next 
 
iron gate drive 
thick something place struck 
chill went deserted leaves 
daylight almost gone. like 
walking world branches 
note. Occasionally drifted down, 
startling cold touch 
 
turn drive brought sight house. That, too, 
seemed empty deserted. steps 
door indeed spot 
Tuppence seemed hard believe human 
passed way months. 
 
Julius jerked bell rang 
one came. rang 
sign life. walked completely round 
house. Everywhere silence, could 
believe evidence eyes place empty. 
 
"Nothing said Julius. 
 
steps slowly 
 
"There must village continued young American. 
better make there. They'll know something place, 
whether there's anyone 
 
"Yes, that's bad 
 
Proceeding road, soon came little 
it, met Tommy 
stopped question. 
 
"The Moat It's empty. empty years. Mrs. got 
key want go post office." 
 
Tommy him. soon found post office, also 
sweet general fancy knocked door 
next it. woman opened it. readily 
produced key Moat House. 
 
doubt it's kind place suit you, sir. 
terrible state all. need lot 
money spent it." 
 
said Tommy "I dare say it'll 
houses 
 
"That declared woman "My daughter 
looking decent don't know 
long. It's war. things has. excuse me, 
sir, it'll dark see much house. Hadn't 
better wait 
 
"That's right. We'll look around evening, anyway. We'd 
lost way. What's best place 
stay night round here?" 
 
Mrs. looked doubtful. 
 
"There's Arms, it's much place gentlemen 
like you." 
 
"Oh, well. Thanks. way, you've young 
lady asking key 
 
woman shook head. 
 
"No one's place long time." 
 

 
steps Moat House. front door swung 
back Julius struck match 
examined floor carefully. shook head. 
 
"I'd swear one's passed way. Look dust. sign 

 
wandered round deserted house. Everywhere Thick 
dust apparently 
 
"This gets me," said Julius. "I don't believe Tuppence ever 
house." 
 
"She must been." 
 
Julius shook head without 
 
go said Tommy. "Perhaps we'll see 

 
took search more, 
forced conclusion house invaded 
considerable time. might left village altogether 
fortunate discovery steps 
gave sudden picked something 
among held Julius. small gold 
 
"That's 
 
"Are 
 
I've often seen wear it." 
 
Julius drew deep breath. 
 
"I guess it. came far here, anyway. We'll make 
raise hell round find her. 
Somebody MUST seen her." 
 
Forthwith campaign began. Tommy Julius worked 
together, result same. Nobody answering Tuppence's 
description seen vicinity. 
Finally altered Tuppence certainly 
remained long neighbourhood Moat House. pointed 
overcome carried away car. renewed 
anyone seen car standing somewhere near Moat House 
met success. 
 
Julius town car, neighbourhood 
daily grey set high 
hopes traced turned property 
highly respectable 
 
day saw set new Julius like 
followed clue. Every car passed 
village day down. forced 
way country properties submitted owners 
searching thorough 
seldom failed indignation 
but, day succeeded day, nearer Tuppence's 
well girl seemed 
literally vanished thin air. 
 
another weighing Tommy's mind. 
 
"Do know long we've here?" asked one morning 
sat facing "A We're nearer finding 
Tuppence, NEXT SUNDAY 
 
said Julius thoughtfully. "I'd almost forgotten 
I've thinking nothing Tuppence." 
 
"So I. least, hadn't forgotten 29th, didn't 
seem matter damn comparison finding Tuppence. 
getting we're ever going get hold 
all, must life won't worth 
purchase afterwards. game played then. 
I'm beginning feel we've made big mistake way we've set 
this. We've time we're 
 
"I'm there. We've couple 
bit I'm going quit right 
 
"What mean?" 
 
"I'll tell you. I'm going ought done week ago. 
I'm going right back London put case hands 
British fancied piece 
I'm I've enough it. Scotland 
Yard me!" 
 
"You're right," said Tommy slowly. "I wish God we'd gone right 
away." 
 
"Better late We've like couple playing 
go round I'm going right along Scotland 
Yard ask take hand show way go. 
guess professional always end. 
coming along me?" 
 
Tommy shook head. 
 
"What's One us enough. might well stay 
nose round bit longer. Something MIGHT turn up. One never 
 
"Sure thing. Well, long. I'll back couple shakes 
along. shall tell pick 

 
course events follow plan Julius laid 
down. Later day Tommy received 
 
 
Manchester Important 
 
 
night Tommy slow train. 
Julius platform. 
 
you'd come train weren't wire 

 
Tommy grasped arm. 
 
"What it? Tuppence 
 
Julius shook head. 
 
"No. found waiting London. 
 
handed telegraph form other. Tommy's eyes opened 
read: 
 
 
"Jane Finn found. Come Manchester Hotel 

 
 
Julius took form back folded up. 
 
said thoughtfully. "I thought lawyer 
 
 
 
CHAPTER JANE FINN 
 
"MY train got half hour explained Julius, led way 
station. "I reckoned you'd come left London, 
accordingly Sir James. He's us, 
round 
 
"What made think he'd ceased take interest 
asked Tommy curiously. 
 
"What replied Julius dryly. "The old close 
Like darned lot them, wasn't going commit 
till sure could deliver 
 
"I said Tommy thoughtfully. 
 
Julius turned him. 
 
"You wonder what?" 
 
"Whether real 
 
life was." 
 
Tommy shook head 
 
Sir James arrived eight o'clock, Julius introduced 
Tommy. Sir James shook hands 
 
"I delighted make Mr. Beresford. heard 
much Miss smiled 
really seems though already know quite well." 
 
"Thank you, sir," said Tommy cheerful 
great lawyer eagerly. Like Tuppence, felt 
other's personality. reminded Mr. Carter. two men, totally 
unlike far physical resemblance went, produced similar effect. 
Beneath weary manner one professional reserve 
other, lay quality mind, like 
 
meantime conscious Sir James's close 
lawyer dropped eyes young man feeling 
read like open book. could wonder 
final judgment was, little chance learning 
that. Sir James took everything, gave 
proof occurred almost once. 
 
Immediately first Julius broke flood 
eager questions. Sir James managed track 
let know still working case? on. 
 
Sir James stroked chin smiled. last said: 
 
"Just so, so. Well, she's found. that's great thing, isn't 
it? Come now, that's great 
 
"Sure is. strike Miss Tuppence 
thought you'd quit good all." 
 
"Ah!" lawyer shot lightning glance him, resumed operations 
"You thought that, you? dear me." 
 
"But guess take pursued Julius. 
 
"Well, don't know go far say that. it's 
certainly fortunate parties we've managed find young 

 
"But she?" demanded Julius, thoughts flying another 
"I thought you'd sure bring 
 
"That would hardly said Sir James gravely. 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Because young lady knocked street accident, 
sustained slight injuries head. taken 
recovering consciousness gave name Jane Finn. 
heard that, arranged removed house 
friend mine, you. 
spoken 
 
"She's seriously 
 
"Oh, cut really, medical point view, 
slight injuries produced condition. state 
probably attributed mental shock consequent recovering 

 
"It's come cried Julius 
 
Sir James tapped table rather impatiently. 
 
Mr. Hersheimmer, since able give real name. 
thought appreciated 
 
"And happened said Tommy. quite like 

 
Sir James far 
 
curious said dryly. 
 
Nevertheless Tommy certain 
Sir James's presence Manchester Far 
abandoning case, Julius supposed, means 
successfully run missing girl earth. thing puzzled 
Tommy reason concluded 
legal mind. 
 
Julius speaking. 
 
"After "I shall go right away see 
 
"That said Sir James. "It unlikely 
would allow see time night. 
suggest to-morrow morning ten 
 
Julius something Sir James always stirred 
conflict two 
 
"All same, reckon I'll go round to-night see can't 
break silly 
 
"It quite Mr. 
 
words came like Tommy looked 
start. Julius nervous hand raised 
glass lips shook slightly, eyes held Sir James's 
moment hostility two seemed likely 
burst end Julius lowered eyes, 
 
"For moment, reckon you're 
 
"Thank you," said other. "We say ten o'clock then?" 
consummate ease manner turned Tommy. "I must Mr. 
Beresford, something surprise see 
evening. last heard friends 
grave anxiety Nothing heard 
days, Miss Tuppence inclined think got 

 
"I had, Tommy "I never 
place 
 
Helped questions Sir James, gave account 
lawyer looked renewed interest 
brought tale close. 
 
"You got tight place said gravely. "I 
congratulate you. displayed great deal ingenuity carried 
part well." 
 
Tommy face assuming 
 
"I couldn't got away girl, sir." 
 
"No." Sir James smiled little. "It lucky happened 
fancy you." Tommy appeared protest, Sir 
James went on. "There's doubt one 
suppose?" 
 
"I'm afraid not, sir. thought perhaps keeping 
force, way acted didn't fit that. see, went 
back could got away." 
 
Sir James nodded thoughtfully. 
 
"What Something wanting taken 
 
"Yes, sir. suppose meant Mrs. 
 
"She always signed Rita Vandemeyer. friends spoke 
Still, suppose girl must habit 
calling full name. And, moment crying 
her, Mrs. Vandemeyer either dead one 
two points strike sudden change 
attitude towards yourself, way, house 

 
"Yes, sir, they'd cleared out." 
 
said Sir James dryly. 
 
"And clue left 
 
"I lawyer tapped table thoughtfully. 
 
Something voice made Tommy look up. Would man's eyes 
seen something spoke 
 
"I wish you'd there, sir, go 
 
"I wish said Sir James quietly. sat moment silence. 
looked up. "And since then? 
 
moment, Tommy stared him. course 
lawyer know. 
 
"I forgot didn't know Tuppence," said slowly. 
anxiety, forgotten excitement knowing 
Jane Finn found last, swept again. 
 
lawyer laid knife sharply. 
 
"Has anything happened Miss voice 
 
"She's said Julius. 
 

 
"A week 
 

 
Sir James's questions fairly shot out. Tommy Julius 
gave history last week search. 
 
Sir James went root matter. 
 
"A wire signed knew enough that. 
weren't sure much learnt house. 
Miss Tuppence escape. 
necessary could seal lips threat might happen 
her." 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"That's thought, sir." 
 
Sir James looked "You worked out, you? 
bad. curious thing certainly 
know anything first held sure 
way 
 
Tommy shook head. 
 
"That's so," said Julius reckon one put 
earlier Sunday 
 
"Yes, 
 
"That almighty Mr. Brown, 
 
faint note voice made 
Sir James look sharply. 
 
"You don't believe Mr. Brown, Mr. 
 
"No, sir, not," returned young American "Not 
such, say. reckon he's 
name children with. real head business 
Russian guess he's quite capable running 
revolutions three countries man Whittington 
probably head English 
 
"I disagree you," said Sir James "Mr. Brown 
turned Tommy. "Did happen notice wire handed 
in?" 
 
"No, sir, I'm afraid 
 
Got you?" 
 
"It's upstairs, sir, 
 
"I'd like look You've 
hung day We'll deal 
Miss Jane Finn first. Afterwards, we'll set work Miss 
Tuppence don't think she's immediate danger. 
is, long don't know we've got Jane Finn, 
memory returned. must keep dark 

 
two and, making arrangements meeting 
great lawyer took 
 
ten o'clock, two young men appointed Sir 
James joined alone appeared 
introduced doctor. 
 
"Mr. How's 
 
well. Evidently idea time. Asked 
morning many saved papers 
That, course, expected. seems 
something mind, 
 
"I think relieve anxiety. May go up?" 
 

 
Tommy's heart beat faster followed doctor upstairs. 
Jane Finn Jane 
improbable success house, 
memory almost restored, lay girl held 
future England hands. half broke Tommy's lips. 
Tuppence could side share triumphant 
conclusion joint put thought Tuppence 
aside. confidence Sir James 
man would Tuppence's 
meantime Jane suddenly dread clutched heart. 
seemed Suppose find stricken 
hand Mr. 
 
another minute laughing 
doctor held open door room passed in. white 
bed, round head, lay girl. Somehow whole scene 
seemed exactly one expected gave 
effect beautifully 
 
girl looked one large wondering eyes. 
Sir James spoke first. 
 
"Miss said, "this cousin, Mr. Julius P. 
 
faint flush girl's face, Julius stepped forward 
took hand. 
 
"How do, Cousin said 
 
Tommy caught voice. 
 
"Are really Uncle asked 
 
voice, slight Western almost 
seemed vaguely familiar Tommy, thrust 
impression aside impossible. 
 
"Sure thing." 
 
"We used read Uncle Hiram continued girl, 
low soft "But never thought I'd meet one day. Mother 
figured Uncle Hiram would never get mad 
her." 
 
"The old man like that," admitted Julius. "But guess new 
sort different. Got use family business. 
First thing thought about, soon war over, come along 
hunt up." 
 
shadow passed girl's face. 
 
telling memory went, 
years shall never know lost 

 
"You didn't realize 
 
girl's eyes opened wide. 
 
"Why, no. seems though time since 
see now." closed eyes 

 
Julius looked across Sir James, nodded. 
 
"Don't worry any. isn't worth it. Now, see here, Jane, there's 
something want know about. man aboard boat 
mighty important papers him, big guns country 
got notion passed goods you. so?" 
 
girl hesitated, glance shifting two. Julius 
understood. 
 
"Mr. Beresford commissioned British Government get 
papers back. Sir James Peel Edgerton English Member 
might big gun Cabinet It's owing 
we've last. go right ahead tell 
us whole story. Danvers give 
 
"Yes. said they'd better chance me, would 
save women children 
 
"Just said Sir James. 
 
"He said might make 
difference But, it's long ago, 
over, matter now?" 
 
"I guess history repeats itself, Jane. First great 
cry papers, died down, whole 
started rather different 
hand us right 
 
"But 
 
"What?" 
 
"I haven't got them." 
 
them?" Julius words little 

 
them." 
 
"You them?" 
 
"Yes. got People seemed watching me. scared 
put hand head. "It's almost last thing 
remember 
 
"Go on," said Sir James, quiet "What 

 
turned 
 
"It came don't remember 
 
"That doesn't matter. Go on." 
 
"In confusion slipped away. Nobody saw me. took 
car. Told man drive town. watched got 
open road. car following us. saw path side 
road. told man 
 
paused, went on. "The path led 
sea big yellow like golden 
looked round. wasn't soul sight. level head 
quite could get 
hand in, went long way back. took oilskin packet 
round right far could. tore 
bit 
you'd never guess kind there. 
marked place carefully mind, I'd find again. 
queer path world 
like dog sitting went back road. car 
drove back. caught train. bit ashamed 
things but, by, saw man 
opposite woman sitting next me, felt 
scared again, glad papers safe. went 
get little air. thought I'd slip another carriage. 
woman called back, said I'd dropped something, 
something seemed hit placed hand 
back head. "I don't remember anything woke 

 
pause. 
 
"Thank you, Miss Sir James spoke. "I hope 
tired you?" 
 
"Oh, that's right. head little, otherwise feel 

 
Julius stepped forward took hand again. 
 
"So long, Cousin Jane. I'm going get busy papers, 
I'll back two shakes I'll 
London give time young life go back 
mean hurry get well." 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER LATE 
 
street held informal council war. Sir James drawn 
watch pocket. "The boat train 
start think catch 
 
Tommy looked up, puzzled. 
 
"Is need To-day 
 
"I guess it's always well get early morning," said Julius, 
lawyer time reply. make 
right away." 
 
little frown settled Sir James's 
 
"I wish could come you. due speak meeting two 
o'clock. 
 
tone clear, 
hand, Julius easily disposed put loss 
other's company. 
 
"I guess there's nothing complicated remarked. 
"Just game that's all." 
 
"I hope so," said Sir James. 
 
"Sure thing. else could be?" 
 
"You still young, Mr. Hersheimmer. age probably 
learnt one 
 
gravity tone impressed Tommy, little effect upon 
Julius. 
 
"You think Mr. Brown might come along take does, I'm 
ready him." pocket. "I carry Little Willie 
round produced 
tapped affectionately returning 
home. "But won't needed There's nobody put Mr. Brown 

 
lawyer shrugged shoulders. 
 
"There nobody put Mr. Brown wise fact Mrs. Vandemeyer 
meant him. Nevertheless, MRS. VANDEMEYER DIED WITHOUT 

 
Julius silenced once, Sir James added 
 
"I want put good Take 
unnecessary papers hands. 
reason believe destroy once. 
Good luck you. game hands now." shook hands 
both. 
 
Ten minutes later two young men seated first-class 
carriage en route 
 
long time neither spoke. length Julius broke 
silence, totally unexpected remark. 
 
observed thoughtfully, "did ever make darned fool 
girl's 
 
Tommy, moment's searched mind. 
 
"Can't say replied last. "Not 
Why?" 
 
"Because last two months I've making sentimental 
First moment eyes photograph heart 
usual read guess I'm ashamed 
admit it, came determined find fix 
up, take back Mrs. Julius P. 
 
"Oh!" said Tommy, 
 
Julius legs continued: 
 
"Just shows almighty fool man make One look 
girl flesh, 
 
Feeling ever, Tommy "Oh!" again. 
 
"No Jane, mind you," continued other. "She's real 
nice girl, fellow fall love right away." 
 
"I thought said Tommy, finding 

 
"Sure is. she's like one bit. least suppose 
recognized right off. I'd 
seen crowd I'd said girl whose face 
right away without something 
shook head, heaved guess 
mighty queer 
 
"It must be," said Tommy "if come love 
one girl, propose another within 
 
Julius grace look 
 
"Well, see, I'd got sort tired feeling I'd never find 
plumb anyway. well, 
French, instance, much sensible way look 
things. keep marriage 
 
Tommy 
 
"Well, I'm 
 
Julius 
 
now, don't don't mean take 
Americans higher opinion morality 
meant French set marriage 
two people suited one another, look money affairs, 
see whole thing 
 
"If ask me," said Tommy, damned 
We're always saying, men bad enough, 
girls 
 
down, son. Don't get 
 
"I feel said Tommy. 
 
Julius looked judged wise say more. 
 
However, Tommy plenty time cool reached 
cheerful returned countenance 

 
aid road fairly 
well agreed direction, able hire taxi without 
drive road leading instructed 
man go slowly, watched miss 
came long leaving town, Tommy stopped 
car promptly, asked tone whether path led 
sea, hearing paid man handsome 
 
moment later taxi slowly back Tommy 
Julius watched turned narrow 
 
"It's right one, suppose?" asked Tommy doubtfully. "There must 
simply along here." 
 
"Sure is. Look Remember Jane 
 
Tommy looked swelling golden 
path either side, 
 
went single Julius Twice Tommy turned 
head Julius looked back. 
 
"What it?" 
 
"I don't know. I've got wind Keep there's 
one following us." 
 
"Can't be," said Julius see him." 
 
Tommy admit true. Nevertheless, sense 
uneasiness spite believed 
enemy. 
 
"I rather wish fellow would come said Julius. 
pocket. "Little William 
 
"Do always carry you?" inquired Tommy burning 
curiosity. 
 
guess never know might turn up." 
 
Tommy kept silence. impressed little 
seemed remove menace Mr. Brown farther away. 
 
path running along side parallel 
Suddenly Julius came abrupt halt Tommy 
him. 
 
"What's up?" 
 
"Look there. doesn't beat 
 
Tommy Standing half path huge 
certainly bore resemblance 
 
"Well," said Tommy, refusing share Julius's "it's 
expected see, isn't it?" 
 
Julius looked shook head. 
 
Sure expected kind me, 
same, see sitting expected find it!" 
 
Tommy, whose calm was, perhaps, assumed moved 
feet impatiently. 
 
on. 
 
Tommy heard saying 

 
"The won't 
 
Julius replied 
 
"I guess you're right." 
 
Tommy suddenly pointed shaking hand. 
 
"What there?" 
 
Julius replied voice: 
 
"That's sure." 
 
looked other. 
 
"When said Tommy 
failed call me, always said come never 
believed it. whether felt not, 
I've got 
 
looked rock kind agonized 
 
it!" cried. "It's Five Think it! 
parties, thousands people 
can't It's hundred one It's 

 
Indeed, felt perhaps, could 
believe success many others failed. thing 
therefore could be. would empty. 
 
Julius looked smile. 
 
"I guess you're right," 
"Well, thrust hand made 
slight "It's tight fit. Jane's hand must 
smaller mine. don't feel what's this? 
waved small 
"It's goods right. Hold get 

 
happened. Tommy held precious packet 
hands. 
 
"It's murmured think would 
look good 
 
cut carefully away Inside small 
folded sheet paper. trembling fingers it. 
sheet stared other, puzzled. 
 
"A Julius. "Was Danvers 
 
Tommy shook head. solution satisfy him. Suddenly 
face 
 
"I've got it! SYMPATHETIC 
 
"You think so?" 
 
trying Heat usually trick. Get 
We'll make 
 
minutes little fire leaves 
Tommy held sheet paper near paper 
little Nothing more. 
 
Suddenly Julius grasped arm, pointed 
appearing faint brown 
 
You've got it! Say, idea great. never 
occurred me." 
 
Tommy held paper position minutes longer judged 
heat done work. withdrew it. moment later uttered 
cry. 
 
Across sheet brown printing ran words: 
MR. BROWN. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER TOMMY MAKES DISCOVERY 
 
moment two stood staring 
Somehow, Mr. Brown them. 
Tommy accepted defeat quietly. Julius. 
 
"How get ahead us? That's me!" 
ended up. 
 
Tommy shook head, said 
 
"It accounts new. might 
 
"Never mind darned get ahead us? 
knew. It's impossible anyone get 
did. And, anyway, know? reckon 
Jane's guess must been." 
 
Tommy's common sense pointed 
 
"No one could known going 
less particular room." 
 
"That's so," admitted Julius. "Then one 
listened door. How's that?" 
 
"I don't see matters said Tommy "He may 
found months ago, removed papers, 
won't They'd published once." 
 
"Sure thing No, one's got ahead us to-day hour 
so. gets 
 
"I wish Peel Edgerton said Tommy 
thoughtfully. 
 
"Why?" Julius "The mischief done 
 
Tommy hesitated. could explain 
idea presence would somehow averted 
former point view. "It's good 
arguing done. up. We've failed. There's 
one thing do." 
 
"What's that?" 
 
"Get back London soon possible. Mr. Carter must It's 
matter hours blow But, rate, 
ought know 
 
duty unpleasant one, Tommy intention 
it. must report failure Mr. Carter. work 
done. took mail London. Julius elected stay 
night 
 
Half hour pale, Tommy stood 
chief. 
 
"I've come report, sir. I've 
 
Mr. Carter eyed sharply. 
 
"You mean 
 
"Is hands Mr. Brown, sir." 
 
"Ah!" said Mr. Carter quietly. expression face 
change, Tommy caught despair eyes. 
convinced nothing else done 
 
"Well," said Mr. Carter minute two, "we 
suppose. I'm glad know must can." 
 
Tommy's mind flashed "It's knows 
it's 
 
looked him. 
 
"Don't take heart, said "You best. 
one brains century. came 
near success. Remember that." 
 
"Thank you, sir. It's awfully decent you." 
 
"I blame myself. ever since heard 

 
Something tone attracted Tommy's attention. new fear 
heart. 
 
"Is more, sir?" 
 
"I'm afraid so," said Mr. Carter gravely. stretched hand 
sheet table. 
 
Tommy. 
 

 
words eyes. description green 
coat pocket marked looked 
agonized question Mr. Carter. latter replied it: 
 
I'm looks 
much like foul 
 
"My gasped Tommy. never rest till 
I've got even them! I'll hunt 
 
pity Mr. Carter's face stopped him. 
 
"I know feel like, poor boy. it's good. You'll waste 
strength may sound advice is: 
Cut You'll 
 

 
Mr. Carter shook head. 
 
"So think now. Well, won't bear thinking brave little 
I'm sorry whole 
 
Tommy came start. 
 
"I'm taking time, sir," said effort. "There's need 
blame yourself. dare say couple young fools 
take job. warned us right. wish God I'd 
one get sir." 
 
Back Tommy 
thoughts far away. still introduction 
tragedy cheerful existence. fun 
together, couldn't believe 
couldn't Little Tuppence, 
horrible dream. Nothing more. 
 
brought note, kind words sympathy Peel 
read news paper. large 
FEARED letter ended offer 
post Sir James considerable 

 
old muttered Tommy, flung aside. 
 
door opened, Julius burst usual violence. held 
open newspaper hand. 
 
"Say, what's this? seem got fool idea 
Tuppence." 
 
"It's said Tommy quietly. 
 
"You mean they've done in?" 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
"I suppose got treaty good 
longer, afraid let go." 
 
"Well, I'm said Julius. "Little Tuppence. sure 
little 
 
suddenly something seemed Tommy's brain. rose 
feet. 
 
"Oh, get out! don't really care, damn you! asked marry 
rotten way, LOVED her. I'd given 
soul body save harm. I'd stood without 
word let marry you, could given sort 
time ought had, poor devil without 
bless with. wouldn't didn't 
 
"See here," began Julius 
 
"Oh, go can't stand coming talking 
Go look Tuppence 
I've always loved her, time played together 
grew same. shall never forget 
came ridiculous cap like 
see girl loved turn 
 
Julius interrupted him. 
 
"A must going could swear 
I've seen Jane cap too. that's plumb No, 
I've got it! saw talking Whittington 
home wasn't patient 

 
"I dare said Tommy "she's probably 
start. shouldn't wonder papers Danvers 
begin 
 
"I'm darned shouted Julius. "She's cousin, 
patriotic girl ever 
 
"I don't care damn is, get retorted Tommy 
also top voice. 
 
young men point coming suddenly, 
almost Julius's anger 
 
"All right, said quietly, "I'm don't blame 
you've saying. It's mighty lucky say it. I've 
almighty darned it's possible imagine. 
Calm made impatient going right away 
London North Western Railway want 
know." 
 
"I don't care damn you're Tommy. 
 
door closed behind Julius, returned 
 
"That's rang bell. 
 
"Take down." 
 
"Yes, sir. Going away, sir?" 
 
"I'm going said Tommy, regardless 
feelings. 
 
however, merely replied 
 
"Yes, sir. Shall call 
 
Tommy nodded. 
 
hadn't idea. Beyond fixed 
determination get even Mr. Brown plans. Sir 
James's letter, shook head. Tuppence must Still, 
kind old fellow. 
 
"Better answer it, went across 
usual bedroom 
paper. one came. Tommy 
delay. remembered good supply Julius's 
American announced immediate 
would fear running him. Besides, wouldn't mind 
did. beginning rather ashamed things said. 
Old Julius taken jolly well. He'd found 
there. 
 
room deserted. Tommy walked across 
opened middle thrust face 
caught eye. moment stood ground. 
took out, shut walked slowly 
sat still staring photograph hand. 
 
earth photograph French girl Annette 
Julius Hersheimmer's 
 
 
 
CHAPTER STREET 
 
Prime Minister tapped desk front nervous 
face worn took conversation Mr. 
Carter point broken off. "I don't said. 
"Do really mean things desperate all?" 
 
"So seems 
 
"Let's look letter again." 
 
Mr. Carter handed over. written hand. 
 
"DEAR MR. CARTER, 
 
turned given course may 
simply making awful myself, don't think so. 
conclusions right, girl Manchester 
whole thing packet all, object 
making us think game fancy must 
pretty hot 
 
"I think know real Jane Finn is, I've even got idea 
papers are. guess, course, I've 
sort feeling it'll turn right. enclose sealed 
envelope it's worth. I'm going ask open 
last moment, fact. You'll understand 
minute. see, I've figured things 
Tuppence's plant too, she's drowned am. way 
reason this: last chance they'll let Jane Finn escape 
hope she's memory 
thinks she's free go right away course it's 
awful risk take, knows 
they're pretty desperate get hold KNOW 
PAPERS RECOVERED US, neither two 
lives worth must try get hold 
Tuppence Jane 
 
"I want repeat telegram sent Tuppence Ritz. 
Sir James Peel Edgerton said would able manage me. 
He's 
 
"One last house Soho watched day night. 
 
etc., 
 

 
 
Prime Minister looked up. 
 
"The 
 
Mr. Carter smiled dryly. 
 
"In Bank. taking 
 
"You don't Prime Minister hesitated would 
better open now? Surely ought secure 
is, provided young man's guess turns correct, once. 
keep fact done quite 
 
"Can I'm sure. round us. it's known 
wouldn't give life 
two No, boy trusted me, shan't let down." 
 
"Well, well, must leave that, then. What's like, 
 
he's ordinary rather young 
Slow mental hand, it's quite 
impossible lead imagination. hasn't got 
he's difficult things slowly, 
he's got hold anything doesn't let go. little lady's 
quite different. less common sense. make 
pretty pair working together. 
 
"He seems Prime 
 
"Yes, that's gives hope. He's kind youth 
would sure ventured opinion all." 
 
half smile came other's lips. 
 
"And defeat master criminal time?" 
 
say! sometimes fancy see shadow 
 
"You mean?" 
 

 
said Prime Minister 
 
"Yes. see hand THIS." struck open letter. "He's 
dark, I've always felt 
anyone run Mr. Brown earth, Peel Edgerton would 
man. tell he's case now, doesn't want known. 
way, got rather odd request day." 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"He sent cutting American paper. referred man's 
body found near New York three weeks ago. asked 
collect information subject 
 
"Well?" 
 
Carter shrugged shoulders. 
 
"I couldn't get much. Young fellow 
badly never 
 
"And fancy two matters connected way?" 
 
do. may wrong, course." 
 
pause, Mr. Carter continued: 
 
"I asked come round here. we'll get anything 
doesn't want tell. legal strong. there's 
doubt throw light one two obscure points young 
letter. Ah, 
 
two men rose half thought 
flashed across mind. "My successor, 
 
"We've letter young said Mr. Carter, coming 
point once. "You've seen him, suppose?" 
 
"You suppose said lawyer. 
 
"Oh!" Mr. Carter little 
 
Sir James smiled, stroked 
 
"He rang up," 
 
"Would objection telling us exactly passed 
you?" 
 
"Not all. certain letter written 
matter fact, offered job. reminded 
something said Manchester respecting bogus 
telegram Miss Cowley away. asked anything 
said drawer Mr. Hersheimmer's room 
discovered lawyer paused, continued: 
"I asked photograph bore name address 
replied: it, sir. 
went tell something DIDN'T know. original 
photograph French girl, Annette, saved 
 
"What?" 
 
"Exactly. asked young man curiosity done 
replied put back found 
it." lawyer paused again. "That good, 
good. use young fellow. him. 
discovery one. course, moment 
girl Manchester proved plant everything 
Young Beresford saw without tell 
him. felt couldn't trust judgment subject 
Miss think told him, duly weighing 
evidence, decided chance favour it. 
brought us back 
 
"Yes?" 
 
"I advised apply copy original 
occurred probable that, Miss Cowley flung 
floor, certain words might altered express 
intention setting false 
 
Carter nodded. took sheet pocket, read 
 
 
"Come once, Astley Great 

 
 
"Very said Sir James, "and words 
thing done. one important clue 

 
"What that?" 
 
"The statement Miss Cowley drove Charing 
sure took granted made 

 
"Then young Beresford now?" 
 
"At unless much 
 
Mr. Carter looked curiously. 
 
"I rather wonder you're too, Peel 
 
"Ah, I'm busy case." 
 
"I thought 
 
"Oh, I've Perhaps would correct say I'm 
preparing case. facts American me?" 
 
"I'm afraid not. important find 
 
"Oh, know said Sir James "I can't prove 
know." 
 
two asked questions. instinct would 
mere waste breath. 
 
"But don't said suddenly, "is 
photograph came Mr. Hersheimmer's 
 
"Perhaps never left it," suggested lawyer gently. 
 
"But bogus Inspector 
 
"Ah!" said Sir James thoughtfully. rose feet. "I keep 
you. Go affairs nation. must get back case." 
 
Two days later Julius Hersheimmer returned note 
Tommy lay 
 
 
"DEAR HERSHEIMMER, 
 
lost temper. case don't see again, I've 
offered job might well take it. 
 

 

 
 
peculiar smile lingered moment Julius's face. threw 
letter waste-paper 
 
"The darned murmured. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER RACE TIME 
 
ringing Sir James, Tommy's next make call 
South Audley found Albert professional 
duties, introduced without friend 
Albert immediately. 
 
quiet said 
young lady's keeping well, sir?" 
 
"That's point, She's 
 
"You don't mean got her?" 
 
"They 
 
"In 
 
"No, dash all, 
 
"It's sir," explained "At pictures 
always think 
they've done in, sir?" 
 
"I hope not. way, chance cousin, 
suitable female relation might 
represented likely 
 
delighted spread slowly Albert's 
 
"I'm on, sir. poor aunt lives country mortal bad 
long time, she's asking dying 
 
Tommy nodded approval. 
 
"Can report proper quarter meet Charing Cross 
time?" 
 
"I'll there, sir. count me." 
 
Tommy faithful Albert proved 
two took quarters Albert fell 
task collecting information. difficulty it. 
 
Astley property Dr. Adams. doctor longer 
believed, took private 
good fellow tapped 
doctor popular figure village, 
freely local 
Oh, matter ten years 
longer. Scientific gentleman, was. people often came 
town see him. Anyway, gay house, always 
 
face Tommy felt possible 
well-known figure could reality dangerous 
life seemed open hint sinister 
Suppose gigantic Tommy felt cold chill 
thought. 
 
remembered private inquired 
carefully young lady amongst them, describing Tuppence. 
nothing much seemed known seldom 
seen outside guarded description Annette also failed 
recognition. 
 
Astley pleasant surrounded 
grounds effectually house 
observation road. 
 
first evening Tommy, accompanied Albert, 
Owing Albert's dragged along painfully 
thereby producing great deal noise 
stood case, totally 
grounds, like private house 
seemed Tommy imagined possible fierce 
Albert's fancy ran 
reached near house quite 
 
window up. large company 
assembled round table. port passing hand hand. 
seemed pleasant company. open window 
conversation floated night air. heated 
discussion county 
 
Tommy felt cold chill seemed impossible 
believe people 
gentleman sat 
head table looked singularly honest 
 
Tommy slept badly night. following morning 
Albert, boy, took 
place cook 
returned information undoubtedly "one 
Tommy imagination. 
Questioned, could nothing support statement except 
opinion wasn't usual kind. could see 
glance. 
 
repeated pecuniary advantage 
real following day, Albert brought back 
first piece hopeful news. French young lady staying 
house. Tommy put doubts aside. confirmation 
theory. time To-day 29th 
sorts rumours 
running Newspapers getting 
Labour freely Government said nothing. 
knew rumours among Labour 
one mind. among 
realized proposed might well 
England heart shrank 
misery general strike would willing meet 
Government behind forces 
work, urging memories old 
measures, 
 
Tommy felt that, thanks Mr. Carter, understood position fairly 
fatal document hands Mr. Brown, 
public opinion would side Labour 
Failing that, battle even chance. 
Government loyal army police force behind might 
cost great Tommy another 
dream. Mr. Brown captured 
believed, rightly whole organization would 
strange influence 
chief held together. Without him, Tommy believed 
instant panic would set in; and, honest men left themselves, 
would possible. 
 
"This said Tommy himself. "The thing 
get hold man." 
 
partly ambitious design 
requested Mr. Carter open sealed draft 
treaty Tommy's Every 
dared think discovered many 
wiser clever men Nevertheless, stuck 
idea. 
 
evening Albert grounds Astley 
Tommy's ambition somehow gain admission 
house itself. approached Tommy gave sudden 
 
second floor window one standing window 
light room threw one Tommy 
would recognized Tuppence 
 
clutched Albert shoulder. 
 
begin watch 
 
hastily position main began 
deep coupled following 
 
          Soldier           jolly British 
   see I'm Soldier 
 
 
favourite Tuppence's hospital days. 
doubt would recognize draw 
conclusions. Tommy note music voice, 
noise produced 
 
Presently butler, accompanied equally 
issued front door. butler 
him. Tommy continued addressing butler 
affectionately "dear old took one arm, 
butler other. ran neatly 
butler threatened police 
again. beautifully perfect Anyone 
would sworn butler real butler, real 
happened, butler 
 
Tommy retired waited Albert's return. last 
worthy made appearance. 
 
"Well?" cried Tommy eagerly. 
 
"It's right. window opened, 
something out." handed scrap paper Tommy. "It 
wrapped round 
 
paper three words: time." 
 
"Good cried Tommy. getting 
 
"I wrote message piece paper, wrapped round stone, 
continued Albert 
 
Tommy 
 
"Your zeal us, say?" 
 
could get away, come 
like 
 
know that's you," said Tommy sigh relief. "Your 
imagination runs away you, know, Why, wouldn't 
recognize heard it." 
 
Albert looked rather 
 
up," said Tommy. "No harm done. old friend 
knew was, though didn't let on. It's 
game show suspicion. That's we've found fairly plain 
don't want discourage altogether. hand, 
don't want make easy. I'm Albert, that's 
am. see, fly walk 
fly might suspect job. Hence usefulness 
promising youth, Mr. T. Beresford, who's right 
moment them. later, Mr. T. Beresford better look 
 
Tommy retired night state 
careful plan following evening. felt sure 
inhabitants Astley would interfere 
certain point. Tommy proposed give 
surprise. 
 
twelve o'clock, however, calm told 
one demanding applicant proved 
carter well 
 
"Well, good fellow, it?" asked Tommy. 
 
you, sir?" carter held dirty folded 
note, outside "Take gentleman 
near Astley give ten 
 
handwriting Tommy appreciated 
might staying assumed name. 
it. 
 
"That's right." 
 
man withheld it. 
 
"What ten 
 
Tommy hastily produced note, man 
Tommy it. 
 
"DEAR TOMMY, 
 
"I knew last night. Don't go evening. They'll lying 
wait you. They're taking us away morning. heard something 
think. I'll drop road get 
chance. Annette told you'd up. 
 

 

 
 
Tommy raised Albert even finished 
characteristic 
 
We're 
 
"Yes, sir." Albert could heard upstairs. 
mean that, puzzled. read 
slowly. 
 
Albert continued active floor above. 
 
Suddenly second came below. 
 
I'm damned 
 
"Yes, sir." 
 
Tommy note thoughtfully. 
 
"Yes, damned said softly. "But one 
last know 
 
 
 
CHAPTER JULIUS TAKES HAND 
 
Kramenin dictated 
secretary 
 
Presently telephone took 
spoke minute two, turned 
 
"Some one asking you." 
 
"Who it?" 
 
"He gives name Mr. Julius P. 
 
repeated Kramenin thoughtfully. "I heard name 

 
"His father one steel kings explained 
whose business know everything. "This young man 
must millionaire several times 
 
other's eyes narrowed 
 
"You better go see him, Find 
 
secretary closing door noiselessly behind him. 
minutes returned. 
 
"He state entirely private 
must see you." 
 
"A millionaire several times murmured up, 
dear 
 
secretary left room more, returned Julius. 
 
said latter abruptly. 
 
studying attentively pale eyes, 

 
meet you," said American. "I've got important 
business I'd like talk you, see 
looked other. 
 
"My Monsieur 
 
"That may said Julius dryly. "So I'd obliged 
you'd tell 
 
said Russian "perhaps would mind retiring 
next 
 
"The next room won't do," interrupted Julius. "I know 
want one plumb empty except me. Send 
round store buy 
 
Though particularly enjoying free easy manner 
speech, Kramenin curiosity. "Will business take 
long 
 
night job caught on." 
 
"Very good, shall require evening. Go 
night off." 
 
"Thank you, 
 
secretary bowed 
 
Julius stood door watching Finally, satisfied 
closed it, came back position centre 
room. 
 
"Now, Mr. Hersheimmer, perhaps kind come 

 
"I guess won't take Julius. Then, abrupt 
change 
 
moment Kramenin stared big then, 
almost haste, flung hands head. 
instant Julius taken measure. man deal 
physical rest would easy. 
 
"This cried Russian high voice. "An 
mean kill me?" 
 
"Not keep voice down. Don't go sideways towards 
bell. That's 
 
"What nothing Remember life utmost 
value country. may 
 
"I said Julius, "that man let daylight would 
humanity good turn. needn't worry any. I'm 
proposing kill is, you're 
 
Russian stern menace other's eyes. 
passed tongue dry lips. 
 
"What 
 
"No. want Jane 
 
"Jane Finn? heard 
 
"You're darned know perfectly 
 
"I tell I've never heard 
 
"And tell you," retorted Julius, "that Little Willie 
mad go 
 
Russian 
 
"You wouldn't 
 
"Oh, yes, would, 
 
Kramenin must recognized something voice carried 
said 
 
Granted know it?" 
 
"You tell 
 
Kramenin shook head. 
 
"I 
 
"Why not?" 
 
"I ask 
 
Mr. Ah, 
person, then? doubted it. mere mention 

 
"I seen him," said Russian slowly. face face. 
know afterwards. one crowd. 
know again. know. know 
man 
 
never know," said Julius. 
 
"He knows Even 

 
"Then won't ask you?" 
 
"You ask 
 
"Sure that's pity you," said Julius cheerfully. "But world 
general raised 
 
"You cannot mean shoot me?" 
 
"Of course do. I've always heard held life cheap, 
seems there's difference it's life question. 
gave one chance saving dirty 
wouldn't 
 
"They would kill me!" 
 
"Well," said Julius "it's you. I'll say this. 
Little Willie dead I'd take 
chance Mr. 
 
"You hang shoot me," muttered Russian 
 
"No, that's you're wrong. forget dollars. 
big crowd get they'll get 
doctors job, end they'll say 
brain shall spend months quiet 
mental health doctors declare sane again, 
end happily little Julius. guess bear months' 
order rid world you, don't 
I'll hang it!" 
 
Russian believed him. Corrupt himself, believed 
power money. read American murder trials running much 
lines indicated Julius. bought sold justice himself. 
young American, significant voice, 
whip hand him. 
 
"I'm going count continued Julius, "and guess, let 
get past four, needn't worry Mr. Brown. Maybe he'll send 
flowers won't smell them! 
I'll begin. 
 
Russian interrupted 
 
"Do 
 
Julius lowered 
 
"I thought you'd hear sense. girl?" 
 
"At Astley place 
 
"Is prisoner there?" 
 
"She's allowed leave it's safe enough 
little fool lost memory, 
 
"That's friends, 
girl, one away week 
 
"She's too," said Russian 
 
"That's said Julius. 
lovely night 
 
"What demanded 
 
sure. hope you're fond 
 
"What mean? refuse go." 
 
"Now don't get must see I'm leave 
here. You'd ring friends telephone first thing! 
observed fall other's face. "You see, you'd got fixed. 
No, sir, you're coming along me. bedroom next door here? 
Walk right in. Little Willie come behind. Put thick 
that's right. we're ready. 
walk hall 
don't forget I've got covered every inch way. shoot 
well coat pocket. One word, glance even, one 
sure strange face 

 
Together descended stairs, passed waiting car. 
Russian shaking hotel servants surrounded them. 
cry lips, last minute nerve failed him. 
American man word. 
 
reached car, Julius breathed sigh relief. 
passed. Fear successfully man 
side. 
 
"Get in," ordered. caught other's 
"No, chauffeur won't help any. Naval man. 
Revolution broke out. brother murdered 
people. 
 
"Yes, sir?" chauffeur turned head. 
 
"This gentleman Russian don't want shoot him, 
may necessary. 
 
sir." 
 
"I want go Know road all?" 
 
"Yes, sir, hour 
 
hour. I'm 
 
"I'll best, sir." car shot forward 
 
Julius side kept 
hand pocket manner 
last 
 
"There man shot began cheerfully. 
 
end run unfortunate Kramenin dead 
succession man, 
episode Julius's 
style, strictly 
 
down, chauffeur called shoulder 
coming Julius Russian direct them. plan 
drive straight house. Kramenin ask two 
Julius explained Little Willie would 
time, other's hands. 
terrific come still him. 
given dead every 
 
car swept stopped chauffeur 
looked round orders. 
 
car first, ring bell, get back 
place. Keep going, ready like hell 
give 
 
"Very good, sir." 
 
front door opened butler. Kramenin felt muzzle 
revolver pressed 
 
Julius. "And 
 
Russian lips white, voice 

 
"It Bring girl time 

 
Whittington come uttered exclamation 
astonishment seeing other. 
 
What's Surely know 
 
Kramenin interrupted him, using words created many 
unnecessary 
 
"We Plans must must save 
It's 
 
Whittington hesitated, hardly moment. 
 
"You HIM?" 
 
time 
lost. little fool better come too." 
 
Whittington turned ran back house. minutes 
went by. figures hastily appeared 
steps car. smaller two inclined 
resist Whittington Julius leaned 
forward, light open door face. 
Another man steps behind Whittington gave startled 
end. 
 
"Get move on, shouted Julius. 
 
chauffeur slipped bound car started. 
 
man steps uttered oath. hand went pocket. 
flash report. missed girl 

 
"Get down, cried Julius. bottom 
thrust forward, standing up, took careful aim 

 
"Have hit him?" cried Tuppence eagerly. 
 
replied Julius. "He isn't like take 
lot right, 
 
"Of course am. who's this?" indicated 

 
making guess thought you'd 
turned Steady That's right. 
It'll take 'em least five minutes get busy us. They'll use 
guess, look don't take 
direct route. Who's this, say, Let present Monsieur 
persuaded come trip 
 
Russian remained still 
 
"But made let us demanded Tuppence 
 
"I reckon Monsieur Kramenin asked 
couldn't 
 
much burst 
 
you! know betrayed them. life won't 
safe hour country." 
 
"That's so," assented Julius. "I'd advise make 
right away." 
 
"Let go, then," cried other. "I done asked. 
still keep you?" 
 
"Not pleasure company. guess get right 
want to. thought you'd rather back 
 
"You may never reach snarled other. "Let go 
now." 
 
"Sure thing. Pull up, making return 
ever come Russia, Monsieur shall expect 

 
Julius finished speech, car 
finally Russian swung disappeared 
night. 
 
"Just mite impatient leave commented Julius, car 
gathered way again. "And idea saying 
Say, Jane, get seat now." 
 
first time girl spoke. 
 
"How him?" asked. 
 
Julius tapped 
 
"Little Willie takes 
 
cried girl. colour face, eyes 
looked Julius. 
 
didn't know going happen said 
Tuppence. "Old Whittington hurried us off. thought 

 
said Julius. "Is call her?" 
 
mind seemed trying adjust new idea. 
 
"It's said Tuppence, opening eyes wide. 
 
retorted Julius. "She may think it's name, 
gone, poor it's one real original Jane Finn 
we've got here." 
 
"What?" cried Tuppence. 
 
angry 
car behind head. 
 
you," cried Julius. "It's got busy 
pretty quickly. Push 
 
car fairly forward. Three rang out, went 
happily wide. Julius, leant back car. 
 
"Nothing shoot announced gloomily. "But guess 
another little soon. 
 
raised hand 
 
"You said Annette quickly. 
 

 
girl sprang feet. 
 
"Let out! Let out, say! Stop car. they're after. 
I'm one want. shall lose lives me. Let 
go." door. 
 
Julius took arms, looked her. spoken 
trace foreign 
 
down, said gently. "I guess there's nothing wrong 
memory. time, eh?" 
 
girl looked him, nodded, suddenly burst 
Julius shoulder. 
 
sit We're going let 
 
girl said 
 
"You're home. tell voice. makes 
 
"Sure I'm home. I'm Hersheimmer. came 
Europe purpose find pretty you've led me." 
 
car speed. George spoke 
 
here, sir. I'm sure way." 
 
car till hardly figure climbed 
suddenly back, plunged head first midst them. 
 
said Tommy, himself. 
 
mass confused greeted him. replied 

 
"Was Hung behind. Couldn't let know 
could hang on. 
then, get 
 
"Get out?" 
 
"Yes. There's station road. Train due three minutes. 
You'll catch 
 
"What devil driving demanded Julius. "Do think 
fool leaving 
 
"You aren't going leave car. 
 
"You're Beresford. staring can't let girls 
go alone. It'll end do." 
 
Tommy turned Tuppence. 
 
"Get once, Tuppence. Take you, say. 
one harm. You're safe. Take train London. Go 
straight Sir James Peel Mr. Carter lives town, 
you'll safe him." 
 
cried Julius. "You're Jane, stay 
 
sudden swift movement, Tommy revolver Julius's 
hand, him. 
 
"Now believe I'm Get out, you, 
I'll 
 
Tuppence sprang out, unwilling Jane her. 
 
"Come on, it's right. Tommy's sure. We'll 
miss 
 
started 
 
Julius's rage burst forth. 
 
"What 
 
Tommy interrupted him. 
 
want words you, Mr. Julius 
 
 
 
CHAPTER JANE'S STORY 
 
arm along, Tuppence reached 
station. quick ears caught sound approaching train. 
 
up," we'll miss it." 
 
arrived platform train came 
Tuppence opened door empty first-class 
two girls sank breathless 
 
man looked in, passed next carriage. Jane started 
eyes looked 
Tuppence. 
 
"Is one them, think?" 
 
Tuppence shook head. 
 
"No, no. It's right." took Jane's hand wouldn't 
told us unless sure we'd right." 
 
"But doesn't know girl "You can't 
understand. Five Five long Sometimes thought go 

 
"Never mind. It's 
 
"Is it?" 
 
train moving now, night gradually 
increasing Suddenly Jane Finn started up. 
 
"What that? thought saw 
 
"No, there's nothing. See." Tuppence went window, 
let down. 
 
"You're 
 
"Quite sure." 
 
seemed feel excuse 
 
"I guess I'm acting like frightened can't help it. 
caught eyes opened wide 
 
Tuppence. back, DON'T THINK. quite 
sure Tommy wouldn't said safe 
 
"My cousin didn't think so. didn't want us this." 
 
"No," said Tuppence, rather 
 
"What thinking said Jane sharply. 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Your voice 
 
"I thinking something," confessed Tuppence. "But don't want 
tell now. may wrong, don't think so. It's 
idea came head long time ago. Tommy's got 
almost sure has. don't time enough 
later. tell back 
don't think 
 
"I'll long eyes. 
 
Tuppence, part, sat bolt attitude 
spite eyes 
flashed continually one window other. noted exact 
position communication 
would hard put say. mind 
far feeling confidence displayed words. 
Tommy, occasionally shaken doubts 
whether anyone simple honest could ever match 

 
reached Sir James Peel Edgerton safety, would 
well. would reach him? Would silent forces Mr. Brown 
already assembling them? Even last picture Tommy, 
revolver hand, failed comfort her. might 
borne sheer force Tuppence plan 
campaign. 
 
train length drew slowly Charing Jane Finn sat 
start. 
 
"Have never thought 
 
"Oh, thought we'd get London right. there's going 
begin. get out. We'll 
 
another minute passing paid necessary 

 
directed Tuppence. gave man looked 
window, started. almost certain 
man got carriage next them. horrible 
feeling slowly every side. 
 
"You see," explained Jane, "if think we're going Sir 
James, put they'll imagine we're going 
Mr. Carter. country place north London 
 
Crossing taxi held up. 
Tuppence waiting for. 
 
whispered. 
 
two girls stepped Two minutes later 
seated another taxi time direct 
House 
 
said Tuppence, great "this ought them. 
can't help thinking I'm really rather taxi 
man took number, I'll send postal order 
won't lose happens 
What's thing 
 
noise Another taxi 
them. 
 
flash Tuppence policeman 
arrived Tuppence handed driver five 
Jane crowd. 
 
"It's step two now," said Tuppence accident 
taken place 
 
"Do think collision accident, done 
 
"I don't know. might 
 
two girls hurried along. 
 
"It may said Tuppence suddenly, "but feel though 
one behind us." 
 
murmured other. "Oh, 
 
corner House Terrace, spirits 
Suddenly large apparently intoxicated man 
way. 
 
"Good evening, away 
 
"Let us said Tuppence 
 
"Just word pretty friend here." stretched 
hand, clutched Jane shoulder. Tuppence heard footsteps 
behind. pause ascertain whether friends 
head, repeated days, 
full success 
tactics man sat 
Tuppence Jane took house 
sought way down. footsteps echoed behind them. 
breath coming reached Sir James's door. 
Tuppence seized bell Jane 
 
man stopped reached foot moment 
hesitated, door fell hall 
together. Sir James came forward library door. 
 
What's this?" 
 
stepped forward, put arm round Jane swayed 
half carried library, laid 
table poured drops 
forced drink them. sigh sat up, eyes 
still wild 
 
"It's right. Don't afraid, child. You're quite 
 
breath came colour returning 
cheeks. Sir James looked Tuppence 
 
"So you're dead, Miss Tuppence, Tommy boy 

 
"The Young Adventurers take lot Tuppence. 
 
"So said Sir James dryly. right thinking 
joint venture ended success, turned 
girl Miss Jane 
 
Jane sat up. 
 
"Yes," said quietly, "I Jane Finn. lot tell you." 
 
"When 
 
voice rose little. "I shall feel safer told 

 
"As said lawyer. 
 
sat one big facing low 
voice Jane began story. 
 
"I came Lusitania take post 
keen war, dying help somehow other. 
studying French, teacher said wanting help 
hospital Paris, wrote offered services, 
accepted. hadn't got own, made easy arrange 
things. 
 
"When Lusitania man came me. I'd noticed 
I'd figured mind afraid 
somebody something. asked patriotic American, 
told carrying papers life death 
asked take charge them. watch 
advertisement Times. didn't take 
American 
 
followed seems like see 
dreams I'll hurry part. Mr. Danvers told 
watch out. might New York, didn't 
think so. first boat 
began get one woman keen look 
me, Mrs. Vandemeyer. first I'd 
grateful kind me; time 
felt something didn't like, Irish 
boat saw talking men, way 
looked saw talking me. remembered she'd 
quite near Lusitania Mr. Danvers gave 
she'd tried talk began get 
didn't quite see do. 
 
"I wild idea going London 
day, soon saw would plumb 
thing act though I'd noticed nothing, hope best. 
couldn't see could get One thing 
I'd done already open oilskin packet 
substituted blank paper, again. So, anyone 
manage it, wouldn't matter. 
 
"What real thing worried end. Finally opened 
two laid two 
advertisement pages stuck two pages together 
round edge carried magazine 
pocket 
 
"At tried get carriage people looked 
right, queer way seemed always crowd round 
pushing way didn't want go. 
something it. end found 
carriage Mrs. Vandemeyer all. went 
full, go back sit down. 
thought people 
quite man wife sitting 
felt almost happy outside London. 
leaned back closed eyes. guess thought 
eyes weren't quite suddenly saw man 
get something hand Mrs. Vandemeyer, 

 
"I can't tell sort through. 
thought get quick ever could. 
got up, trying look natural easy. Perhaps saw 
don't suddenly Mrs. Vandemeyer said flung something 
nose mouth tried moment felt 
terrific blow back 
 
Sir James murmured something minute 

 
"I don't know long came back 
felt ill lying dirty bed. 
round it, could hear two people talking room. Mrs. 
Vandemeyer one them. tried first couldn't 
take much in. last begin going 
wonder didn't right then. 
 
"They hadn't found papers. They'd got oilskin packet 
didn't know whether I'd changed 
papers, whether Danvers carrying dummy message, 
real one sent another way. spoke closed 
find out! 
 
"I'd never known 
came look me. shut eyes pretended still 
afraid they'd hear beating heart. 
However, went away again. began thinking could do? 
knew wouldn't able stand long. 
 
something put thought loss memory head. 
subject always interested me, I'd read awful lot it. 
whole thing could succeed 
carrying bluff through, might save me. said prayer, drew 
long breath. opened eyes started 
 
"Mrs. Vandemeyer came round once. face wicked 
nearly died, smiled asked French 
was. 
 
"It puzzled her, could see. called man talking 
to. stood face spoke 
French. voice ordinary quiet, somehow, don't know 
why, scared worse woman. felt he'd seen right 
me, went playing part. asked was, 
went something MUST 
moment gone. worked 
asked name. said didn't couldn't 
remember anything all. 
 
caught began it. pain awful. 
went on. managed 
things French. don't know long could gone on, 
luckily last thing heard voice saying: 
Anyway, age wouldn't know guess 
forgot American girls older age English ones, 
take interest scientific subjects. 
 
"When came to, Mrs. Vandemeyer sweet honey me. She'd 
orders, spoke I'd shock 
ill. better soon. pretended rather 
something hurt 
looked relieved said that. 
 
"By went room altogether. suspicious still, 
lay quite quiet time. end, however, got 
walked round room, examining it. thought even anyone 
watching somewhere, would seem natural enough 
circumstances. dirty place. windows, 
seemed guessed door would didn't 
try it. old pictures representing 
scenes 
 
Jane's two gave simultaneous "Ah!" girl nodded. 
 
place Soho Mr. Beresford 
course, time didn't even know London. One thing 
heart gave great relief 
saw lying back chair. 
MAGAZINE STILL 
 
"If could certain looked 
carefully round walls. didn't seem 
felt kind sure must be. sudden 
sat edge table, put face hands, 
Mon I've got sharp ears. distinctly heard 
slight enough me. 

 
"I lay bed again, Mrs. Vandemeyer brought 
still sweet make them. guess she'd 
told win confidence. Presently produced oilskin 
asked recognized it, watching like time. 
 
"I took turned puzzled sort way. shook 
head. said felt OUGHT remember something it, 
though coming back, then, could get 
hold it, went again. told 
call told 
memory would soon come back. 
 
"That awful night. I'd made plan whilst waiting her. 
papers safe far, couldn't take risk leaving 
longer. might throw magazine away minute. 
lay waiting judged must two o'clock 
morning. got softly could, felt dark along 
wall. one pictures 
crept coat 
took odd envelope two in. 
went brown paper back 
picture round. Presently able pull away. 
already torn two pages 
slipped precious picture 
brown paper little helped 
stick latter again. one would dream picture ever 
with. wall, put magazine back 
coat pocket, crept back bed. pleased 
They'd never think pulling pieces one 
hoped they'd come conclusion Danvers carrying 
dummy along, that, end, they'd let go. 
 
"As matter fact, guess that's think first, and, 
way, dangerous me. learnt afterwards nearly 
away never much chance 
first man, preferred keep 
alive chance hidden them, able tell 
recovered memory. watched constantly weeks. 
Sometimes they'd ask questions guess nothing 
didn't know third somehow managed hold 
own. strain 
 
"They took back every step Journey again, 
case I'd hidden somewhere en route. Mrs. Vandemeyer another 
woman never left moment. spoke young relative 
Mrs. Vandemeyer's whose mind affected shock 
one could appeal help without giving 
away THEM, risked Mrs. Vandemeyer 
looked rich, beautifully felt convinced they'd 
take word mine, think part mental trouble 
think felt horrors store 
would awful knew I'd 
 
Sir James nodded 
 
"Mrs. Vandemeyer woman great personality. 
social position would little difficulty imposing 
point view preference yours. 
would easily found 
 
"That's thought. ended sent 
couldn't make mind first whether 
affair hospital nurse charge me. special 
seemed nice normal last determined 
her. providence saved time falling 
door happened heard talking 
one passage. ONE THEM! still fancied 
might bluff part, put charge make 
that, nerve went dared trust 
 
"I think almost myself. while, almost forgot 
really Jane Finn. bent playing part 
Vandemeyer began play became really 
months sank sort felt sure 
die soon, nothing really sane person shut 
often ends becoming say. guess 
like that. Playing part become second nature me. wasn't even 
unhappy Nothing seemed matter. 
years went on. 
 
"And suddenly things seemed change. Mrs. Vandemeyer came 
London. doctor asked questions, 
various talk sending 
end, dare risk it. overheard something 
seemed show looking me. 
learnt later nurse looked went Paris, 
representing me. put 
searching exposed loss memory 
taken note methods 
me. dare say couldn't deceived 
man made study thing 
managed hold them. fact I'd 
thought Jane Finn long made 
 
"One night London moment's notice. took 
back house Soho. got away felt 
though something buried long 
time again. 
 
"They sent wait Mr. Beresford. course didn't know 
name thought another 
looked could hardly believe it. However, careful 
said, knew could There's small high 
wall. 
 
"But Sunday afternoon message brought house. 
Without Word 
come needn't tell next part, 
know it. thought I'd time rush get papers 

said wanted go back shouted 
name three times knew others would think meant 
Mrs. Vandemeyer, hoped might make Mr. Beresford think 
picture. He'd one first made hesitate 
trust him." 
 
paused. 
 
"Then said Sir James slowly, "are still back 
picture room." 
 
"Yes." girl back exhausted strain 
long story. 
 
Sir James rose feet. looked watch. 
 
said, "we must go once." 
 
Tuppence, surprised. 
 
may said Sir James gravely. 
going to-night chance great man 

 
dead silence, Sir James continued: 
 
"You followed doubt it. leave house 
shall followed again, MR. BROWN'S PLAN 
LEAD HIM. Soho house police supervision 
night day. several men watching it. enter 
house, Mr. Brown draw risk all, chance 
obtaining fire mine. fancies risk 
enter 
 
Tuppence opened mouth 
 
"But there's something don't haven't told you." 
eyes Jane 
 
"What that?" asked sharply. "No Miss Tuppence. 
need sure 
 
Tuppence, once, seemed 
 
"It's see, I'm would 
made Jane. "Never forgive me," 
observed 
 
"You want help out, eh?" 
 
"Yes, please. know Mr. Brown is, don't you?" 
 
"Yes," said Sir James gravely. "At last do." 
 
"At Tuppence doubtfully. "Oh, 
paused. 
 
"You thought Miss Tuppence. morally certain 
identity since night Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
mysterious 
 
"Ah!" breathed Tuppence. 
 
"For logic facts. two 
Either administered hand, 
theory reject 
 
"Yes?" 
 
else administered gave her. three 
people touched Miss Tuppence, myself, one 
Julius 
 
Jane Finn stirred sat up, regarding speaker wide astonished 
eyes. 
 
"At first, thing seemed utterly impossible. Mr. Hersheimmer, 
son prominent well-known figure America. 
seemed utterly impossible Mr. Brown could one 
same. cannot escape logic facts. Since thing 
must accepted. Remember Mrs. Vandemeyer's sudden 
agitation. Another proof, proof needed. 
 
"I took early opportunity giving words 
Mr. Hersheimmer's gathered understood 
acted set work prove impossible possible. 
Mr. Beresford rang told me, already 
photograph Miss Jane Finn never really Mr. 
Hersheimmer's 
 
girl Springing feet, cried 
 
"What mean? trying Mr. Brown 

 
"No, Miss said Sir James "Not man 
calls Julius Hersheimmer relation 
 
 
 
CHAPTER MR. BROWN 
 
SIR James's words came like girls looked equally 
puzzled. lawyer went across desk, returned small 
newspaper handed Jane. Tuppence read 
shoulder. Mr. Carter would recognized it. referred 
mysterious man found dead New York. 
 
"As saying Miss Tuppence," resumed lawyer, "I set work 
prove impossible possible. great 
fact Julius Hersheimmer assumed name. 
came across paragraph problem Julius Hersheimmer set 
discover become went West, 
obtained news photograph aid search. 
eve departure New York set upon 
body dressed shabby clothes, face prevent 
Mr. Brown took place. immediately 
England. None real Hersheimmer's friends saw 
indeed would hardly 
had, Since hand 
sworn hunt down. Every secret 
known him. come near Mrs. Vandemeyer knew 
part plan huge bribe ever 
offered her. Miss Tuppence's fortunate change plan, 
would far away flat arrived there. 
stared face. took desperate step, trusting 
assumed character avert suspicion. nearly 

 
"I can't believe it," murmured Jane. "He seemed 
 
"The real Julius Hersheimmer splendid Mr. Brown 
consummate ask Miss Tuppence also 

 
Jane turned Tuppence. latter nodded. 
 
"I didn't want say it, knew would hurt you. And, 
all, couldn't sure. still don't understand why, he's Mr. 
Brown, us." 
 
"Was Julius Hersheimmer helped 
 
Tuppence Sir James exciting events evening, 
ending "But can't see 
 
"Can't you? can. young Beresford, last 
hope Jane Finn allowed escape must 
managed suspicions job. 
They're averse young and, 
necessary, you. They'll take care get 
way right minute. Julius Hersheimmer 
true don't hit 
anybody. would happened next? would driven straight 
house Soho secured document Miss Finn would 
probably entrusted Or, conducted 
search, would pretended find already 
would dozen ways dealing situation, 
result would same. rather fancy accident would 
happened you. see, know rather inconvenient 
That's rough admit caught 
somebody else 
 
said Tuppence softly. 
 
"Yes. Evidently right moment came get rid 
sharp them. same, I'm easy mind him." 
 
"Why?" 
 
"Because Julius Hersheimmer Mr. said Sir James dryly. "And 
takes one man revolver hold Mr. 
 
Tuppence little. 
 
"What do?" 
 
"Nothing we've house Soho. Beresford still 
got upper hand, there's nothing fear. otherwise, enemy 
come find us, find us drawer 
desk, took service placed coat 
pocket. 
 
"Now we're ready. know better even suggest going without you, 
Miss 
 
"I think 
 
"But suggest Miss Finn remain here. 
perfectly safe, afraid absolutely worn 

 
Tuppence's surprise Jane shook head. 
 
"No. guess I'm going too. papers must go 
business end. I'm better 
 
Sir James's car ordered round. short drive Tuppence's 
heart beat spite momentary uneasiness 
respecting Tommy, could feel going 

 
car drew corner square got out. Sir James 
went man duty several others, 
spoke him. rejoined 
 
"No one gone house far. watched back 
well, quite sure that. Anyone attempts enter 
done arrested immediately. Shall go in?" 
 
policeman produced knew Sir James well. also 
orders respecting Tuppence. third member party 
unknown them. three entered house, pulling door behind 
them. Slowly stairs. top 
curtain Tommy hidden day. Tuppence 
heard story Jane character looked 
velvet interest. Even could almost swear 
though one behind it. strong 
almost fancied could make 
Supposing Mr. 
 
Impossible Yet almost went back put curtain aside 
make 
 
entering prison room. place anyone hide 
here, thought Tuppence, sigh relief, 
indignantly. must give way foolish 
curious feeling MR. BROWN 
that? one 
becoming 
 
Jane gone straight picture 
steady hand. dust lay thick upon it, 
lay wall. Sir James handed 
away brown paper advertisement 
page magazine fell out. Jane picked up. Holding apart 
two thin covered 
 
dummy real thing! 
 
"We've got it," said Tuppence. "At 
 
moment almost breathless emotion. Forgotten faint 
imagined minute ago. None eyes 
anything Jane held hand. 
 
Sir James took it, scrutinized 
 
"Yes," said quietly, "this draft 
 
"We've said Tuppence. almost wondering 
voice. 
 
Sir James echoed words folded paper carefully put 
away looked curiously round room. 
 
"It young friend confined long, 
not?" said. "A truly sinister room. notice absence 
windows, door. Whatever took 
place would never heard outside world." 
 
Tuppence words woke vague alarm her. 
one concealed one might bar door 
them, leave die like realized 
absurdity thought. house surrounded police who, 
failed would hesitate break make 
thorough search. smiled looked 
start find Sir James watching her. gave emphatic little 

 
"Quite right, Miss Tuppence. danger. I. Miss 

 
"Yes," admitted Jane. "It's can't help it." 
 
Sir James nodded again. 
 
"You PRESENCE MR. BROWN. Tuppence 
made doubt BROWN 
 
"In 
 
"In don't MR. 
 
stared him. lines face 
changed. different man stood them. smiled 
slow cruel smile. 
 
leave room said 
draft treaty mine." smile grew 
wider looked Tuppence. "Shall tell be? Sooner 
later police break in, find three victims 
Mr. two, understand, fortunately third 
dead, wounded, able describe attack 
wealth hands Mr. Brown. 
one think searching Sir James Peel 
 
turned Jane. 
 
"You me. make 
again." 
 
faint sound behind him, but, intoxicated success, 
turn head. 
 
slipped hand pocket. 
 
Young said, slowly raised big 

 
But, even so, felt seized behind grip 
revolver hand, voice Julius 
Hersheimmer said 
 
"I guess you're caught goods upon you." 
 
blood rushed face, 
looked one two 
looked Tommy. 
 
said beneath breath. might 
 
Seeing disposed offer resistance, grip 
Quick flash left hand, hand bore big 
raised 
 
said, still looking Tommy. 
 
face changed, long fell 
forward whilst bitter filled 
air. 
 
 
 
CHAPTER SUPPER PARTY 
 
supper party given Mr. Julius Hersheimmer friends 
evening 30th long remembered took 
place private room, Mr. Hersheimmer's orders brief 
gave millionaire gives 
usually gets it! 
 
Every delicacy season duly provided. carried 
ancient royal care. 
fruits earth far apart May 
November found side side. list 
small American Mr. Carter, taken 
liberty, said, bringing old friend, Sir William Beresford, 
him, Dr. Hall, two adventurers, 
Miss Prudence Cowley Mr. Thomas Beresford, last, least, 
Miss Jane Finn. 
 
Julius spared pains make Jane's appearance success. 
mysterious knock brought Tuppence door 
American girl. Julius. hand held 

 
"Say, Tuppence," began, "will good Take this, 
get Jane regularly evening. You're coming 
supper Spare get me?" 
 
"Sure thing," Tuppence. "We shall enjoy ourselves. 
pleasure Jane. She's thing I've ever 
 
"That's so," agreed Mr. Hersheimmer 
 
brought momentary Tuppence's eye. 
 
"By way, Julius," remarked given 
answer 
 
said Julius. face 
 
"You asked you," Tuppence, 
eyes true manner early "and 
wouldn't take answer. I've thought well 
 
"Yes?" said Julius. stood forehead. 
 
Tuppence suddenly. 
 
"You great said. "What earth induced it? 
could see time didn't care me!" 
 
"Not all. still highest sentiments esteem 
admiration 
 
said Tuppence. kind sentiments soon 
go wall sentiment comes Don't they, old 

 
"I don't know said Julius large 
burning 
 
retorted Tuppence. closed door, 
add shall always consider 

 
"What it?" asked Jane Tuppence rejoined her. 
 

 
"What 
 
think, wanted see you, wasn't going let him. 
you're going burst upon every one like King 
Solomon Come WE'RE GOING 
 
people 29th, passed much 
day. Speeches made Park 
singing Red wandered 
streets less manner. Newspapers hinted 
general inauguration forced 
hide diminished among 
sought prove peace effected following 
Sunday papers brief notice sudden death Sir 
James Peel famous paper 
dealt dead man's career. exact manner 
sudden death never made public. 
 
Tommy right situation. 
show. Deprived organization fell 
Kramenin made precipitate return Russia, leaving England early 
Sunday morning. gang fled Astley 
leaving haste, various documents 
proofs conspiracy 
hands, aided small brown taken pocket 
dead man contained full damning resume whole 
Government called Labour 
leaders forced recognize used 
Certain made Government, eagerly 
accepted. Peace, 
 
Cabinet knew narrow escaped utter 
burnt Mr. Carter's brain strange scene 
taken place house Soho night before. 
 
entered room find great man, friend 
mouth. dead man's 
draft 
there, presence three, reduced 
England 
 
now, evening private room Mr. 
Julius P. Hersheimmer receiving 
 
Mr. Carter first old 
gentleman, sight Tommy flushed hair. 
came forward. 
 
said old gentleman, surveying "So you're 
you? much look you've done good work, 
mother must brought well all. Shall 
let You're know; future 
propose make look upon Park 

 
"Thank you, sir, it's awfully decent you." 
 
young lady I've hearing lot about?" 
 
Tommy introduced Tuppence. 
 
said Sir her. aren't used 
young 
 
"Yes, said Tuppence. clothes different, perhaps, 

 
"Well, perhaps you're right. 
 
"That's it," said Tuppence. "I'm frightful myself." 
 
"I believe you," said old gentleman, ear 
high young women "old 
him. Tuppence's delighted old 
 
came little company 
found himself, glad daughter considered 
distinguished herself, unable help glancing time 
time nervous Tuppence 
cross legs, set guard upon tongue, 
refused 
 
Dr. Hall came next, followed American 
 
"We might well sit down," said Julius, introduced 
other. 
 
indicated place honour wave hand. 
 
Tuppence shook head. 
 
Jane's one thinks she's held 
years, ought made 
 
Julius flung grateful Jane came forward 
seat. Beautiful seemed before, nothing 
went fully Tuppence performed 
part model supplied famous 
entitled "A 
rose pure column girl's white throat, 
masses hair crowned lovely head. admiration 
every eye, took seat. 
 
Soon supper party full one accord Tommy 
called upon full complete 
 
"You've darned close whole Julius accused 
him. "You let 
guess reasons that. idea Tuppence 
casting part Mr. Brown 
 
"The idea original said Mr. Carter gravely. "It 
poison carefully 
paragraph New York paper suggested plan him, 
means nearly 
 
"I never liked him," said Julius. "I felt first 
something wrong him, always suspected 
silenced Mrs. Vandemeyer wasn't till heard 
order Tommy's execution came right heels interview 
Sunday began fact 
big 
 
"I never suspected all," lamented Tuppence. "I've always thought 
much he's undoubtedly 

 
Julius agreed. 
 
goods And, instead sitting 
let tell us it." 
 

 
"There's nothing said Tommy, "I 
awful time found photograph Annette, 
realized Jane Finn. remembered persistently 
shouted word thought 
that's that. course went whole thing 
see I'd made myself." 
 
"Go on," said Mr. Carter, Tommy showed signs taking refuge 
silence more. 
 
"That business Mrs. Vandemeyer worried Julius told 
it. face it, seemed Sir James must 
done trick. didn't know Finding photograph 
story got Inspector 
Brown, made suspect Julius. remembered Sir James 
discovered false Jane Finn. end, couldn't make 
decided take chances either way. left note 
Julius, case Mr. Brown, saying 
dropped Sir James's letter offer job desk 
would see genuine wrote letter 
Mr. Carter rang Sir James. Taking confidence would 
best thing either way, told everything except 
believed papers way helped get 
track Tuppence Annette almost me, kept 
mind open two them. got bogus note 

 
"But 
 
Tommy took note question pocket passed round 
table. 
 
"It's handwriting right, knew wasn't 
She'd never spell name anyone 
never seen written might quite easily so. Julius seen 
showed note SIR JAMES 
everything plain sent Albert Mr. 
Carter. pretended go away, back again. Julius came 
bursting car, felt wasn't part Mr. Brown's 
would probably trouble. Unless Sir James actually 
caught act, speak, knew Mr. Carter would never believe 
bare 
 
"I Mr. Carter 
 
"That's sent girls Sir James. sure they'd fetch 
house Soho sooner later. threatened Julius 
wanted Tuppence repeat Sir James, 
wouldn't worry us. moment girls sight 
told Julius drive like hell London, went along told 
whole story. got Soho house plenty time met 
Mr. Carter outside. arranging things went 
behind curtain orders say, 
asked, one gone house. That's all." 
 
Tommy came abrupt 
 
silence moment. 
 
"By way," said Julius suddenly, "you're wrong 
photograph Jane. taken me, found again." 
 
cried Tuppence. 
 
"In little safe wall Mrs. Vandemeyer's 
 
"I knew found something," said Tuppence "To tell 
truth, that's started suspecting you. didn't 
say?" 
 
"I guess mite suspicious too. got away once, 
determined wouldn't let I'd got 
made dozen copies it!" 
 
"We kept back something said Tuppence thoughtfully. "I 
suppose secret service work makes like that!" 
 
pause Mr. Carter took pocket small shabby 
brown book. 
 
said would believed Sir James Peel 
Edgerton guilty speak, caught act. 
so. Indeed, read little book 
could bring fully credit truth. book 
pass possession Scotland never publicly 
Sir James's long association law would make 
you, know truth, propose read certain 
passages throw light extraordinary 
great man." 
 
opened book, turned thin pages. 
 
 
"... madness keep book. know that. 
evidence me. never taking 
feel urgent need book taken 
dead 
 
"... early age realized 
fool brain power greatly 
know born succeed. appearance 
thing me. quiet 

 
"... boy heard famous murder trial. deeply 
impressed power eloquence counsel 
first time entertained idea taking talents 
particular studied criminal 
man Even 
eloquence counsel hardly likely save him. felt 
occurred 
criminal standard low one. 
general civilization drifted 
Strange men brains never realized extraordinary 
played magnificent 
unlimited made brain 
 
"... read standard works crime confirmed 
opinion. deliberate embracing career 
man. considered. Supposing utmost 
called rose height 
entered even, became Prime 
Minister then? every turn 
democratic system 
mere power 
power could obtained working 
outside law. play human nature, 
get together control vast organization, 
finally overthrow existing order, thought 
intoxicated 
 
"... saw must lead two lives. man like bound 
notice. must successful career would mask true 
Also must cultivate personality. 
upon famous 
chosen greatest 
grease false put 
like shed it, myself, quiet, man 
like every man. called Mr. Brown. hundreds 
men called hundreds men looking like 
 
"... succeeded false career. bound succeed. shall 
succeed other. man like cannot 
 
"... reading life much 

 
"... make practice defending man look 

 
"... twice felt afraid. first time 
dinner given. great 
present. talk fell said, 'A great many men 
one knows it. know 
understand looked said that. glance 
like it.... 
 
"... war disturbed thought would plans. 
Germans spy system, too, 
streets full boys young 
Yet won 
 
"... plans going girl think 
really knew must give 

 
goes well. loss memory cannot 
girl could deceive 
 
Mr. Carter paused. 
 
"I read details 
two small refer three you. light 
happened 
 
"... inducing girl come 
succeeded her. flashes might 
must got nothing 
American. me. cannot know. fancy 
Sometimes fear 
boy. hard blind eyes 

 
 
Mr. Carter shut book. 
 
"A great said. say?" 
 
silence. 
 
Mr. Carter rose feet. 
 
"I give Joint Venture amply justified 

 
drunk 
 
"There's something want continued Mr. Carter. 
looked American "I speak also, know. We'll 
ask Miss Jane Finn tell us story Miss Tuppence 
heard we'll drink health. health 
one due thanks 
gratitude two great 
 
 
 
CHAPTER 
 
"THAT mighty good said Mr. Hersheimmer, 
cousin driven back Ritz. 
 
"The one joint 
 
one you. isn't another girl world could 
carried did. 
 
Jane shook head. 
 
"I don't feel wonderful. heart I'm tired 
country." 
 
"That brings something wanted say. heard 
telling wife hoped would come right 
away. That's good enough, I've got another plan. want 
marry me! Don't get scared say once. can't love right 
away, course, that's impossible. I've loved 
moment set eyes I've seen I'm simply 
you! you'll marry me, won't worry shall 
take time. Maybe you'll never come love me, that's 
case I'll manage set free. want right look 
you, take care you." 
 
"That's said girl "Some one good 
me. Oh, don't know 
 
"Sure thing do. guess that's fixed up, I'll see 
special license to-morrow morning." 
 
"Oh, 
 
"Well, don't want any, Jane, there's sense 
waiting about. Don't shan't expect love 
once." 
 
small hand slipped his. 
 
"I love now, Julius," said Jane Finn. "I loved first moment 
car 
 
Five minutes later Jane murmured 
 
"I don't know London well, Julius, long way 

 
"It depends explained Julius going 
way 
 
"Oh, chauffeur think?" 
 
"At wages pay him, knows better independent 
thinking. Why, Jane, reason supper 
could drive home. didn't see ever going 
get hold alone. Tuppence together 
like guess another day would driven 
Beresford staring 
 

 
"Of course is. Head 
 
"I thought so," said Jane thoughtfully. 
 
"Why?" 
 
"From things Tuppence didn't 
 
"There said Mr. Hersheimmer. Jane laughed. 
 
meantime, Young Adventurers sitting bolt 
ill taxi which, singular lack 
also returning Ritz Park. 
 
terrible seemed settled them. Without 
quite knowing happened, everything seemed changed. 
old gone. 
 
Tuppence could think nothing say. 
 
Tommy equally 
 
sat straight look other. 
 
last Tuppence made desperate effort. 
 
wasn't it?" 
 

 
Another silence. 
 
"I like Julius," Tuppence again. 
 
Tommy suddenly life. 
 
"You're going marry him, said "I 
forbid it." 
 
"Oh!" said Tuppence 
 

 
"He doesn't want marry really asked 
 
"That's Tommy. 
 
"It's quite true. He's head ears love Jane. expect he's 
proposing now." 
 
said Tommy 
 
"Don't think she's lovely creature you've ever 
 
"Oh, dare say." 
 
"But suppose prefer said Tuppence 
 
dash all, Tuppence, 
 
"I like said Tuppence, hastily creating 
"By way, going do, accept Mr. Carter's offer 
Government job, accept Julius's invitation take 
post America 
 
"I shall stick old ship, think, though it's awfully good 
Hersheimmer. feel you'd home 
 
"I don't see come in." 
 
"I do," said Tommy 
 
Tuppence glance 
 
"There's money, too," observed thoughtfully. 
 
"What 
 
going get each. Mr. Carter told so." 
 
"Did ask inquired Tommy 
 
"Yes," said Tuppence "But shan't tell you." 
 

 
"It hasn't it, hope shall lots 

 
"You're Tuppence. I've quite enough adventures 

 
"Well, almost said Tuppence 
 
buying old bright 
silk polished lots 

 
said Tommy. "What's 
 
think 
 

 
"You think mind saying it, don't OURS, 
 
"You cried Tommy, arms round her. "I 
determined make say it. owe something 
way you've whenever I've tried 
 
Tuppence raised face his. taxi proceeded course round 
north side Park. 
 
"You haven't really proposed now," pointed Tuppence. "Not 
would call listening rotten one 
like I'm inclined let off." 
 
"You won't able get marrying me, don't think it." 
 
"What fun be," responded Tuppence. called sorts 
things, state 
bondage, lots more. know think is?" 
 
"What?" 
 
"A 
 
"And damned good too," said Tommy. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME ONE 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
Introduction 
 
Essay Lincoln Carl 
 
Address Lincoln Joseph 
 
 
 
 
 
VOLUME 1. 
 
 
 
 
INTRODUCTORY 
 
Immediately Lincoln's re-election Presidency, 
speech, delivered response 
evening November 10, 1864, spoke follows: 
 
"It long grave question whether government strong 
liberties people strong enough maintain 
existence great point, present rebellion 
brought republic severe Presidential election, 
occurring regular course rebellion, added little 
strife election human nature 
practically applied facts case. occurred 
case must ever occur similar cases. Human nature change. 
future great national trial, compared men this, shall 
weak strong, silly wise, bad good. 
Let us therefore study incidents philosophy learn 
wisdom none wrongs 
election over, may common interest 
common fort save common country? part, 
shall strive avoid placing way. long 
here, willingly planted thorn man's 
deeply sensible high compliment re-election 
duly trust, Almighty God directed 
countrymen right conclusion, think good, adds 
nothing satisfaction man may disappointed 
pained 
 
speech attracted much general attention, yet 
peculiar degree typical great statesman 
made it, alike strong lofty standard 
Lincoln's life, Lincoln's deeds words, 
interest intimately known 
every man engaged hard practical work American political life. 
difficult much means nation 
two foremost figures history men like Washington Lincoln. 
good every man way concerned public life feel 
highest ambition American possibly 
gratified proportion toward 
set two men. 
 
poor thing, whether nations individuals, advance 
history great deeds done past excuse 
present; excellent thing study history 
great deeds past, great men them, 
earnest desire profit thereby render better service 
present. men present day much 
like men past, live issues present 
faced better advantage men good faith studied 
leaders nation faced dead issues past. study 
Lincoln's life enable us avoid 
always lie one side 
alike man nation. helps nothing avoided one 
other. 
mind, others 
power good little power 
Lincoln 
themselves. life teaches people must act wisdom, 
otherwise adherence right mere sound without 
must also act else seems 
wisdom end turn kind 

 
Throughout entire life, especially rose leadership 
party, Lincoln stirred sense 
lofty throughout entire life, also accepted human 
nature is, worked practical good sense achieve 
results instruments hand. impossible conceive 
man farther removed farther removed 
mere also impossible conceive man 
sane man less influence 
fantastic morality fantastic 
reality profoundly makes man 
world refuse possible cannot accomplish 
impossible. 
 
fifth volume History England, draws 
interesting distinction qualities needed successful 
political career modern society lead 
spheres pure intellect pure moral effort. says: 
 
moral qualities required higher spheres 
statesmanship hero 
earnestness complete every faculty 
delicacy conscience 
aim far exceeding average men, 
likely prove rather politician 
deals largely art 
great measure skilful compromise, conditions 
modern life, statesman likely succeed best possesses 
qualities unusual degree, 
intellectual moral sympathy average intelligent 
men time, common common 
business knowledge men, resolution, 
dealing immediate 
character easily 
confidence, especially needed, likely 
found among enlightened men world among men 
great original genius heroic type 
 
American people feel profoundly grateful greatest 
American statesman since Washington, statesman 
absolutely democratic republic succeeded best, man 
actually combined two sets qualities thus 
puts Abraham Lincoln, Western 
country lawyer, one enlightened men 
world, practical qualities enable man 
guide yet also genius heroic 
leader rose level greatest crisis nation 
nation pass nineteenth century. 
 

 
HILL, OYSTER BAY, N. September 22, 
 
 
 
 
INTRODUCTORY NOTE 
 
"I wrote Lincoln long death, "a great 
deal ridicule without much received great deal 
kindness quite free Day, 1865, world 
knew little much really 
Lincoln man became Lincoln year 
year to-day, swift passing knew 
him, figure grows ever less be. 
Lincoln man, wise, set high worth far 
Lincoln vaguely example 
man, 
 
And, though us, 
listened Gettysburg inspired know Abraham 
Lincoln, yet us another way whereby may attain 
sincerity 
loved hated him. may printed 
words, yet speak knew him, look 
eyes looked his. truth find 
simple great though man tried less 
show power, man shown 
 
Thus writings Abraham Lincoln associated 
Washington, Hamilton, Franklin, 
Lincoln become still past, but, 
rather, become still present. 
However faint may grow story Great Struggle, 
Lincoln, least remain real, living American. 
matter clearly, directly, Lincoln shown 
yet forget men whose 
various us character. nation 
owes great debt Lincoln, so, also, Lincoln's memory owes great 
debt nation which, nation could done, 
able appreciate full worth. Among many brought 
whose estimates placed 
volumes may mentioned here. President Mr. 
Mr. himself, 
behalf wishes offer sincere 
 
Thanks also due, valuable sympathetic assistance rendered 
preparation work, Mr. A. 
Major William H. Philadelphia, Mr. C. F. 
Chicago, Chicago Historical Association personally 
capable Miss Major Henry S. 
General Thomas J. Illinois. 
 
various received, editor indebted 
Library Congress; Messrs. 
& Co., D. & Co., & Co., & Co., 
New & Co., & Co., 
L. C. Page & Co., A. C. & Co., 
Robert Co., Cincinnati, J. B. Co., 
Philadelphia. 
 
hardly necessary add every effort made 
editor bring volumes whatever material may properly 
material much widely scattered public 
private fortunate securing certain 
interesting correspondence papers come 
print book form. Information concerning papers 
reached late enable papers find place proper 
order Rather, however, present 
papers readers included seventh 
volume 
 
   later papers are, 
    order. D.W.] 
 
October, A. B. L. 
 
 
 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN: ESSAY CARL 
 
American study character career Abraham Lincoln 
without carried away sentimental always 
inclined state mind 
exercise sober critical judgment. therefore 
surprising written spoken 
extraordinary man, even conscientiously endeavoring draw 
being, form estimate 
public drifted less 
painting great features 
tender whatever might look like 
 
standing posterity mere praise 
limitations 
great man, one whose peculiar 
consisted unlike great men, rather lose 
gain easily runs 
distinctly mixture qualities forces him, 
lofty ideal 
become ceased be, made 
character among gave singular 
power minds hearts, fitted greatest 
leader greatest crisis national life. 
 
indeed marvellous statesman military hero 
born log familiar figure American 
may search vain among one whose origin 
early life Abraham Lincoln's first saw 
light miserable Kentucky, farm consisting 
barren acres father typical "poor 
Southern without ambition 
children, constantly looking new piece land might 
make living without much mother, youth handsome 
bright, grown coarse feature mind daily 
toil whole household utterly void 
family 
Indiana, mother died, 
woman energy, taken charge children, 
boy, seven years old, 
feel like human Hard work early 
mere boy help supporting family, either father's 
hired 
drive occasionally also 
wife otherwise engaged. could regard 
advancement higher sphere activity obtained work 
amused talk 
soon distinguished among 
one something say worth listening to. win 
distinction, draw mainly upon for, 
knowledge great, opportunities satisfying 

 
log could visit little, taught 
reading, writing, elementary Among people 
settlement, small found none 
uncommon intelligence books, 
borrowed eagerly. Thus read 
learning tell stories point argue read 
Progress, short history United 
States, Life Washington. town went 
read Revised Statutes Indiana. Every printed page fell 
hands would family friends 
watched boy, daily work, 
corner log outside tree, absorbed 
book supper corn manner 
began gather knowledge, sometimes would 
girls startling remarks earth moving around 
sun, sun around earth, 
could got queer Soon also felt impulse 
making extracts books wished remember, 
also composing little own. First 
wooden white 
transferred paper, 
Lincoln taking care cut expressions 
close, might cover much 
method greatly Seeing boys put burning coal 
back wood moved write cruelty 
Seeing men intoxicated wrote 
too, tried himself, persons offensive 
rustic always fit 
ears Also political thoughts put upon paper, 
pieces even deemed good enough publication county 

 
Thus won reputation clever young man, 
increased speaker, seldom drawing upon 
dissatisfaction mounting stump 
field, keeping farm hands work little speeches 
sometimes also serious rude social 
settlement became important person, telling 
happened pass by, 
making mark too; age seventeen 
attained full height, six feet four inches 
any, terribly was. 
known never use extraordinary strength injury 
humiliation others; rather kindly turn, enforce 
justice fair dealing them. made favorite 
society, although things appeared little 
friends. Far them, given 
reading, quiet himself, 
also strange often would pass 
moment whole 
one people among appearance perhaps even 
little youth, 
large dark, 
arms legs long, 
frequent sit 
leaving several inches exposed 
lower end heavy held 
usually one coarse 
head covered winter summer 
rough hat uncertain shape, without 
 
doubtful whether felt much superior 
although confessed knowledge 
world outside circle wish 
age went Mississippi 
New Orleans flatboat hand, temporarily joining trade many 
members time still took pride called 
horse half return worked lived 
old way spring father 
time Illinois; journey fifteen days drive 
carried household Another log 
then, field, Abraham Lincoln split historic 
rails destined play part 
Presidential campaign twenty-eight years later. 
 
come age, Lincoln left family, 
"take whenever could get them." first 
carried flatboat hand New 
something happened made lasting impression upon 
witnessed slave "His heart wrote one 
nothing much; looked bad. say, 
knowing it, trip formed opinion 
slavery. run iron there, May, 
heard say lived several years New Salem, 
Illinois, small village, mill, 
shops, rose quickly, soon disappeared again. 
life, without 
aim gain food shelter day day. served 
pilot steamboat clerk store business 
failing, time. compelled measure 
strength chief him, 
became noted person community, won esteem 
friendship ruling gang degree that, 
Black Hawk war broke out, elected him, young man 
twenty-three, captain volunteer company, composed mainly 
kind. took field, deed 
protecting 
men, peril life, life old savage 

 
Black Hawk war over, turned politics. step 
volunteer company seat 
Legislature seemed natural one. although great 
New Salem, spread far enough district, 
wretched struggle began again. 
drank 
Lincoln reading books. result failure 
debt. Thereupon became appointed 
postmaster New Salem, business post-office small 
could carry incoming outgoing mail 
could lift surveying instruments horse 
sold sheriff debt. 
 
misery upon ambition rose higher 
walked many miles borrow 
improve language. lawyer copy 
began study law. 
 
People would look figure lying 
grass, "with feet sitting as, absorbed 
book, learned construct correct sentences made 
gained little practice, 
justice peace friends, without expecting Judicial 
too, thrust upon him, 
acknowledged fairness gave 
authority. popularity grew soon 
could candidate Legislature again. Although called 
Whig, ardent Henry Clay, clever stump 
speeches won election strongly Democratic district. 
first time, perhaps, thought seriously 
appearance. far content 
seldom usually always Now, borrowed 
money friend buy new suit 
fit Sangamon County thus set 
state capital, take seat among 
 
legislative career, stretched several 

did, indeed, lack ambition. even making 
"the De actually distinguished 
effective work operations 
young State received "a general system internal 
shape railroads, reckless 
policy, State debt, producing usual crop 
political policy characteristic time 
spirit Western people. Lincoln, 
doubt best little knowledge 
subject, simply followed popular current. which, 
perhaps, removal State government 
one triumphs political management 
apt pride small 
One thing, however, true nature asserted itself, 
gave distinct promise future pursuit high 
overwhelming sentiment Legislature, followed 
one recorded protest proslavery 
protest declaring "the institution slavery 
founded injustice bad 
voice true moral too; 
time, many parts West, abolitionist regarded 
little better even Lincoln" would hardly 
antislavery principles, known 
good here, obedience great 
conviction life, manifested courage stand alone, 
courage first requisite leadership great cause. 
 
Together reputation influence politician grew law 
practice, especially removed New Springfield, 
associated good 
last won fixed position society. became successful lawyer, 
less, indeed, learning 
advocate striking may 
truly said vivid sense truth justice much 
would refuse act 
attorney even personal friends saw right 
side. would abandon cases, even trial, testimony 
convinced wrong. would 
sought service pursuing advantage 
claims seemed Presenting first case 
United States Circuit Court, question one authority, 
declared that, upon careful examination, found authorities 
side, none his. Persons accused crime, 
thought would defend all, or, attempting 
unable put forth powers. One notable exception 
record, personal sympathies strongly 
felt 
justice, wrong, frequently 
unexpected resources reasoning, depth feeling, rose 
appeal overwhelm make 
fairly Even ordinary law argument, coming him, 
seldom failed produce impression profoundly convinced 
position. surprising mere 
appearance attorney case 
even judges, almost presumption 
right side, people began call him, sincerely 
meaning it, Abe 
 
meantime private trials painfully 
nature. loved loved fair 
girl, Ann Rutledge, died flower youth beauty, 
loss intensity grief friends feared 
reason. Recovering 
thought new affection upon another lady, refused him. 
finally, prosperous affairs, 
prospects political distinction him, paid addresses 
Mary Todd, Kentucky, accepted. doubts 
affection her, 
future happiness came upon him. 
distress great felt danger 
feared carry him; gave mortal offence 
appearing appointed day. 
consciousness wrong done grew 
won back ended agony marrying her, became 
faithful patient husband good father. secret 
knew family well domestic life full 
temper wife seldom put 
nature severest troubles 
accompanied life 
modest home Springfield White House Washington, 
adding private public sometimes 
upon incredible embarrassments discharge 
public duties, form one features career. 
 
continued read books travelling 
told funny stories 
neighbors around store 
hours melancholy old, became 
widely known trusted beloved among people 
State ability lawyer 
character spring sympathetic 
kindness heart. main ambition 
political hardly one would time seen 
man destined lead nation greatest crisis 
century. 
 
time yet come when, 1846, elected Congress. 
clever speech House Representatives denounced President 
Polk forced war upon Mexico, amused 
Committee Whole attack upon General 
important expression gave antislavery 
offering bill looking emancipation slaves 
District Columbia, repeated votes famous Wilmot 
Proviso, intended exclude slavery Territories acquired 
Mexico. when, expiration term, March, 1849, left 
seat, ever seeing day cause 
nearest heart would rightly grasped people, 
would able render service country great 
career member Congress sense 
ambition. Indeed, ever belief 
great destiny himself, must weak 
actually sought obtain new Whig President, General Taylor, 
place Commissioner General Land Office; willing 
bury one administrative government. 
Fortunately country, less when, 
later, territorial offered him, Mrs. 
Lincoln's protest induced decline it. Returning Springfield, 
gave renewed law practice, acquiesced 
Compromise 1850 mental supported 
Presidential campaign 1852 Whig candidate 
speeches, took interest politics 
day. time drawing 
 
peace promised, apparently Compromise 
1850 broken introduction Kansas-Nebraska Bill 
1854. repeal Missouri Compromise, opening Territories 
United States, coming 
invasion slavery, suddenly revealed whole significance 
slavery question people free States, thrust 
politics country paramount issue. Something like 
electric shock flashed North. Men short time 
absorbed business deprecated 
political startled security sudden 
took sides. trouble conscience 
slavery, even times apparent secretly 
disturbed souls Northern people, broke forth utterance 
louder ever. bonds accustomed party allegiance gave way. 
Antislavery Democrats antislavery Whigs felt drawn 
together common sentiment, soon began 
rally new organization. Republican party sprang 
meet call hour. Abraham Lincoln's time 
come. rapidly advanced position conspicuous 
struggle. This, however, owing 
alone. Indeed, slavery question stirred soul profoundest 
was, one intimate friends said, "the one 
would become called forth faculties 
Yet many others who, long 
fought antislavery battle popular assembly, press, 
halls Congress, far surpassed compared 
still obscure man. 
although highly honorable well far essentially 
Whig outside State 
attracted comparatively little Illinois 
recognized one foremost men Whig party. Among 
opponents Nebraska Bill occupied State important 
position, 1856 choice large majority 
men" Legislature seat Senate 
United States became he, old Whig, could 
obtain votes Anti-Nebraska Democrats necessary make 
majority, generously urged friends transfer votes 
Trumbull, elected. Two years later, 
first national convention Republican party, delegation 
Illinois brought forward candidate 
received respectable support. Still, name Abraham Lincoln 
widely known beyond boundaries State. 
local prominence Illinois put position peculiar 
advantage battlefield national politics. assault 
Missouri Compromise broke legal spread 
slavery Stephen Douglas leader central 
Douglas Senator Illinois, Lincoln's State. 
Douglas's national theatre action Senate, 
Illinois official position 
power. Senate justify people 
Illinois, order maintain place; Illinois 
eyes turned Lincoln Douglas's natural 
 
young men come Illinois, Lincoln Indiana, 
Douglas Vermont, grown together public life, Douglas 
Democrat, Lincoln met first 
Lincoln Legislature Douglas 
members Legislature. Douglas, able 
sort, rose 
political distinction remarkable quick succession 
became member Legislature, secretary 
state, judge supreme bench Illinois, three times 
Representative Congress, Senator United States 
thirty-nine years old. National Democratic convention 1852 
appeared even nomination Presidency, 
favorite received respectable vote. 
far Lincoln commonly called political success 
frequently happened political 
Lincoln felt selected Whig 
friends, answer Douglas's thus two looked 
upon, large part State least, representative 
respective parties debates 
popular soon, therefore, as, passage 
Kansas-Nebraska Bill, Douglas returned Illinois defend cause 
Lincoln, obeying 
also general stepped forward principal 
Thus struggle principles involved Kansas-Nebraska 
Bill, or, sense, struggle freedom slavery, 
assumed Illinois form personal contest 
Lincoln Douglas; and, continued became 
personal contest Illinois watched constantly increasing 
interest whole country. When, 1858, Douglas's senatorial term 
Lincoln formally designated Republican 
convention Illinois candidate Senate, take 
Douglas's place, two agreed debate questions 
issue face face series public eyes 
whole American people turned eagerly one point: 
spectacle reminded one lays ancient times telling two 
armies, battle standing still see two principal 
champions fight contested cause lines single 

 
Lincoln reached full maturity powers. 
statesman embrace comprehensive knowledge public 
affairs. studied indeed made own, eager 
characteristic superior minds 
learning difficulties. narrow opportunities 
life led younger years permitted 
large mind. true, political 
occasionally spoken issues 
Whigs Democrats, tariff, internal improvements, banks, 
on, manner. ever given much 
serious thought study safe assume 
mind original would certainly 
produced utterance upon worth soul 
evidently never deeply stirred moral 
nature brain developed activity 
mastered knowledge within soon repeal 
Missouri Compromise thrust slavery question politics 
paramount issue, Lincoln plunged arduous study 
moral mind became 
complete arsenal argument. rich natural long 
varied practice, made orator rare 
days, pleased short period 
style which, among passes 
instinct 
soon revealed noble beauty 
strength possessed uncommon power clear 
statement, might reminded knew story 
early youth efforts poor boy, 
wooden carefully 
expressions order save paper. language energy 
honest master logical loved 
point reasoning humorous usually 
anecdotes Western life, store 
command. anecdotes seldom rustic 
them, used great effect, amusing 
audience, give life 
argument, drive home natural 
tone, prejudice partisan would 
often open reasoning way minds unwilling receive 
it. 
 
Yet greatest power consisted charm 
charm not, ordinary way, appeal ear eye. 
voice rather especially 
rose high moments great figure 
action limbs commanded 
none commonly understood. 
charm different kind. rare depth 
sympathetic feelings. Sympathy 
strongest element nature. One 
knew became President, says: might 
stirred deeply object present, never object absent 
former case would likely extend relief, 
little inquiry merits case, because, expressed 
himself, pain half 
correct. certainly true could witness individual 
distress kind without feeling 
pain himself, much could suffering 
others put end own. impulse help 
felt human every living 
boys wood 
putting burning coal back, so, told, would, 
mature man, 
struggling Indeed, appeals 
irresistible him, felt difficult 
refuse anything refusal could give pain, 
sometimes spoke say positive 
certainly prove feeling 
confined individual cases suffering witnessed eyes. 
boy moved aspect wood 
compose essay cruelty animals general, aspect 
cases suffering wrong wrought moral nature, set 
mind work oppression general. 
 
sympathy went forth others, attracted others him. 
Especially called felt drawn 
feeling understood, 
appreciated them. grown among poor, 
never ceased remember good souls met among 
them, many done him. Although mental 
development risen far them, never looked upon them. 
felt reasoned knew, felt 
reasoned himself. could moved knew, 
moved practised moving others. mind much larger 
thoroughly thought 
much farther they, thoughts ever present him. 
visible distance grown wide rise world 
would seem Much speech 
still clung him. Although become "Mr. Lincoln" later 
still 
neither appeared unnatural 
them, least awkward him. still told 
enjoyed stories similar told enjoyed Indiana 
settlement New wants remained modest 
ever domestic habits means completely accommodated 
though 
long clothes better material 
better make would sit ill gigantic cotton 
without tied together coarse string 
keep carried circuit said 
remembered still 
habit utterly free affected 
comfort men sometimes carry 
circumstances. Abraham Lincoln entirely 
came contact knew so. ways thinking 
feeling become gentleman highest sense, 
process polished little form. plain 
people, therefore, still considered Abe Lincoln" one 
themselves; felt, doubt frequently did, 
thoughts moved sphere own, 
proud him, without 
relation mutual sympathy 
understanding Lincoln plain people gave 
peculiar power public man, singularly fitted him, shall 
see, leadership required great 
crisis coming leadership indeed thinks moves 
ahead masses, always remains within sight sympathetic 
touch them. 
 
entered upon campaign 1858 better ever 
before. instinctively felt, convinced 
arduous study, struggle spread 
slavery right, justice, philosophy, enlightened opinion 
history, Constitution, good policy side. 
observed began discuss slavery question 
speeches much key former 
remained fond telling funny stories private 
conversation, disappeared public discourse. 
would still point argument expressions 
flash rays kindly humor 
general tone serious, rose sometimes genuine 
skill thrust 
wealth knowledge, power reasoning elevation sentiment, 
language rare strength, beauty, 
seldom astonished old friends. 
 
Neither two champions could found formidable 
met other. Douglas far 
conspicuous member party. "the Little 
greatness mind 
body. though low 
figure appeared something 
shake long 
hair. loud persistent territorial 
name patriotism given enthusiastic 
following among young Great natural parts, highly 
long training made 
Senate filled able men. could 
appeals patriotic feelings fierce denunciation 
thoroughly parliamentary 
genial social 
felt one statesmen time, 
would frequently meet opponents 
persons speech opening 
campaign 1858, spoke Lincoln, Republicans 
dared advance candidate place Senate, 
air "a kind, 
amiable, intelligent gentleman good Little Giant 
would pleased pass tall 
knew Lincoln well, however, indulge seriously 
political situation moment curious 
Douglas could expect derive confusion great 
advantage 
 
repeal Missouri Compromise, opening Territories 
slavery, Douglas pleased South, greatly alarmed 
North. sought Northern sentiment 
Kansas-Nebraska Bill declaration intent "not 
legislate slavery State Territory, exclude 
therefrom, leave people thereof perfectly free form 
regulate institutions way, subject 
Constitution United States." called "the great principle 
popular sovereignty." asked whether, act, people 
Territory, admission State, would right 
exclude slavery, answered, "That question courts 
came famous Scott 
Supreme Court held substantially right hold slaves 
property existed Territories virtue Federal 
Constitution, right could denied act 
territorial government. This, course, denied right people 
Territory exclude slavery territorial 
condition, alarmed Northern people still more. Douglas 
recognized binding force decision Supreme Court, 
time great principle 
popular sovereignty remained force Meanwhile, 
proslavery people western Missouri, so-called 
invaded Kansas, set constitutional convention, made 
constitution extreme 
refused submit fairly vote people 
Kansas, referred Congress thus 
accomplish admission Kansas slave State. Douglas 
supported would lost North. 
name popular sovereignty declared opposition 
acceptance constitution sanctioned formal popular 
vote. "did said, "whether slavery voted down," 
must fair vote people. Thus drew upon 
hostility Buchanan administration, controlled 
proslavery interest, saved Northern 
this, Democratic call "the true 
champion even Republicans large influence, 
prominent among Horace Greeley, Douglas 
fight Lecompton Constitution, hoping 
permanently proslavery interest force lasting breach 
Democratic party, seriously advised Republicans Illinois 
give opposition Douglas, help 
Senate. Lincoln opinion. believed great popular 
movements succeed guided faithful friends, 
antislavery cause could safely entrusted keeping 
one "did care whether slavery voted down." 
opinion prevailed Illinois; influences within Republican 
party prevailed yielded 
acquiesced all, strengthened Douglas's 
position. situation things campaign 1858 
Lincoln Douglas began. 
 
Lincoln opened campaign side convention 
nominated Republican candidate 
saying sounded like 
"A house divided cannot stand. believe 
government cannot endure permanently half slave half free. 
expect Union dissolved. expect house fall, 
expect cease divided. become one thing 
other. Either opponents slavery arrest 
spread it, place public mind shall rest 
belief course ultimate extinction, advocates 
push forward, till shall become alike lawful 
well new, North well South." proceeded 
point Nebraska doctrine combined Dred Scott 
decision worked direction making nation "all 
spoken Seward short time later, 
speech made famous mainly new 
discovery it, right utterance 
proved conception issue, also, 
situation candidate, firmness moral 
friends read draught speech 
delivered warned anxiously delivery might fatal 
success election. advice, ordinary 
sense. slaveholder could disunion 
mere suggestion existence slavery incompatible 
freedom Union would hazard political chances public 
man North. Lincoln inflexible. "It said he, 
"and deliver would rather defeated 
expressions speech held discussed people 
victorious without them." statesman right 
judgment statement truth, 
practical politicians also right prediction 
immediate effect. Douglas instantly seized upon declaration 
house divided cannot stand main objective point 
sectional 
doubt persistent 
charge served 
 
Lincoln constantly bring moral philosophical side 
subject 
speeches. Douglas's sophism right 
people Territory slavery not, might desire, 
accordance principle true popular sovereignty, made 
pointed "Then true popular sovereignty, according Senator 
Douglas, means that, one man makes another man slave, 
third man shall allowed Douglas's argument 
principle demanded people Territory 
permitted choose whether would slavery 
God made man, placed good evil him, allowing 
choose upon Lincoln solemnly replied: 
place good evil man, telling make 
contrary, God tell one tree 
fruit eat, upon pain not, 
however, place advanced ground taken radical 
anti-slavery men. admitted that, Constitution, "the 
Southern people entitled Congressional fugitive slave 
although approve fugitive slave law 
declared also that, slavery kept Territories 
territorial existence, be, people 
Territory, fair chance clear field, 
extraordinary thing adopt slave constitution, 
actual presence institution among them, saw alternative 
admit Territory Union. declared that, 
exceedingly glad see slavery abolished 
District Columbia, would, member Congress, 
present views, endeavor bring abolition except 
condition emancipation gradual, approved 
decision majority voters District, compensation 
made unwilling owners. every available occasion, pronounced 
favor deportation colonization blacks, 
course consent. repeatedly wish part 
social political equality established whites 
blacks. point views reply Douglas's 
assertion Declaration Independence, speaking men 
created equal, include negroes, saying: "I 
understand Declaration Independence mean men 
created equal respects. equal 
believe mean declare men equal 
equal right life, liberty, 
pursuit happiness." 
 
regard subjects Lincoln modified position 
later period, suggested would professed 
advanced principles debates Douglas, feared 
thereby lose votes. view hardly Lincoln 
courage opinions, man 
risked election urgent protest 
friends, speech "the house divided would 
expression extreme views, really 
entertained them. fair assume said 
time really thought, if, opinions changed, 
owing new good policy duty brought 
forth entirely new set circumstances 
characteristic continued adhere impracticable 
colonization plan even Emancipation Proclamation already 
issued. 
 
contest Lincoln proved 
also political first order. amiable, 
intelligent Douglas pleased call him, 
means harmless possessed uncommon share 
seldom goes genuine simplicity 
political experience gathered Legislature 
Congress, many election added keen 
made judge probable effects 
public man's sayings doings upon popular mind, 
accurate political chances 
results, could found among party Illinois. 
perceived ugly Douglas found himself, 
Dred Scott decision, declared right hold slaves 
exist Territories virtue Federal Constitution, 
"great principle popular sovereignty," according 
people Territory, saw fit, right 
exclude slavery Douglas 
best ability avoid admission two 
question presented would good 
policy Lincoln force Douglas clear expression opinion 
whether, Dred Scott decision "the people 
Territory could lawful way exclude slavery limits prior 
formation State constitution." Lincoln predicted 
Douglas would slavery could exist Territory 
unless people desired gave protection territorial 
legislation. caucus policy pressing 
interrogatory Douglas Lincoln's friends unanimously 
advised it, answer would sufficiently 
commend Douglas people Illinois insure re-election 
Senate. Lincoln "I larger said 
"If Douglas answers, never President, battle 
1860 worth hundred this." interrogatory pressed upon 
Douglas, Douglas answer that, matter decision 
Supreme Court might abstract question, people 
Territory lawful means introduce exclude slavery 
territorial legislation friendly unfriendly institution. 
Lincoln found easy show absurdity proposition that, 
slavery admitted exist right Territories virtue 
supreme law, Federal Constitution, could kept 
inferior law, one made territorial Legislature. 
judgment nearest object 
view, proved Douglas reelected Senate. Lincoln's 
judgment proved correct Douglas, expedient 
"unfriendly legislation forfeited last chance 
becoming President United States. might hoped 
sufficient pardon South opposition 
Lecompton Constitution; taught people 
Territories could defeat proslavery men 
considered constitutional right, called 
slave power would never breach 
Southern Northern Democracy 

 
Presidential election 1860 struggle Kansas, 
debates Congress accompanied it, 
provoked violent continually stirred popular 
excitement. Within Democratic party war 
national Democratic convention met Charleston 23d April, 
1860. struggle ten days 
opponents Douglas, delegates cotton States 
withdrawn, convention adjourned without nominated 
meet Baltimore 18th June. 
however, hostile elements. appeared 
probable Baltimore convention would nominate Douglas, 
seceding Southern Democrats would set candidate own, 
representing extreme proslavery principles. 
 
Meanwhile, national Republican convention assembled Chicago 
16th May, full enthusiasm hope. situation easily 
understood. Democrats would South. order succeed 
election, Republicans addition States 
carried Fremont 1856, 
Jersey, Pennsylvania, Indiana, Illinois place either 
New Jersey Indiana. eminent Republican statesmen leaders 
time thought Presidency Seward Chase, 
regarded belonging advanced order antislavery men. 
two, Seward largest following, mainly New York, 
New England, Cautious politicians doubted seriously 
whether Seward, speeches 
given reputation reckless would able command 
whole Republican vote doubtful States. Besides, long 
public career made enemies. evident thought 
Seward's nomination experiment would consider Chase 
reason. would look round 
man; among men Abraham Lincoln 
easily discovered stand great debate Douglas 
given national people East eager 
see hero contest, induced visit 
several Eastern astonished delighted large 
distinguished audiences speeches singular power 
address delivered Cooper Institute New York, 
audience containing large number important persons, then, 
ever since been, especially one logical 
convincing political speeches ever made country. people 
West grown proud Western great man, 
popularity home peculiar features could 
expected exercise Lincoln's name 
available candidate left chance accidental 
indeed probable thought Presidential 
possibility, contest Douglas 
late April, 1859, written friend approached 
subject think fit Presidency. 
limit ambition. 
friends Illinois took matter seriously hand, Lincoln, 
formally authorized "the use 
matter managed energy excellent judgment that, 
convention, whole vote Illinois start 
with, won votes sides without large 
majority opponents Seward went Abraham Lincoln, 
gave nomination third 
Douglas nominated one wing Democratic party Baltimore, 
extreme proslavery wing put field 
candidate. campaign conducted energy genuine 
enthusiasm antislavery side united Republicans defeated 
divided Democrats, Lincoln elected President majority 
votes electoral 
 
result election hardly declared disunion 
movement South, long threatened carefully 
broke shape open nearly month 
Lincoln could inaugurated President United States 
seven Southern States adopted ordinances secession, formed 
independent confederacy, framed constitution it, elected 
Jefferson Davis president, expecting slaveholding 
States soon join them. 11th February, 1861, Lincoln left 
Springfield Washington; characteristic 
asked law change sign firm 
four years unavoidable absence 
taken affectionate touching leave 

 
situation confronted new President 
larger part South open rebellion, rest slaveholding 
States preparing revolt guided 
Southern people, apparently full 
enthusiasm military spirit, arms, forts 
already government Union, 
accession new President, hands men 
actively others 
doctrines dealing it, really gave aid 
comfort departments full 
treasury 
public credit lowest ill 
supplied arms, regular 
army insignificant strength, immense surface, 
deprived best officers navy small 
all. threat disunion often 
resorted slave power years gone Northern 
people ceased believe But, disunion 
actually appeared stern reality, something like chill swept 
whole Northern country. cry union peace 
price rose sides. Democratic reiterated cry 
even many Republicans grew afraid 
victory achieved spoke 
compromise. country fairly noise 
Expressions firm resolution determined antislavery 
men indeed almost drowned 
confusion voices. Even 
all. influences Europe, desire 
permanent disruption American Union, eagerly cause 
Southern two principal maritime powers 
Old World seemed waiting favorable opportunity lend 
helping hand. 
 
state things mastered Abe Lincoln" 
took seat Presidential Abe 
could say greatest 
whose life debate slavery question; never 
position power; without slightest experience 
high executive duties, speaking acquaintance 
men upon whose counsel 
accession power circumstances greeted general 
confidence even members party. indeed won 
much many Republicans, especially among 
advocated Seward's nomination Presidency, saw simple 
take government feeling little 
short orators journals opposition 
without measure. Many people actually 
wondered man could dare undertake task which, 
said neighbors parting speech, 
difficult Washington been." 
 
Lincoln brought task, aside uncommon 
first nature. 
indulge Union could maintained 
restored without conflict arms, could indeed 
problems would instinctively understood, however, 
means conflict would conducted government 
democracy. knew impending war, whether great small, 
would like foreign war, exciting united national 
civil war, likely uncommon heat party 
even localities controlled government; war would 
carried means machinery, ruled 
absolute will, means furnished 
voluntary action formed voluntary 
large sums money raised people, 
representatives, voluntarily themselves; trust extraordinary 
power voluntarily war measures, seldom 
restricting rights liberties citizen 
voluntarily accepted submitted people, 
least large majority them; would 
kept merely short period enthusiastic 
possibly weary years success disaster, hope 
knew order government 
public opinion successfully confusion created 
prejudices doubts differences sentiment 
popular mind, 
guide popular might give forth means required 
performance great task, would take 
account influences strongly affecting current popular 
thought feeling, direct appearing 
 
kind leadership conceived needed 
free people led forward en overcome 
great common danger circumstances difficulty, 
leadership dash ahead brilliant matter 
follows, intent upon available forces, 
closing front 
may advance well leadership Abraham Lincoln 
better American statesman 
understood plain people, 
prejudices noble 
strength, understood himself, sympathetic nature apt 
draw sympathy him. 
 
inaugural address official course characteristic 
manner. Although yielding nothing point principle, 
means antislavery would pleased 
ardent Republicans. rather 
father speaking children. language 
pointed ill advised attempt 
disunion was, why, Almost 
told that, duty destroy 
Union, sworn duty preserve it; least 
could do, obligations oath, possess hold 
property United States; hoped 
war purpose, would none 
unless 
Lincoln accepted many valuable amendments 
suggested Seward, essentially own. Probably Lincoln 
expect inaugural address effect upon 
must known resolved upon disunion 
cost. appeal minds North, 
upon made profound impression. Every candid man, however 
admit President bound oath 
oath could less said 
would do; resisted appeal 
President made, bent upon 
government must supported them. partisan sympathy 
Southern insurrection still existed North indeed 
diminished influence 
still resisted risk appearing 

 
must supposed, however, Lincoln succeeded 
pleasing even among among nearest 
him. cabinet, substantially left 
Springfield Washington, thought wise call assistance 
strong men party, especially given evidence 
support commanded Chicago convention. 
found time representatives 
different opinion within party, different 
Whigs former party 
recruited itself. sound policy circumstances. 
might indeed among members cabinet 
would break out. 
better President strong ambitious 
men near critics 
Congress, differences might composed common 
opposition him. members cabinet could hope control 
them, keep busily employed service common 
purpose, strength so. Whether possess 
strength soon tested singularly rude trial. 
 
doubt foremost members cabinet, Seward 
Chase, eminent Republican statesmen, felt 
party national convention preferred 
Presidency man thought 
greatly inferior ability experience well service. 
disappointment saw 
Western man White House, much rustic manner speech 
still clung him, meeting fellow-citizens, high low, 
footing equality, simplicity good nature 
dignity dealing great 
business state apparently 
somewhat way. understand man. Especially 
Seward, who, Secretary State, considered next 
Chief Executive, quickly accustomed giving orders 
making arrangements upon motion, thought necessary 
direction public affairs hands 
take full charge himself. end first month 
administration submitted President Lincoln, 
first brought light Nicolay Hay, one 
valuable history days. 
paper Seward actually told President end month's 
administration government still without policy, either 
domestic slavery question 
struggle Union; matter maintenance 
forts South decided 
explanations demanded 
governments Spain France, one 
annexation San invasion 
satisfactory explanations received war declared 
Spain France United States; explanations 
also sought Great Britain, vigorous continental 
spirit independence European intervention aroused 
American policy pursued 
directed either President devote 
entirely it, direction member 
cabinet, debate policy must end. 
 
could understood formal demand President 
acknowledge perform duties, content 
resign 
power important affairs hands Secretary 
State. seems to-day statesman Seward's 
could period conceive plan policy 
slavery question place; policy rested upon utterly 
assumption already formed 
Southern Confederacy stern resolution preparing fight 
independence, could back Union 
sentimental demonstration European policy which, 
critical moment, would involved Union foreign war, 
thus inviting foreign intervention favor Southern Confederacy, 
increasing chances struggle independence. 
equally Seward could fail see 
demand unconditional surrender mortal insult head 
government, putting proposition paper 
delivered hands man for, 
Lincoln, Presidents would done, instantly dismissed 
Seward, published true reason would 
inevitably end Seward's career. Lincoln 
many noblest greatest men history would 
noble great enough do. considered Seward still 
capable rendering great service country place 
was, rightly 
firmly established reply, forthwith 
told Seward administration domestic policy 
laid inaugural address Seward's 
foreign policy traced Seward's despatches 
President's policy maintained 
changed, he, President, direct 
performing duty President right 
advice Seward's fantastic foreign war 
continental Lincoln aside passing 
silence. Nothing said. Seward must felt 
mercy superior man; offensive proposition 
generously pardoned temporary great mind, 
could devoted personal did. 
thoroughly submitted Lincoln 
despatches revision amendment without war 
European nations longer thought slavery question found 
due time proper place struggle Union; when, 
later period, Seward demanded dissatisfied 
senators, attributed administration, 
Lincoln stood faithful Secretary State. 
 
Chase, Secretary Treasury, man presence, 
eminent ability ardent patriotism, great natural dignity 
certain manner, made appear difficult 
approach really was, permit disappointment 
burst Lincoln's ways 
essentially different never became quite 
certainly congenial him. might, perhaps, 
better been, beginning administration, 
decided Lincoln Chase, 
Lincoln Seward, bring full mutual make 
Chase appreciate real Lincoln's nature. But, 
was, relations always remained somewhat Chase never 
felt quite ease chief could understand, whose 
character powers never learned esteem true 
time, devoted duties 
department, country arduous service circumstances 
extreme difficulty. Nobody recognized heartily Lincoln 
himself, managed work together near end 
Lincoln's first Presidential term, Chase, 
concerning appointments office, resigned and, 
death, President made Chief Justice. 
 
rest cabinet consisted men less 
January, 1862, Lincoln found 
necessary bow war office, put place 
Edwin M. Stanton, man practical mind, 
fierce energy, immense working power, lofty 
patriotism, severest devotion duty. accepted war office 
never Republican, 
could save country." manner 
Lincoln succeeded lion will, frankly 
recognizing great giving generous 
confidence, aiding work full power, 
kindly concession affectionate cases differing 
opinions, or, necessary, firm assertions superior 
authority, bears highest testimony skill management 
men. Stanton, entered service rather mean opinion 
Lincoln's character became one 
admiring friends, none secretaries 
Lincoln's intercourse take advice candid 
without pride opinion, one 
Lincoln's long 
cabinet council felt members ruling 
mind. 
 
cautious policy inaugural address, pursued 
first period civil war, far satisfying 
party friends. ardent spirits among Union men thought 
whole North called arms, crush rebellion 
one powerful blow. ardent spirits among antislavery men 
insisted that, slavery brought forth rebellion, powerful 
blow slavery. complained 
administration slow 
Lincoln reasoned otherwise. ways thinking 
feeling masses, plain people, constantly present 
mind. masses, plain people, furnish men 
fighting, fighting done. believed plain people 
would ready fight clearly appeared necessary, 
would feel necessity felt 
therefore waited enemies Union struck first blow. 
soon as, 12th April, 1861, first gun fired 
Charleston harbor Union flag upon Fort Sumter, call 
Northern people rushed arms. 
 
Lincoln knew plain people indeed ready fight 
defence Union, yet ready fight destruction 
slavery. declared openly right people 
fight Union, fight abolition 
slavery primary declaration gave 
soldiers Union period would hesitated 
battle institution slavery. time succeeded 
rendering harmless cry partisan opposition 
Republican administration war Union 
went far acts 
generals field, looking emancipation slaves 
districts covered commands, loud complaints arose 
earnest antislavery men, accused President turning back 
upon antislavery cause. Many antislavery men now, 
calm willing admit would 
policy fight 
slavery, success struggle Union. 
 
Lincoln's views feelings concerning slavery changed. 
intimately upon subject period know 
expect slavery long triumph Union, 
even immediately destroyed war. 
right. Union armies achieved decisive victory early 
period seceded States received back 
slavery, would defeated power, 
defeated attempt carry effective would 
lost menaces would hollow sound, 
ceased make one afraid. could longer hoped 
maintain branch Congress, control 
government. victorious free States would largely 
it. would longer able 
hostile age. could longer slavery rule 
order live. would lingered while, would surely 
"in course ultimate prolonged war 
destruction slavery; short war might 
prolonged death struggle. Lincoln saw saw also 
that, death struggle, might still kept disloyal 
sentiments caused great mischief 
country. therefore hoped slavery would 
war. 
 
question could rightfully employ power bring 
speedy destruction question mere sentiment. 
set forth reasoning upon it, later period, one 
"I naturally said "If 
slavery wrong, nothing wrong. cannot remember time 
think yet never understood 
Presidency conferred upon right act upon 
judgment feeling. oath took would, 
best ability, protect, defend Constitution 
United States. could take office without taking oath. 
view might take oath get power, break 
oath using power. understood, too, that, ordinary civil 
administration, oath even forbade practically indulge 
private abstract judgment moral question slavery. 
understand, however, also, oath imposed upon duty 
best ability, every indispensable means, 
government, nation, Constitution organic 
law. could feel that, best ability, even tied 
preserve save slavery, minor matter, 
permit wreck government, country, Constitution 
words, salvation government, 
Constitution, Union demanded destruction slavery, 
felt right, sworn duty destroy it. 
destruction became necessity war Union. 
 
war dragged disaster followed disaster, sense 
necessity steadily grew upon him. Early 1862, friends 
well remember, saw, Seward seemed see, give 
war Union antislavery character means 
prevent recognition Southern Confederacy independent 
nation European that, slavery moral 
sense civilized European government would dare offer 
gross insult public opinion people openly 
favor creation state founded upon slavery prejudice 
existing nation fighting slavery. saw also slavery 
rebellion element power, order 
overcome power necessary turn element 
Still, felt assurance plain people 
prepared radical measure emancipation slaves 
act government, anxiously considered that, 
not, great step might, exciting North, injure 
cause Union one quarter would help 
another. heartily effort made New York mould 
public sentiment slavery question public meetings 
boldly emancipation. time 
cautiously advanced recommendation, expressed special 
message Congress, United States co-operate 
State might adopt gradual abolishment slavery, giving 
State pecuniary aid compensate former owners 
slaves. discussion started, spread Congress adopted 
resolution soon went step farther passing 
bill abolish slavery District Columbia. plain people 
began look emancipation larger thing 
considered seriously patriotic soon Lincoln thought 
time freedom could ventured 
upon without danger serious confusion Union ranks. 
 
failure McClellan's movement upon Richmond increased immensely 
enemy. need great act 
Union cause seemed grow daily 
July 21, 1862, Lincoln surprised cabinet draught 
proclamation declaring free slaves States 
still rebellion United States 1st 
matter announced fully made 
invited advice concerning form time 
Seward suggested proclamation, brought out, 
disaster distress, would sound like last 
cause. Lincoln accepted suggestion, proclamation 
Another defeat followed, second Bull Run. when, 
battle, Confederate army, Lee, crossed Potomac 
invaded Maryland, Lincoln heart that, Union army 
blessed success, decree freedom surely 
issued. victory won September 17, 
preliminary Emancipation Proclamation came forth 
Lincoln's resolution practically bound nation, 
permitted step spite limitations, 
actual abolition slavery. Thus wrote name upon books 
history title heart, slave. 
 
true, great proclamation, stamped war one 
mark turning 
field military operations. Fredericksburg 
Gettysburg Vicksburg whole aspect 
war changed. Step step, slowly, rapidly, 
increasing flag Union advanced 
field field toward final consummation. decree emancipation 
naturally followed enlistment negroes 
Union armies. measure reaching effect merely 
giving Union armies increased supply men. laboring force 
rebellion war became like 
problem Union armies pushed forward, area 
Southern Confederacy could draw supplies 
constantly grew area Union recruited 
strength constantly grew everywhere, even within 
Southern lines, Union fate rebellion 
virtually still required much bloody work 
convince brave fought really 
beaten. 
 
Neither Emancipation Proclamation forthwith command universal 
assent among people loyal Union. even 
signs reaction administration fall elections 
1862, justifying opinion, entertained many, 
President really anticipated development popular feeling. 
cry war Union turned 
raised opposition, ever. 
good sense patriotic plain people gradually 
Lincoln's side, lost opportunity 
help process personal argument never 
President constant active contact public 
opinion country, never President who, 
head government, remained near people. Beyond 
circle long known feeling steadily grew 
man White House Abe Lincoln" still, 
every citizen might approach 
advice, without danger meeting authority, 
privilege used many 
freedom patience could 
endured all. men living would to-day read 
ventured say write him. 
Lincoln one believed speak good faith 
patriotic purpose. good advice would go candid 
criticism would him. honest opposition, might pain 
him, would produce lasting feeling 
may truly said men power ever 
exposed daring attempts direct course, 
censure acts, cruel misrepresentation 
met humor peculiarly 
own, effort see right impress 
upon differed him. 
correspondence carried upon matters public interest, 
men official position, private citizens, almost 
large number public letters, written 
persons importance, addressed 
directly popular mind. letters stand among 
finest political Thus presented 
singular spectacle President who, midst great civil 
war, unprecedented duties weighing upon him, constantly 
person great features policy people. 
 
manner exercised influence upon 
popular understanding, sympathetic nature 
popular heart. vain journals speakers 
opposition represent amused 
coarse blood 
people flowing people knew man head 
affairs, whose face humor frequently 
changed expression profoundest 
deeply suffering felt 
pain every wound inflicted 
every woman child lost husband 
whenever could eager sorrow, mercy 
never vain. looked one 
hopes fears, 
laughed them; heart 
hearts turned him. popularity far different 
Washington, revered Jackson, 
party enthusiasm never grew weary 
Abraham Lincoln people became bound genuine 
sentimental matter respect, confidence, 
party pride, feeling spread far beyond boundary lines 
affair heart, independent mere 
soldiers field folks home spoke 
it. felt President 
really father would, could go him, 
every one them, would go father, talk 
troubled them, sure find willing ear tender Thus, 
President, cause, success 
gradually became almost matters family 
popularity carried Presidential election 
1864, spite opposition within party first 
seemed 
 
Many radical antislavery men never quite satisfied 
Lincoln's ways meeting problems time. 
earnest mostly able men, positive ideas "how 
rebellion put down." would recognize necessity 
measuring steps government according progress 
opinion among plain people. Lincoln's cautious 
management lacking definite purpose 
delayed emancipation 
confided important commands men doubtful views slavery; 
authorized military commanders set slaves free 
went on; dealt unsuccessful 
put opposition strong hand instead 
trying it; given people accomplished 
facts instead arguing them, on. true, 
always entirely Lincoln's policy had, 
democratic government, 
presence pressing exigencies apt deprive governmental 
action necessary kindness heart, 
disposition always respect feelings others, frequently made 
anything like even severity 
called for. many radical critics since revised 
judgment sufficiently admit Lincoln's policy was, 
whole, wisest policy heroic 
sometimes accomplished great results, could democracy like 
maintained constant would quickly 
broken weight might 
successful start, Union, beginning 
Grants 
fully matured head that, great 
commanders slowly developments war, 
constant success could counted upon, best follow 
policy friendly contact popular force, 
therefore fit stand trial 
period thought dissatisfaction 
Lincoln's doings greatly increased steps took toward 
reconstruction rebel States partially possession Union 
forces. 
 
December, 1863, Lincoln issued amnesty proclamation, offering 
pardon implicated rebellion, certain specified 
exceptions, condition taking maintaining oath 
support Constitution obey laws United States 
proclamations President regard slaves; also promising 
when, rebel States, number citizens equal one 
tenth voters 1860 state government 
conformity oath mentioned, recognized 
Executive true government State. proclamation 
seemed first received general favor. soon another 
scheme reconstruction, much provisions, put 
forward House Representatives Henry Winter Benjamin 
Senate. passed closing moments 
session July, 1864, Lincoln, instead making law 
embodied text proclamation plan 
reconstruction worthy earnestly considered. differences 
opinion concerning subject feeling 
Lincoln long among 
openly declared purpose resisting re-election 
Presidency. Similar sentiments manifested advanced 
antislavery men Missouri, who, hot 
State, received Lincoln active 
support demanded. Still another class Union men, mainly 
East, gravely shook heads considering question whether 
Lincoln re-elected. cherished 
minds ideal statesmanship personal bearing high office 
which, opinion, Lincoln's much 
heard cap argument upon grave 
affairs state story "a man Sangamon 
story, sure, point, lacking 
dignity. could understand man opening 
cabinet meeting, reading secretaries funny chapter 
recent book moment 
relieved mind, solemnly informed 
executive council heart issue proclamation 
slaves soon God blessed Union arms 
another victory. alarmed President 
would indeed resist urgent statesmen 
policy, could resist prayer old woman pardon 
soldier sentenced shot desertion. men, 
mostly sincere ardent earnestly set 
work, prevent Lincoln's actually 
believed, 1863, that, national convention Union party 
held then, Lincoln would supported delegation 
single State. convention met Baltimore, June, 1864, 
voice people heard. first ballot Lincoln received 
votes States except Missouri; 
even turned votes result 
ballot 
 
even opposition Lincoln within 
ranks Union party convention, called 
dissatisfied Missouri, favored men similar 
way thinking States, held already May, 
nominated candidate Presidency General Fremont. He, 
indeed, strong following, opposition movements 
different quarters appeared Henry Winter Davis 
Benjamin assailed Lincoln Union men, 
patriotism high standing, persuaded themselves, 
sought persuade people, Lincoln's ill 
advised dangerous Union cause. Democrats put 
convention 29th August, Union party had, 
larger part summer, opposing candidate platform 
political campaign Neither 
theatre war character. terrible losses 
suffered Grant's army battles spread general 
Sherman seemed position 
opposition Lincoln within Union party grew louder 
complaints discouraging Earnest demands heard 
Lincoln himself, knowing 
strongly masses attached him, dark 
scene suddenly changed 
 
Democrats, national convention, declared war 
demanded, substantially, peace price, nominated 
platform General McClellan candidate. convention 
hardly adjourned capture gave new aspect 
military situation. like bursting dark 
rank file Union party rose rapidly growing 
song "We coming, Father three hundred 
thousand land. Long decisive 
day arrived, result beyond doubt, Lincoln 
President overwhelming election even 
severest critics found forced admit Lincoln 
possible candidate Union party 1864, neither 
political combinations campaign speeches, even victories 
field, needed insure success. plain people 
satisfied Abraham Lincoln: confided him; 
loved him; felt near him; saw 
cause Union went 

 
hour triumph called characteristic 
nature. opposition within Union party 
opponents him, 
moment lose stretch hand friendship all. "Now 
election said, response serenade, "may 
all, common interest, common effort save 
common country? part, 
place way. long 
willingly planted thorn man's deeply 
sensible high compliment adds nothing 
satisfaction man may pained disappointed 
result. May ask join 
spirit toward me?" Abraham Lincoln's 
character tested prosperity. 
 
war virtually decided, yet Sherman 
carrying Union flag South. Grant 
iron hand upon Richmond. days Confederacy 
evidently last blow remained struck. 
Lincoln's second inauguration came, second inaugural 
address. Lincoln's famous much justly 
far well far 
inaugural poured whole devotion 
great soul. father's last 
blessing children lay 
closing words: hope, fervently pray, 
mighty scourge war may speedily pass away. Yet God wills 
continue wealth piled two hundred 
fifty years unrequited toil shall sunk, every drop 
blood drawn lash shall paid another drawn sword, 
said three thousand years ago, still must said, 
judgments Lord true righteous malice 
toward none, charity all, firmness right God 
gives us see right, let us strive finish work in; 
bind nation's care shall borne 
battle, widow may achieve 
cherish lasting peace among 

 
like sacred poem. American President ever spoken words 
like American people. America never President 
found words depth heart. 
 
followed closing scenes war. Southern armies fought 
bravely last, vain. Richmond fell. Lincoln 
entered city accompanied officers 
sailors James 
River, negro picked way serving Never 
world seen modest characteristic 
army 
slaves, hastily run together, victorious chief 
capital told pressed 
around him, kissed hands shouted 
tears ran President's cheeks. 
 
days brought surrender Lee's army, peace 
people North wild Everywhere 
guns churches ringing 

suddenly news flashed land Abraham Lincoln 
people blow. sorrow 
went America never heard before. Thousands Northern 
lost Many 
Southern man cried heart people 
best friend humiliation distress, Abraham 
Lincoln struck down. tender affection 
countrymen bore inspired nations common sentiment. 
civilized mankind stood around dead 
President. Many those, abroad, long 
among first 
flowers universal chorus 
praise voice genuine emotion. 
Never since death unanimity judgment 
man's even death, 
although name held greater touch 
sympathetic people's 
 
said owing character 
Lincoln's end. true, death 
hand mad well apt beyond 
merits loved him, make 
object peculiarly tender also true 
pronounced upon days affected 
little time, historical inquiry served rather 
increase lessen appreciation 
Giving measure credit great 
Seward conduct foreign affairs, Chase 
management finances terrible difficulties, Stanton 
performance task war 
readily acknowledging without skill great 
heroism soldiers sailors them, 
success could still finds 
Lincoln's judgment means governed around 
him; important steps owing 
deciding directing 
whose whose character enlisted administration 
struggles sympathy, support 
people. found, even, judgment military matters 
advice instructions gave 
generals commanding field would seldom done honor 
them. History, therefore, without 
continues place 
foremost among Union 
slave. that, merit accomplished 
political would recognized 
leading republic four years furious civil 
conflict without serious detriment free institutions. 
 
was, indeed, President, violently denounced opposition 
tyrant gone beyond constitutional 
powers authorizing permitting temporary suppression 
newspapers, suspending writ habeas corpus 
arbitrary Nobody blamed who, 
things done, good faith patriotic motives 
them. republic, arbitrary power, even 
demanded necessity, never permitted pass without 
protest one hand, without apology other. well 
pass civil war. arbitrary measures 
resorted true. resorted 
government thought absolutely required safety 
republic, hardly denied. certain 
history world furnish single example government 
passing crisis civil war 
small record arbitrary acts, little interference 
ordinary course law outside field military operations. 
American President ever power thrust 
Lincoln's hands. hoped American President ever 
entrusted power again. man ever 
entrusted less dangerous 
proved Abraham Lincoln. care 
even trying circumstances, remain strictly within 
constitutional limitations authority; whenever boundary 
became dangers situation forced 
cross it, equally careful mark acts 
measures, imperative necessities civil 
war, might pass history similar 
acts time peace. fact 
reconstruction period followed war, things done 
capable serving dangerous war itself. 
Thus may truly said 
republic saved disruption country 
blot slavery, that, crisis 
history, conducted government almost 
dictatorial power leave essentially free institutions 
things concern rights liberties citizens. 
understood well nature first message 
Congress defined pointed language: government 
necessity strong liberties people, 
weak maintain existence? 
inherent question answered name great 
American republic, man could answered better, 
triumphant 
 
said Abraham Lincoln died right moment 
However may be, had, time death, certainly 
exhausted usefulness country. probably 
man could guided nation 
reconstruction period manner prevent work 
peace revival passions war. would indeed 
escaped serious controversy details could 
far better statesman time, 
active politicians immensely strengthened 
triumphant and, important, would 
supported confidence victorious Northern people 
would secure safety Union rights 
negro, time confidence 
defeated Southern people nothing would done motives 
selfish party 
spirit. "With malice toward none, charity all," foremost 
would genius 

 
might rendered country great service another direction. 
days fall Richmond, pointed friend 
crowd door. "Look that," said 
"Now conquered rebellion, see something 
may become dangerous republic rebellion 
true, Lincoln President profess call civil 
service principles. used patronage government 
many cases avowedly reward party work, many others form 
combinations produce political effects advantageous Union 
cause, still others simply put right man right 
place. strengthen Union cause, 
search able useful men public duties, frequently went 
beyond limits party, gradually accustomed 
thought that, party service value, considerations 
public interest were, appointments office, far greater 
consequence. Moreover, different 
political elements support Union civil war 
Lincoln, standing head temporarily united 
hardly felt himself, narrow sense term, party man. 
became strongly impressed dangers brought upon 
republic use public offices party means 
improbable that, crisis found time 
turn objects, one important later 
days would powerful authority. 
be. measure achievements full enough 

 
younger generation Abraham Lincoln already become 
which, historic distance, grows 
heroic also loses 
indeed common lot popular 
Lincoln apt become 
assembling 
qualities forces character time grand 
career startling 
state society Abraham Lincoln grew 
passes away, world read increasing wonder man who, 
remaining 
citizens, raised position power 
unprecedented 
unable see creature suffer without 
suddenly found called conduct greatest 
power government stern 
resolution force order day won 
ruled popular mind heart tender sympathies 
cautious conservative mental habit, 
led sudden sweeping social revolution time; 
who, preserving speech rustic manner even 
conspicuous position period, drew upon 
polite society, soul mankind 
wonderful beauty who, heart best friend 
defeated South, murdered took 
cruel enemy; who, power, beyond measure 
sectional passion excited party spirit, around 
whose friend gathered praise since 
never ceased one greatest Americans best 
men. 
 
 
 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN, JOSEPH H. 
 
[This Address delivered Philosophical 
Institution, November 13, included set 
permission author Messrs. Thomas Y. & 

 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
asked deliver Inaugural Address occasion, 
recognized owed compliment fact 
official representative America, subject 
ventured think might interest hour brief study 
popular government, life American 
Americans. therefore offer apology asking attention 
Abraham unique character part bore 
two important achievements modern preservation 
integrity American Union emancipation colored 
race. 
 
brief term power probably object 
ridicule man world; 
fell hand moment 
nations earth one another paying 
character, thirty-five years since 
elapsed established place history one great 
country alone, human race. 
 
One many noble upon occasion death 
made spirit 
pursued him: 
 
  bears winding sheet 
   stars lived rear 
   head feet, 
   Say, room you? 
 
          
 
  "Yes, lived 
   pen 
   make 
   true born king men." 
 
furnish match life, 
searched vain startling 
great power glory won humble adverse 
circumstances. 
 
Doubtless familiar points 
extraordinary career. fame wise, 
successful ruler men; exercising power 
time, himself, good people 
placed commander-in-chief vast military 
power, ultimate success greatest war 
triumphant champion popular government, 
four millions honored mankind 
Statesman, President, 
 
Let us glance first half brief life 
glorious happy consummation. Nothing could 
miserable home Abraham Lincoln 
without floor window 
Kentucky, heart life swiftly moved 
Mississippi, always advance 
schools churches, books money, railroads newspapers, 
things generally regarded even 
life. father, 
content could keep soul body together 
family, ever without success, better unhappy 
condition moving one scene 
another. rude society surrounded much better. 
struggle existence absorbed 
fighting wild beast, retreating 
time could barely handle tools attained 
majority, Lincoln's life simple farm 
work either father's wretched farm hired 
neighboring perhaps means, 
rude grew reaching six feet four 
stories told 
growth mighty frame began strange education 
years great destiny 
him, development mental faculties moral 
which, time reached middle life, make 
triumphant leader great nation 
crisis fate. whole obtained odd times 
could spared labor, amount much 
one year, quality teaching lowest possible 
including elements reading, writing, 
simple elements, rightly used right man, 
education Lincoln knew use them. often 
seemed take warning father's unfortunate 
example. industry, knowledge, 
desire rise early 
manifestations character. 
 
Books almost unknown community, Bible 
every house, somehow Progress, 
History United States, Life Washington fell 
hands. foot many miles borrow 
English said contents 
Statutes Indiana fell way. volumes read 
power great. shut 
books master thoroughly sometimes 
development character freedom range large, 
way, wide 
mind, rate, thoroughly knowledge 
language, which, life, used great readiness 
effect. constant use little knowledge 
developed exercised mental powers. hard 
day's work done, others on, always reading 
writing. early age thinking made 
future President. Paper 
that, evening would write 
back wooden make room 
more. by, approached began speaking rude 
laid foundation art 
one rich result education, 
one great secret subsequent success. 
 
Accustomed days steam telegraphs every 
intelligent boy survey whole world morning breakfast, 
inform going every nation, hardly 
possible conceive isolated condition 
community Indiana, family Lincoln's 
father formed part, eagerly ambitious boy, 
he, must escape. first ever 
got world beyond narrow home 
age neighbor employed accompany son 
river New Orleans flatboat 
commission discharged great success. 
 
Shortly return first outer 
world, father, tired failure Indiana, family 
goods single drawn two 
fourteen days' camp 
more, Illinois. come age 
master, rendered last service minority 
lot tall trees 
forest enough rails little clearing 
coming leader men, 
age future British Prime Minister statesman 
university double first every advantage 
high training broad culture association wisest 
best men women give, enters upon form public 
service road usefulness honor, University course 
first stage public Lincoln, 
begun preparation public life soon 
began years yet must continue earn daily 
bread sweat brow, absolutely means, home, 
friend farm work hired hand, 
village running mill, another trip New Orleans 
flatboat 
means summer 
twenty-three years age, event occurred gave public 
recognition. 
 
Black Hawk war broke out, and, Governor Illinois calling 
volunteers repel band whose leader bore name, 
Lincoln enlisted elected captain among 
already established supremacy signal strength 
one successful single brief hostilities 
engaged battle won military local 
leadership year offered 
candidate Legislature Illinois, failed Yet 
vast popularity knew district 
consisted several counties, unanimous vote people 
county Lincoln. Another unsuccessful attempt 
followed better luck horse 
instruments levied upon execution debts 
business 
 
thus detailed early years upon 
strange foundations structure great fame service 
place school university training fortune 
substituted struggles preparation 
great work do. turned exactly 
required. Ten years instead public school 
university certainly never could fitted man unique 
work thrown upon him. would 
lead us sight promised land liberty. 
 
age twenty-five became member Legislature 
Illinois, continued eight years, and, meantime, 
qualified reading law books could borrow 
poor buy called 
second quarter single term Congress 
introduced national gave 
law politics. spite ambition, two years 
Congress gave great destiny 
close, 1849, find unsuccessful applicant 
President appointment Commissioner General Land 
purely administrative fortunate escape 
country. Year year knowledge power, 
experience reputation extended, mental faculties seemed 
grow fed on. power persuasion, always 
developed extraordinary degree, became 
engaged congenial questions subjects. Little little rose 
prominence became effective public speaker 
West. possessed 
logic force statement impressed 
upon honest mind, broad 
sympathies genial humor made universal favorite 
far fast acquaintance extended. 
 
twenty years elapsed time establishment 
lawyer Springfield, new capital Illinois, 
furnished fitting theatre development great 
and, new enlarged obviously 
grew mental second period career, 
compensate absolute lack advantages 
suffered powers reputation extended, 
always people, felt warm sympathy 
concerned them, took part discussion every public 
question, made personal influence ever widely deeply 

 
brethren legal profession naturally ask me, could 
rough whose youth spent forest 
farm without culture education 
study, reading, wing, miscellaneous law 
books, become learned accomplished Well, never did. 
never would salt 
won place advocate Court Session, 
profession reached highest 
centuries learning precedent involved 
lawyer. Dr. asked anxious young mother, "When 
education child replied, least two centuries 
sure lawyer. 
 
Illinois 1840. population 
increased Lincoln began law 
Springfield life Illinois simple, 
courts administration justice. Books 
people loved justice, upheld law, followed 
courts, soon found among 
fundamental principles common law, set forth 
difficult common sense, 
force character, purpose, ready power speech 
rest, supplied 
 
days extremely simple, principles 
natural justice mainly relied Bar 
Bench, without resort technical Railroads, 
chief business community, combined 
wealth, subtle questions 
yet come professional agents 
require needed. many highly 
educated powerful men Bar Illinois, even early 
days, spirit enterprise carried search fame 
constant contact conflict 
Lincoln acquired professional strength Every community 
every age entirely adequate present uses 
Illinois, population wealth 
State kept Bar presented growing 
abundance learning science technical early 
grew growth mastered requisite 
Chicago soon grew one largest certainly 
active city continent, 
professional friends gone Lincoln's later years, 
try argue cause, business, idea 
London legal 
would certainly found mistake. 
 
early days West, every lawyer, especially every court 
lawyer, necessarily constantly engaged public 
discussion many questions rapid development 
town, county, State, Federal affairs. there, 
public discussion supplied place universal 
activity press since public speaker who, 
clearness, force, could make felt 
questions day would rapidly come absence 
immense variety popular feed 
public taste people found chief 
courts public political either 
place, amused 
hero hour. carefully 
eloquence eloquence Human nature 
ruled alike, effective speaker 
political often retained likely win cause 
tried doubt way many 
came Lincoln. Fees, money form, 
eager pursuit fame could afford make money. 
ambitious distinguish great service 
ambition fame real public service left room 
However much seems ended every 
year hardly began it, yet, years passed, 
fees came One L large 
professional fee time, even part America, 
lay great Lincoln's career 
America state things 
exists wholly different prevails Great 
profession law always day principal 
avenue public life; sure training experience 
courts much development forces 
intellect character soon displayed 
 
political controversy, course, acquired wide 
made deep lasting impression upon people 
become powerful State Illinois, upon people 
Great West, political power control United 
States already surely swiftly passing older Eastern 
States. reputation familiar 
knowledge character come local 
happily inspired people West present 
candidate, press upon Republican convention 
1860 fit necessary leader struggle life 
nation. 
 
struggle, know, arose terrible question 
must trust general knowledge history 
question make intelligible attitude leadership 
Lincoln champion freedom final contest. 
Negro slavery firmly established Southern States 
early period history. year 
landed Fathers upon Rock, ship 
discharged cargo African slaves Virginia: 
colonial period importation 
found way Northern States, none sufficient 
numbers constitute danger afford basis political power. 
time adoption Federal Constitution, 
doubt principal members convention condemned 
slavery moral, social, political evil, believed 
suppression slave trade course gradual 
extinction South, certainly North. Washington, 
will, provided emancipation slaves, 
said Jefferson "was among first wishes see plan 
adopted slavery country might Jefferson 
said, referring "I country 
think God justice cannot sleep 
Franklin, Adams, Hamilton, Henry utterly opposed 
it. made subject fatal compromise Federal 
Constitution, whereby existence recognized States 
basis prohibition importation slaves 
postponed twenty years, return fugitive slaves 
provided for. danger 
invention cotton gin cotton culture negro labor 
became forever leading industry South, gave 
new importation slaves, 
constitutional prohibition took effect, numbers vastly 
time forward slavery became basis great 
political power, Southern States, circumstances 
every carried brave struggle 
maintenance 
 
conscience North slow rise it, though bitter 
controversies time time took place. Southern leaders 
threatened disunion demands complied with. save 
Union, compromise compromise made, one end 
Missouri Compromise, made 1820 upon occasion 
admission Missouri Union slave State, 
consideration admission, slavery forever excluded 
Northwest Territory, repealed 1854, Congress 
elected interests slave power, intent force 
slavery vast territory long dedicated 
freedom. last aroused conscience 
passion North, led formation Republican party 
avowed purpose constitutional 
extension slavery. 
 
first campaign, 1856, though failed elect 
received surprising vote carried many 
States. one could longer doubt North made 
mind disunion deter pressing 
cherished purpose performing long neglected duty. 
Lincoln one active effective leaders 
speakers new party, great debates Lincoln 
Douglas 1858, respective champions restriction 
extension slavery, attracted attention whole country. 
Lincoln's powerful arguments carried conviction everywhere. moral 
nature thoroughly aroused conscience stirred 
Unless slavery wrong, nothing wrong. man, whatever 
color, entitled fruits labor, could one man live 
idle sweat another's brow, whose skin 
principle Declaration 
Independence men vested certain inalienable rights 
equal rights life, liberty, pursuit happiness. 
doctrine case carried it. time one 
two sentences struck contest. 
 
"The real issue country eternal struggle 
two world. two 
principles stood face face beginning time, 
ever continue struggle. one common right humanity, 
divine right principle 
whatever shape itself. spirit says, 'You 
work toil earn bread I'll eat 
 
vision conflict inevitable 
one other, right wrong, freedom 
slavery, must ultimately prevail wholly throughout 
country; principle carried war, 

 
One sentence 
 
"Under operation policy compromise, slavery agitation 
ceased, constantly augmented. opinion 
cease crisis shall reached passed. 'A 
house divided cannot believe government 
cannot endure permanently half slave half free. expect 
Union dissolved. expect house fall, 
expect cease divided. become one thing 
other; either opponents slavery arrest 
spread it, place public mind shall rest 
belief course ultimate extinction, advocates 
push forward till shall become alike lawful 
States, old well new, North well South." 
 
entire 1850 1860 agitation 
slavery question point, events become 
historical continually indicated near approach overwhelming 
sooner Compromise Acts 1850 resulted temporary 
peace, everybody said must final perpetual, new 
came. carrying away fugitive slaves Federal 
troops Boston agitated ancient freedom 
publication Uncle truly exposed 
frightful possibilities slave reckless attempts 
force fraud establish Kansas 
vast majority beating Summer Senate 
Chamber words spoken Dred Scott decision 
Supreme Court, made nation realize slave power 
last reached Federal finally execution 
John Brown, wild raid Virginia, invite slaves 
rally standard freedom events 
tend illustrate Lincoln's nation 
could permanently continue half slave half free, must become 
one thing other. John Brown lay sentence 
death declared sure slavery must 
neither within four years 
million soldiers would marching across country final 
music great 
 
   "John Brown's body lies grave, 
   soul marching on." 
 
now, age child 
farm lawyer, 
statesman, found elected great party 
pledged prevent extension slavery, 
chief magistrate Republic, bound carry 
purpose, leader ruler nation trying 
hour. 
 
believe living Providence 
affairs nations, find elevation plain man 
extraordinary fortune great duty, 
discharged, signal faith. Perhaps 
philosophical institution judgment 
commend estimate Lincoln's historical place. 
 
"His occupying chair state triumph good sense 
mankind public conscience. grew according 
mind mastered problem problem 
it. war place holiday 
new pilot hurried 
four years battle 

tried, never found There, courage, justice, 
even temper, humanity, stood heroic figure 
centre heroic true history American 
people time, true representative 
country, twenty millions heart, 
thought 
 
born great, distinguished achieve greatness 
thrust upon them, inherent moral, 
recognized educated intelligence free 
people, happily chose ruler day deadly 
 
forty years since first saw heard Abraham Lincoln, 
impression left mind great 
successes West came New York make political address. 
appeared every sense word like one plain people 
among loved first sight nothing 
imposing great 
clothes hung giant 
face dark without slightest 
features bore 
eyes looked sad countenance gave 
little evidence brain power raised lowest 
highest station among talked 
meeting, seemed ill sort apprehension 
young man might feel presenting new strange 
audience, whose critical disposition great 
audience, including noted learned 
party New York statesmen, lawyers, 
curious hear him. fame powerful 
speaker him, exaggerated rumor worst 
reached Mr. presented 
him, high platform Cooper vast sea eager 
faces greeted him, full intense curiosity see 
rude child people like. equal occasion. 
spoke eye voice face 
shone seemed light whole hour half 
held audience hollow hand. style speech 
manner delivery severely simple. called "the 
grand 
reflected discourse. attempt 
without spoke straight point. came 
expecting eloquence 
must startled earnest sincere 
marvellous see man, mere 
spirit, 
found way strength 
absolute 
 
spoke upon mastered 
demonstrated historical proofs logic 
fathers created Constitution order form perfect 
union, establish justice, secure blessings liberty 
posterity, intended Federal 
Government exclude slavery Territories. 
spirit protested avowed threat Southern States 
destroy Union if, order secure freedom vast regions 
future States Republican President 
elected. closed appeal audience, spoken 
fire aroused full 
love justice liberty, maintain political purpose 
lofty issue right wrong alone 
could justify it, high resolve 
sacred duty destruction government ruin 
themselves. concluded telling sentence, drove 
whole argument home "Let us faith right 
makes might, faith let us end dare duty 
understand it." night great hall, next day whole 
city, rang delighted applause 
come departed great triumph. 
 
five years night saw again, 
last time, city, borne 
tears people accompanied 
Washington, scene last 
young city West worked way 

 
Never new ruler desperate Lincoln 
entered office fourth March, 1861, four months 
election, took oath support Constitution Union. 
intervening time busily employed Southern States 
carrying threat disunion event election. 
soon fact seven seceded 
seized upon forts, navy public property 
United States within making every 
preparation war. meantime retiring President, 
elected slave power, thought seceding States 
could lawfully done absolutely nothing. Lincoln 
found himself, Constitution, Commander-in-Chief Army 
Navy United States, either hand. 
created great unknown resources 
nation war. 
 
inaugural address, appealing 
seceding States return avowed purpose 
keep solemn oath taken day, see laws 
Union faithfully use troops 
forts, navy property belonging government. 
probable, however, neither side actually realized war 
determined fight, 
assault Fort Sumter presented South first 
roused North use every possible maintain 
government Union, supremacy 
flag every inch territory United States. 
fact Lincoln's first proclamation called 75,000 troops, 
serve three months, shows inadequate even idea 
future moment Lincoln loyal 
supporters never purpose. knew could 
duty America whole hope 
future depended upon acts 
seceding States issue election secure prevent 
extension transformed struggle preserve 
destroy Union. 
 
cannot follow contest. know gigantic 
lasted four years instead three progress, 
instead 75,000 men, enrolled side 
government alone; aggregate cost loss nation 
pounds less 
300,000 brave precious lives side. History 
recorded Lincoln bore four frightful years; 
real President, responsible actual head 
government, all; listened advice, heard 
parties, then, always responsibility God 
nation, decided every great executive question himself. absolute 
become long President. Abe 
Lincoln" name known years. every 
act it. 
 
vast power never ceased 
one plain people, always called them, never lost 
perfect sympathy them, always perfect touch 
open lay secret 
power, people turn gave 
absolute confidence. courage, patience, 
tried never 
 
true steel frequent occasion 
change them, found serious painful duty 
rested wholly upon him, perhaps important 
when, last, recognized General Grant 
master situation, man could would bring war 
triumphant end, gave upheld 
Amid pressure distress burdens office 
brought upon him, sense humor saved him; probably 
made possible live always 
great West, used cultivated 
faculty relieve weight 
 
enabled keep wonderful record never lost 
temper, matter agony whole night might 
spent stories wit, harmless 
recall two General Grant, 
always found plenty enemies critics urge President 
command. One, sure, interest 
repeated malicious intent Grant "What 
asked Lincoln. was, course, 
doubtless guess "Well," said President, "just 
find particular kind uses I'll send 
must pleasing British 
American pressed grounds get rid 
Grant, declared, "I can't spare man, 
 
never could resist appeals 
wives mothers soldiers got trouble 
sentence death Secretary War 
complained never could get deserters surely 
women family could get always gave 
way. Certainly appreciate exquisite sympathy 
suffering fallen battle. heart 
Never gentle tender utterance 
letter mother given sons country, written 
time angel death visited almost every household 
land, already hovering him. 
 
"I says, "in War Department 
statement mother five sons died gloriously 
field battle. feel weak fruitless must words 
mine attempt grief 
loss overwhelming cannot refrain tendering 
consolation may found thanks Republic died 
pray Heavenly Father may 
leave cherished memory loved 
lost, solemn pride must laid 
sacrifice upon 
 
Hardly could 
heart, spoken words touching tender 
stricken mothers soldiers. 
 
Emancipation Proclamation, Mr. Lincoln delighted 
country world first January, 1863, doubtless 
secure foremost place history among 
race, hopeless degrading 
slavery, many millions described law 
existing fact hands owners 
purposes 
Rarely happy fortune come one man render service 
proclaim liberty throughout land unto 
inhabitants 
 
Ideas rule world, never signal instance 
triumph idea here. William thirty years 
begun abolition slavery, lived 
see glorious unexpected consummation hopeless cause 
devoted life, well described proclamation 
"great historic event, magnitude, momentous 
beneficent consequences, eminently 
right alike 
 
Lincoln always heart soul opposed slavery. 
says trip flatboat New Orleans formed 
first last opinion slavery sight negroes chained 
iron entered soul. 
boy could grow days poor white Kentucky 
Indiana, close contact slavery without 
growing consciousness effects free labor, well 
frightful injustice Legislature Illinois, 
public sentiment institution 
violently every movement abolition restriction, upon 
passage resolutions effect courage one 
companion put record protest, institution 
slavery founded injustice bad great 
demonstration courage, say; time 
abolition dragged angry mob 
streets Boston rope around body, 
year Lovejoy State Illinois 
defending press, printed antislavery 

 
Congress brought bill gradual abolition District 
Columbia, compensation owners, raised 
treasonable hands life nation always maintained 
property come two 
centuries without fault part, ought taken 
away without used say that, one way 
another, voted times Wilmot Proviso, 
Mr. Wilmot Pennsylvania moved addition every bill 
affected United States territory, "that neither slavery involuntary 
shall ever exist part said 
evident condemnation system, moral grounds crime 
human race, political grounds 
nation, must master whole 
grew steadily upon 
great speeches Illinois debate. 
 
mere election Lincoln Presidency, extension 
slavery Territories rendered forever 
Revolutions never go founded 
great moral sentiment stirring heart people 
irresistible slave power acquiesced 
election, Southern States remained Constitution 
within Union, relied upon constitutional legal 
rights, favorite institution, was, 
fatal was, might endured another century. great party 
elected him, determined 
nevertheless pledged interfere continuance States 
already existed. course, new regions forever 
closed it, nature must begun shrink 
probably gradual compensated emancipation, 
appealed strongly new President's sense justice 
expediency, would, progress time, ideas 
founders Republic, found safe 
masters slaves. wish destroy first make 
seven States, afterwards increased openly 
seceded Union, declared began war upon 
nation, mighty power desperate 
struggle life, maintenance authority 
nation territory, gave Lincoln freedom 
opportunity history. 
 
first inaugural address, yet drop precious blood 
shed, held branch one hand, 
presented guarantees Constitution, 
emphatic resolution convention nominated 
him, maintenance States, 
especially right State order control domestic 
institutions according judgment exclusively, essential 
balance power perfection endurance 
political fabric reiterated sentiment, declared, 
mental "that protection which, consistently 
Constitution laws, given, cheerfully 
given States lawfully demanded whatever cause 
cheerfully one section 
 
When, however, peace 
seceding States Constitution every 
clause principle it; staying 
Union proceeded 
territory new hostile empire based slavery; 
nation plunged war 
nineteenth century belief gradually came 
mind President Rebellion soon 
force arms, war must fought bitter end, 
reach end salvation nation might require 
destruction slavery wherever war 
continue one side purpose preserve 
slavery, must continue side Union, destroy 
slavery. 
 
said, control me; cannot control 
dreadful war became deadly 
conviction forced upon that, order 
frightful sacrifice life treasure sides might 
become duty Commander-in-Chief Army, 
necessary war measure, strike blow Rebellion which, 
others failing, would inevitably lead 
thing words 

 
"I understood oath preserve Constitution best 
ability imposed upon duty preserving every indispensable 
means Constitution 
organic law. possible lose nation yet preserve 
Constitution? general law, life limb must yet often 
limb must save life; life never wisely 
given save felt measures otherwise unconstitutional 
might become lawful becoming indispensable preservation 
Constitution preservation nation. Right wrong, 
assumed ground avow it. could feel best 
ability ever tried preserve Constitution save 
slavery minor matter permit wreck government, 
country, Constitution 
 
so, last, judgment indispensable necessity 
come, struck fatal blow, signed proclamation 
made name it, President, Commander-in-Chief 
time actual armed rebellion, fit necessary war measure 
suppressing rebellion, proclaimed persons held slaves 
States parts States rebellion thenceforward 
free, declared executive, army navy, would 
recognize maintain freedom. 
 
great steps government, led triumphant 
prosecution war, necessarily responsibility 
credit great statesmen stayed hands cabinet, 
Seward, Chase Stanton, generals 
soldiers great act absolutely 
own. conception execution exclusively his. laid 
cabinet measure mind made could 
changed, asking suggestions chose 
time circumstances Emancipation 
proclaimed take effect. 
 
came hour public opinion North would 
sustained first eighteen months war 
extended Atlantic beyond Mississippi. Many 
victories West 
Virginia, partially redeemed bloody 
battle reaction set general 
enthusiasm swept Northern States assault upon 
Sumter. could truly said lost heart, faction 
raising head. Heard land like 
proclamation patriotism country fresh 
sacrifices renewed step could 
relieved conscience nation 
oppressed United States 
false beginning, 
great popular heart new enthusiasm Union, 
forever, one brought moral 
material support cause government, within two 
years colored troops enlisted military service 
following national supported loyalty North, 
led spirits. One mother said, son 
offered command first colored regiment, "If 
shall proud heard shot 
gallant charge replied 
request friends body 
mother lived enjoy thirty-six 
years Boston erected noblest monument 
memory. 
 
effect proclamation upon actual progress war 
wherever Federal armies advanced carried 
freedom them, summer came round new spirit 
force heart government people 
first week July decisive battle Gettysburg 
turned war, fall Vicksburg made great river 
free source 
 
foreign nations influence proclamation new 
victories great importance. days, 
easy foreign appreciate 
really going on; could see clearly true state affairs, 
last year nineteenth century able, 
new electric watch every event observe 
effect. Rebel sent 
spared pains impress upon minds public private men 
upon press views character contest. 
prospects Confederacy always better abroad home. 
stock world upon bonds 
one time high favor. 
 
ideas seriously North fighting 
empire South independence; Southern States, instead 
essentially founded 
right one man appropriate fruit men's toil 
exclude equal rights, real sure 
Northern representing idea freedom, 
mighty strength nation put forth 
crush them; Jefferson Davis Southern leaders created 
nation; republican experiment failed Union 
ceased exist. argument foreign minds 
utter impossibility government win 
success Southern States, far separation 
concerned, certain event yet future could 
be; South North, even could 
would prove United States world, 
especially negro victory 
would necessarily leave people South many generations 
deadly hostility government North, 
always independence. 
 
Lincoln issued proclamation knew ideas 
founded national resources 
government could would slavery 
finally disposed of, cause difference way, 
North South would come together again, good 
friends ever. many quarters abroad proclamation 
enthusiasm friends think 
demonstrations favor brought gladness Lincoln's 
heart meetings held 
upon war bore 
expressing enthusiastic sympathy proclamation, 
bore heroic war 
upon them. Mr. Lincoln's expectation announced 
world slaves States rebellion set free 
must avowed position government, 
continuance war meant slavery, would make 
intervention impossible foreign nation whose people lovers 
result 
 
growth development Lincoln's mental power moral force, 
intense magnetic vast responsibilities 
government thrown upon age furnish rare 
striking illustration marvellous capacity 
human sound mind sound body. came 
discharge great duties Presidency absolutely 
experience administration government, vastly 
varied complicated questions foreign domestic policy 
immediately continued press upon rest 
life; mastered came, apparently facility 
experienced said "His 
parts seemed raised demands great life 
one intense labor, anxiety, distress, without 
one hour peaceful first last. rose every 
occasion. led public opinion, march far advance 
fail effective support every great emergency. 
knew heart thought people, man constant 
absolute sympathy could known it, holding 
confidence, them. 
steady growth intellect, infinite delicacy nature 
capacity developed also, exhibited 
perfection language style speech. rough 
never seen inside became 
end, exercise powers mind, 
heart, soul, master style, rank 
best, perfectly adapted occasion produced 
them. 
 
time listen speech Gettysburg, 
whole soul it: 
 
score seven years ago fathers brought forth 
continent new nation, conceived liberty dedicated 
proposition men created equal. engaged 
great civil war, testing whether nation, nation conceived 
long endure. met great battlefield 
war. come portion field final 
gave lives nation might 
live. altogether fitting proper this. 
larger sense cannot cannot cannot 
ground. brave men, living dead, struggled 
consecrated far poor power add 
world little note, long remember, say 
never forget here. us, living, rather, 
dedicated unfinished work fought 
thus far nobly advanced. rather us dedicated 
great task remaining us honored dead 
take increased devotion cause gave last full 
measure highly resolve dead shall 
died nation God shall new birth 
government people, people, 
people shall perish 
 
lived see work indorsed overwhelming majority 
second inaugural address, pronounced forty days 
death, single passage well 
time deep religious feeling, 
charity enemies country, broad 

 
"If shall suppose American slavery one offences 
Providence God must needs come, which, 
continued appointed time, wills 
gives North South terrible war, woe due 
offence came, shall discern therein departure 
divine living God always 
ascribe Him? Fondly hope, fervently pray, 
mighty scourge war may speedily pass away. Yet, God wills 
continue wealth piled two hundred 
fifty years unrequited toil shall sunk, every drop 
blood drawn lash shall paid another drawn sword, 
said three thousand years ago, still must said, 'the 
judgments Lord true righteous 
 
"With malice toward none, charity all, firmness 
right God gives us see right let us strive finish 
work bind nation's care shall 
borne battle widow 
may cherish lasting peace among ourselves, 

 
prayer answered. forty days life remained 
crowned great historic events. lived see 
Proclamation Emancipation embodied amendment 
Constitution, adopted Congress, submitted States 
mighty scourge war speedily pass away, 
given witness surrender Rebel army fall 
capital, flag loved triumph 
national soil. died hand supreme hour 
lost best friend, human race 
one noblest friends freedom justice, 
whose cause lived died, joined hands grave. 
 
 
 
 
WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
1832 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS PEOPLE SANGAMON COUNTY. 
 
March 9, 
 
FELLOW become candidate honorable office 
one Representatives next General Assembly State, 
according established custom principles true 
becomes duty make known you, people 
propose represent, sentiments regard local affairs. 
 
Time experience demonstration public 
internal improvements. 
countries would greatly opening good roads, 
clearing streams within limits, 
person deny. Yet folly undertake works 
without first knowing able finish 
work generally proves labor lost. cannot 
justly objection railroads 
good things, provided cost nothing. objection 
paying them; objection arises want ability 
pay. 
 
respect County Sangamon, 
 
Yet, however desirable object construction railroad 
country may be, however high may heated 
thoughts always shock accompanying 
amount cost, forces us shrink pleasing 
probable cost contemplated railroad 
estimated bare statement which, opinion, 
sufficient justify belief improvement Sangamon 
River object much better suited infant 
 
cost work would be, unable say. probable, 
however, would greater common streams 
length. Finally, believe improvement Sangamon River 
vastly important highly desirable people county; 
and, elected, measure Legislature 
object, may appear meet approbation receive 
support. 
 
appears practice money rates 
interest already opened field suppose 
may enter upon without claiming honor danger 
may await first seems though never 
end system, acting almost 
general interests community direct tax 
several thousand dollars laid county benefit 
individuals only, unless law made fixing limits 
law purpose, opinion, may made without 
injuring class people. cases extreme necessity, 
could always means found law; 
cases would intended effect. would favor passage 
law subject might easily Let 
labor difficulty could justified 
cases greatest necessity. 
 
Upon subject education, presuming dictate plan 
system respecting it, say view 
important subject people engaged in. every 
man may receive least moderate education, thereby enabled 
read histories countries, may duly 
appreciate value free institutions, appears object 
vital importance, even account alone, say nothing 
advantages satisfaction derived able read 
works religious moral nature, 
themselves. 
 
part, desire see time means, 
enterprise, become much 
general present, gratified power 
contribute something advancement measure might 
tendency happy period. 
 
regard existing laws, alterations thought 
necessary. Many respectable men suggested laws, 
law respecting issuing road law, others, 
present form, require But, 
considering great probability framers laws 
wiser myself, prefer them, unless 
first attacked others; case feel 
privilege duty take stand which, view, might tend 
advancement justice. 
 
But, fellow-citizens, shall Considering great degree 
always attend youth, probable already 
presuming becomes me. However, upon subjects 
spoken thought. may wrong 
regard them; but, holding sound maxim 
better sometimes right times wrong, soon 
discover opinions erroneous, shall ready 
them. 
 
Every man said peculiar ambition. Whether true 
not, say, one, great 
truly esteemed rendering worthy 
far shall succeed gratifying ambition yet 
young, unknown many you. born, 
ever remained, humble life. wealthy 
popular relations friends recommend me. case thrown 
exclusively upon independent voters county; and, 
elected, conferred favor upon shall 
labors But, good people 
wisdom shall see fit keep background, 
familiar much 
 
friend A. LINCOLN. 
 
New Salem, March 9, 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
E. C. 
 
NEW SALEM, Aug. 10, 
 
E. C. 
 
Dear regard time David served enclosed 
discharge shows well writing 
transfer company occurred follows: 
lost horse ferry acquaintance 
one foot companies going river desirous 
go them, one acquaintance mine 
belonging company wished go wished leave 
join mine, case agreed 
exchange places answer other's expected 
would discharged days. 
knowledge ever getting any. embraces facts 
recollection pertinent case. 
 
shall take pleasure giving information power 
call me. 
 
friend, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE REQUEST POSTAGE RECEIPT 
 
Mr. 
 
Mr. 
 
request send receipt postage paper. 
somewhat surprised will, however, comply it. 
law requires newspaper postage paid advance, 
waited full year choose wound feelings 
unless get receipt probably make pay again. 
 
Respectfully, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1836 
 
 
 
 
ANNOUNCEMENT POLITICAL VIEWS. 
 
New Salem, June 13, 1836. 
 
EDITOR paper last Saturday see 
communication, signature 
candidates announced Journal called upon 
Agreed. Here's mine. 
 
go privileges government assist 
bearing Consequently, go admitting whites 
right suffrage pay taxes bear arms means excluding 

 
elected, shall consider whole people Sangamon 
well oppose support me. 
 
acting representative, shall governed 
subjects upon means knowing 
is; upon others shall judgment teaches 
best advance Whether elected not, go 
proceeds sales public lands 
several States, enable State, common others, 
construct railroads without money paying 
interest it. alive first Monday November, shall vote 
L. White President. 
 
respectfully, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE POLITICAL 
 
ROBERT 
 
New Salem, June 21, 1836 
 
DEAR told absence last week passed 
place, stated publicly possession 
fact facts which, known public, would entirely destroy 
prospects N. W. Edwards election; that, 
favor us, forbear divulge them. one 
needed favors I, and, generally, less unwilling 
accept them; case favor would injustice 
public, therefore must beg pardon it. 
confidence people Sangamon, sufficiently 
since done anything, either design 
known would subject forfeiture 
confidence, knows thing, it, 
country's interest. 
 
find wholly unable form fact 
facts, real supposed, opinion veracity 
permit moment doubt least believed 
said. flattered personal regard manifested me; 
hope that, mature reflection, view public 
interest paramount consideration, therefore determine let 
worst come. assure candid statement facts 
part, however low may sink me, shall never break tie 
personal friendship us. wish answer this, 
liberty publish both, choose. 
 
respectfully, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MISS MARY 
 
December 13, 1836. 
 
sick ever since written 
little difference, however, little 
even yet write. more, longer avoid 
looking post-office letter finding it, 
better. see mad old letter yet. don't like 
well risk again. I'll try more, 
 
new State House yet finished, consequently 
Legislature little nothing. governor delivered 
political message, expected 
parties soon two Houses get 
business. Taylor delivered petition new county one 
members morning. told success, 
account members Morgan County opposing it. 
names enough think, justify members 
county going it; members Morgan oppose it, 
say will, chance bad. 
 
chance take seat government Springfield better 
expected. convention held since 
recommended loan several millions dollars, 
faith State, construct Legislature 
it, it; majority cannot tell. 
great strife struggling office United States 
Senator time. probable shall ease pains 
days. opposition men candidate own, 
consequently smile angry 
contending Van Buren candidates respective friends 
Christian recollect mentioned 
outset letter fact, though 
believe well now; that, things cannot 
account for, gotten spirits low 
feel would rather place world here. really 
cannot endure thought staying ten weeks. Write back soon 
get this, and, possible, say something please me, 
really pleased since left you. letter 
dry stupid ashamed send it, present 
feelings cannot better. 
 
Give best respects Mr. Mrs. Able family. 
 
friend, LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
1837 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
January 1837 
 
Mr. fall common error 
mistaken regard side design upon, shall make 
first care remove doubt point, declaring 
opposed resolution consideration, proceed 
body subject, 
without considerable degree apprehension venture cross 
track gentleman Coles [Mr. Indeed, 
believe could muster courage come contact 
gentleman, fact he, days since, 
assure us would never found 
small fortunate occasion, 
gave us understand, regarded 
decidedly superior common friend [Mr. 
feeling, really do, I, say myself, 
nothing friend shall 
regard gentleman Coles decidedly superior also, 
consequently, course shall say, whenever 
shall occasion allude gentleman, shall endeavor 
adopt kind court language understand due 
decided one least, dispute 
superiority men, is, 
faculty subject, neither himself, 
man, find head tail it. introduced 
resolution embracing printed lines across common writing 
paper, yet one half opening speech made 
upon subjects one word said resolution. 
 
Though resolution embraces nothing regard 
constitutionality Bank, much said 
view make impression unconstitutional 
Now, although satisfied ample field may found 
within pale resolution, least small yet, 
gentleman it, feel may, due 
venture follow him. gentleman discovered 
gentleman Washington city upon eve deciding 
Bank unconstitutional, would probably completed 
decision, one Bank officers placed 
hand upon mouth, withhold it. fact 
individuals composing Supreme Court have, official 
decided favor constitutionality Bank, would, 
mind, seem sufficient answer this. fact known all, 
members Supreme Court, together Governor, form 
Council Council approved Bank 
ask, then, decision quite almost made 
gentleman Washington, way, question 
constitutionality Bank never has, never 
taken paramount decision officially made 
which, alone, constitutionality Bank ever 
But, aside view subject, would ask, 
committee resolution proposes appoint examine 
Constitutionality power 
send persons papers, found 
bank unconstitutional, decided so, 
enforce decision? decision amount to? cannot 
compel Bank cease operations, change course 
operations. good, then, labors result in? Certainly none. 
 
gentleman we, without examination, shall, giving 
State Bank, taking stock reserved 
State, former pretend possess 
sufficient legal knowledge decide whether legislative enactment 
proposing to, accepting from, Bank, certain terms, would 
effect former not; 
assure gentleman, effect, already got 
behind settlement well known all, 
Legislature, last session, passed Bank charter, 
Bank since accepted, which, according doctrine, 
alleged violations original charter 
distribution 
 
proceed resolution. examination found 
first lines, precisely one third whole, 
relate exclusively distribution stock commissioners 
appointed State. Now, Sir, clear question arise 
portion resolution, except question 
regard gentlemen stock 
hands, others, money know 
with, want it; this, alone, question, settle 
called thousands people's money. 
interest, let ask, people settlement 
question? difference whether stock owned 
Judge Smith gentleman entitled stock 
Bank, kept possession others, let assert 
right Supreme Court, let 
may found wrong, pay old 
sound one, always pay 
Now, Sir, present case, gentlemen, whose money burden 
them, choose lead decidedly opposed 
people's money used pay one doubt 
examination proposed resolution must cost State ten 
twelve thousand settle question 
people interest, care nothing. 
generally act 
people, got quarrel 
called upon appropriate people's money settle 
 
leave part resolution proceed 
found charge remaining part resolution, 
true, amounts violation Bank charter, except one, 
notice due time. might seem quite sufficient say 
upon charges insinuations enough show 
violations yet, framed 
view deceive notice 
order prominent them. first relation 
connection Bank several banking institutions 
States. Admitting connection exist, like see 
gentleman gentleman, undertake show 
harm it. 
people Illinois willing pay money get 
reference tenth section Bank charter, 
gentleman see framers act contemplated holding 
stock institutions Why, then, it, 
neither law justice forbids it, asked spend 
time money inquiring 
 
next charge, order time, is, officer, 
clerk servant Bank, required take oath 
relation affairs said Bank. Now, know 
whether true believe honest man 
know seventh section charter expressly 
guarantees Bank right making, certain 
may think know requiring 
oath would What, then, 
Bank chosen exercise right? 
every secret ever silly enough 
complain it? presume Bank require oath 
done motive delicacy individuals 
deal it. Why, Sir, many days since, one gentleman upon 
floor, who, way, doubt ready join 
cry Bank, indulged one 
Bank because, said, 
 
Immediately following last charge, several insinuations 
resolution, silly require sort notice, 
fact conclude saying, "to great 
injury people answer would say 
strange enough, people suffering "great 
yet sensible it! Singular indeed people 
oppression yet one among 
found raise voice Bank 
injury upon people, single petition 
presented body subject? Bank really 
one real people found ask 
redress it? truth is, oppression exists. did, 
people would would 
permitted rest day night, till put down. people know 
rights, never slow assert maintain them, 
Let call investigation, shall ever 
stand ready respond call. made call. 
make assertion without fear 
man, hold office, one, ever 
found fault Bank. products 
filled sound circulating 
well pleased operations. No, Sir, 
politician first sound alarm 
way, false he, who, means, 
endeavoring blow storm may upon 
he, alone, proposes spend thousands people's 
public advantage make 
reward Mr. Chairman, work 
exclusively work set men interests 
aside interests people, who, say 
them, are, taken least one long step removed honest 
men. say greater freedom, because, politician 
myself, none regard 
 
Again, rather officers Bank 
money rates interest. Suppose 
true, send committee House inquire it? 
Suppose committee find true, redress injured 
not. individual injured 
way, ample remedy found laws 
gentleman Coles know statute standing 
full force making highly individual loan money 
higher rate interest twelve per 
ignorant placed head committee resolution 
purposes does, neglect mention shows 
merit respect confidence one. 
 
besides this, Bank struck existence, could 
owners capital still loan well now? 
whatever Bank, officers, may done, know 
transactions much frequent enormous 
commencement operations ever since. 
 
next is, Bank refused specie 
This, true violation 
least probability because, fact, 
individual payment refused would interest 
making public, charter 
him. Yet thing done; strong presumption is, 
false groundless. 
 
end resolution, nothing merits 
therefore drop particular examination it. 
 
general view resolution, seen principal 
object committee examine out, mass 
supposed committed commissioners 
stock Bank. believe universally 
understood acknowledged men ever act correctly unless 
motive otherwise. true, suppose 
commissioners acted also supposing 
so. Taking view subject, would ask 
Bank likely find difficult bribe committee 
which, may found 
bribe 
 
Mr. called order. Chair decided Mr. Lincoln 
order. Mr. appealed House, but, 
question withdrew saying preferred let 
gentleman go on; thought would break Mr. Lincoln 

 
Another gracious acknowledge know 
know every sensible man House knows 
it. saying gentleman Coles could nor, 
hand, say could not. particular leave 
found him. endeavoring show 
least great probability seven members could selected 
House act 
twenty-four commissioners reference 
ninth section Bank charter, seen 
commissioners John Robert K. Daniel 
S. John C. W. H. Edward M. Wilson, Edward L. 
Robert R. Green, Baker, John Taylor, Samuel 
C. Benjamin Thomas A. M. 
W. W. S. Charles Richard I. Hamilton, 
W. F. D. Taylor. 
 
twenty-four respectable men State. Probably 
twenty-four men could selected State people 
better whose honor integrity would 
readily place confidence. repeat, less 
probability men 
seven men, rather six men, could selected 
members House, might even though 
headed led himself. 
 
ask every reasonable man, issue joined 
twenty-four commissioners, one part, 
seven men, part, whole depend upon honor 
integrity contending parties, party would greatest 
degree credit Again: Another consideration is, 
right make examination. shall say upon head 
design exclusively part House. 
claim Legislature, 
assumed powers disposed disregard 
Constitution, law, good faith, moral right, everything else, 
word say. part say, examine Bank 
charter, go examine Constitution, go examine acts 
General Assembly State passed, find 
much authority given every compel Bank 
bring hall pour contents upon 
floor, compel submit examination 
resolution Why, Sir, gentleman 
resolution, lately denied floor Legislature 
right repeal otherwise acts, 
acts made nature accepted 
acted parties. ask resolution 
propose, House alone, he, day, denied 
right whole Legislature do? must either abandon 
position must vote resolution. 
difference me, presume little one else, 
does. 
 
means special advocate Bank. long thought 
would well report condition General 
Assembly, cases might occur, might proper make 
examination affairs committee. Accordingly, 
last session, bill Bank charter pending 
House, offered amendment same, words: 
"The said shall, next session General 
Assembly, subsequent General Session, existence 
charter, report amount debts due said 
amount debts due same; amount specie 
account lands owned same, 
amount lands moreover, said 
shall time neglect refuse submit books, 
papers, everything necessary full fair examination 
affairs, person persons appointed General 
Assembly, purpose making examination, said 
shall 
 
amendment vote Eleven 
voted members though would 
order call names, hope recollect 
themselves, vote examination made without 
authority, inasmuch refused receive authority 
power so. 
 
said cases might occur, examination might 
believe case has, 
still opposed making examination without legal 
authority. opposed encouraging lawless 
spirit, whether relation Bank anything else, 
already abroad land spreading rapid fearful 
ultimate overthrow every institution, every 
moral principle, persons property hitherto found 

 
supposing authority, would ask good result 
declare Bank unconstitutional, 
compel power, provided find 
repair injuries may done 
certainly none things. 
shall spend public money Oh, say 
injure credit Bank, nothing else, Please 
tell me, gentlemen, suffer that? cannot 
extent, men large capital; 
consequently, beyond power injuring credit 
Bank, value paper hands 
honest farmer 
do. suppose could effect whole purpose; suppose could 
Bank existence, grand 
would why, Sir, spend 
several thousand dollars public treasure 
currency State, render hands 
people reward former finally 
comfortable obligation paying principal 
interest. 
 
 
 
 
OPPOSITION 
 
ADDRESS YOUNG MEN'S SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS. 
 
January 27, 1837. 
 
subject remarks evening, "The Perpetuation 
Political 
 
great journal things happening sun, we, American 
people, find account running date nineteenth century 
Christian find peaceful possession 
fairest portion earth regards extent territory, 
soil, find 
government system political institutions 
essentially ends civil religious liberty 
history former times tells us. We, mounting stage 
existence, found legal fundamental 
establishment them; 
us brave, 
lamented race ancestors. 
task (and nobly performed it) possess themselves, 
us, land, upon 
political edifice liberty equal rights; 
transmit former foot 
latter lapse time 
latest generation fate shall permit world know. task 
gratitude fathers, justice ourselves, duty posterity, 
love species general, require us faithfully 
perform. 
 
shall perform it? point shall expect approach 
means shall fortify it? Shall expect 
military giant step ocean crush us 
armies Europe, Africa 
treasure earth military 
chest, commander, could force take drink 
Ohio make track Blue Ridge trial thousand 
years. 
 
point approach danger 
ever reach us must spring amongst us; cannot come 
abroad. destruction lot must author 
nation freemen must live time, die 

 
hope not, even something 
ill amongst us. mean increasing disregard law 
pervades growing disposition substitute wild 
furious passions lieu sober judgment courts, 
worse savage executive ministers justice. 
disposition awfully fearful 
exists ours, though feelings admit, would 
violation truth insult intelligence deny. Accounts 
outrages committed form news times. 
country New England Louisiana; 
neither peculiar eternal former burning 
creature climate, neither 
confined slave holding holding States. Alike 
spring among masters Southern slaves, 
citizens land steady Whatever 
cause may be, common whole country. 
 
would tedious well useless horrors 
them. happening State Mississippi St. Louis 
perhaps dangerous example 
Mississippi case first commenced hanging regular 
set men certainly following useful 
honest occupation, one which, far forbidden 
laws, actually licensed act Legislature passed 
single year before. Next, negroes suspected raise 
insurrection caught hanged parts State; 
then, white men supposed finally, 
strangers neighboring States, going business, 
many instances subjected fate. Thus went process 
gamblers negroes, negroes white citizens, 
till dead men seen literally 
trees upon every numbers almost 
sufficient rival native Spanish country 

 
Turn scene St. Louis. single victim 
there. story short, perhaps 
highly anything length ever 
witnessed real life. man name seized 
street, dragged city, chained tree, 
actually burned death; within single hour time 
attending business peace 
world. 
 
effects mob law, scenes becoming 
frequent land lately love law 
order, stories even grown familiar 
anything idle remark. 
 
perhaps ready ask, "What 
perpetuation political answer, much 
it. direct consequences are, comparatively speaking, 
small evil, much danger consists proneness 
minds regard direct consequences. 
considered, hanging gamblers Vicksburg little 
consequence. constitute portion population worse 
useless death, example 
set it, never matter reasonable regret one. 
swept stage existence 
honest men would perhaps much operation. 
Similar correct reasoning regard burning 
negro St. Louis. forfeited life 
outrageous murder upon one worthy respectable citizens 
city, died did, must died 
sentence law short time afterwards. alone, 
well way could otherwise been. 
example either case men take heads 
to-day hang gamblers burn murderers, recollect 
confusion usually attending transactions likely 
hang burn one neither murderer one 
is, that, acting upon example mob to-morrow 
may, probably will, hang burn 
mistake. innocent, ever set 
faces violations law every shape, alike guilty 
fall victims mob law; thus goes on, step 
step, till walls erected defense persons 
property individuals disregarded. this, 
even, full extent evil. instances 
acts going lawless spirit 
encouraged become lawless used 
restraint dread thus become absolutely 
ever regarded government 
make suspension operations, pray 
nothing much total While, hand, 
good men, men love desire abide laws 
enjoy benefits, would gladly blood defense 
country, seeing property destroyed, families 
lives persons seeing 
nothing prospect change better, become tired 
government offers protection, 
much averse change imagine nothing 
lose. Thus, then, operation spirit 
must admit abroad land, strongest 
government, particularly constituted like ours, may 
effectually broken mean 
people. Whenever effect shall produced among us; whenever 
portion population shall permitted gather 
hundreds burn churches, 
throw printing rivers, shoot 
hang burn obnoxious persons pleasure depend 
it, government cannot last. things feelings best 
citizens become less it, thus 
left without friends, few, weak 
make friendship time, 
circumstances, men sufficient talent ambition wanting 
seize strike blow, fair fabric 
last half century hope lovers 
freedom throughout world. 
 
know American people much attached government; know 
would suffer much know would endure evils 
long patiently would ever think 
notwithstanding this, laws continually 
rights secure persons 
property held better 
government natural 
that, sooner later, must come. 
 
Here, then, one point danger may expected. 
 
question recurs, shall fortify it? answer 
simple. Let every American, every liberty, every 
posterity swear blood Revolution never violate 
least particular laws country, never tolerate 
violation others. patriots seventy-six 
support Declaration Independence, support 
Constitution laws let every American pledge life, property, 
sacred Let every man remember violate law 
trample blood father, tear charter 
children's liberty. Let reverence laws breathed 
every American mother 
let taught schools, let 
written books, let preached 
pulpit, proclaimed legislative enforced courts 
justice. And, short, let become political religion 
nation; let old young, rich poor, 
grave gay tongues colors conditions, 
sacrifice upon 
 
ever state feeling shall universally even 
generally prevail throughout nation, vain every effort, 
fruitless every attempt, national freedom. 
 
When, urge strict observance laws, let 
understood saying bad laws, 
may arise redress legal provisions 
made. mean say thing. mean say although 
bad laws, exist, repealed soon possible, still, 
continue force, sake example 
observed. also cases. arise, let 
proper legal provisions made least possible delay, 
till let them, borne with. 
 
fit object redress mob law. 
case may arise, as, instance, 
one two positions necessarily is, thing right 
within itself, therefore deserves protection law 
good citizens, wrong, therefore proper prohibited 
legal neither case interposition mob law 
either necessary, 
 
may asked, suppose danger political 
preserved fifty may 
fifty times 
 
hope sufficient reason. hope danger may 
conclude danger may ever arise would 
extremely dangerous. now, hereafter be, many 
dangerous tendency, existed heretofore, 
insignificant merit attention. government 
maintained original form, establishment 
now, much wondered at. many support 
period, crumbled away. 
period felt 
understood successful one. Then, sought 
fame distinction expected find success 
experiment. upon it; destiny 
it. ambition admiring 
world practical demonstration truth proposition 
hitherto considered best better 
people govern themselves. succeeded 
names transferred counties, 
rivers, revered 
time. failed, called 
sink 
forgotten. experiment successful, thousands 
won names making so. game 
believe true catching end pleasures 
chase. field glory crop already 
new arise, seek 
field. deny history world tells us true, 
suppose men ambition talents continue spring 
amongst us. do, naturally seek 
gratification ruling passion others done them. 
question is, gratification found supporting 
maintaining edifice erected others? 
certainly Many great good men, sufficiently qualified 
task may ever found whose ambition would 
nothing beyond seat Congress, 
Presidential belong family lion, 
think places would satisfy 
Towering genius 
beaten seeks regions hitherto sees 
distinction adding story story upon fame erected 
memory others. denies glory enough serve 
chief. tread footsteps 
however burns 
possible, it, whether expense slaves 
enslaving then, expect man 
possessed coupled ambition sufficient 
push utmost time spring among us? 
one require people united 
other, attached government laws, generally intelligent, 
successfully 
 
Distinction paramount object, although would 
perhaps so, acquire good yet, 
opportunity past, nothing left done way 
building up, would set boldly task pulling down. 
 
probable case, highly one could 
well existed heretofore. 
 
Another reason was, which, extent, 
more, done much maintaining institutions thus far. mean 
powerful influence interesting scenes Revolution 
upon passions people distinguished judgment. 
influence, incident nature, 
common state peace, prosperity, conscious strength, 
time great measure rendered 
principles powerful motive 
instead turned other, directed 
exclusively British nation. thus, force 
circumstances, principles nature either made 
lie become active agents advancement 
noblest establishing maintaining civil 
religious liberty. 
 
state feeling must 
circumstances produced it. 
 
mean say scenes Revolution ever 
entirely that, like everything else, must 
upon memory world, grow 
lapse time. history, hope, read of, 
long Bible shall even granting will, 
influence cannot heretofore been. Even 
cannot universally known felt 
generation gone rest. close struggle, nearly 
every adult male 
consequence form husband, 
father, son, brother, living history found 
every history bearing 
limbs wounds received, 
midst scenes history, too, could read 
understood alike all, wise learned 
histories gone. read 
forever. fortress invading 
could never silent artillery time 
walls. gone. forest giant 
swept them, left 
lonely shorn 
murmur gentle 
combat limbs sink 
more. 
 
temple liberty; 
crumbled away temple must fall unless we, supply 
places solid sober 
reason. Passion helped us, more. future 
enemy. Reason 
furnish materials future support defense. Let 
materials moulded general intelligence, sound 
particular, reverence Constitution laws; 
improved last, remained free last, revered 
name last, long sleep permitted hostile 
foot pass resting place, shall 
learn last trump shall Washington. 
 
Upon let proud fabric freedom rest, rock 
basis; truly said greater institution, 
"the gates hell shall prevail it." 
 
 
 
 
PROTEST ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE SUBJECT SLAVERY. 
 
March 3, 1837. 
 
following protest presented House, read 
ordered spread wit: 
 
upon subject domestic slavery passed 
branches General Assembly present session, 
hereby protest passage same. 
 
"They believe institution slavery founded 
injustice bad policy, abolition 
doctrines tends rather increase 
 
"They believe Congress United States power 
Constitution interfere institution slavery 
different States. 
 
"They believe Congress United States power, 
Constitution, abolish slavery District Columbia, 
power ought unless request 
people District. 
 
"The difference opinions contained said 
resolutions reason entering 
 
STONE, 
 
LINCOLN, 
 
County 
 
 
 
 
MISS MARY 
 
SPRINGFIELD, May 7, 1837. 
 
MISS MARY S. 
 
FRIEND commenced two letters send this, 
got half done, tore up. 
first thought serious enough, second 
shall send this, turn 
 
thing living Springfield rather dull business, 
all; least me. quite ever 
anywhere life. spoken one woman since 
here, could avoided it. 
never church yet, probably shall soon. stay 
away conscious know behave myself. 
 
often thinking said coming live 
Springfield. afraid would satisfied. great 
deal here, would 
see without it. would poor, without means 
believe could bear 
Whatever woman may cast lot mine, ever so, 
intention power make happy 
nothing imagine would make unhappy 
fail effort. know much happier 
way am, provided saw signs you. 
said may way may misunderstood 
you. so, let otherwise, much wish 
would think seriously decide. said 
positively abide by, provided wish it. opinion 
better it. accustomed may 
severe imagine. know capable thinking 
correctly subject, deliberate maturely upon 
subject decide, willing abide decision. 
 
must write good long letter get this. 
nothing else do, though might seem interesting 
written it, would good deal company 
Tell sister don't want hear 
selling gives whenever think 
it. 
 
Yours, etc., LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., Aug. 5, 1837. JOHN ESQ. 
 
DEAR Edwards tells wish know whether act 
provision attached passed law. 
did. organize general law soon 
choose. 
 
also provision bill authorize 
road town, 
certain whether bill passed, neither suppose 
ascertain law published, law. Bowling 
appointed make change. 
news. excitement except little election Monday next. 
 
suppose, course, friend Dr. stands chance 

 
friend humble servant, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MARY 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 16, 1837 
 
FRIEND doubt think rather strange 
write letter day 
account supposing seeing lately makes think 
late meeting expressions 
must know cannot see you, think you, 
entire yet may mistaken regard 
real feelings toward are. 
 
knew not, troubled letter. 
Perhaps man would know enough without 
consider peculiar right ignorance, duty 
allow 
 
want cases right; particularly cases 

 
want, particular time, thing else right 
you; knew would right, rather suspect 
would, let alone would it. And, purpose making 
matter plain possible, say drop 
subject, dismiss thoughts (if ever ever 
leave letter without calling forth one 
murmur me. even go say that, add 
anything comfort peace mind so, sincere 
wish should. understand wish cut 
acquaintance. mean thing. wish 
acquaintance shall depend upon yourself. acquaintance 
would contribute nothing sure would 
mine. feel degree bound me, willing 
release you, provided wish it; hand 
willing even anxious bind faster convinced 
will, considerable degree, add happiness. This, 
indeed, whole question me. Nothing would make 
miserable believe nothing happy know 
so. 
 
said, think cannot make 
understood object letter. 
 
suits best answer this, farewell. long life 
one attend you. But, conclude write back, speak 
plainly do. neither harm danger saying 
anything think, manner think it. respects 

 
friend, LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LEGAL SUIT WIDOW Gen. ADAMS 
 
PEOPLE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., Aug. 19, 1837. 
 
accordance expressed last week, present 
reader articles published form, 
reference case Joseph Anderson vs. James Adams. 
articles read personal party 
feeling, sole motive learning truth. 
done, reader pass judgment matters issue. 
 
regret case, made 
weeks election. course might prevented 
expressions often heard since, different 
individuals, account disposition made votes. 
 

 
well known you, existing time 
considerable excitement regard Gen. Adams's certain 
tracts land, manner acquired them. 
understand, Gen. charges whole gotten 
lawyers injure election; one 
happen possession facts connected 
matter, will, brief manner possible, make statement 
them, together means arrived knowledge 
them. 
 
Sometime May June last, widow woman, name Anderson, 
son, county, came Springfield, 
purpose said selling ten lot ground lying near 
town, claimed property deceased husband 
father. 
 
reached town found land claimed Gen. Adams. 
John T. employed look matter, 
thought could prospect success, commence 
suit land. went immediately office 
examine Adams's title, found land entered one 
Thomas, Thomas one Miller 
Gen. Adams. three deeds ten eleven 
years old, latest five, recorded 
time, within less one year. thought suspicious 
circumstance, thereby induced examine deeds 
view discovery defect 
title, almost convinced founded 
discovered deed Thomas although Miller's 
name stood sort marginal note record book, nowhere 
deed itself. told fact Talbott, 
proposed go Gen. Adams's get original 
deed, compare record, thereby ascertain whether 
defect original merely error 
Talbott afterwards told me, went 
finding home, got deed son, which, compared 
record, proved discovered merely error 
Mr. Talbott corrected record, brought 
original office, thought think yet, show us 
right. came room handed deed me, 
fault own. opening it, another paper 
fell it, examination proved assignment 
judgment Circuit Court Sangamon County Joseph Anderson, 
late husband widow James Adams, judgment 
favor said Anderson one Joseph Knowing 
judgment connection land affair, immediately 
took copy it, word word, letter letter cross 
cross follows: 
 
Joseph Anderson, vs. Joseph 
 
Judgment Sangamon Circuit Court Joseph Miller obtained 
note originally 25 interest thereon assign 
right, title interest James Adams consideration 
debt owe said Adams. 
 
JOSEPH x 
 
copy shows, bore date May 10, although judgment 
assigned obtained October afterwards, may 
seen one records Circuit Court. Two strange 
circumstances attended cannot represented copy. One 
was, date first made and, without 
figure fully figure afterwards 
made top it; that, although date ten 
years old, writing it, appearance, 
thought many, believe saw it, 
week old. paper written old 
old figures back made 
writing face much striking 
suppose otherwise might been. curiosity doubt 
excited know connection assignment land 
question. story this: sold land 
Thomas sold gave deed, Anderson sold 
took Miller's note purchase money. 
note became due, Anderson Miller it, Miller procured 
Court stay collection 
money get deed land. Gen. Adams employed 
attorney Anderson suit, October 
term, judgment given favor 
Anderson provided Thomas 
execute deed land favor Miller deliver Gen. 
Adams, held till Miller paid judgment, 
deliver him. Miller left county without paying judgment. 
Anderson moved county, since died widow 
came Springfield last May June, mentioned, found 
land Gen. Adams naturally led inquire 
money due upon judgment sent them, inasmuch 
he, Gen. Adams, authority deliver deed Miller 
money paid. General told her, perhaps 
son, came her, Anderson, assigned 
judgment him, Gen. Adams. told General 
exhibiting assignment judgment bearing date 
respects differing one 
asserting assignment one ever 
did, forged Talbott lawyers, 
slipped papers purpose injuring him. Now, 
say know precisely one exist, Talbott, 
Wm. Butler, Matheny, John T. Judge Logan, Robert P. 
C. S. M. saw examined it, least 
one half swear GENERAL ADAMS'S 
further, know Talbott swear got 
General's returned possession again. 
assignment General exhibiting 
Anderson writing. one signed 
 
told Gen. says swear heard Gen. 
Adams tell young Anderson assignment made father 
signed 
 
stated. leave without 
given names persons knowledge facts, order 
one chooses may call ascertain far 
made statements 
known many one individuals 
charge assignment General's 
papers made, silence might construed 
truth. shall subscribe hereby 
authorize editor Journal give one may 
call it. 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN TALBOTT REPLY GEN. ADAMS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., Oct. 28, 1837. 
 
Republican morning publication Gen. Adams's 
name used quite thank 
General. thank gives without 
appearing part former publication 
mine, appears misunderstood 
 
former publication alluded to, stated, substance, 
Mr. Talbott got deed son Gen. Adams's purpose 
mistake occurred record said deed 
office; corrected record, brought 
deed handed me, opening deed, another paper, 
assignment judgment, fell it. statement 
Gen. Adams editor Republican seized upon 
palpable evidence falsehood. set 
gravely proving assignment could 
deed Talbott got young Adams, he, Talbott, would 
seen opened deed correct record. Now, truth 
is, Talbott see assignment opened deed, least 
told omitted say so, 
former publication, matter palpable 
necessary stated Talbott corrected record 
course must opened it; and, 
General friends must seen omitted 
state fact seeing assignment, 
existence necessarily connected facts 
state, thought greatest could understand 
it. say Talbott seen it? say anything 
inconsistent seen before? certainly 
not, becomes logical 
gentlemen sustain argument assuming say 
everything say upon 
assumption, may expect find General, little harder 
pressed argument, saying said Talbott came office 
head actually said so, omitted 
say came feet 
 
publication to-day, General produces affidavit 
said Talbott told 
find assignment deed, error 
committed, found wrapped another paper 
office, upon statement comments follows, 
wit: "If true stated Talbott 
found assignment wrapped another paper office, 
statement Lincoln fell 
 
common sense say Talbott 
found in? Talbott find another paper office, 
reason could folded deed brought 
one far made believe 
may happened office one time inconsistent 
happened office another 
 
statement case makes this, 
got bunch deeds young Adams, knows found 
assignment certain particular deed 
in, certain whether folded deed 
taken, another one, brought office. 
mysterious anything suspicious it? 
 
"But useless dwell longer point. man 
wilfully blind see 
Lincoln shown inconsistent truth, 
say, shown done 
thing; reader disposed require evidence 
General's opinion. 
 
Excepting General's attempt regard 
Talbott myself, denied single 
statement made Every material statement 
made sworn men who, former times, thought 
respectable General Adams. stated assignment judgment, 
copy Talbott, C. R. Matheny, Wm. 
Butler, Judge Logan swore existence. stated 
said Gen. Adams's men swore 
stated Talbott would swear got 
Gen. Adams's came forward swear it. 
 
Bidding former publication, propose examine 
General's last gigantic propose point 
General's such, too, shall 
able escape from. Speaking famous assignment, General 
says: "This last charge, last dying 
effort render character infamous among fellow citizens, 
manufactured certain lawyer's office town, printed 
office Sangamon found way world 
time two days last turn Mr. 
affidavit, find following, "I 
time May early part June, saw 
corner paper purporting assignment Joseph 
Anderson James Adams, assignment signed mark 
etc. Keys saw assignment last 
May first June, Gen. Adams tells falsehood says 
manufactured election, 7th 
manufactured election, Keys tells 
falsehood says saw last May first 
June. Either Keys General it; 
General's language, say "Let settle 
them." 
 
again, let bearing mind General Adams 
said, one part address, charge 
relation assignment manufactured election, 
turn affidavit S. following 
found S. best 
day day Gen. Adams started 
Illinois May last, house Gen. Adams, 
sitting kitchen, situated back part house, 
afternoon, Benjamin Talbott came around house, back 
kitchen, appeared wild laid 
papers kitchen table requested 
handed made apology coming kitchen, 
handing himself, showed 
frightened confused speech cause 
could 
 
affidavit, Gen. Adams "Why 
reply question General himself. 
says May, so, clear Talbott 
frightened account assignment, unless General 
lies says assignment charge manufactured 
election. strong evidence, General 
truth front, see one part 
address roundly asserting assignment manufactured 
election, then, position, 
foolish affidavit, prove Talbott engaged 
two months before? 
 
another part address, Gen. Adams says: "That hold 
assignment said judgment, dated 20th May, signed 
said Anderson, never pretended deny stated 
fact one previous election, also 
answer bill pronounce statement 
false, shall rely word oath 
man sustain say; let whole decided 
reference circular answer General 
circular speak 
say bore date 20th May, say bore date. 
answer say 
say bore date 20th May, far it, 
said oath (for swore well 
obtained one let examine circular 
answer himself. 
 
readily observed principal part Adams's defense 
rests upon argument base enough 
assignment would fool enough one would 
cover case. argument used circular 
election. Republican used least once, since then; 
Adams uses publication to-day. pledge 
show fool friends contended 
impossible be. says genuine 
got Joseph affidavit, stating 
seen it, believed signature executed 
hand signed name answer 
Luckily took copy genuine assignment, 
permitted hence know cover case. 
first place headed Anderson vs. Joseph heads 
Sangamon Circuit Court." Now, never 
case Sangamon Circuit Court entitled Joseph Anderson vs. Joseph 
case mentioned former publication, 
one parties ever existed Circuit Court, 
entitled Joseph Miller vs. Joseph Anderson, Miller 
becomes Adams fool 
enough assignment would cover case? 
certain present one cover case; got 
honestly, still clear fool enough pay 
assignment cover case. 
 
General asks proof 
consider None already 
testified him. one least interest earth, 
far learn, injure him. True, says 
him; testimony angel Heaven 
introduced him, would make charge 
put question every man, believe 
Benjamin Talbott, R. Matheny, William Butler Stephen T. Logan, 
sustaining high justly proud them, 
would deliberately themselves, without motive whatever, 
except injure man's election; that, too, man 
candidate, time mind, yet never elected 

 
Adams's demanding testimony, 
brings affidavit son, even S. 
who, suppose, black 
boy, kept kitchen, prove 
man Talbott, man who, two years ago, ran 
Gen. Adams office beat 
four votes one, introduced him, asks community, 
consequence lord, reject 
 
might easily write pointing 
statements Adams's last address one another, 
known facts; aware reader must already tired 
length opening first 
accused that; 
ghost story got up, that; last 
dying effort, assignment charge got false 
community must know. ghost first made 
appearance print, that, too, Keys swears saw 
assignment, one may see reference 
Gen. Adams himself, reply ghost story, first 
man raised cry way 
never back him. effort 
make impression enemies first made charge 
drove that, drove 
that, finally assignment charge manufactured 
election. Now, general reply ever made 
ghost charges made one time, 
succession states; date reply show, 
made least month date Keys swears saw 
Anderson enough. conclusion say 
character defend well Gen. Adams, 
does. true children kitchen 
had, make me. 
 
A. LINCOLN, September 6, 1837. 
 
 
 
 
Gen. ADAMS 
 
PUBLIC. 
 
Springfield, Ill, 1837. 
 
turn things taken lately, Gen. Adams 
writes book, expected write it. 
Republican morning presented world new work 
six length; consequence must beg room 
one column obvious minute reply cannot 
made one column everything said and, 
consequently, hope expectation answered reply 
parts General's publication worth to. 
 
may improper remind reader publication 
Sept. 6th General Adams said assignment charge manufactured 
election; reply proved statement 
false Keys, Now, without attempting 
furnishes another witness thing 
wit, assignment manufactured 
election; weeks before. Let borne mind 
Adams made furnished two witnesses 
prove attempt deny explain it. 
going let pin stuck here, "One lie proved 
6th September said stated 
held assignment dated May 
reply pronounced false, referred 
truth said. week forgets make explanation 
this. Let another pin stuck here, before. mention 
things because, if, one permitted 
shift ground pass silence, end 
controversy. 
 
first thing attention General's present 
production information pleased give 
made suffer 
 
present circumstances, cannot apply me, 
widow wife children might 
possibility become such. Such, however, doubt, been, 
made suffer Yes, 
mischievous next thing shall notice favorite 
expression, "not lawyers, doctors fond 
applying dare Now, let remembered 
first came country attempted impose 
upon community lawyer, actually carried attempt 
far induce man charge murder 
defence life hands, finally took money got 
man raise favor 
lawyer, lack 
sense, lawyer, 
proclaimed lawyer, got man hanged 
him. 
 
Passing parts article neither fact argument 
them, come question asked Adams whether person ever 
saw assignment possession. insult common sense. 
Talbott sworn repeated time again, got 
Adams's possession returned possession. Still, 
though addressing assurance ask person 
ever saw possession. 
 
Next quote sentence, "Now son swears Talbott 
called deed, he, Talbott, opened pointed 
True. son swear so, 
swore prove affidavit falsehood. Turn 
affidavit, see Talbott called 
deed correct error record. Thus appears 
error question record, 
could Talbott open deed point thing 
not, cannot pointed out. error deed, 
course could pointed there. merely prove 
error could pointed out, swore 
too, deed opened presence special 
view error, been, could failed see 
error it. easy enough see swore 
this. object prove assignment deed 
Talbott got it: discovered could swear 
without first deed swore 
opened, must show motive opening it, conclusion 
father pointing error would appear 

 
purpose showing assignment 
Talbott got it, story introduced affidavit 
deeds remarkable fact, one 
stand warning 
short affidavit attempted depart truth, 
far means two points, wit, 
opening deed pointing error counting 
caught himself. 
caught saying contained five deeds 
"and saw papers said deed 
First six papers, saw none "my 
son let pin stuck here. 
 
Adams argument, could forged 
assignment, reason could motive it. 
know facts absence Admitting 
paper filed suit clear 
cannot answer purpose designs it. Hence motive 
making one supposed would answer obvious. making date 
old also easily enough accounted for. records 
hands, then, considerable talk upon particular 
subject, knew could examine records ascertain 
precise without hence 
concluded try guess, and, turned out, missed little. 
Miller's word say. first place, 
Miller's answer first question shows upon face 
with, answer dictated him. asked 
knew Wright James three-fourths answer 
consists knew Joseph Anderson, man nothing 
asked, word said fact 
accounted upon supposition Adams secretly told 
wished swear to. 
 
Another Miller's answers prove common sense 
Court Record untrue. one question answers, brought 
suit James Adams, acting justice 
peace Sangamon County, obtained judgment. 
 
remove Sangamon Circuit 
remove it." 
 
said removed word 
common language command person thing shall 
move law meaning. 
issuing justice peace command 
stop proceedings named case orders. 
order remove stop stay something already 
Besides this, records Sangamon Circuit Court show 
judgment Miller swore never removed said Court 
otherwise. 
 
take notice part Adams's address 
order time noticed before. words: 
"I shown, opinion two competent judges, 
handwriting forged assignment differed mine, one 
could mistaken mine." false. 
doubt judge referred to; reference certificate 
seen say handwriting assignment 
could mistaken use expression 
substantially, anything near substantially, same. 
said handwriting could mistaken would 
equally unfortunate would 
contradicted Keys, says, "I looked writing judged 
said Adams's good 
 
Adams speaks much apparent confidence success attending 
ultimate maintenance title land 
question. Without wishing disturb pleasure would 
say impossible may yet taught sing 
different song relation matter. 
 
end Miller's Adams "Will Mr. Lincoln say 
almost convinced title ten tract land 
founded answer, not. change 
make quite cannot 
pass silence Adams's assertion proved forged 
assignment deed came house Talbott, 
this, although Talbott sworn assignment 
deeds came house, Adams 
assurance say proved contrary 
Let friends attempt show wherein proved 
thing 
 
publication 6th September hinted Talbott, 
might mistaken. present, speaking Talbott says 
"They may imposed man least 
fail see object this? till 
hopes got us little scared wishes softly 
"If you'll quit could get us say 
slipped assignment 
hands without knowledge, doubt remains would 
immediately discover men earth. 
ground evidently wishes us understand willing compromise 
upon. ask charity hands. neither mistaken 
imposed upon. made statements know 
true choose live die them. 
 
Esq. Carter, Adams's friend, personal political, 
that, 5th month, great 
affectation modesty, declared would never introduce 
child Notwithstanding affectation modesty, 
present publication introduced child 
show much could treat declaration, 
Esq. Carter administer oath him. 
important witness consider him, entirely whole 
entire present production depend upon testimony child, 
mentioned "my "my son 
like expressions less fifteen different times. Let 
remembered here, shown affidavit "my son 
false evidence apparent 
ask affidavit taken away foundation fabric 
left stand 
 
General Adams's taken 
connection articles Republican, 
foolish One 
week Republican public Gen. Adams preparing 
instrument blow up, 
burst 
particularly Talbott 
done due time. 
 
two three weeks word said. 
Republican comes forth mere passing remark opinion 
decided favor Gen. Adams, give 
trouble matter. meantime Adams 
and, Burns says "For 
one instance goes far take old 
acquaintance mine several steps crowd and, apparently weighed 
importance business, gravely solemnly asks 
"he ever heard Lincoln say 
 
Republican comes again. "We invite attention public 
General Adams's "The victory great one, 
triumph really believe editor Illinois 
Republican fool enough think General Adams leads 
mistaken shall presumption 
mercy "The hour yet come, 
long first Journal 
shall say, appeared shall laid 
bare public Suddenly General appears 
severity treating us "The condemnation 
enemies inevitable result 
sake, dear permit heart 
much account. reason 
killed shall never sensible 
 
General. see court 
settle question whether widow shall 
land. 
 
A. LINCOLN. October 18, 1837. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
Mrs. O. H. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, April 1, 
 
DEAR shall make 
history much life elapsed since saw subject 
letter. And, way, discover that, order give 
full intelligible account things done suffered 
since saw you, shall necessarily relate happened 
before. 
 
was, then, autumn 1836 married lady 
great friend mine, pay 
visit father residing Kentucky, proposed 
return would bring sister 
condition would engage become 
convenient despatch. I, course, accepted know 
could done otherwise really averse it; 
me, well pleased 
seen said sister three years before, thought 
intelligent saw good objection 
life hand hand her. Time passed on; lady took 
journey due time sister company, sure enough. 
astonished little, appeared coming readily 
showed trifle willing, reflection occurred 
might prevailed married sister 
come without anything concerning ever mentioned her, 
concluded objection presented itself, would 
consent waive this. occurred hearing arrival 
remembered, yet seen her, 
except three years mentioned. days 
and, although seen before, look 
imagination her. knew 
appeared fair match knew called 
"old felt doubt truth least half 
now, her, could life avoid 
thinking this, 
skin full fat permit 
want teeth, appearance 
general, kind notion ran head nothing 
could commenced size reached present 
less thirty-five forty years; short, 
pleased her. could do? told sister 
would take better worse, made point honor 
conscience things stick word especially others 
induced act case doubt had, 
fairly convinced man earth would 
her, hence conclusion bent holding 

 
"Well," thought I, "I said it, and, consequences 
may, shall fault fail it." determined 
consider and, done, powers discovery 
put work search might fairly set 
tried imagine which, 
unfortunate actually true. Exclusive 
woman ever seen face. also tried convince 
mind much valued 
inferior, could discover, 

 
Shortly this, without coming positive understanding 
her, set first saw me. 
stay letters change opinion 
either intellect intention, contrary confirmed 
both. 
 
while, although 
resolution, found continually 
led make it. life, 
bondage, either real much 
desired free. return home, saw nothing change 
opinions particular. same, I. 
spent time might get along life 
contemplated change circumstances taken place, 
might evil day time, really dreaded 
much, perhaps more, 
 
suffering upon deeply interesting subject, am, 
want 
know guess got clear, every sense 
violation word, honor, conscience. don't believe 
guess, might well tell once. lawyer 
says, done manner following, wit: delayed 
matter long thought could honor way, 
brought round last concluded might well 
bring consummation without mustered 
resolution, made proposal but, 
answered, No. first supposed 
affectation modesty, thought ill became 
peculiar circumstances case; charge, 
found greater firmness before. tried 
success, rather want 
success. 
 
finally forced give up; found 
almost beyond seemed 
me, hundred different ways. vanity deeply wounded 
reflection stupid discover 
time never doubting understood also 
she, taught believe nobody else would have, 
actually rejected fancied And, cap 
whole, first time began suspect really 
little love her. let go. I'll try it. 
Others made fools never 
truth said me. emphatically instance, made fool 
myself. come conclusion never think 
never satisfied one 
would enough me. 
 
receive this, write long something amuse me. 
Give respects Mr. Browning. 
 
sincere friend, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
REMARKS SALE PUBLIC LANDS 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, January 17, 
 
Mr. Lincoln, Committee subject 
made report subject purchasing United 
States lands lying within limits State 
Illinois, accompanied resolutions State propose purchase 
lands twenty-five per faith 
State carry proposal effect government accept 
within two years. 
 
Mr. Lincoln thought resolutions ought seriously considered. 
reply gentleman Adams, said 
State. price lands may thought 
others, would conclusion mind 
representatives Legislature country 
lands lie would opposed raising price, would 
operate settlement lands. referred lands 
military fallen hands large 
consequence low opposed low price land. 
thought adverse interests poor 
buy up. opposed reduction price 
public lands. 
 
Mr. Lincoln referred official documents Indiana, 
compared population two States. Illinois 
gained upon State public land system is. 
conclusion ten years time Illinois would 
public land Indiana has. referred also Ohio. 
State sold nearly public lands. twenty years 
ahead us, lands equally so, 
twenty years 
present. 
 
Mr. Lincoln referred canal lands, supposed policy 
State would different regard them, representatives 
section country could choose 
representatives parts State veto upon it, 
policy. thought State lands, 
policy Legislature would liberal sections. 
 
referred policy General Government. thought 
national debt paid, expenses government 
would done since debt paid. 
 
 
 
 
------ 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 11, DEAR 
 
Mr. informs wish write particulars 
conversation Dr. relative you. Dr. 

 
He, learning lived Springfield, asked 
acquainted you. told was. said lately 
elected Adams, never would again. asked 
why. said people found 
sheriff sheriff Sangamon County, came 
left securities asked know 
fact. told think ever sheriff 
sheriff Sangamon, thought 
told left securities suffer 
case, never heard it, so, 
thought would heard it. 
 
Dr. telling told anything whatever, 
authorize contradict news here. 
 
friend, ever, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH NATIONAL BANK 
 
HALL HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, December 20, 
 
peculiarly embarrassing attempt 
continuance discussion, evening, conducted 
hall several preceding ones. 
much fuller now, without 
reason so, except greater interest community feel 
speakers addressed 
now. am, indeed, attended 
done spare hope 
interested anything may able say. circumstance 
upon sure shall unable overcome 
evening. enough 
 
subject heretofore discussed subtreasury scheme 
present administration, means 
revenues nation, 
national bank purposes. Mr. Douglas said 
(the dared meet (the argument 
question. protest assert 
again, discussion, urged facts arguments 
subtreasury neither dared deny attempted 
answer. lest may led believe really wish avoid 
question, propose, humble way, urge arguments 
time audience mark well positions 
shall take proof shall offer sustain them, 
permit Mr. Douglas friends escape force 
round assertion meet 

 
then, national bank 
purposes, lay following propositions, 
wit: (1) injuriously affect community operation 
circulating medium. (2) fiscal 
(3) less secure public money. show 
truth first proposition, let us take short review 
condition operation national bank. 
public collection revenues 
government, bank permitted 
actually loan individuals, hence large amount 
money actually collected revenue purposes, 
plan would idle great portion time, kept almost 
constantly person reflect money 
valuable circulation readily perceive 
keep government revenues constant instead 
locked advantage. 
subtreasury revenue collected kept iron 
government wants thus people 
use it, government need it, 
money performing office iron 
natural effect change policy, every one see, 
reduce quantity money But, again, 
subtreasury scheme revenue collected 
anticipate expect hear said 
policy administration collect revenue 
shall, reply Mr. Van Buren, message 
recommending expended nearly column document 
attempt persuade Congress provide collection 
revenue specie words: 
 
"It may safely assumed motive convenience citizens 
requires reception bank addition this, Mr. 
Wright, Senator New York, political, personal 
confidential friend Mr. Van Buren, drafted introduced 
Senate first subtreasury bill, bill provided ultimately 
collecting revenue true, know, clause 
stricken bill, done votes Whigs, 
aided portion Van Buren subtreasury 
bill yet become law, though two three considered 
Congress, without specie 
admit room quibbling upon question whether 
administration favor exclusive specie doctrine not; take 
fact President first urged specie doctrine, 
recommendation first bill introduced embraced it, 
us charging policy party head 
publicly first it. repeat, then, 
subtreasury revenue collected mark 
effect must be. estimates ever made 
sixty eighty millions specie United States. 
expenditures Government year last 
forty millions. Thus seen 
whole revenue collected take half 
specie nation it. means half 
specie belonging fifteen millions souls compose 
whole population country thrown hands public 
public creditors number perhaps 
one quarter leaving fourteen 
millions three quarters get along best can, less 
one half specie country, whatever 
may able 
means, every public may, 
likely will, set glorious 
upon fair division, 
share let 
ask, system expense many 
ever sacred name Democracy ever 
made indorse enormity rights people? 
 
already said subtreasury reduce quantity 
money position strengthened recollection 
revenue collected mere amount 
revenue withdrawn, amount paper 
circulation forty millions would serve basis 
withdrawn, would sound state least one hundred 
millions. one hundred more, circulation 
shall withdrawn, contemplate without terror 
distress, must man 
purchased credit, one hundred 
dollars, two hundred millions circulating country, 
quantity reduced one hundred millions arrival 
find horse sufficient pay half 
half must either paid means, thereby 
become clear loss him, go thereby become clear 
loss said single case 
purchase horse hold good every case debt existing 
time reduction quantity money occurs, 
may may said 
loses 
examination found true limited extent. 
generally true lose losing 
debts increased value 
either parting property pay debts 
received them, entirely breaking 
business, thereby thrown upon world 
 
general distress thus created will, sure, 
because, whatever change may occur quantity money 
community, time adjust 
adjustment suffer less, many lose 
everything renders life Why, then, shall suffer 
severe difficulty, even though unless receive 
equivalent it? 
 
saying effect produced reduction 
quantity money relates whole country. propose 
show would produce peculiar permanent upon 
citizens States Territories public lands 
States Territories, know, form 
great gulf all, nearly all, money swallowed 
up. quantity money shall consequently 
everything individual control brought 
price lands, fixed law, remain now. 
necessity follow produce labor money 
sufficient purchase eighty acres raise sufficient 
purchase perhaps much; difficulty 
last long, degree, portion 
lands shall remain of. well do, difficulty 
poor people encounter homes, hesitate say 
price public lands shall or, 
thing, produce labor cut one half one 
third present prices, little less impossible 
procure homes 
 
Well, then, become him? General Why, 
President immediately expressed high almost 
appointing foreign 
party 
attempt throw off, avoid responsibility 
President indorse when, 
commission, appointed author highest 
honorable office single step behind 
American political 
 
return another Mr. Douglas's expenditures 
time announcing pleasing intelligence 
last one. says ten millions year's expenditure 
prosecute anticipated war Great 
Britain Maine boundary question. words settle this. 
First, ten millions made till 
consequently could expended second, although 
never expended all. heard Mr. 
Douglas recollect indulged expression 
pity me. "Now he's got me," thought I. went 
say five millions expenditure payments 
French knew five millions 
knew ten millions 
Maine boundary war, knew 
ridiculous saw stupid enough 
hope would permit assertions 
go readily consented that, score veracity 
audience judge whether 
world's 
 
Mr. insists difference Van Buren party 
Whigs that, although former sometimes practice, 
always correct principle, whereas latter wrong 
principle; and, better impress proposition, uses 
expression words: "The Democrats 
sound head first branch 
is, Democrats admit 
merely literally true. looks 
moment Prices, 
hundreds others, away public money Texas, 
Europe, every spot earth may hope find 
refuge justice, doubt 
affected heels species seems 
heels operates 
creatures much like song 
which, got started it, 
tried stop it, would run away. hazard wearing 
point relate seems 
point Irish soldier, always 
danger near, 
without orders first charge 
asked captain so, replied: brave 
heart Julius ever but, somehow other, whenever 
danger legs run away it." Mr. 
party. take public money hand 
laudable purpose wise heads honest hearts 
possibly get again, 
run away them. 
 
Seriously proposition Mr. nothing less 
request party may tried instead 
Perhaps position party assumes 
liable modest 
nothing length already 
extended remarks forbids attempting it. 
reason given, pass by. 
 
shall one point. Mr. late 
elections States, results confidently 
every State Union vote Mr. Van Buren next 
Presidential election. Address argument 
free brave effect nothing. may true; 
must, let it. Many free countries lost liberty, 
may lose shall, 
last never deserted her. know great 
Washington, aroused directed evil spirit 
there, forth political 
current broad sweeping frightful velocity 
whole length breadth land, bidding fair leave 
green spot living thing; 
like waves evil spirit, 
dare resist destroying course 
and, knowing this, cannot deny 
may swept away. Broken I, too, may be; bow never 
will. probability may fall struggle ought 
deter us support cause believe shall 
deter me. ever feel soul within 
wholly unworthy almighty 
contemplate cause country deserted world 
standing boldly alone, 
victorious Here, without contemplating consequences, 
high heaven face world, swear eternal fidelity 
cause, deem it, land life, liberty, 
love. thinks adopt oath 
Let none thinks right, may succeed. 
if, all, shall fail, so. still shall 
proud consolation saying departed 
shade country's freedom, cause approved judgment, 
hearts, disaster, death, 
never 
 
 
 
 
JOHN T. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, December 23, 
 
DEAR 
 
Dr. Henry write political news. write 
little matters business. recollect told drawn 
Chicago money, sent 
every turn take, saying Robert 
never received eighty dollars tell 
anything Again, old Mr. Wright, lives South 
somewhere, continually deeds says 
left you, find nothing of. tell 
Legislature session suffered bank 
charter without benefit seems little 
disposition it. 
 
Whenever letter comes carry her, 
see tolerable nice now. Maybe 
write get time. 
 
friend ever, A. LINCOLN 
 
P. Democratic giant here, much worth talking 
about. A.L. 
 
 
 
 
1840 
 
 
 
 
CIRCULAR WHIG COMMITTEE. 
 
Confidential. 
 
January 1840. 
 
------ 
 
obedience resolution Whig State convention, 
appointed Central Whig Committee county. 
trust confided one hope 
glory overthrow corrupt powers 
control beloved country sufficient reward 
time labor devote it. Whig brethren throughout 
Union met convention, due 
mutual elected candidates Presidency 
worthy cause, worthy support 
every true patriot would country 
institutions honestly faithfully overthrow 
opposed us whose officers ever 
whose ever ready obey 
smallest commands, every Whig must know duty, must 
firmly whatever time labor may cost, boldly 
faithfully it. intention organize whole State, 
every Whig brought polls coming Presidential 
contest. cannot this, however, without 
duty, shall expect yours. due 
following plan organization, duties 
required county 
 
(1) divide county small districts, appoint 
whose duty shall make perfect list 
voters respective districts, ascertain certainty 
vote. meet men doubtful 
man support, voters designated separate 
lines, name man probably support. 
 
(2) duty said keep constant watch 
doubtful voters, time time talked 
confidence, also place hands 
documents influence them. 
 
(3) also duty report you, least month, 
progress making, election days see every Whig 
brought 
 
appointed last 
April, least, make first report. 
 
(5) first month hereafter shall expect hear 
you. first report unless 
found great many doubtful voters, tell pretty accurately 
manner county vote. letters 
us, state number certain votes us, 
well number doubtful votes, opinion manner 

 
heard counties, shall able 
tell similar accuracy political State. 
information forwarded soon received. 
 
Inclosed newspaper continued 
Presidential election. ourselves, 
every Whig State must take it. published low 
every one afford it. must raise fund forward us extra 
county ought one hundred 
copies forwarded distribution among political 
paper devoted exclusively great cause 
engaged. Procure forward us 
immediately. 
 
Immediately election county, must inform us 
early possible general election 
give like information. 
 
senator Congress elected next Legislature. Let 
local interests divide you, select candidates succeed. 
 
plan operations course concealed every one 
except good friends right ought know them. 
 
Trusting much good cause, strength 
determination Whigs everywhere duty, go 
work organization State confident success. 
numbers, properly organized gallant 
Harrison head, shall meet 
parts Union. 
 
Address letters Dr. A. G. Henry, R. A. Lincoln, E. 
D. Baker, J. F. Speed. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN T. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 1, 1840 
 
DEAR 
 
never seen prospects party bright parts 
now. shall carry county larger majority 
ran think 
think probable shall 
permitted party succeed 
"Old pour without 
morning took post office letter 
names sixty carrying Francis 
found received one hundred forty quarters 
day's mail. average specimen every day's 
Yesterday Douglas, chosen consider 
something undertook Francis street. 
Francis caught hair back market 
matter ended Francis pulled away him. 
whole affair Francis everybody else 
laughing ever since. 
 
send names men come 
Harrison town, suggest send 
 
let us appoint delegate 
George H. M. Johnson 
Michael (not 
Thomas Hunter, always Whig 
deserves Matthew Jr., John 
George William three fell us 
doubtful John M. John 
Walter 
 
foregoing addressed Springfield. 
 
Also send Solomon Miller John Also 
Charles Samuel B. C. T. J. 
John Logan County. 
 
Speed says wrote Smith said passed here. 
procure names people here, send 
long. Speed also says must fail send us New 
York Journal wrote time since. 
 
Butler jealous never send him. 
must neglect next time. 
 
friend, ever, A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
RESOLUTION ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
November 28, 1840. 
 
Illinois House Representatives, November 28, 1840, Mr. Lincoln 
offered following: 
 
Resolved, much message relates 
fraudulent fraudulent practices elections, 
referred Committee Elections, instructions said 
committee prepare report House bill act 
may judgment afford greatest possible protection 
elective franchise sorts whatever. 
 
 
 
 
RESOLUTION ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
December 2, 1840. 
 
Resolved, Committee Education instructed inquire 
expediency providing law examination 
qualification persons offering school 
teacher shall receive part public school fund shall 
successfully passed examination, report bill 
otherwise. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
December 4, 1840 
 
House Representatives, Illinois, December 4, 1840, 
presentation report respecting petition H. N. claiming 
seat Mr. Peoria, Mr. Lincoln moved House 
resolve Committee Whole question, take 
immediately. Mr. Lincoln considered question highest 
importance whether individual right sit House 
not. course propose would take evidence 
decide upon facts 
 
Mr. wanted time; could decide heat debate, 
etc. 
 
Mr. Lincoln thought question better gone now. 
courts law required decide evidence, without 
previous study examination. required know nothing 
subject evidence laid immediate 
decision. thought heat party would augmented delay. 
 
Speaker called Mr. Lincoln order mention 
made party 
 
Mr. said spoken debate. Mr. Lincoln asked 
caused Mr. Lincoln concluded urging 
question would decided better hereafter, 
thought less heat excitement. 
 
debate, Lincoln 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
December 4, 1840. 
 
Illinois House Representatives, December 4, 1840, House 
Committee Whole bill providing payment interest 
State Lincoln moved strike body amendments 
bill, insert lieu thereof amendment substance 
governor authorized issue bonds payment 
interest; called taxes 
Congress lands become irrevocably set 
aside devoted fund payment interest bonds. Mr. 
Lincoln went reasons appeared render plan 
preferable State bonds. course 
could get along till next meeting Legislature, 
great importance. objection might urged 
interest bonds could replied bonds 
could, much could these, offered perfect security, fund 
irrevocably set aside provide another 
paying interest, would reply 
rapid growth increase resources great 
ratio difficulty; object best 
could done present emergency. agreed faith 
State must plan appeared preferable 
bonds, would redeemed 
interest paid. done, could therefore 
had, turning matter every way, devised measure, 
would carry us till next Legislature. 
 
(Mr. Lincoln spoke length, advocating 
 
Lincoln advocated measure, December 11, 1840. 
 
December 12, 1840, thought permanent provision ought 
made bonds satisfied taxation 
revenue could connected now. 
 
 
 
 
1841 
 
 
 
 
JOHN T. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 23, 1841 
 
DEAR miserable man living. feel 
equally distributed whole human family, would one 
cheerful face earth. Whether shall ever better, cannot 
awfully shall not. remain impossible. must die 
better, appears fear shall unable attend 
business here, change scene might help me. could 
myself, would rather remain home Judge write 
more. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE. 
 
January 23, 1841 
 
House Representatives January 23, discussing 
Illinois Michigan Mr. afraid 
would lose. 
 
Mr. thought danger that; Mr. Lincoln said 
examined see amount would probably needed. 
principal point mind this, nobody obliged 
take altogether voluntary part, 
apprehend fall hands take it. 
be, fall citizens 
section country. 
 
going extensive range country, 
confined chiefly vicinity Now, find 
representatives section country favor 
bill. 
 
propose protect interests, say Leave us 
take care willing run 
must suppose competent protect 
interests, fair let it. 
 
 
 
 
CIRCULAR WHIG COMMITTEE. 
 
February 9, 
 
Appeal People State Illinois. 
 
General Assembly, 
assembled November last, state public 
treasury, pecuniary embarrassments prevailing every department 
society, state public works, impending 
danger State, right expect 
representatives would lose time adopting 
measures avert threatened 
people, fearful apprehensions regard future 
prosperity State. expected spirit 
party would take lead councils State, make every 
interest bend expected party would 
assume entire control legislation, 
means offices State, substance people, 
party Neither could expected 
party spirit, however strong desires unreasonable 
demands, would passed Constitution, 
entered form formation 
judiciary system. 
 
early period session, measures adopted 
party take possession State, fill public 
offices party men, make every measure affecting interests 
people credit State operate 
party views. merits men measures therefore became 
subject discussion caucus, instead halls legislation, 
decisions made minority Legislature 
executed carried effect force party 
without regard whatever rights people interests 
State. Supreme Court State organized, judges 
according provisions Constitution, 
people never complained organization court; 
attempt ever made change department. Respect 
public opinion, regard rights liberties people, 
hitherto restrained spirit party attacks upon 
independence integrity judges 
continued office since decisions 
subject complaint among people; integrity 
court questioned, never supposed 
court ever permitted party prejudice party considerations 
operate upon decisions. court made consist four 
judges, Constitution two form 
business. thus people 
satisfied near sixteen years. law organized 
Supreme Court also established organized circuit courts 
held county State, five circuit judges 
appointed hold courts. Legislature abolished 
circuit courts, repealed judges office, required 
judges Supreme Court hold circuit courts. reasons 
assigned change were, first, business country 
could better attended four judges Supreme Court 
two sets and, second, state public treasury 
forbade employment unnecessary officers. circuit 
established north Illinois River, order meet wants 
people, circuit judge appointed hold courts 

 
system established throughout 
State, circuit judges appointed hold courts, judges 
Supreme Court relieved performance circuit court 
duties. change recommended acting governor 
State, General W. L. D. following 
 
"The augmented population State, number 
organized counties, well increase business all, 
long since convinced every one department 
government indispensable necessity alteration 
judiciary system, subject therefore recommended 
earnest patriotic consideration Legislature. present system 
never exempt serious weighty idea 
appealing circuit court judges Supreme Court 
recommended little hopes redress injured party below. 
duties too, may added, one half 
year, leaving small inadequate portion time required 
domestic purposes decisions 
Supreme Court, judicial monument legal learning 
talent ability court might otherwise entirely 
competent to." 
 
organization circuit courts people never 
complaints heard come 
large judges could 
business, Judges lately 

 
Whilst honor credit State demanded legislation upon 
subject public debt, unfinished public works, 
embarrassments people, judiciary stood upon basis 
required legislative action. Yet party power, 
every interest requiring legislative action, wholly 
disregarding rights, interests people, has, 
purpose providing places supplying 
large department 
government. Provision made election five party judges 
Supreme Court, four circuit judges, 
appointment party clerks half counties 
State. Men respect public opinion, acknowledged 
leaders party, avowed halls legislation 
change judiciary intended produce political results 
favorable party party friends. principles 
justice make way party interests, bonds social 
order rent order desperate faction may 
sustained expense people. change proposed 
judiciary supported upon grounds institutions 
country, entirely war rights liberties 
people, party could secure entire unanimity 
support, three Democrats Senate five House voting 
measure. unwilling see justice 
seats independent judges occupied tools 
declarations party leaders, selection party men 
judges, total disregard public adoption 
measure, prove conclusively object 
advancement highest interests State, 
party. 
 
cannot manner undertake point objections 
party present stated Council 
Revision upon returning bill, ask candid 
consideration. 
 
Believing independence judiciary destroyed, 
hereafter courts independent people, 
entirely dependent upon rights property 
liberty conscience longer regarded safe 
unconstitutional knowing 
remedy adopted consistently peace good order 
society, call upon avail opportunity 
and, next general election, vote convention 
people. 
 
   S. H. LITTLE, 
   E. D. BAKER, 
   J. J. HARDIN, 
   E. B. 
   A. LINCOLN, 
   J. 
 
   Committee behalf Whig members Legislature. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXTRACT PROTEST ILLINOIS LEGISLATURE 
 
February 26, 1841 
 
reasons thus presented, others less apparent, 
cannot assent passage bill, permit 
become law, without evidence 
protest 
violates great principles free government 
judiciary Legislature. (2) fatal blow independence 
judges constitutional term office. (3) 
measure asked for, wished for, people. greatly 
increase expense courts, else greatly 
(5) give courts political partisan character, 
thereby public confidence decisions. 
standing States world. party 
measure party purposes, practical good people 
possibly arise, may source 
 
well aware protest altogether 
majority body. blow already 
compelled stand by, ruin 
cause. 
 
members, among Abraham 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. CASE 
 
SPRINGFIELD June 19, 
 
DEAR highest state excitement week 
past community ever and, although public 
feeling somewhat curious affair aroused 
far even yet cleared would take 
paper give anything like full account it, therefore 
propose brief chief 
Archibald supposed Archibald Henry 
William supposed murdered him. three 
first, know, lives 
second, Henry, third, Warren 
County; supposed without family, 
made home Saturday evening, 29th May, 
Fisher William came 
stayed Monday three came Springfield 
joined Archibald 
evening supper Fisher next morning 
search made him; Tuesday, one o'clock 
P.M., William Henry started home without him. day two Henry 
one two neighbors came back again, 
disappearance papers. knowledge matter 
thus far general, dropped till 
10th instant, Keys received letter postmaster 
Warren County, William arrived home, telling 
mysterious improbable story disappearance 
induced community suppose disposed 
Keys made letter public, immediately set whole town 
adjoining county continued yesterday. mass 
people commenced search dead body, 
arrest Henry 
Warren arrest Monday last, Henry brought in, 
showed evident inclination knew Fisher 
dead, Arch. William killed him. said guessed 
body could found Spring road 
Away people swept like cut 
draw water 
went 
two days, and, all, dead 
body found. 
 
meantime sort found 
point, road leading woods past 
one leading past 
sign something size man 
dragged edge joined track 
carriage drawn one horse, shown 
led toward Spring Near 
Dr. Merryman found two which, long scientific 
examination, pronounced human term, 
says, includes within hair growing arms 
parts judged two 
ends showing 
operations. Thursday last 
brought William day Arch. 
arrested put Yesterday William put upon 
examining trial May Archibald Henry 
present. Logan, Baker, humble servant 
great many witnesses introduced 
shall mention whose testimony seemed important. 
first Captain swore William 
Henry left Springfield home Tuesday mentioned 
take direct know, leads 
followed street north got nearly 
new house, could see 
afterwards proved hour 
started, came street shop toward 
Dr. Merryman others swore stated 
carriage Henry 
introduced swore started 
home went north, stated, turned west 
met 
proceeded small distance placed 
watch announce approach one might happen 
way; William Arch. took road small 
distance edge saw 
lift body man it; moved 
carriage direction mill, 
something like hour, William returned carriage, 
without said put safe place; went 
somehow know exactly road close 
proceeded also stated time 
day William told Arch. killed Fisher evening 
before; way William knocking 
Arch. death. 
 
old man Warren, called Dr. introduced 
part defense. swore known Fisher several 
years; Fisher resided house long time two 
different built him, 
two three years ago 
Fisher serious hurt head bursting since 
subject continued bad health occasional 
mind. also stated last Tuesday, 
day arrested William (the home 
early part day, return, eleven o'clock, 
found Fisher house bed, apparently 
asked came Fisher said come 
Peoria, also told several places 
direction Peoria, showed time speaking 
know state 
stated two hours received note one 
friends, arrest, requesting go 
Springfield testify state 
health former times; immediately set off, calling two 
neighbors company, and, evening night, 
William County; 
refusing discharge upon statement, two neighbors 
returned came Springfield. question made 
whether doctor's story several 
postmaster wrote Keys, 
introduced sort swore 
knew doctor good character truth veracity, 
generally good character every way. 
 
testimony discharged, Arch. 
William expressing word manner entire confidence 
Fisher would found alive doctor's 
day purpose; 
Henry still protested power earth could ever show Fisher 
Thus stands curious affair. doctor's story 
first made public, amusing contemplate 
hear remarks actively 
search dead looked 
furiously Porter, swore always 
knew man dead, stirred inch hunt 
him; taken lead cutting 
wanted hang looked 
awfully seemed unrequited 
represented used laugh 
little home once, said damned bad 
much hanging all. 
 
commenced letter yesterday, since received 
stick promise come Nothing new 
except written. seen since last 
going soon mail letter. 
 
forever, LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
STATEMENT 
 
June 25, 1841 
 
charged public 
late United States marshal district Illinois, used 
office political effect, appointment 
taking census year 1840, we, called 
upon Mr. examine papers possession relative 
appointments, ascertain correctness 
charge. accompanied Mr. room, 
examined matter fully could means afforded us. 
sources information bearing subject submitted 
us letters, etc., recommending opposing various 
appointments made, Mr. verbal statements concerning 
same. letters, etc., appears instances 
appointments made accordance recommendations leading 
Whigs, opposition leading among 
instances appointments Scott, Madison, Lawrence 
According Mr. statement seventy-six 
appointments Democrats, eleven Whigs, 
eleven unknown politics. 
 
chief ground complaint Mr. understood 
it, appointment many Democratic candidates 
Legislature, thus giving decided advantage 
Whig consequently attention directed rather 
particularly point. found many 
appointments, among 
Washington, 
learn one instance Whig candidate 
Legislature written evidence 
us showing us time appointments made; Mr. 
stated one exception made 
appointed became candidates Legislature, letters, etc., 
recommending bear date before, long before, 
appointed publicly announced 
 
give foregoing naked facts draw conclusions them. 
 
S. A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MISS MARY SLAVERY 
 
BLOOMINGTON, ILL., September 27, 
 
Miss Mary Speed, Louisville, 
 
way, fine example presented board boat 
contemplating effect condition upon human happiness. 
gentleman purchased twelve negroes different parts Kentucky, 
taking farm South. chained six 
six together. small iron around left each, 
main shorter one, convenient 
distance others, negroes together 
precisely like many upon condition 
separated forever scenes 
friends, fathers brothers many 
wives children, going perpetual 
slavery lash master 
other; yet amid 
circumstances, would think them, cheerful 
apparently happy creatures One, whose offence 
sold wife, played almost 
others played 
various day day. true 
wind shorn words, renders 
worst human conditions permits best 
nothing better return 
reached Springfield stayed one day, started tedious 
circuit am. remember going city, 
Kentucky, making failure it? 
Well, old got much week 
since torn out, bringing bit 
consequence mouth neither 
talk 
 
sincere friend, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. MARRIAGE 
 
January 30, 1842. 
 
DEAR know do, deepest solicitude 
success enterprise engaged in, adopt 
last method adopt aid you, case (which God 
shall need place going say paper 
say better way could word mouth, but, 
say part, likely would forget 
time might good. think 
reasonable feel badly time 
final consummation purpose, intended shall read 
time. say reasonable feel 
badly yet, three special causes added general 
one shall mention. 
 
general cause is, naturally nervous 
say seen personally, 
told concerning mother various times, concerning 
brother William time wife died. first special cause 
bad weather experience 
clearly proves severe second 
absence business conversation friends, might divert 
mind, give occasional rest intensity thought 
sometimes wear idea turn 
death. third rapid near approach 
crisis thoughts feelings 
 
causes shall escape go 
without another shall happily 
deceived. If, contrary, shall, expect 
agonized let me, 
reason speak judgment subject, beseech ascribe 
causes mentioned, false ruinous 
suggestion 
 
"But," say, "do causes apply every one engaged 
like means. particular greater 
less extent, perhaps apply general 
key 
particular ones, without would utterly 
pertain you, pertain one 
thousand. painful difference 
mass world 
 
know painful point times 
apprehension love should. 
came court her? thought 
it, given reason expect it? 
reason make court Ann Todd, 
least twenty others think, would apply 
greater force her? court Why, 
know none. say reasoned it. 
mean that? found unable reason 
it? think, partly form purpose, 
first time ever saw heard her? 
reason early nothing time 
reason work upon. Whether moral, amiable, 
even good character, not, could know, 
perhaps, might infer last company found in. 
 
could know personal appearance 
these, impress all, impress heart, 
head. 
 
Say heavenly black eyes whole basis 
early reasoning subject? 
go take way 
back, purpose get see again, return 
evening take trip express earthly 
consideration would take find you, 
giving 
therefore cannot bring home feelings. 
 
shall anxious shall want write every 
mail. 
 
friend, LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, February 3, 1842. 
 
DEAR letter 25th January came hand to-day. 
well know feel much 
yours, know them; yet assure much hurt 
wrote bad feeling time 
less capable ever, 
less friend ever, hope believe 
present anxiety distress health life 
must forever doubts know 
sometimes felt truth affection her. 
forever removed (and almost feel 
Almighty sent present affliction expressly 
surely nothing come fill 
measure love surely painful 
prepared expect happen 
all, know must Painful are, 
she, fear, destined early 
grave, indeed great consolation know well 
prepared meet it. religion, much, 
venture prize hope melancholy 
early death well even hope 
ere reaches returned improved still 
improving health, met her, forgotten 
past present. would say 
could, seems said enough. really appears 
ought sorrow, 
evidence affection her. Why, Speed, 
love although might wish death, would 
certainly resigned it. Perhaps point longer 
question you, upon rude 
upon feelings. so, must pardon me. know 
hell suffered point, tender upon it. 
know mean wrong. quite clear since 
left, even better along fall. seen 
once. seemed said nothing 
spoke of. 
 
Old Uncle dead, said evening Uncle 
live. This, believe, news, enough 
unless better. Write immediately receipt 
this. 
 
friend, ever, LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, February 13, 1842. 
 
DEAR 1st instant came hand three four days 
ago. shall reach you, husband 
several days. know desire 
never cease know anything. always 
hereafter ground never consequently, 
advice needed, might advise wrong. fondly hope, however, 
never need comfort abroad. 
mistaken this, pleasure still accompanied 
painful times, still let urge you, ever 
done, remember, depth even agony 
shortly feel well again. fully convinced 
love ardently capable ever happy 
presence, intense anxiety health, 
nothing else, would place beyond dispute mind. 
think probable fail occasionally 
get firmly guarded trouble 
forever. think, you, case mind exactly 
right, would avoid would immediately engage 
business, go making it, would 
thing. went even sufficient 
excite alarm present, safe beyond 
question, two three months, say most, 
men. 
 
would desire give particular respects perhaps 
wish know received this, lest 
desire see it. Make write answer last letter 
rate would set great value upon note letter her. 
Write whenever forever, A. LINCOLN. P. 
quite man since left. 
 
 
 
 
G. B. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., Feb. 16, 1842. 
 
G. B. 
 
10th duly received. Judge Logan 
business together now, willing attend cases 
terms, willing attend case prepare 
send us shall sent 
advance, know safe. takes cost 
start upon, is, two publishers 
papers. Judge Logan thinks take balance carry 
case through. must advanced time time services 
performed, officers act know 
whether admitted attorney Federal court 
absence not; material, business done 

 
Thinking may aid little, send one blank forms 
It, see, framed sworn Federal 
court and, cases, far changed 
sworn clerk circuit court; certificate 
must accompanied official too, must 
attended to. sure contain names, 
amounts due each, names, 
amounts also property 
 
Also sure signed well 
Publication made one paper, 
one nearest residence Write us case 
last advertisement whether 
paper. 
 
believe said everything advantage. 
friend ever, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GEORGE E. YOUTH 
 
February 22, 1842. 
 
never encourage especially got 
bad memory, worst enemy fellow have. fact truth 
friend, matter circumstances are. 
Notwithstanding boy, inclined 
suggest little prudence part. see 
sudden announcement Uncle Andrew 
success might possibly prevent passing 
severe physical examination subjected order 
enter Military see like perfect 
soldier credited dear old broken 
etc. think might wise hand letter 
good uncle comfortable 
dinner, watch effect top 
 
told folks Springfield anniversary 
birth whose name, mightiest cause civil liberty, 
still mightiest cause moral mention solemn 
one victory ever call 
complete one one slave 
one face God's green earth. victory. 
 
Now, boy, march, don't go forget old maxim "one 
drop honey flies 
smoke 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS SPRINGFIELD TEMPERANCE SOCIETY, 
 
FEBRUARY 22, 1842. 
 
Although temperance cause progress near twenty 
years, apparent crowned 
degree success hitherto 
 
list friends daily additions 
thousands. cause seems suddenly transformed 
cold abstract theory living, powerful 
going forth 
great daily temple 
worship long 
performed, human sacrifices long made, 
daily deserted. triumph fame 
hill hill, sea sea, land land, 
calling millions standard 
 
new splendid success heartily success 
much greater heretofore doubtless owing rational 
would continue, shall well inquire 
causes are. 
 
warfare heretofore demon somehow 
Either champions engaged tactics 
adopted proper. champions 
part lawyers, hired 
mass mankind want term 
least, fatal success. 
supposed sympathy feeling interest 
persons object convince 
 
again, common easy ascribe motives men 
classes profess act upon. 
said, advocates temperance desires 
union Church State; lawyer pride vanity 
hearing speak; hired agent one 
long known victim 
bound him, appears neighbors 
right redeemed specimen humanity, stands 
up, tears joy trembling eyes, tell 
endured, endured naked 
children, fed wife long weighed 
broken heart, restored health, 
renewed easily done, 
resolved done; simple logic 
eloquence human feelings cannot 
say desires union Church State, church 
cannot say vain hearing speak, 
whole shows would gladly avoid speaking all; cannot 
say speaks pay, receives none, asks none. 
sincerity way sympathy would 
persuade example denied. 
 
judgment, battles new class champions 
late success perhaps But, 
champions wise 
system tactics seems 
not. much denunciation 
indulged in. think 
much nature man driven 
still less driven exclusively 
least driving submitted 
expense pecuniary interest burning 
told accents 
persuasion, addressed man 
brother, denunciation 
judge often together crimes 
life, face ere passes sentence 
death upon authors vice misery 
crime material 

houses persons 
good moral 
say, told this, way, wonderful 
slow acknowledge truth 
join ranks cry 
themselves. 
 
expected otherwise expected 
meet denunciation 
expect 
human nature, God's decree never reversed. 
 
conduct men designed persuasion, kind, 
persuasion, ever adopted. old true 
maxim "a drop honey flies 
men. would win man cause, first convince 
sincere friend. Therein drop honey 
heart, which, say will, great 
which, find little trouble 
convincing judgment justice cause, indeed 
cause really one. contrary, assume dictate 
judgment, command action, mark one 
retreat within himself, close 
head though cause naked truth itself, 
transformed heaviest harder 
steel made, though throw 
force shall able pierce 
penetrate hard man, 
must understood would lead him, even 
best 
 
point greatly temperance advocates 
former times. desire convince persuade 
old friends know 
even worst men; know generally kind, generous, 
even beyond example sober 
practical 
generous zeal mere incapable 
feeling. charity possess hearts 
abundance hearts tongues give 
actions words 
spirit speak act, heard 
temper audience, 
good cause said 
well 
Let us see. inquired period time use 
important know. 
sufficient that, us inhabit world, practice 
drinking old world is, seen 
one long seen other. us 
reached years maturity first opened eyes upon 
stage existence, found recognized 
used repudiated commonly entered 
first draught infant last draught dying 
man. pocket 
constantly found. 
this, that, government provided soldiers 
rolling 
anywhere without positively So, too, 
everywhere respectable article 
making regarded honorable could 
make Large small 
everywhere earthly 
goods owners Wagons drew town 
boats bore winds nation 
nation; bought sold it, 
precisely feelings part 
felt selling buying 
real life. Universal public opinion 
tolerated recognized adopted use. 
 
true even known acknowledged many 
greatly injured it; none seemed think injury arose 
use bad thing, abuse good thing. 
victims 
failing 
treated crime, even If, 
then, saying true, wonderful 
think act thought acted twenty years 
despise so? universal 
sense mankind subject argument, least 
influence, easily success argument favor 
existence Providence mainly depends upon 
men ought justice denounced yielding 
case, giving slowly, especially 
interest, fixed burning 
 
Another error, seems me, old fell, 
position habitual utterly 
therefore must turned damned without remedy order 
grace temperance might then, 
mankind hundreds years 
thing humanity, 
it, never ever enthusiasm 
popular cause. could love man taught could hear 
heart could throw open it, 
generous man could adopt could mix blood. 
looked like throwing fathers brothers 
boat security, 
shrank manifest thing. besides this, 
benefits effected system 
point time engage many 
induced labor exclusively posterity, none 
done nothing us; and, 
may, practically shall little it, unless 
made think time something ourselves. 
 
ignorance human nature exhibit ask expect 
whole community rise labor happiness 
others, shall majority 
community take pains whatever secure eternal 
welfare distant Great distance either time 
space wonderful power render human mind. 
Pleasures pains endured, shall dead 
gone little regarded even cases, much less 
cases others. Still, addition something 
promises good evil great way 
render whole subject connected easily turned 
"Better lay 
don't you'll pay day "Be powers, 
credit long I'll take another 
 
system habitual 
hopeless ruin adopt enlarged 
go present well future good. labor 
living, well hereafter live. teach hope 
none. applying cause, deny doctrine 

lamp holds may 
And, matter profound they, 
experiment upon experiment example upon example, prove maxim 
less true one case other. every hand 
behold yesterday chief chief 
cause. cast ones, 
unfortunate like poor possessed 
redeemed long lonely 
ends earth great things done 
them. 
 
new champions new system tactics late 
success mainly must mainly look final 
consummation. ball rolling gloriously on, none 
able increase speed add 
though letters, task none 
well fit work taught 
true gulf would teach 
others means escape. passed prison wall 
others long declared shall dare 
opinions mode 
 
true, suffered 
personally, powerful 
efficient instruments push ultimate success, 
follow suffered part left 
perform. Whether world would vastly 
total final seems 
open question. Three fourths mankind confess 
affirmative and, believe, rest acknowledge 

 
Ought any, then, refuse aid good good 
whole Shall cannot much reason excused 
"But," says one, "what good signing 
never even without question already 
asked answered million times. Let answered 
more. man suddenly way break 
use indulged long course years 
appetite grown ten stronger 
natural appetite be, requires 
powerful moral effort. needs every moral 
support influence possibly brought aid thrown 
around him. so, every moral taken 
whatever argument might rise mind 
eyes around him, able see 
respects, kindly anxiously 
pointing none back former miserable 

 
said men think act themselves; 
none spirits anything else neighbors do; 
moral influence powerful contended for. Let us 
examine this. Let ask man could maintain position 
compensation accept go church Sunday 
sit wife's upon 
I'll not? would nothing 
it, nothing nothing not? 
would something it? 
influence influence fashion 
influence people's actions 
strong inclination us feels see neighbors 
do? influence fashion confined particular thing 
class strong one subject another. Let us 
make withhold names temperance cause 
wear church, instances 
rare one case other. 
 
"But," say some, "we shall acknowledge 
joining society, whatever 
influence might be." Surely Christian adhere objection. 
believe take 
form man, die 
death surely refuse submission 
infinitely lesser perhaps 
salvation large, unfortunate class 
great. judgment 
us never fallen victims spared 
absence appetite mental moral superiority 
have. Indeed, believe take habitual class, 
heads hearts bear advantageous comparison 
class. seems ever proneness 
brilliant fall demon 
ever seems delighted blood genius 
one us call mind 
promising youth fallen sacrifice 
ever seems gone forth like Egyptian 
angel death, commissioned first, fairest born 
every family. Shall arrested 
arrest give aid shall excused 
not? Far around human breath ever blown keeps 
fathers, sons, friends 
moral death. living everywhere "Come sound 
moral may rise stand exceeding great 
"Come four O upon 
may live." relative revolutions shall 
estimated great amount human misery 
small amount indeed 
world shall ever seen. 
 
political revolution justly given 
us degree political freedom far exceeding nation 
earth. world found solution 
problem man govern himself. 
still grow 
universal liberty mankind. But, glorious results, 
past, present, come, evils too. breathed forth 
blood, long, long after, 
cry continued break sad silence 
price, inevitable price, paid 
blessings 
 
Turn temperance revolution. shall find stronger 
bondage slavery greater tyrant 
it, want disease sorrow 
none wounded 
feeling, none injured interest; even 
gradually never 
felt change, stand ready join others 
universal song noble cause 
political freedom, aid march cannot fail 
on, till every son earth shall drink rich 
perfect liberty. Happy day 
poisons matter 
mind, shall live move, world. 
Glorious fall reason, 
 
victory shall shall neither 
slave earth, proud title land 
may truly claim 
revolutions shall ended victory. nobly 
distinguished people shall planted 
maturity political moral freedom 
 
one hundred tenth anniversary birthday 
Washington; met day. Washington 
mightiest name earth long since mightiest cause civil 
liberty, still mightiest moral name eulogy 
expected. cannot be. add sun glory 
name Washington alike impossible. Let none attempt it. solemn 
pronounce name, naked leave 
shining on. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, February 25, 1842. 
 
DEAR 16th instant, announcing Miss Fanny 
"no one reached morning. 
way telling much happiness wish both, though 
believe conceive it. feel somewhat jealous 
exclusively concerned one another, shall 
forgotten acquaintance Miss Fanny (I call this, 
lest think speaking short 
reasonably hope long remembered still sure 
shall forget soon. Try cannot remind debt 
owes sure interfere prevent paying it. 
 
regret learn resolved return Illinois. 
shall without you. things seem 
arranged friends, 
them, sure lose them, pained 
loss. hope would make home here; 
right owe obligations ten thousand times 
sacred owe others, light let 
respected observed. natural desire remain 
friends. friends, however, could 
need would abundance here. 
 
Give kind Mr. family, particularly 
Miss also mother, brother, Ask little 
Davis town come again. 
finally, give Fanny double love sent me. 
Write believe 
 
forever, LINCOLN. 
 
P. S. Poor gone last. died day 
morning. say loath 
 
L. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. MARRIAGE CONCERNS 
 
SPRINGFIELD, February 
 
DEAR received 12th written day went 
place, days since, delayed answering till 
receive promised one came last night. 
opened letter intense anxiety much so, 
that, although turned better expected, hardly yet, 
distance ten hours, become calm. 
 
tell you, Speed, (for 
worst sort time received 
letter Saturday, one Wednesday never come, 
yet come, more, perfectly clear, 
tone much or, think 
term less wrote 
wrote last one before. obviously improved 
time much fancied would grown worse. say 
something horrible still you. 
say three months now, 
get steady now, whole trouble forever. 
become impatient even slow becoming 
say, much fear 
much never Well, shall not, dare swear 
fault wife. doubt 
peculiar dream dreams 
far exceeding anything earthly Far short 
dreams may be, woman could realize 
could contemplate 
would appear ridiculous one 
moment think unhappy her. old father 
used saying "If make bad bargain, 
occurs bargain closed 
possibly called bad one, certainly pleasant one 
applying maxim fancy effort picture. 
 
write another letter, this, show her, 
desires it. would think perhaps, 
tell received letters me, or, telling 
do, refuse let see them. close this, entertaining confident 
hope every successive letter shall (which 
pray may few, far may show possessing 
steady hand cheerful heart last preceding it. ever, 
friend, LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 27, 
 
DEAR 10th instant received three four days 
since. know sincere tell pleasure contents 
gave was, is, farm matter, 
sympathy you. ever expect have, 
consequently studied subject enough much interested 
it. say glad satisfied pleased 
it. subject, intense interest 
whether joy sorrow, never power withhold sympathy 
you. cannot told joy hear 
say happier ever expected be." much know 
enough. know well suppose expectations not, 
least, sometimes reality all, 
say, Enough, dear going beyond truth tell 
short space took read last letter gave 
pleasure total sum enjoyed since fatal 1st 
January, Since seems entirely 
happy, idea one still unhappy 
make so. still soul. cannot 
even wishing happy otherwise. 
accompanied large party railroad cars 
last Monday, return spoke, heard it, 
enjoyed trip God that. 
 
know vigilance watched ever since 
commencement although almost confident 
cannot forbear say think even yet 
possible spirits flag leave 
should, don't fail remember cannot long remain so. One 
thing tell know glad 
scrutinized feelings well could, 
fully convinced far happier last 
fifteen months past. 
 
see last Sangamon made temperance 
speech 22d February, claim Fanny shall 
read act charity me; cannot learn anybody else 
read it, likely to. Fortunately long, 
shall deem sufficient compliance request one 
reads it. 
 
matter, necessary say 
court since left, next to-morrow 
morning, suppose cannot fail get judgment. 
 
wish would learn would take, 
discharge trouble at, take business 
hands give somebody else. impossible collect 
money claim now; although know 
man, declare almost patience Mr. 
seems like writes letters 
himself, gets everybody else Louisville vicinity 
constantly writing us claim. always said 
Mr. clever fellow, sorry cannot 
seem ought know interested 
collect claim, therefore would could. 
 
neither say would thank 
transfer business other, without compensation 
done, provided see court cost paid, 

 
sweet inclosed came safely hand, 
flat, crumbled dust first attempt 
handle it. place 
letter, mean preserve cherish sake 
procured renewed good wishes particular, 
generally relations know me. 
 
ever, 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, July 4, 1842. 
 
DEAR 16th June received day two 
since. Louisville till speak 
great time elapsed since wrote you. Let explain that. 
letter reached day two started 
gone five six got letters weeks 
Butler started country. thought scarcely worth 
write news could would tell 
return told would write soon, waited 
letter. advice, surely 
know better that. know do, therefore labor 
convince you. True, subject painful me; 
silence, silence world, make forget it. 
acknowledge correctness advice too; resolve 
one thing other, must gain confidence 
ability keep resolves made. ability know 
chief 
know well. yet it; 
do, cannot trust matter much importance. 
believe understood case time well 
understand afterward, aid would given 
clear, afford sufficient 
confidence begin like again. 
 
make kind acknowledgment obligations 
present happiness. pleased thousand 
times pleased know enjoy degree happiness 
worthy truth is, sure 
merit part took difficulty; drawn 
fate. would could done less did. always 
believe God made one instruments 
bringing Fanny together, union doubt 
Whatever designs yet. still, 
see salvation text now. If, say, 
told Fanny all, objection seeing 
letter, reference friend let seeing 
depend upon whether ever known anything 
not, let her. 
 
think come Kentucky poor make 
little world, drop back month 
much gain year's like visit again. 
like see absent 
there, though suppose would run away hear 
coming. 
 
respects esteem friends there, and, 
love 
 
Ever yours, 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER LOST 
 
Article written Lincoln Sangamon Journal ridicule James 
Shields, who, State Auditor, declined receive State Bank notes 
payment letter come poor 
widow who, though supplied State Bank paper, could obtain 
receipt tax bill. This, another subsequent letter Mary 
Todd, brought 
 
 
 
 
LOST 
 
August 27, 1842. 
 
DEAR Mr. 
 
see printed long letter sent spell ago. 'm quite 
encouraged it, can't keep writing again. think 
printing letters good thing give 
benefit known world, give world 
advantage knowing what's going Lost give 
paper comes another. Yesterday 
afternoon hurried dinner stepped 
neighbor see wife well 
expected, hear called Well, got 
turned round corner log was, setting 
reading "How you, says I. 
started heard me, hadn't seen before. says he, 
"I 'm mad Aunt "What about?" says 
hair right None ain't 
woman Lost says he; 
"what mischief about?" began see running 
wrong says I, guess mistaken 
little, that's all. mad about?" 
 
says he, "I've ever since getting 
river raise State Bank paper enough pay 
tax year little school debt now, got 
it, open Extra Register, expecting find full 
Democratic when, 
find set calling officers 
State, forbidden tax school commissioners 
receive State paper all; dead hands. don't 
believe I've got fetch ready cash enough pay 
taxes school 
 
good deal myself; first 
heard proclamation, old man pretty much 
fix stood moment staring one another without 
knowing say. last says I, "Mr. let look 
handed me, read proclamation over. 
 
"There now," says he, "did ever see piece 
that?" saw good saying 
things, would argue little 
contrary side, make spell could. says I, 
looking dignified thoughtful could, "it seems pretty 
sure, raise silver there's none 
then, see, danger ain't 
 
says "I defy Daniel Webster, defy King 
defy defy even you, Aunt 
show people lose anything paying taxes State 

 
"Well," says I, "you see officers State say it, 
set men. says I, "I guess mistaken 
proclamation says. don't say people lose 
anything paper money taken says 
danger though tolerable plain 
people can't lose paying taxes something get easier 
instead pay though it's 
plain State can't lose taking State Bank paper, however low 
may be, owes bank whole revenue, 
pay paper debt, dollar 
danger loss know, can't 
get along without officers State." 
 
officers says he; "that's Whigs always 

 
"Now, don't swear so, says I, "you know belong 
hurts 
 
pardon, Aunt says he; "but say it's enough make 
Dr. tax pay nothing 
may get two thousand year, Shields twenty-four 
hundred year, sixteen hundred year, 
without taking State paper. Yes, it's 
plain enough officers State mean 
actually lost fifteen hundred dollars three 
thousand two let 
treasury, compelled take State paper. Wonder 
don't proclamation long, commanding us make 
loss Wash 
 
went till breath run out, 
couldn't think anything say then, begun look 
paper again. here's another proclamation, something like 
it." 
 
says "and whose egg it, 
 
looked bottom it, read "Your obedient servant, 
James Shields, 
 
says "one three fellows again. Well read it, 
let's hear it." 
 
read till came says, "The object measure 
suspend collection revenue current 
 
"Now says he; "that's lie don't want 
hear it." 
 
"Oh, maybe not," says I. 
 
"I say Suspend 
taken oaths make dare end it? 
anything law requiring 
bidding James 
 
"Will greedy satisfied 
instead them, venture obey him? 
would discover time 
came taking 
 
"And suppose people attempt refusing 
then? would horses 
like, sell highest silver hand, without 
Why, Shields didn't believe story himself; 
never meant truth. true, writ 
till five days n't 
sign well Answer that, Aunt say it's 
lie, well told one that. like 
Shields fool well truth 
question; getting good, bright, lie him, 
might well try strike fire stick 
it, it's Whig 
 
"A Whig 
 
"Yes, Whig it's like everything British Whigs 
do. First they'll they'll tell lie hide 
it. don't care plain lie is; think 
sort one ignorant 
call 
 
"Why, don't mean say Shields 
 
"Yes, do." 
 
"Why, look proclamation Democratic paper, 
call it." 
 
"I know it; that? printed let us Democrats 
see Whigs 
 
"Well, Shields mean Democratic 
State." 
 
"So is, Tyler appointed office." 
 
appointed him?" 
 
(if must Tyler appointed him; or, n't 
him, old Harrison, that's one. tell you, Aunt 
there's mistake Why, looks 
shows it; everything shows it: 
could tell seed Springfield 
last sort one night among 
called fair. town there, 
handsome married women, trying look 
like tied tight 
like n't yet, wanted 
pretty bad. around house 
ten thousand 
little sell 'em fellows 
would n't let Democrats 
in, fear they'd disgust little 
dirty floor. looked window, 
fellow Shields air, without earthly 
like lock 
 
"He paying money one, one, one, 
great loss n't silver instead State 
sweet distress seemed 
agony soul, spoke 
cannot marry all. well know 
much do, remember, fault 
handsome 
 
"As last expressed exquisite face, 
seized hold one hands, held 
quarter hour. good says myself, 
one Democratic Lost way 
get brass pin let would 
tell you, Aunt he's Whig, 
nobody Whig could make 
 
"Well," says I, is; but, is, 'm mistaken worst 
sort. Maybe so, maybe so; but, am, I'll suffer it; I'll 
Democrat turns Shields Whig, shall 
Whig turns 
 
"A bargain, says he; "but find out?" 
 
says I, write 
 
says he; "and turn 
Shields Democrat, never 
 

 
"What want, 
 
"Do get everlasting time, bring 
crying drink 
 
"Let then; may well die water taxed death 
officers State." 
 
run get water, though, like hadn't saying 
anything he's fellow, all, 
get foundation him. 
 
walked house, and, "Why, says I, "I declare like 
forgot 
 
"Oh, says she, "when body can't help themselves, everybody soon 
forgets but, thank day to-morrow shall well 
enough pen contrary 
thanks 
 
"Good evening, says I, seed mad 
making neglect long. 
 
now, Mr. sure let us know next paper 
whether Shields Whig don't care 
myself, know well enough want convince 
may good let him, others like him, know 
officers State are. may help send present 
set fill places 
men work less pay, take fewer 
it. ain't sensible think 
men get us trouble change course; yet it's pretty 
plain change better made, it's long 
either us left 
tail 
 
truly, 
 

 
 
 
 
INVITATION HENRY 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., 29, 1842. 
 
HON. HENRY CLAY, Lexington, 
 
DEAR hear visit Indianapolis, Indiana, 5th 
October next. information correct hope 
deny us pleasure seeing State. aware 
toil necessarily incident journey one are; 
already determined do, 
toil would greatly augmented extending journey 
capital. season year favorable good roads, 
pleasant although cannot believe would 
highly gratified visit pleasure 
would give us thousands beyond question. 
never visited Illinois, least portion it; 
yield request, promise reception shall 
worthy man turned hopes great 
suffering nation. 
 
Please inform us earliest convenience whether may expect you. 
 
respectfully obedient servants, 
 
   A. G. HENRY, A. T. 
   C. A. LINCOLN, 
   G. M. 
   P. A. J. M. 
   F. N. 
   Executive Committee 
 
answer, September 6, 
 
 
 
 
CORRESPONDENCE 
 
September 17, 1842. 
 
LINCOLN, regret absence public business 
compelled postpone matter private consideration little 
longer could necessary, however, 
account Quincy business 
would admit delay. state briefly reasons 
communication, disagreeable nature 
hoped avoid difficulty one 
Springfield residing there, endeavoring conduct 
way amongst political friends opponents escape 
necessity any. Whilst thus giving 
become object personal 
capable submitting to, would prove worthy 
whole it. 
 
two three last numbers Sangamon articles 
personal nature calculated degrade made 
appearance. informed editor paper, 
medium friend General 
author information 
become means object secret 
take trouble inquiring reason this; 
take liberty requiring full, 
absolute retraction offensive used 
communications, relation private character standing 
man, apology conveyed them. 
 
may prevent consequences one regret myself. 
 
obedient servant, SHIELDS. 
 
 
 
 
J. SHIELDS. 
 
September 17, 
 
SHIELDS, note to-day handed General 
note say informed, 
medium editor author certain 
articles paper deem personally you; 
without inquire whether really author, point 
offensive them, demand retraction 
proceed hint consequences. 
 
Now, sir, much assumption facts much 
menace consequences, cannot submit answer note 
have, add consequences suppose 
allude would matter great regret possibly could 
you. 
 
Respectfully, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. LINCOLN SHIELDS 
 
September 17, 1842. 
 
LINCOLN, reply note date, intimate 
assume facts menace consequences, cannot submit 
answer further. now, sir, desire it, little 
particular. editor Sangamon Journal gave 
understand author article 
think, paper 2d September instant, headed "The Lost 
signed would therefore take 
liberty asking whether author said article, 
signature appeared late 
numbers paper. so, repeat request absolute 
retraction offensive contained therein relation 
private character author 
articles, denial say further, 
intention menace, justice. 
 
obedient servant, SHIELDS. 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM INSTRUCTIONS E. H. 
 
Lincoln's Second, 
 
September 19, 1842. 
 
case Whitesides shall wish adjust affair without 
difficulty, let know present papers 
withdrawn, note Mr. Shields asking know author 
articles asking shall make 
satisfaction author, without menace, 
satisfaction shall be, pledge made 
following answer shall 
 
"I write letter appeared Journal 
2d instant, form 
article alluding you. wrote wholly political 
intention injuring personal private character standing 
man think, think, 
article could produce produced effect you; 
anticipated effect would forborne write it. 
add conduct toward me, far know, always 
personal you, 
cause 
 
done, leave arrange shall 
shall nothing like done, 
fight 
 
First. Cavalry largest size, precisely 
equal respects, used cavalry company 

 
Second. plank ten feet long, nine twelve inches 
firmly fixed ground, line 
us, neither pass foot upon life. 
Next line drawn ground either side said plank 
parallel it, distance whole length sword 
three feet additional passing 
line either party fight shall deemed surrender 
contest. 
 
Third. Thursday evening five o'clock, get so; 
case greater distance time Friday evening 
five o'clock. 
 
Fourth. Within three miles Alton, opposite side 
river, particular spot agreed you. 
 
preliminary details coming within rules liberty 
make case 
pass beyond limits. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, October 4, 1842. 
 
DEAR heard Shields, 
inform business still city. Day 
yesterday Shields Butler, accepted, proposed 
fighting next morning Bob one hundred 
distance, second, said 
"No," law. Thus ended No. 2. Yesterday Whitesides 
chose consider Dr. sent kind 
inviting meet House 
St. Louis next settle difficulty. Merryman made 
friend, sent Whitesides note, inquiring know meant 
note so, would, according 
law case made provided, terms meeting. 
Whitesides returned answer Merryman would meet 
House desired, would him. Merryman replied 
note denied right dictate time place, 
would waive question time, meet 
Louisiana, Missouri. Upon presenting note Whitesides 
stating verbally declined receiving it, saying 
business St. Louis, near Louisiana. Merryman 
directed notify Whitesides publish 
correspondence them, comments thought fit. 
did. Thus stood last night. morning 
friend Shields, new trial, ground 
mistaken proposition meet Louisiana, 
Missouri, thinking State Louisiana. Merryman 
at, preparing town 
street fight somewhat 
 
began letter writing, 
say something subject know infinite 
solicitude me. immense sufferings endured first days 
September till middle February never tried conceal 
me, well understood. husband lovely 
woman nearly eight months. happier day 
married well know, without could living. 
word it, too, returning spirits 
manifested want ask close question, "Are 
feeling well judgment glad married 
anybody would question, 
know pardon me. Please answer 
quickly, impatient know. sent love Fanny 
fear getting tired it. However, venture tender 
again. 
 
forever, 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JAMES S. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November 2, 1842. 
 
S. 
 
Owing received till 
moment. Judge Logan willing attend business 
Supreme Court may send us. fees, impossible 
establish rule apply all, even great many cases. 
believe never accused unreasonable 
would always easily satisfied, provided could 
see whatever fees earn distance, paid 
before, noticed, never hear work done. We, 
therefore, growing little sensitive point. 
 
etc., 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
RESOLUTIONS WHIG MEETING SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, MARCH 1, 1843. 
 
object meeting stated Mr. Lincoln Springfield, 
offered following resolutions, unanimously 
 
Resolved, tariff duties imported producing 
sufficient revenue payment necessary expenditures 
National Government, adjusted protect American industry, 
necessary prosperity American people. 
 
Resolved, opposed direct taxation support 
National Government. 
 
Resolved, national bank, properly highly necessary 
proper establishment maintenance sound currency, 
cheap safe public 

 
Resolved, distribution proceeds sales 
public lands, upon principles Mr. Clay's bill, accords 
best interests nation, particularly State 
Illinois. 
 
Resolved, recommend Whigs Congressional district 
State nominate support approaching election 
candidate principles, regardless chances success. 
 
Resolved, recommend Whigs portions State 
adopt rigidly adhere convention system nominating 

 
Resolved, recommend Whigs Congressional district 
hold district convention first Monday May next, 
composed number delegates county equal double 
number representatives General Assembly, provided, 
county shall least one Said delegates 
chosen primary meetings Whigs, times places 
respective counties may see fit. Said district conventions 
nominate one candidate Congress, one delegate 
national convention purpose nominating candidates 
President Vice-President United States. seven delegates 
nominated national convention power add two delegates 
number, fill 
 
Resolved, A. T. S. T. Logan, A. Lincoln appointed 
committee prepare address people State. 
 
Resolved, N. W. A. G. Henry, James H. Matheny, John 
C. James C. Conkling appointed Whig Central State 
Committee, authority fill vacancy may occur 
committee. 
 
 
 
 
CIRCULAR WHIG COMMITTEE. 
 
Address People Illinois. 
 
resolution meeting Whigs 
State Springfield, we, appointed 
prepare address you. performance task 

 
Several resolutions adopted chief object 
address show briefly reasons 
 
first resolutions declares tariff duties upon foreign 
producing sufficient revenue support 
General Government, adjusted protect American industry, 
necessary prosperity American people; 
second declares direct taxation national revenue 
two resolutions kindred nature, 
therefore proper convenient considered together. question 
protection subject entirely broad 
pages only, together several subjects. point 
therefore content giving following extracts 
writings Mr. Jefferson, General Jackson, speech Mr. 

 
"To independent life, must 
ourselves. must place side 
grand inquiry is, Shall make 
go without foreign He, 
therefore, domestic manufactures must 
us either dependence foreign nation, 
live like wild one 
experience taught manufactures necessary 
independence Letter Mr. Jefferson 
Benjamin 
 
"I ask, real situation 
American farmer market surplus Except cotton, 
neither foreign home clearly 
market home abroad, much 
labor employed Common sense points 
Take agriculture six hundred thousand men, women, 
children, give market 
Europe short, long subject 
policy British time become little 
instead laborers 
England, feed own; else short time, continuing 
present policy, shall rendered 
Jackson's Letter Dr. 
 
"When manufactures grown certain soon 
be, fostering care government, farmer find 
ready market surplus produce, equal 
certain cheap supply prosperity 
every class Speech Hon. J. 
C. Calhoun 
 
question revenue briefly consider. several 
years past revenues government 
expenditures, consequently loan sometimes direct 
sometimes indirect form, resorted to. means 
new national debt still growing us 
fearful reasonably 
expected time war. state things produced 
prevailing either increase tariff resort 
direct taxation. one must come. Coming expenditures 
must present debt must money cannot always 
borrowed objects. system loans temporary 
nature, must soon system ruinous 
one must soon fail leave us 
individual undertakes live soon finds original 
means interest, and, next, one left borrow from, 
must government. 
 
repeat, then, tariff sufficient revenue, direct 
must soon resorted to; and, indeed, believe alternative 
denied one. system shall 
theory, admit propriety tariff sufficient 
revenue, even practice vote 
others boldly advocate direct taxation. therefore, 
boldly advocate direct 
nearly make exceptions adopt tariff, 
think injustice class advocates 
direct taxation. Indeed, believe open 
avowal system till assure people 
tolerate it. Let us, then, briefly compare two 
tariff cheaper system, duties, collected 
large commercial points, require comparatively 
officers system land 
must literally covered going forth 
like Egyptian every grass 
green thing. And, again, tariff system whole revenue 
paid foreign chiefly 
life. system man contents 
live upon products country pays nothing 
all. surely country extensive enough, products 
abundant varied enough, answer real wants people. 
short, system revenue falls almost entirely 
wealthy few, substantial laboring many 
live home, upon home products, go entirely free. 
system none escape. However strictly citizen may 
exclude foreign fine 
rich golden 
possession house, 
perpetually views 
leave determined whether opponents 
truly democratic subject. 
 
third resolution declares necessity propriety national 
bank. last fifty years much said written 
constitutionality expediency institution, 
could hope improve least former discussions 
subject, undertake it. We, therefore, upon question 
constitutionality content facts 
first national bank established chiefly men formed 
Constitution, time instrument two years old, 
receiving sanction, President, immortal Washington; 
second received sanction, President, Mr. Madison, 
common consent awarded proud title 
subsequently sanction Supreme Court, 
enlightened judicial tribunal world. Upon question 
expediency, ask examine history times 
existence two banks, compare times 
miserable present. 
 
fourth resolution declares expediency Mr. Clay's land bill. 
Much often used constitutionality 
measure. place, attempting answer it, 
simply because, opinion, urge party 
zeal resolved see acknowledge truth. question 
expediency, least far Illinois concerned, seems us 
bill receive large sum 
money, part otherwise precise annual sum 
cannot known doubtless different years. 
Still something know last year almost 
pecuniary amounted forty thousand 
dollars. annual midst almost 
difficulties, days severest necessity, political 
opponents furiously take keep us. 
what? Many silly reasons given, usual cases single 
good one found. One giving us proceeds 
lands national treasury, thereby render 
necessary increase may true; so, 
amount whose pride, whose abundance means, 
prompt manufactures country, 
British may pay 
yard makes them. terrible evil, truly, 
Illinois never ever expects 
single yard British goods whole life. Another reasons 
passage continuance Mr. Clay's bill, prevent 
passage bill would give us more. This, sound 
itself, war former position; 
Mr. Clay's bill treasury much, shall said 
one still sound itself. 
true Mr. Clay's bill passage one 
favorable us new States. Considering strength opposite 
interest old States, wonder ever permitted one 
pass favorable Mr. last years' efforts 
reduce price lands, pass bills 
cession prove assertion true; 
experience support it, reason plain. States 
none, few, public lands lie, consequently 
interested parting except best price, 
moment's reflection show must ever 
continue majority, time one original new 
States becomes populous gets weight Congress, 
public lands limits nearly sold every 
point material question becomes old State. 
wish price none left citizens 
wish ceded States lie, 
longer lie limits, get nothing 
nature things, States interested 
reduction price, similar 
never majority. reason hope 
ever succeed Democratic party measure, 
heretofore seen party full power, year year, 
many leaders making loud favor 
yet nothing. reason, then, believe 
hereafter every light view 
question, amounts simply this: Shall accept share 
proceeds Mr. Clay's bill, shall rather reject get 

 
fifth resolution recommends Whig candidate Congress 
run every district, regardless chances success. 
aware sometimes temporary friend 
cannot succeed, able choose believe 
gratification never fails 
followed abundant policy 
ourselves. voting us 
measure complain acts, however 
wrong may believe be. policy one portion 
friends ever certain course another portion 
may want mutual perfect understanding 
political identity partially away lost. And, again, 
thus elected aid ever become 
Take prominent elected 
whole strength elect Judge Young 
United States Senate, effort, though failing, gave 
prominence subsequently elected him; 1836 General 
elected United States yet let us ask three men 
assaults upon 
men measures they? last summer whole State 
covered pamphlet us, 
written two 
Young, stop charging us 
error merely, roundly denounced us enemies 
human liberty, itself. Heaven men shall 
politically live, so; never permit draw 
us. 
 
sixth resolution recommends adoption convention system 
nomination believe 
first importance. Whether system right stop 
trying show that, 
opponents use it, madness us defend 
it. Experience shown cannot successfully defend 
without it. look elections last year. 
candidate governor, approbation large portion 
party, took field without nomination, open opposition 
system. Wherever counties Whigs held conventions 
nominated candidates Legislature, 
nominated induced rebel become 
said, "on And, go would 
large Whig county, sure find Whigs contending 
shoulder shoulder common enemy, divided 
fighting furiously one another. election came, 
governor beaten, Whig vote 
many thousands since 1840, although Democratic vote 
increased any. Beaten almost everywhere members 
four hundred Whig majority, sending 
delegation half five hundred, 
same; four hundred, sending two 
Morgan, two hundred sending three 
say nothing numerous less 
whole winding aggregate number Democratic 
representatives sent Whig counties. senators, too, 
result character. worthy remembered 
Whigs State ran regular 
single one elected. Although succeeded 
almost 
borne common enemy. 
 
mention fact many Whigs opposing convention 
system heretofore purpose them. Far it. 
expressly protest conclusion. know 
generally, perhaps good true Whigs 
claim be. 
 
mention merely draw attention result 
example forever hereafter avoided. 
truth known, declared 
various ways forms ages world. great 

whose wisdom declared 
"a house divided cannot stand." induce 
friends act upon important universally acknowledged truth 
urge adoption convention system. Reflection 
prove way practically applying it. 
application know incidents temporarily but, 
all, incidents fewer less intense 
without system. two friends office 
certain cannot succeed. Would not, then, much less 
painful question decided mutual friends time before, 
quarrel day election, 
beaten common enemy? 
 
leaving subject, think proper remark 
understand resolution intended recommend application 
convention system nomination candidates small 
offices way connected though must say 
perceive application would wrong. 
 
seventh resolution recommends holding district conventions 
May next, purpose nominating candidates Congress. 
propriety rests upon reasons sixth, 
therefore needs discussion. 
 
eighth ninth also relate merely practical application 
therefore need discussion. 
 
permit us add reflections present 
condition future prospects Whig party. almost 
States fallen minority, seems 
prevail universally among us. cause this? 1840 
carried nation hundred forty thousand majority. 
opponents charged fraudulent whatever 
may believed, know charge untrue. Where, now, 
mighty gone enemy? Let results 
late elections answer. Every State fallen 
Whig cause since 1840 done giving Democratic votes 
then, giving fewer elected 
Democratic Governor New York last fall 15,000 majority, 
many votes 1840, beaten 
seven eight thousand. States 
fallen away cause. evident 
thousands late elections voted all. 
they? important question, respects future. 
come forward give us victory again. all, nearly all, 
Whigs apparent. madness 
defeat 1840, ever since usual 
kept 
facts show result must be, people rally 
entire Proclaim facts, 
although opponents may smile us, ones 
shall Whigs rally again? 
principles less dear 
doctrines since discovered true, 
victory 1840 produce happy results 
equally true, believe, unfortunate death General 
Harrison cause election 
General Harrison expected produce happy effects, 
measures adopted administration. means death, 
unexpected course successor, measures never 
adopted. could fruits consequences always 
predicted would follow failure measures followed, 
upon us course Mr. Tyler 
policy opponents continued still leaving 
advantage charging evils upon us results 
Whig administration. Let none deceived somewhat 
though entirely false charge. ask us sufficient 
sound currency promised, let answered promised 
medium national bank, they, aided Mr. 
Tyler, prevented let too, 
policy relation currency time been, 
still is, full operation. Let us come forth might, 
second victory accomplish death prevented 
first. it. Whigs ever fail fully 
aroused Even single States, circumstances, 
defeat seldom them. Call mind contested elections 
within last years, particularly 
Kentucky, North Carolina, famous 
New Jersey case. districts 
before; whole people aroused 
occasions, put down, never rise again. 
 
declare solemn Whigs always 
majority nation; make always successful needs 
get polls vote great 
Let us make every effort attain it. every election, 
let every Whig act though knew result depend upon 
action. great contest 1840 twenty one hundred 
thousand votes surely shall many, 
ordinary increase added, cast surely Whig 
elected President United States. 
 
A. LINCOLN. S. T. A. T. 
 
March 4, 1843. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 7, 1843. 
 
FRIEND 
 
letter day handed Mr. Miles. late 
effect object desire. yesterday morning 
Whig members district got together agreed hold 
convention Tazewell County. sorry hear 
Whigs county, indeed county, longer 
last Wednesday evening meeting 
Whigs parts State held, question 
propriety conventions brought fully discussed, 
end discussion resolution recommending system 
conventions Whigs State unanimously adopted. 
resolutions also passed, appear next 
meeting also appointed committee draft address 
people State, address also appear next 

 
find brief argument favor 
although wrote say conclusive upon 
point reasonably answered. right way 
hold meeting appoint delegates how, 
take part, let so. matter work well 
time even oppose come next time. 
 
convention held 5th April 
according rule adopted county 
double 
 
good Whig disposed stick 
conventions get least read favor 
address. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 24, 1843. 
 
DEAR meeting Whigs county last 
Monday appoint delegates district Baker beat me, 
got delegation instructed go him. meeting, spite 
attempt decline it, appointed one 
getting Baker nomination shall fixed good deal like 
fellow made man cut 
marrying dear prospects 
town, can't say exactly yet. 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MARTIN M. MORRIS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., March 26, 1843. 
 
FRIEND 
 
letter 3 received yesterday morning, 
thought proper tender 
sincere thanks. truly gratifying learn that, 
people Sangamon cast off, old friends 
known best, stick me. would 
older citizens learn (a 
penniless boy, working flatboat ten dollars per 
put candidate pride, wealth, 
aristocratic family Yet so, was. was, 
too, combination church influence me. Baker 
therefore, suppose, exceptions got 
wife relations churches, 
therefore, wherever would 
tell, set either one other, 
everywhere contended Christian ought go me, 
belonged church, suspected talked 
fighting things, Baker, course, 
nothing do. complain them. church going 
him, think right enough, influences 
spoken other, though strong, would 
grossly untrue unjust charge acted upon body 
near so. mean influences levied tax 
considerable per cent. upon strength throughout religious 
controversy. enough this. 
 
say choosing candidate Congress equal 
right Sangamon, undoubtedly correct. 
agreeing withdraw Whigs Sangamon go me, 
mean alone worth she, 
heavy delegation, me, would impossible 
succeed, therefore well relation 
Menard rights, permit fully recognize them, 
express opinion that, Mason act 
convention able far enforce rights decide 
absolutely one candidates shall successful. Let show 
reason this. Hardin, Morgan candidate, get 

Mason, three, give victory either side. 
 
say shall instruct delegates me, unless object. 
certainly shall object. would pleasant compliment 
tread dust. besides, anything happen 
however, Baker thrown 
fight, would liberty accept nomination could get 
it. do, however, feel bound hinder way 
getting despise attempt it. 
think, then, would proper meeting appoint three 
delegates instruct go one first choice, 
one else second, perhaps one 
instructions named first choice, would 
much. wish hold balance power, important 
attend secure vote Mason sure 
men appointed delegates know safely in. 
James Short appointed county, would 
whether woman affair year ago might 
way appointment question. don't know whether know it, 
know honorable man world. 
even request, show letter 
one else, unless particular friend know 
speak it. 
 
ever, A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. write again? 
 
 
 
 
MARTIN M. MORRIS. 
 
April 14, 1843. 
 
FRIEND 
 
heard intimated Baker attempting get 
you, violate instructions meeting 
appointed you, go him. still insist, 
cannot true. Surely Baker would like. well 
might Hardin ask vote convention. Again, said 
attempt get instructions county requiring 
go wrong. Upon rule, 
might fly decision Sangamon, get 
instructions delegates go me? least twelve 
hundred Whigs county took part, yet would soon 
put head fire attempt it. Besides, one get 
nomination extraordinary means, harmony district 
would inevitably lost. Honest Whigs (and nearly 
would quietly abide repeat, 
attempt part cannot true. Write Springfield 
matter is. Don't show speak letter. 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GEN. J. J. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, May 11, 1843. 
 
FRIEND 
 
Butler informs received letter you, 
expressed doubt whether Whigs Sangamon support 
may, once, dismiss fears subject. 
already resolved make particular effort give 
largest majority possible county. this, Whig 
county many objects it. make matter 
honor pride it; love Whig cause; 
like last, wish convince 
bear hatred Morgan County people 
long seemed imagine. see journals week 
propose, upon pain losing give twice great 
majority county shall receive own. got 

 
five appointed write district 
labor writing one address year, got 
Nothing new here. 
 
ever, A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. wish would measure one largest 
took write length it, tip point 
tip feet dispute length. 
 
A. L. A. L. 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME SEVEN 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
 
WRITINGS A. LINCOLN, Volume 
 
 
 
 
1863 
 
 
OPINION LOSS GENERAL R. H. 
 
October 27, 1863. 
 
June last division substantially lost near Winchester, Va. 
time, General Milroy immediate commander 
field, General Schenck department commander Baltimore, General 
Halleck general-in-chief Washington. 
 
General immediate commander, put arrest, 
subsequently court inquiry examined chiefly reference 
orders, reported evidence. 
 
foregoing statement evidence, together 
conclusions. disaster, came, 
surprise all. well known Generals Milroy 
time before, General Halleck thought division great 
danger surprise service 
risk ought but, 
although advised never positively 
ordered it. General Schenck, contrary, believed service 
force Winchester worth positively 
order withdrawal late enemy cut wire 
prevented order reaching General 
 
General Milroy seems concurred General Schenck opinion 
force kept Winchester least approach 
danger, order upon subject. 
 
question made whether General 
General construed orders withdraw 
force, obeyed question made 
General fact, last order received prepared 
actually withdraw order, 
order never reached him. 
 
Serious blame necessarily due serious disaster, cannot 
say case officers serious 
court-martial deemed necessary proper case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
Private confidential 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 28, 1863. 
 
GENERAL JOHN M. 
 
recently reached War Department, thence laid 
me, Missouri, three communications, similar 
identical object. One them, addressed without place 
date, signature letter 
eight closely written pages. two written 
different person, St. Mo., respectively, 
October 12 13, 1863, inclosing large number 
general statements whole Federal State 
authorities arming disloyal loyal, 
latter killed driven State unless shall 
change. particular, loyal man 
show name persons disloyal 
follows: [The names 
 
majority shown rebel service. believe 
could shown government deliberately armed 
ten times many captured Gettysburg, say nothing similar 
operations East Tennessee. papers contain altogether 
manuscript pages, one newspaper yet find 
anywhere charged loyal man reason 
disloyal one anybody reason 
armed Federal State Government. course, 
time carefully examine all; examined 
others, result stated. remarkable fact 
actual evil yet suppose 
understand case; state might 
duty mine plain event. 
nearly seems St. Joseph Buchanan County. 
wish give special attention region, particularly 
election day. Prevent violence whatever see 
soldiers wrong. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 28, 1863. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Tenn.: please 
come personal conversation me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
VICE-PRESIDENT HAMLIN. 
 
ACT REGULATE DUTIES CLERK HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES 
PREPARING ORGANIZATION HOUSE. 
 
enacted Senate House Representatives United 
States America Congress assembled, that, first meeting 
next Congress, every subsequent Congress, clerk 
next preceding House Representatives shall make roll 
Representatives place thereon names persons, 
persons only, whose show regularly elected 
accordance laws States respectively, laws 
United States. 
 
Approved March 3, 1863. 
 
 
 
 
J. W. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., October 29, 1863. 
 
HON. JAMES W. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The act Congress passed, suppose, 
purpose improper seats House 
fear danger used 
shut proper ones. Iowa, entire Union delegation, 
one States attempt made, upon any. Governor 
doubtless made already 
hands suggest come them; that, 
greater caution, you, perhaps Mr. you, consult 
Governor, additional set made according form 
half still another can, studying 
law, think form judgment, promises additional 
security, quietly bring whole you, used case 
necessity. Let kept 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM P. F. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 30, 1863. 
 
HON. F. F. San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
act Congress, passed last session, intended exclude 
entitled which, reason fear, 
used exclude Please get Governor 
one two discreet friends, study act carefully, make 
two three forms, according best 
sent me, multiply chances delegation 
getting Let done without form 
may answer one. could procure done 
member might well. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 30, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Much obliged information deserters contained 
dispatch yesterday, beg pardon 
regard them, when, appears yours, means 
answering questions. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 31, 1863. 
 
Provost-Marshal-General issued proclamation all. 
form announced anything recently regard troops New York, 
except letter Governor Seymour October 21, 
published newspapers State. announced 
decided form one else 
authority Government, every citizen paid three 
hundred dollars liable immediately drafted again, 
towns raised money pay quotas 
subject similar taxation suffer operations 
new probable like ever 
announced 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM W. H. SEWARD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 1, 1863. 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD, 
 
important news. Details night fight great credit 
command, particularly Eleventh Corps part 
any. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, November 2, 1863. 
 
HON. 
 
DEAR days ago understood say brother, 
General Frank Blair, desires guided wishes whether 
occupy seat Congress remain field. wish, then, 
believe best country; 
come here, put military commission hands, take seat, 
go caucus friends, abide help elect 
thus aid organize House Representatives 
really support Government war. result shall 
election Speaker, let serve position. not, 
let retake commission return army benefit 
country. 
 
dangerous him. relieve 
dangerous position misunderstanding, think danger 
permanently separated ever 
real sincere opponents slavery. 
 
mistake shall allow offered 
drive house building. 
young yet. abundant enough occupy time 
without temper. 
 
rising military skill recent appointment 
command corps, one competent judge General Sherman, 
proves this. line serve country 
profitably could member Congress upon floor. 
 
foregoing would say Frank Blair brother instead 
yours. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 2, 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY A. W. Governor Maryland. 
 
SIR:--Yours 31st received yesterday since 
giving earnest attention 
it. call General Schenck 
almost certain violence used voting places 
election day unless prevented says 
places Union voters attend all, run 
unless assurance protection. makes Missouri 
case, action regard express approval. 
 
remaining point letter protest person 
offering vote put test found laws Maryland. 
brings us difference Missouri Maryland. 
reason States, Missouri has, law, provided test 
voter reference present rebellion, Maryland not. 
example, General captured fighting us Gettysburg, is, without 
legal voter laws Maryland. Even General 
order admits vote, upon oath. think 
cheap enough. order Missouri, approve, General 
order here, reach precisely end. 
right voting loyal men, whether man loyal, allows 
man fix oath. suggestion nearly 
candidates loyal, think quite meets case. 
struggle nation's life, cannot confidently rely 
whose elections may depended upon disloyal votes. men, 
elected, may prove true; votes given expectation 
prove false. 
 
think keep peace prevent 
persistently disloyal constitutes cause offense 
Maryland. think example it. mistake not, 
precisely General Excellency elected 
 
revoke first three propositions General General 
Order No. wrong principle, military, 
necessity exclusive judges shall arrested, 
provision liable revoked part substitute 
following: 
 
That, military officers prevent 
disturbance violence whether offered 
persons person persons 
 
two propositions order allow stand. General 
fully strict orders besides, loyal men 
may vote, vote please. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. H. 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 2, 1863. 
 
JAMES H. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours October 22d received, also was, 
due course, October 3d. look forward pleasure 
promise made former visit Washington 
following winter 
 
Give uneasiness subject mentioned 
note certainly expect see print, yet 
much newspaper comments upon it. 
 
comments constitute fair specimen occurred 
life. endured great deal without much 
received great deal kindness quite free 
used it. 
 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM W. H. SEWARD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, November 3, 1863. 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD, N. 
 
Nothing new. 12 last night Chattanooga show 
quiet well. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 3, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Samuel private Company B, Pennsylvania Volunteers, 
writes shot desertion 6th instant. 
story rather bad one, yet tells 
somewhat interested him. good soldier except 
old he? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE, MANSION WASHINGTON, D. C., November 5, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Please suspend execution Samuel Pennsylvania 
Volunteers, orders. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, November 
9, P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Knoxville, Tenn.: 
 
seen dispatch General Grant loss Per 
time, got considerable advantage 
enemy Virginia: Saturday, 
seventh, Meade drove enemy Rappahannock Station 
eight four guns, prisoners, 
little loss himself. Let hear you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. G. MEADE. 
 
WASHINGTON, November 9, 1863 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
seen operations Rappahannock 
Saturday, wish say, prisoners reported 
General include taken General French, 
Whole amount 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING TOBACCO PURCHASED FOREIGN NATIONS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, November 10, 1863. 
 
consideration peculiar circumstances pursuant 
deemed due friendly powers, tobacco United States 
belonging government either France, state 
country peace, tobacco purchased 
paid government prior 4th day March, 1861, may 
exported port United States supervision upon 
responsibility naval officers governments conformity 
regulations may presented Secretary State 
United States, otherwise. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 10, 1863. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
 see dispatch Saint Louis, little difficult 
understand. says "General Schofield refused leave 
absence members military service attend legislature. 
radical administration men. election two Senators 
place Thursday probably turn upon thing." 
mean? course members legislation must allowed attend 
session recent election returns 
in? "this Saint 
Please inform me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 11, 1863. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
believe Secretary War telegraphed members 
legislation. events, allow service attend 
session, afterward decide whether stay 
entire session. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM HIRAM 
 
   [Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 11, 1863. 
 
HON. HIRAM New would like interview you. 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., November 11, 1863. 
 
JOHN Peru, 
 
cannot comprehend object often decline 
seeing people call upon me, probably see call. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM E. H. E. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., November 13, 1863. 
 
E. H. E. Jefferson City, Mo.: 
 
saying Brown elected Senators received. 
understand one one. knocking heads together 
some. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, November 14, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
received considered dispatch yesterday. reports 
means seeing except own. Besides 
this, publication might improper view court inquiry 
ordered. every merely justice, 
oblige you, feel constrained say think 
better made now. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, November 16, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Knoxville, Tenn.: 
 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CHASE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 17, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I expected see Cabinet meeting, say 
something going train take 
return us. time starting yet shall 
notify you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS GETTYSBURG 
 
NOVEMBER 19, 1863. 
 
Four score seven years ago fathers brought forth 
continent, new nation, conceived Liberty, dedicated 
proposition men created equal. 
 
engaged great civil war, testing whether nation 
nation conceived long endure. met 
great battle-field war. come portion 
field, final resting place gave lives 
nation might live. altogether fitting proper 
this. 
 
But, larger sense, 
ground. brave men, living dead, struggled 
here, consecrated it, far poor power add 
world little note, long remember say here, 
never forget here. us living, rather, 
dedicated unfinished work fought thus 
far nobly advanced. rather us dedicated 
great task remaining honored dead take 
increased devotion cause gave last full measure 
devotion highly resolve dead shall 
died nation, God, shall new birth 
government people, people, people, 
shall perish earth. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 20, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
man name King sentence please 
suspend execution till order, send record. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON. November 20, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
intelligent woman deep distress, called morning, saying 
husband, lieutenant Army Potomac, shot next Monday 
desertion, putting letter hand, upon relied 
left without name particular 
identify case. opening letter found equally 
nothing identify by, except 
seems "Mrs. Anna S. could find her. 
case shall think probably one intended, please apply 
dispatch morning it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM E. P. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 23, 1863. 
 
E. P. West Union, Adams County, Ohio: 
 
Governor Chase behalf John me. 
worse case desert letters others 
cannot without better showing make. 
write 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., November 23, 1863. 
 
DEAR despatches since saw you; one quite late 
firing before, giving points Burnside thinks 
hold place, closely 
across river. brings firing 11 A.M. yesterday, 
twenty-three hours later before. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, November 25, 1863. A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL U.S. GRANT: 
 
despatches fighting Monday Tuesday here. Well 
Many thanks all. Remember Burnside. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
C. P. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 7, 1863. 
 
CHARLES P. ESQ., New York: 
 
received read published letter HON. 
Benjamin R. Curtis. circumstances may 
competent judge, appears paper great ability, 
country's sake thank it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ANNOUNCEMENT UNION SUCCESS EAST TENNESSEE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 7, 1863. 
 
Reliable information received insurgent force retreating 
East Tennessee, circumstances rendering probable 
Union forces cannot hereafter important position; 
high national consequence, recommend 
loyal people do, receipt information, assemble 
places worship, render special gratitude Almighty God 
great advancement national cause. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION AMNESTY RECONSTRUCTION. DECEMBER 8, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas Constitution United States provided 
President "shall power grant pardons 
offenses United States, except cases and, 
 
Whereas rebellion exists whereby loyal State governments 
several States long time many persons 
committed guilty treason United States; 
 
Whereas, reference said rebellion laws 
enacted Congress declaring confiscation property 
liberation slaves, upon terms conditions therein stated, 
also declaring President thereby authorized 
time proclamation, extend persons may 
participated existing rebellion State part thereof pardon 
exceptions times conditions 
may deem expedient public 
 
Whereas Congressional declaration limited pardon 
accords judicial exposition power; 

 
Whereas, reference said rebellion, President United 
States issued several proclamations provisions regard 
liberation slaves; 
 
Whereas desired persons heretofore engaged said 
rebellion resume allegiance United States 
loyal State governments within respective 
States: 
 
Therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
declare, make known persons have, directly 
implication, participated existing rebellion, except 
full pardon hereby granted them, 
restoration rights property, except slaves 
property cases rights third parties shall 
upon condition every person shall take subscribe oath 
thenceforward keep maintain said oath oath 
shall registered permanent preservation shall 
effect following, wit: 
 
solemnly presence Almighty God, 
faithfully support, protect, defend Constitution 
United States Union States 
like manner abide faithfully support acts Congress passed 
existing rebellion reference slaves, long far 
held void Congress decision 
Supreme Court; like manner abide faithfully 
support proclamations President made existing 
rebellion reference slaves, long far modified 
declared void decision Supreme Court. help 
 
persons excepted benefits foregoing provisions 
shall civil diplomatic officers agents 
so-called Confederate Government; left judicial 
United States aid rebellion; shall 
military naval officers said so-called Confederate Government 
rank colonel army lieutenant 
left seats United States Congress aid rebellion; 
resigned commissions Army Navy United States 
afterwards aided rebellion; engaged way 
treating colored persons, white persons charge such, otherwise 
lawfully prisoners war, persons may 
found United States service soldiers, seamen, 

 
declare, make known 
States Arkansas, Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, Tennessee, 
Alabama, Georgia, Florida, South Carolina, North Carolina, number 
persons, less number votes cast State 
Presidential election year A.D. 1860, taken oath 
aforesaid, since violated it, qualified voter 
election law State existing immediately so-called 
act secession, excluding others, shall State 
government shall republican nowise said oath, 
shall recognized true government State, 
State shall receive benefits constitutional 
provision declares "the United States shall guarantee every 
State Union republican form government shall protect 
invasion, and, application legislature, 
EXECUTIVE legislature domestic 

 
declare, make known provision 
may adopted State government relation freed 
people State shall recognize declare permanent 
freedom, provide education, may yet consistent 
temporary arrangement present condition 
class, objected National 

 
suggested improper constructing loyal 
State government State name State, boundary, 
constitution, general code laws 
rebellion maintained, subject modifications made necessary 
conditions hereinbefore stated, others, any, 
said may deemed expedient framing 
new State government. 
 
avoid misunderstanding, may proper say proclamation, 
far relates State governments, reference States 
wherein loyal State governments maintained. 
reason may proper say whether 
members sent Congress State shall admitted seats 
constitutionally rests exclusively respective Houses, 
extent And, still further, proclamation 
intended present people States wherein national 
authority suspended loyal State governments 
mode national authority loyal State 
governments may within said States them; 
mode presented best EXECUTIVE suggest, 
present must understood possible 
mode would 
 
Given hand city WASHINGTON, 8th day December, 
A. D. 1863, Independence United States America 
eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS, DECEMBER 8, 1863. 
 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE 
 
Another year health, sufficiently abundant passed. 
these, especially improved condition national 
affairs, renewed profoundest gratitude God 
 
remain peace friendship foreign powers. 
 
efforts disloyal citizens United States involve us 
foreign aid inexcusable insurrection, 
Britannic Majesty's government, justly expected, exercised 
authority prevent departure new hostile 
British France has, like promptly 
proclaimed beginning 
contest. Questions great importance arisen 
blockade, belligerent operations, Government 
several maritime powers, discussed, and, 
far possible, spirit justice, 
mutual especially gratifying prize courts, 
commanded respect 
confidence maritime powers. 
 
treaty United States Great Britain 
suppression African slave-trade, made 17th day 
February last, duly ratified carried execution. 
believed that, far American ports American citizens 
concerned, odious traffic brought end. 
 
shall consideration Senate, convention 
adjustment claims Washington Territory, arising 
treaty 15th June, 1846, United States 
Great Britain, source among 
citizens rapidly improving part country. 
 
novel important question, involving extent maritime 
jurisdiction Spain waters island 
without reaching proposed, 
amicable spirit, refer friendly power. 
convention purpose submitted Senate. 
 
thought proper, subject approval Senate, 
concur interested commercial powers arrangement 
dues upon principles 
heretofore adopted regard upon navigation waters 

 
controversy government 
touching seizure Peru, officers, large 
amount treasure belonging citizens United States 
brought close Majesty King 
whose question referred parties. subject 
thoroughly patiently examined justly respected 
although sum awarded may 
large expected reason wisdom 
Majesty's decision. decision promptly complied 
intelligence regard reached country. 
 
joint commission act last session carrying 
effect convention subject claims 
organized engaged business intrusted it. 
 
Difficulties concerning transit 
course amicable 
 
conformity principles set forth last annual message, 
received representative United States 
accredited minister Republic. 
 
Incidents occurring progress civil war forced upon 
attention uncertain state international questions touching 
rights foreigners country United States citizens abroad. 
regard governments rights least partially defined 
instance, however, expressly stipulated 
event civil war residing country within 
lines insurgents rule classes 
whose behalf government country 
expect privileges immunities distinct character. regret 
say, however, claims put forward, 
instances behalf foreigners lived United States 
greater part lives. 
 
reason believe many persons born foreign countries 
declared intention become citizens, fully 
naturalized military duty required denying 
fact thereby throwing upon Government burden proof. 
found difficult impracticable obtain proof want 
proper sources information. might supplied 
requiring clerks courts declarations intention may made 
effected send names 
persons naturalized declaring intention become citizens 
Secretary Interior, whose Department names might 
arranged printed general information. 
 
also reason believe foreigners frequently become citizens 
United States sole purpose duties imposed 
laws native countries, becoming naturalized 
though never returning United States still 
claim interposition government citizens. Many 
great prejudices heretofore arisen 
therefore submitted serious consideration. might advisable 
fix limit beyond citizen United States residing 
abroad may claim interposition government. 
 
right suffrage often assumed exercised aliens 
drafted 
military service. submit expediency amendment 
law make fact voting plea 
exemption military service civil obligation ground 

 
common Western powers, relations Japan 
brought serious opposition 
Empire enlightened liberal policy 
designed bring country society nations. 
although entire confidence, difficulties 
may ask attention claim 
minister residing sustained destruction 
fire residence 
 
Satisfactory arrangements made Russia, 
which, believed, result effecting continuous line 
telegraph Empire Pacific coast. 
 
recommend favorable consideration subject 
international telegraph across Atlantic Ocean, also telegraph 
capital national forts along Atlantic seaboard 
Gulf Mexico. communications, established 
reasonable would economical well effective aids 
military, naval service. 
 
consular system United States, enactments last 
Congress, begins reason hope 
may become entirely increase trade 
whenever peace restored. ministers abroad faithful 
defending American rights. protecting commercial interests consuls 
necessarily encounter increased labors responsibilities 
growing war. part met 
discharged zeal efficiency. acknowledgment justly includes 
consuls who, residing Egypt, China, 
countries, charged functions 
extraordinary powers. 
 
condition several organized Territories generally 
satisfactory, although Indian New Mexico 
entirely mineral resources Colorado, Nevada, 
New Mexico, proving far heretofore 
understood. lay communication subject 
Governor New Mexico. submit consideration 
expediency establishing system encouragement 
Although source national wealth strength flowing 
greater freedom several years insurrection occurred, 
still great deficiency laborers every field industry, 
especially agriculture mines, well iron coal 
precious demand labor much increased here, 
thousands persons, occupation, 
foreign offering United 
States cheap, assistance afforded them. 
easy see sharp discipline civil war nation 
beginning new life. noble effort demands aid ought 
receive attention support Government. 
 
Injuries Government may cases 
inflicted subjects citizens foreign countries, 
sea land, persons service United States. 
government expects redress powers similar injuries 
inflicted persons service upon citizens United 
States, must prepared justice existing 
judicial inadequate purpose, special court may 
power hear decide claims character 
referred may arisen treaties public law. 
Conventions claims joint commission 
proposed governments, answer proposition 
yet received any. 
 
course session shall probably occasion request 
provide 
rendered awarded courts, cases 
government may acknowledged liable principle 
amount ascertained informal 

 
proper officers Treasury deemed required 
law United States upon subject demand tax upon 
foreign consuls country. demand may 
public law, perhaps existing 
treaty United States foreign country, expediency 
far modifying act exempt tax consuls 
citizens United States, derived 
office property situated United States, 
submitted serious consideration. make suggestion upon 
ground ought reciprocated consuls 
countries taxation extent thus United 
States, think, ought international 
trade commerce. 
 
operations Treasury last year successfully 
enactment Congress national banking law proved 
valuable support public credit, general legislation 
relation loans fully answered expectations 
amendments may required perfect existing laws, change 
principles general scope believed needed. 
 
Since measures operation demands Treasury, 
including pay Army Navy, promptly met fully 
satisfied. considerable body troops, believed, ever 
amply provided liberally paid, may 
added people burdens incident great war ever 
cheerfully 
 
receipts year sources, including loans 
balance Treasury 
aggregate disbursements leaving balance 1st 
July, 1863, receipts derived 
customs internal revenue direct 
tax lands miscellaneous sources 
loans making aggregate 
disbursements civil service 
pensions Indians interest 
public debt War Department 
Navy Department payment temporary 
debt making aggregate leaving 
balance payment temporary debt, 
made moneys borrowed year, must regarded 
merely nominal payments moneys borrowed make merely 
nominal therefore 
receipts done 
remains actual receipts actual disbursements 
leaving balance already stated. 
 
actual receipts disbursements first quarter 
estimated receipts disbursements remaining 
current fiscal year shown detail report 
Secretary Treasury, invite attention. 
sufficient say believed actual results 
exhibit state finances less favorable country 
estimates officer heretofore submitted confidently 
expected close year disbursements debt 
found considerably less 
 
report Secretary War document great interest. 
consists 
 
1. military operations year, detailed report 
General Chief. 
 
2. organization colored persons war service. 
 
3. exchange prisoners, fully set forth letter General 

 
4. operations act enrolling calling national 
forces, detailed report Marshal General. 
 
5. organization invalid corps, 
 
6. operation several departments 
Chief Chief 

 
appeared impossible make valuable summary report, 
except would extended place, hence content 
asking careful attention report itself. 
 
duties naval branch service year 
throughout whole unhappy contest discharged 
fidelity eminent success. extensive blockade constantly 
increasing efficiency Navy yet long line 
far impossible entirely suppress trade. 
returns received Navy Department appears 
vessels captured since blockade 
value already sent adjudication amounts 

 
naval force United States consists time five hundred 
vessels completed course completion, 
seventy-five ironclad events war 
give increased interest importance Navy probably 
extend beyond war itself. 
 
vessels Navy completed service, 
contract approaching completion, believed exceed 
number power; may relied upon 
harbor defense coast service, others greater strength capacity 
necessary purposes maintain rightful 
position 
 
change taken place naval vessels naval warfare since 
introduction steam motive power ships war demands 
either corresponding change existing navy 
establishment new ones construction necessary repair 
modern naval delay, 
public injury experienced want governmental 
necessity furnished, 
suitable place upon Atlantic seaboard repeated occasions 
brought attention Congress Navy Department, 
presented report Secretary 
communication. think duty invite special attention 
subject, also establishing yard naval 
purposes upon one Western rivers. naval force created 
interior many within little 
two years, exceeding numbers whole naval force country 
commencement present Administration. Satisfactory 
important heroic men Navy 
interesting period, scarcely wonderful success 
mechanics production war vessels, 
created new form naval power. 
 
country advantages superior nation resources 
iron immediate 
vicinity both, available close proximity 
Without advantage public works, resources nation 
developed power displayed construction Navy 
magnitude, period creation rendered 
signal service Union. 
 
increase number seamen public service 
men spring 1861 present time 
accomplished without special legislation extraordinary bounties 
promote increase. found, however, operation 
draft, high bounties paid army beginning 
affect injuriously naval service, will, 
likely efficiency seamen proper 
inducing enter Army. therefore respectfully 
suggest Congress might aid army naval services 
definite provision subject would time 
equitable communities especially interested. 
 
commend consideration suggestions Secretary 
Navy regard policy fostering training seamen also 
education officers engineers naval service. Naval 
rendering signal service preparing highly 
responsible duties life required perform. 
order country deprived proper quota 
educated officers, legal provision made 
naval vacancies caused neglect omission make 
nominations States insurrection filled 
Secretary Navy. school full complete 
former period, every respect entitled favorable 
consideration Congress. 
 
past fiscal year financial condition Post-Office 
Department one increasing prosperity, gratified 
able state actual postal revenue nearly 
entire expenditures, latter amounting former 
leaving deficiency 1860, 
year immediately preceding rebellion, deficiency amounted 
postal receipts year 
less 1863. decrease since 1860 annual amount 
transportation twenty-five per annual 
expenditure account reduced thirty-five per cent. 
therefore, Post-Office Department may become 
years, even restoration whole 
service. 
 
international conference postal delegates principal 
countries Europe America, called suggestion 
Postmaster-General, met Paris 11th May last concluded 
8th June. principles established 
conference best adapted facilitate postal intercourse 
nations basis future postal conventions inaugurate general 
system uniform international charges reduced rates 
fail produce beneficial results. 
 
refer report Secretary Interior, 
herewith laid you, useful varied information relation 
public lands, Indian affairs, pensions, matters 
public concern pertaining Department. 
 
quantity land disposed last first quarter 
present fiscal years acres 
sold acres taken homestead law, 
disposed laws granting lands military 
railroad purposes. also appears sale 
public lands largely increase. 
 
long cherished opinion wisest statesmen 
people United States higher enduring interest 
early settlement substantial public lands 
amount direct revenue derived sale them. 
opinion controlling influence legislation upon 
subject national may evidence liberal 
measures adopted reference actual grant States 
lands within limits, order 
reclaimed rendered fit grants railway 
companies alternate sections land upon contemplated lines 
roads, completed largely multiply facilities 
reaching distant policy received 
signal beneficent illustration recent enactment granting 
actual Since 1st day January last 
quantity acres land taken 
provisions. fact amount sales furnish gratifying 
evidence increasing settlement upon public lands, notwithstanding 
great struggle energies nation engaged, 
required large withdrawal citizens 
accustomed cordially concur recommendation 
Secretary Interior suggesting modification act favor 
engaged military naval service United States. 
doubt Congress cheerfully adopt measures will, 
without essentially changing general features system, secure 
greatest practicable extent benefits left 
homes defense country arduous crisis. 
 
invite attention views Secretary propriety 
raising appropriate legislation revenue mineral lands 
United States. 
 
measures provided last session removal certain 
Indian tribes carried effect. Sundry treaties 
negotiated, due time submitted constitutional 
action Senate. contain stipulations 
rights Indians large valuable tracts lands. 
hoped effect treaties result 
establishment permanent friendly relations tribes 
brought frequent bloody collision 
settlements Sound policy imperative duty 
Government demand anxious constant attention 
material progress and, 
all, moral training blessing Divine 
Providence confer upon elevated 
hopes Christian faith. 
 
suggested last annual message propriety 
Indian system. Subsequent events satisfied necessity. 
details set forth report Secretary urgent need 
immediate legislative action. 
 
commend benevolent institutions established 
Government District generous fostering care. 
 
attention Congress last session engaged 
extent proposition enlarging water communication 
Mississippi River proposition, 
however, failed time. Since then, upon call greatest 
convention held Chicago upon 
subject, summary whose views contained memorial addressed 
President Congress, honor lay 
you. interest one ere long force way 
entertain doubt, submitted entirely wisdom 
done now. Augmented interest given subject 
actual commencement work upon Pacific Railroad, 
favorable rapid progress enlarged navigation 
becomes palpable need great road. 
 
transmit second annual report Commissioner Department 
Agriculture, asking attention developments vital 
interest nation. 
 
Congress assembled year ago, war already lasted nearly 
twenty months, many land sea, 
varying rebellion pressed back reduced 
limits; yet tone public feeling opinion, home abroad, 
satisfactory. popular elections 
past indicated uneasiness among ourselves, while, amid much cold 
kindest words coming Europe uttered accents 
pity blind surrender hopeless cause. commerce 
suffering greatly armed vessels built upon furnished 
foreign threatened additions 
quarter would sweep trade sea raise blockade. 
failed European governments anything hopeful upon 
subject. preliminary emancipation proclamation, issued September, 
running assigned period beginning new year. month 
later final proclamation came, including announcement colored 
men suitable condition would received war service. 
policy emancipation employing black soldiers gave future 
new hope fear doubt contended uncertain 
conflict. According political system, matter civil 
administration, General Government lawful power effect 
emancipation State, long time hoped 
rebellion could suppressed without military 
measure. deemed possible necessity 
might come, crisis contest would 
presented. came, and, followed dark 
doubtful days. Eleven months passed, permitted take 
another rebel borders pressed still farther back, 
complete opening Mississippi country 
rebellion divided distinct parts, practical communication 
them. Tennessee Arkansas substantially cleared 
insurgent control, influential citizens each, owners slaves 
advocates slavery beginning rebellion, declare openly 
emancipation respective States. States included 
emancipation proclamation, Maryland Missouri, neither 
three years ago would tolerate restraint upon extension slavery 
new Territories, dispute best mode removing 
within limits. 
 
slaves beginning rebellion full 100,000 
United States military service, one-half 
number actually bear arms ranks, thus giving double advantage 
taking much labor insurgent cause supplying places 
otherwise must filled many white men. far tested, 
difficult say good soldiers any. 
insurrection tendency violence cruelty marked measures 
emancipation arming blacks. measures much 
discussed foreign countries, and, contemporary discussion, 
tone public sentiment much improved. home 
measures fully discussed, 
annual elections following highly encouraging whose 
official duty bear country great trial. Thus 
new crisis threatened divide friends 
Union past. 
 
Looking present future, reference 
national authority within States wherein authority 
suspended, thought fit issue proclamation, copy 
herewith transmitted. examination proclamation 
believed, nothing attempted beyond 
amply justified Constitution. True, form oath given, 
man take it. man promised pardon 
case voluntarily takes oath. Constitution authorizes 
Executive grant withhold pardon absolute discretion, 
includes power grant terms, fully established 
judicial authorities. 
 
also States named State government 
shall mode prescribed set up, government shall 
recognized guaranteed United States, 
State shall, constitutional conditions, protected 
invasion domestic violence. constitutional obligation 
United States guarantee every State Union republican form 
government protect State cases stated explicit 
full. tender benefits provision State 
government set particular way? section Constitution 
contemplates case wherein element within State favorable 
republican government Union may feeble opposite 
hostile element external even within State, 
precisely cases 
 
attempt guarantee protect revived State government, 
constructed whole part element 
whose hostility violence simply 
absurd. must test separate opposing elements, 
build sound; test sufficiently 
liberal one sound whoever make sworn 
former 
 
proper require test admission political 
body oath allegiance Constitution United States 
Union it, also laws proclamations regard 
slavery? laws proclamations enacted put forth 
purpose aiding suppression rebellion. give 
effect pledge 
judgment, aided aid cause 
intended. abandon would relinquish lever 
power, would also cruel breach faith. 
may add point remain present position shall 
attempt retract modify emancipation proclamation, 
shall return slavery person free terms 
proclamation acts Congress. 
reasons thought best support measures shall 
included oath, believed Executive may lawfully claim 
return pardon restoration forfeited rights, 
clear constitutional power withhold altogether grant upon terms 
shall deem wisest public interest. observed 
also part oath subject modifying 
power legislation supreme judicial decision. 
 
proposed acquiescence National Executive reasonable 
temporary State arrangement freed people made view 
possibly modifying confusion must best attend 
classes total revolution labor throughout whole States. 
hoped already deeply afflicted people States may 
somewhat ready give cause affliction 
extent vital matter left themselves, power 
National Executive prevent abuse proposition. 
 
suggestion proclamation maintaining political 
framework States called reconstruction made 
hope may good without danger harm. save labor 
avoid great confusion. 
 
proclamation upon subject? question 
conflicting views step might delayed long 
taken soon. States elements seem ready 
action, remain apparently want 
plan action. shall adopt plan B rather B 
B agree, know General 
Government reject proclamation plan 
presented may accepted point, 
assured advance rejected here. may bring 
act sooner otherwise would. 
 
objections presentation plan National 
Executive consist danger points could 
safely left Care taken shape 
document avoid embarrassments Saying 
certain terms certain classes pardoned rights restored, 
said classes terms never Saying 
reconstruction accepted presented specified way, 
said never accepted way. 
 
movements State action emancipation several States 
included emancipation proclamation matters profound 
repeat detail heretofore 
earnestly urged upon subject general views feelings remain 
trust Congress omit fair opportunity 
aiding important steps great consummation. 
 
midst however important must lose sight 
fact war power still main power 
alone look yet time give confidence people 
contested regions insurgent power overrun them. 
confidence shall established little done anywhere 
called reconstruction. Hence care must still 
directed Army Navy thus far borne harder part 
nobly may esteemed fortunate giving greatest 
efficiency indispensable arms also recognize 
gallant men, commander compose them, 
others world must stand indebted home freedom 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. WASHINGTON D. C., December 8, 1863. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
conformity law July 16, 1862, cordially recommend 
Captain John United States Navy, receive vote thanks 
Congress eminent skill gallantry exhibited 
engagement rebel armed ironclad steamer Atlanta, 
whilst command United States ironclad steamer 
led capture 17th June, 1863, also 
general good conduct shown officer many occasions. 
 
recommendation specially made order comply 
requirements ninth section aforesaid act, 
following words, 
 
line officer Navy Marine Corps may advanced one 
grade upon recommendation President name receives 
thanks Congress highly distinguished conduct conflict 
enemy extraordinary heroism line profession. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. WASHINGTON, D. C., December 8, 1863. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
Congress, recommendation, passed resolution, approved 7th 
February, 1863, tendering thanks Commander D. D. Porter "for 
skill displayed attack post Arkansas 
10th January, consideration services, together 
efficient labors vigilance subsequently displayed 
efforts rebels Mississippi 
important part rendered squadron command, led 
surrender 
 
therefore, conformity seventh section act approved 
16th July, 1862, nominate Commander D. D. Porter 
Navy active list 4th July, 1863, fill existing 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Understanding Chattanooga 
wish tender you, command, 
profoundest courage, 
they, great difficulties, effected 
important object. God bless 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 9, 1863 
 
EXCELLENCY A. G. CURTIN, 
 
Governor Pennsylvania. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I urge preparation message, 
excuse sooner transmitted inclosed 
Secretary War Marshal General response 
relation recruiting Pennsylvania. Though quite desire, 
hope grounds taken reasonably satisfactory you. Allow 
exchange organization House 
Representatives, especially recent military events Georgia 
Tennessee. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 10, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Please suspend execution sentences death 
department order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Col. James B. Tenth Regiment Pennsylvania offers 
resignation circumstances inducing wish accept it. 
prefer know pleasure upon subject. Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JUDGE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, December 15, 1863. 
 
HON. U. S. District Judge, San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
oath proclamation December 8 intended may 
voluntarily take it, may constrained take 
order escape actual imprisonment intended 
latter class shall abide granting withholding 
power ordinary way. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MARY 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 15, 1863. 
 
MOTHER MARY 
 
President authority whether may 
benevolent object mention. objection Iowa laws, 
none here. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING DISCRIMINATING DUTIES, DECEMBER 16, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas act Congress United States 24th May, 
entitled "An act addition act entitled act concerning 
discriminating duties tonnage duties 
vessels provided upon satisfactory 
evidence given President United States 
government foreign nation discriminating duties tonnage 
imposed levied ports said nation upon 
vessels wholly belonging citizens United States upon 
produce, merchandise imported United 
States foreign country, President thereby authorized 
issue proclamation declaring foreign discriminating duties 
tonnage within United States shall suspended 
far respects vessels said foreign nation 
produce, merchandise imported United 
States said foreign nation 
foreign country, said suspension take effect time 
given President United States 
continue long reciprocal exemption vessels belonging 
citizens United States aforesaid, shall 
continued, 
 
Whereas satisfactory evidence lately received 
official communication Envoy Extraordinary 
Minister Republic Nicaragua, date 
28th November, 1863, higher duties tonnage 
imposed levied since second day August, 
ports Nicaragua, upon vessels wholly belonging citizens 
United States, upon produce, merchandise 
imported United States, foreign country 
whatever, levied ships 
ports like 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
America, hereby declare proclaim much several acts 
imposing discriminating duties tonnage within United 
States are, shall be, suspended far respects 
vessels Nicaragua, produce, 
merchandise imported United States 
Nicaragua, foreign country said 
suspension take effect day mentioned, continue 
thenceforward long reciprocal exemption vessels 
United States, produce, merchandise imported 
same, aforesaid, shall 
continued part government 
 
Given hand city Washington, sixteenth day 
December, year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
sixty-three, Independence United 
States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, 
 
DECEMBER 17, 1863. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES UNITED STATES: 
 
Herewith lay letter addressed committee 
gentlemen representing aid societies Boston, New York, 
Philadelphia, subject letter, indicated 
above, one great magnitude importance, one 
gentlemen, known ability high character, seem considered 
great attention care. time form mature 
judgment whether plan suggest best, 
submit whole subject Congress, attention thereto 
almost demanded. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 17, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Tenn.: 
 
understand sentence death, tall old man, name 
Henry F. personally knew him, think bad 
man. Please let executed unless upon order me, 
meantime send record. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, December 19, 1863. 
 
GENERAL GRANT, Chattanooga, Tennessee: 
 
Indiana delegation Congress, least large part them, 
anxious General Milroy shall enter active service again, 
share feeling. difficult man sincerity 
courage strong Believing cause, wanting 
fight it, whole matter him. Could you, without 
assign place, directed report you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 21, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR note Secretary Navy, promised, 
called said strikes thrown 
completion vessels back much thought General 
proposition entirely proper. wishes (and 
General confer with, explain to, Admiral 

 
regard Western matter, believe stand 
substantially first put it. especially Brown, believe 
social influence St. Louis would inevitably tell injuriously 
upon General particular difficulty existing there, think 
force view. 
 
General Schofield temporarily, done, 
believe scarcely able get nomination 
Senate. Send nomination, which, however, quite ready 
send Senate. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
O. D. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 22, 1863. 
 
O. D. ST. Louis, Missouri: 
 
looked petition signed three dozen citizens 
St. Louis, three accompanying letters, one yourself, one Mr. 
one Mr. John D. whole relating 
Rev. Dr. petition name justice 
restore Dr. rights. 
gives intimation rights 
 
letter states Provost-Marshal year ago, ordered 
arrest Dr. Street Church, prohibited 
placed management affairs 
church control chosen near close 
state certain course "would insure Mr. 
letter says: "Dr. Samuel S. enjoying rights 
cannot Mr. letter, 
"Is strange illustration condition things, 
question shall allowed church St. Louis 
shall decided President United States?" 
 
Now, sounds and, little 
gentlemen making application understand case one 
doctor enjoying rights 
another pointing secure second day 
January last, wrote General Curtis relation Mr. order 
upon Dr. and, suppose doctor enjoying 
rights quote part letter relates 
follows: "But must add United States 
Government must not, order, undertake run 
individual, church it, becomes dangerous public 
interest, must churches, such, must take care 
themselves. United States appoint 
agents 
 
letter going General Curtis, command there, supposed, 
course, especially heard complaint 
Dr. friends nearly entire year. never 
thought shall shall 
knowingly tolerated 
one else interfere authority. one interfering 
color authority, would like specifically made known 
me. If, all, sought put Dr. 
back heads majority that, too, 
control church side. 
 
respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MILITARY COMMANDER POINT 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 22, 1863. 
 
MILITARY COMMANDER, Point Md.: 
 
prisoner name think, 
certainly son U. F. Illinois, please send 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MILITARY COMMANDER POINT 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 24, 1863. 
 
MILITARY COMMANDER, Point Md.: 
 
send directed day two ago, also send Edwin C. 
Ninth Virginia rebel cavalry. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM U. F. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON D. C., December 26, 1863. 
 
HON. U. F. Chicago, Ill.: son left 
order Secretary War, administer oath 
discharge send you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 29, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
sixteenth received, send you, ground 
it, copy answer sixth, possible 
original may reach you. intend master every controversy 
made you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 30, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Jacob fully pardoned past upon condition 
returns duty three years war. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, December 31, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
fix department Curtis go, without 
waiting wind Missouri matter. Lane anxious Fort 
Smith it, willing, unless decided military reasons 
contrary, case course, it. oblige 
Curtis department fixed once. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1864 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., January 1, 1864. p.m. 
 
GENERAL Harper's Ferry: 
 
anything new Winchester, Martinsburg 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 2, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Alexandria, Va.: 
 
Please call see to-day 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 2, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
SIR:--The Secretary War concluded discharge 
prisoners Point following First, 
take oath prescribed proclamation December 8, issued 
consent General service. Second, 
take oath discharged whose homes lie safely within 
military lines. 
 
send Mr. Hay letter 
way using propose explain verbally better 
writing. 
 
Yours, truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 5, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
inconsistent service, please allow General William 
long leave absence rules permit understanding 
may see fit. acquaintance friend mine, 
family matters require presence. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, 
 
JANUARY 5, 1864. 
 
GENTLEMEN SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
joint resolution honorable bodies approved December 23, 1863, 
paying bounties volunteers, practiced 
War Department, is, extent three hundred dollars case, 
prohibited 5th day present month. transmit 
consideration communication Secretary War, accompanied 
one Provost-Marshal General him, relating subject 
mentioned. earnestly recommend law modified 
allow bounties paid are, least 1st 
day 
 
without anxiety lest appear thus 
attention subject upon recently 
nothing deep conviction public interest demands could 
induce hazard misunderstood point. 
Executive approval given resolution mentioned, 
attention fuller knowledge facts feel 
constrained recommend subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 6, 1864. 2 P.M. 
 
GOVERNOR Frankfort, Kentucky: 
 
yesterday received. Nothing known General 
order, beyond fair presumption comes 
General Grant, object which, understood, 
would loath True, troops are, strict law, 
removed General Grant's judgment would 
highest make order. understand 
bad faith yet Kentucky 
Military men perceive Kentucky, sure 
Grant would permit appeared him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL Q. A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 13, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
understand effort made worthy gentlemen 
reconstruct legal State government Florida 
Department, unlikely may 
given Mr. Hay commission sent you, 
aid reconstruction. 
explain manner using also general views 
subject. desirable 
differences opinion shall arise, master. wish thing done 
speedy way, done within range 
late proclamation subject. detail labor will, course, 
done others; greatly obliged give 
general supervision find consistent 
strictly military duties. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 15, 
1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Columbus, Ohio: 
 
Private William G. Ohio Volunteers, returns 
regiment faithfully term, fully pardoned 
military offenses prior this. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 16, 1864. 
 
MESSRS. 
 
GENTLEMEN: number month year North American Review 
duly received, please accept thanks. course 
impartial yet, due allowance this, venture 
hope article entitled "The President's 
value country. fear worthy therein 
kindly said personally. 
 
sentence twelve lines, commencing top page could 
wish exactly is. expressed, writer 
correctly understood me. never theory secession 
could States people Precisely 
contrary asserted inaugural 
belief obligations puzzled, 
time, denying legal rights citizens remained 
innocent treason rebellion. mean 
merely call attention point. 
 
respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL P. STEELE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 20, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Sundry citizens State Arkansas petition election may 
held State, elect assumed 
election, thenceforward, constitution laws 
State, rebellion, full force, except 
constitution modified declare shall neither 
slavery involuntary except punishment crimes 
whereof party shall duly General 
Assembly may make provisions freed people shall recognize 
declare permanent freedom, provide education, 
may yet construed temporary arrangement suitable 
condition said election 
shall held 28th March, 1864, usual places 
State, voters may attend purpose, voters 
attending eight o'clock morning said day may choose judges 
clerks election purpose; persons qualified 
said constitution laws, taking oath presented 
President's proclamation December 8, 1863, either 
election, none others, may set judges 
clerks may make returns directly day ---- 
respects said election may conducted according 
said constitution receipt said five 
thousand four hundred six votes shall receive 
said votes, ascertain shall thereby appear 
day ------ next, persons appearing 
elected, shall appear Little Rock, take 
oath, severally support Constitution 
United States said modified Constitution State 
Arkansas, may declared qualified empowered enter 
immediately upon duties offices shall 
respectively elected. 
 
please order election take place 28th March, 
1864, returns made fifteen days 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, JANUARY 20, 1864 
 
GENTLEMEN SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
accordance letter addressed Secretary State, 
approval, Hon. Joseph A. Wright, Indiana, patriotic 
distinguished gentleman repaired Europe attended International 
Agricultural held last year, since 
return made report me, which, believed, fail 
general interest, especially agricultural community. 
transmit consideration copies letters report. 
appears letter expenses compensation 
promised him, submit whether reasonable allowance made 
them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER APPROVING TRADE REGULATIONS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 26, 1864. 
 
I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States seen 
considered additional regulations trade prescribed Secretary 
Treasury, numbered hereby 
approve same; declare order property 
brought good faith, actually sold pursuance said 
Regulations shall taken 
effect come force provided Regulation shall exempt 
confiscation forfeiture United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 27, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FOSTER, Knoxville, Tenn.: 
 
supposed correspondence General 
amnesty proclamation, newspapers, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM E. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 28, 1864 
 
HON. EDWARD San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
yesterday received. similar dispatch 
received you, nothing definite North Carolina. Knowing 
Mr. able man, doubting 
glad old south Virginia, 
unable suggest anything definite upon subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION 
 
WASHINGTON, January 28, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
citizens Missouri, vicinity Kansas City, 
special danger renewed troubles 
thence route toward New Mexico. impressed danger 
great thank give Generals Rosecrans 
Curtis, respectively, orders may turn attention thereto 
prevent far possible 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 29, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL New York: 
 
Could you, without inconvenient disagreeable yourself, 
immediately take trip Arkansas me? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 31, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Frankfort, Ky.: 
 
General resignation accepted, Excellency give 
appointment proposed. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COLONIZATION EXPERIMENT 
 
ORDER SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 1, 1864 
 
HON. EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
directed transport steam 
vessel, may deemed proper sent 
colored colony established United States island 
coast San bring back country 
colonists desire return. transport furnished 
suitable supplies purpose, detail officer 
Department, who, special instructions given, 
shall charge business. colonists brought 
Washington, unless otherwise hereafter employed 
provided colored persons around city. 
brought island desire return, effects 
brought them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER DRAFT FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND MEN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 1, 1864. 
 
Ordered, draft five hundred thousand men, serve 
three years war, made tenth day March 
next, military service United States, 
many may enlisted drafted 
service prior first day March, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 3, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR YATES, Springfield, Ill.: 
 
United States Government lot Springfield used 
home, understanding Government 
expense case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, February 6, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR J. 
 
order General election made ignorance 
action convention taken would take. subsequent letter 
directs General aid plan, 
hinder you. Show him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
STORY EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION 
 
TOLD PRESIDENT, F. B. 
 
FEBRUARY 6, 1864. 
 
"It got be," said Mr. Lincoln, 1862. Things gone 
bad worse, felt reached end rope 
plan operations played 
last must change lose determined 
upon adoption emancipation without consultation 
with, knowledge of, Cabinet, prepared original draft 
proclamation, and, much anxious thought, called Cabinet 
meeting upon subject. last July first part 
month August, 1862. [The exact date July 22, 
present excepting Mr. Blair, Postmaster-General, absent 
opening discussion, came said Cabinet 
resolved upon step, called together 
ask advice, lay proclamation 
them, suggestions would order heard 
read. Mr. Lovejoy error informed excited 
comment excepting part Secretary Seward. Various suggestions 
Secretary Chase wished language stronger reference 
arming blacks. 
 
"Mr. Blair, came in, deprecated policy ground 
would cost administration fall elections. Nothing, however, 
offered already fully anticipated settled mind, 
Secretary Seward spoke. said substance, President, 
approve proclamation, question expediency issue 
public mind, consequent upon 
repeated great fear effect important 
may viewed last measure exhausted government, 
cry government stretching forth hands 
instead stretching forth hands 
said President, "was would considered last 
[This precise 
continued Mr. Seward, approve measure, suggest, sir, 
postpone issue give country supported 
military success, instead issuing it, would case now, upon 
greatest Mr. Lincoln continued "The wisdom 
view Secretary State struck great force. 
aspect case that, thought upon subject, 
entirely overlooked. result put draft 
proclamation aside, sketch waiting 
victory. 
 
"From time time added changed line, touching 
there, anxiously watching process events. Well, next news 
disaster Bull Run. Things looked ever. 
Finally came week battle determined wait 
longer. news came, think, advantage 
side. staying Home miles 
finished writing second draft preliminary 
came called Cabinet together hear it, 
published following 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 11, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Army Potomac: 
 
Unless strong reason contrary, please send General 
us here, two three days. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM HORACE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 13, 1864. 
 
HON. HORACE Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
letter second received. course Governor Johnson 
proceed exigencies case appear 
require. apprehend think necessary 
views ruinous extent. one hasty reading see 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. M. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, February 17, 1864. 
 
WILLIAM M. Little Rock, 
 
fixed plan election Arkansas ignorance 
convention work. Since learned latter fact 
constantly trying yield plan them. sent two 
letters General Steele, three four despatches others, 
saying he, General Steele, must master, probably 
best merely help convention plan. single 
mind must master, else agreement anything, 
General Steele, commanding military ground, 
best man master. Even citizens telegraphing 
postpone election later day either fixed 
convention me. discord must 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL STEELE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 17, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL STEELE, Little Rock, 
 
day fixed convention election probably best, 
ground, consultation gentlemen there, 
decide. fixed day election, presented plan 
reconstruction, known convention things. 
probably best merely assist convention 
plan, election day matters already written 
telegraphed half dozen times. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 18, 1864. 
 
A. N. 
 
law us keep accounts States, 
Congressional Districts, would overwhelm us attempt counties, 
cities Nevertheless oblige particular 
cases. view send dispatch Provost-Marshal General, 
asking best you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING BLOCKADE, FEBRUARY 18, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, proclamation nineteenth April, one thousand eight 
hundred sixty-one, ports States South Carolina, Georgia, 
Alabama, Florida, Mississippi, Louisiana, Texas were, reasons 
therein set forth, placed whereas, port 
district State Texas, 
since blockade said port may 
safely relaxed advantage interests 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, pursuant authority vested fifth section 
act Congress approved 13th July, 1861, entitled "An 
act provide collection duties imports, 
purposes," hereby declare blockade said port 
shall far cease determine date, 
commercial intercourse said except persons, things, 
information may, date, carried on, 
subject laws United States, regulations prescribed 
Secretary Treasury, and, rebellion shall 
suppressed, orders may general commanding 
department, officer duly authorized commanding 
said proclamation authorize allow 
persons in, service 
insurgents, things information intended use, 
aid nor, except upon permission Secretary 
War, officer duly authorized him, following 
prohibited articles, namely: 

excepting quantity said articles 
may necessary defense ship compose 
material, 
adapted 
light native 
 
vessels clearing foreign ports destined port 
opened proclamation, granted 
consuls United States upon satisfactory evidence vessel 
licensed convey persons, property, information excepted 
prohibited above, either said shall 
exhibited said port immediately and, 
required, officer charge blockade, leaving said 
port every vessel required 
according law, showing violation conditions 
violations said conditions involve 
forfeiture condemnation vessel cargo, exclusion 
parties concerned privilege entering United 
States war purpose whatever. 
 
respects, except herein existing blockade remains 
full force effect hitherto established maintained, 
relaxed proclamation except regard port 
expressly applied. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. Done city Washington, 
eighteenth day February, year Lord one thousand eight 
hundred independence United States 
eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President   WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COMMANDER 
 
EXECUTIVE, MANSION, February 19, 1864. 
 
COMMANDER GEORGE S. Commandant Naval R. 
 
desire case C. clearly 
inconsistent shall much obliged recommendation changed. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM WARREN 
 
NASHVILLE, February 20, 1864. 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD, Secretary State, Washington, 
 
county State elections, must citizens Tennessee take oath 
prescribed Governor Johnson, President's oath amnesty 
entitle appointed hold March election 
County, wish act 
 
WARREN 
 
 
WASHINGTON, February 20, 1864. 
 
WARREN 
 
county elections better stand Governor 
otherwise conflict confusion. seen plan. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 22, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Saint LOUIS, MO.: 
 
Colonel ordered to-day, mere omission 
done before. questions despatch yet 
prepared answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL STEELE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 22, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL STEELE, Little Rock, 
 
yesterday received. conference citizens Let 
election 14th March agreed. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL F. STEELE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, February 25, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL STEELE, Little Rock, 
 
General going Arkansas. probably make 
Mississippi home gulf ocean, 
affairs. 
 
one time intend call explain fully 
could letter telegraph, avoid difficulty coming 
made plan here, convention made one there, 
even given 
two weeks. Please show Governor save 
telegraphing him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DESERTERS DEATH SENTENCES 
 
GENERAL ORDERS, 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, OFFICE, 
 
WASHINGTON, February 26, 1864. 
 
Sentence 
 
President directs sentences deserters 
condemned court-martial death, otherwise 
acted upon him, imprisonment war Dry 
Florida, sent suitable orders 
army commanders. 
 
commanding power act proceedings 
cases, authorized special cases restore 
duty deserters sentence, judgment service 
thereby 
 
Copies orders issued foregoing instructions 
immediately forwarded Adjutant-General 
General. 
 
order Secretary War: B. D. Assistant 
Adjutant-General 
 
 
 
 
FEMALE SPY 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 26, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Monroe, Va.: 
 
cannot remember whose request gave pass Mrs. 
course detain her, evidence spy strong 
her. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 26, 1864. 
 
HON. W. 
 
DEAR dislike make changes office long 
avoided. embarrassments dislike two 
appointments one do. Send name man 
present marshal, nominate Provost-Marshal 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
E. H. 
 
WASHINGTON, February 27, 1864. 
 
HON. E. EAST, Secretary State, Nashville, Tennessee 
 
telegram instant asking copy despatch 
Warren Esq., Nashville Press office, referred 
Governor Johnson. reply Mr. brief 
intended say county State elections 
Tennessee, oath prescribed proclamation Governor Johnson 
January, 1864, ordering election Tennessee 
first Saturday March next, entirely satisfactory test 
loyalty persons proposing offering vote said 
coming would better observed followed. 
conflict oath amnesty proclamation eighth 
December, 1863, prescribed Governor Johnson 
proclamation 
 
person taken oath amnesty eighth December, 1863, 
obtained pardon intends observe good 
faith, objection taking prescribed Governor 
Johnson test 
 
seen examined Governor proclamation, entirely 
satisfied plan, restore State government 
place control citizens truly loyal Government 
United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Please send Governor Johnson. A. L. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 27, 1864 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
SIR:--You ask instructions relation Report 
Special Commission constituted order War Department, dated 
December 5, 1863, "to enrolment quotas City 
State New York, report whether any, what, errors 
therein, any, 
 
correspondence Governor New York last 
summer, understood complain several 
districts State neither accurately honestly made; 
view this, I, draft immediately ordered 
arbitrary reduction quotas several districts wherein 
seemed large, said: "After four districts, 
also shall carefully 
and, please, agents may witness every step 
subsequent letter believe additional districts 
put list idea work 
according law, presence complaining party, 
thereby correct anything might found commission, 
whose work seem proceeded upon totally 
different idea. going forth find men all, proceeded 
altogether upon paper mental One 
understand, that, law stands, attempting 
follow it, enrolling officers could made 
much accurately did. report point might 
useful Congress. commission conclude quotas draft 
based upon entire population, proceed upon basis 
give table State New York, districts 
reduced draft, let quotas 
stand made enrolling officers, districts wherein 
table requires let reduced according 
table precedent subsequent action. 
But, think report may, full consideration, shown 
much valuable it, suggest consideration given 
it, especially considered whether suggestions 
without alteration law. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL THOMAS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, February 28, 1864. 
 
GENERAL L. THOMAS, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
see despatch yesterday Secretary War. 
 
wish would go Mississippi River once, take hold 
master contraband business. understand better 
man does. Mr. Miller's system doubtless well intended, 
hear fear that, in, would fall dead 
within Go judge. Mr. 
probably follow something subject, 
wait him. induce violate neglect 
military order General-in-Chief Secretary War. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CHASE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 29, 1864. 
 
HON. SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I would taken time answer 22d 
suppose evil could result delay, 
especially as, note, promptly acknowledged receipt yours, 
promised fuller answer. Now, consideration find really 
little say. knowledge Mr. letter made 
public came day had, spite myself, 
known existence several days before. yet read it, 
think shall not. surprised appearance 
letter, knowledge Mr. committee, 
secret issues which, supposed, came it, secret agents who, 
supposed, sent several weeks. known 
little things friends allowed know. bring 
documents me, read them; tell think 
fit tell me, inquire more. 
 
fully concur neither us justly held responsible 
respective friends may without 
countenance assure you, assured me, assault 
made upon 
 
Whether shall remain head Treasury Department 
question allow consider standpoint 
judgment public service, and, view, 
perceive occasion change. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL THOMAS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, March 
 
GENERAL L. 
 
Mr. Lewis, mentioned despatch sent Louisville 
days ago. little personal acquaintance him; 
confidence several members Congress seem know 
well. hopes useful, without charge government, 
introduction system Mississippi 
acquainted with, access to, many 
wish adopt system. show two letters 
mine subject, one somewhat General, relating 
named different principle. also show 
suggestions coming themselves. desire 
promise letters, far practicable, may good 
faith carried out, suggestions may heard 
adopted, far may principles stated, 
justice, laborers. herein intend 
mature judgment point. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL STEELE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., March 3, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL STEELE, Little Rock, 
 
including address people Arkansas received. approve 
address thank it. relation William M. 
also received. Let take oath December 8, go work 
new constitution, it, immediately issue 
special pardon him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort 
Monroe, Va.: 
 
Admiral here, course anxious son. 
Please send know learn fate. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER REGARD EXPORTATION TOBACCO BELONGING FRENCH 
GOVERNMENT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, March 7, 1864. 
 
Whereas, Executive order 10th November last permission 
given certain tobacco belonging French government 
insurgent territory, tobacco supposed purchased 
paid prior 4th day March, whereas 
subsequently ascertained part least said tobacco 
purchased subsequently date, fact made necessary 
suspend carrying effect said whereas, pursuant 
mutual satisfactory understanding upon subject 
reached, directed order aforesaid may carried 
effect, understood quantity French tobacco 
exported shall exceed seven thousand 
tobacco respecting exportation application 
originally made French government. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM UNITED STATES MARSHAL, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 7, 1864. 
 
U.S. MARSHAL, Louisville, Ky.: 
 
order suspend sale property proceedings 
cases United States Dr. John B. English, S. S. English, 
John L. Also 
Thomas A. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
MAJOR Please send JNO. G. Private 
Secretary 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 9, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
New York City votes hundred majority allowing soldiers 
vote, rest State nearly side. Tell 
soldiers. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, March 9, 1864. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES 
 
compliance resolution Senate 1st instant, 
respecting points commencement Union Pacific Railroad, 
one hundredth degree west branch road, 
western boundary Iowa said one hundredth degree 
transmit accompanying report Secretary 
Interior, containing information called for. 
 
deem proper add 17th day November last Executive 
order made upon subject delivered vice-president 
Union Pacific Railroad Company, fixed point western 
boundary State Iowa company construct 
branch road one hundredth degree west 
declared within limits Iowa opposite 
town Nebraska. Since company represented 
upon actual made determined upon precise point 
departure said branch road Missouri River, located 
described accompanying report Secretary 
Interior, point within limits designated order 
November last; inasmuch order record 
Executive Departments, company desired definite one, 
made order copy caused 
filed Department Interior. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS GENERAL GRANT, 
 
MARCH 9, 1864. 
 
GENERAL expression nation's approbation 
already done, reliance remains 
existing great struggle, presented commission 
constituting Lieutenant-General Army United States. 
 
high honor, additional responsibility. 
country herein you, so, God, sustain you. scarcely 
need add, speak country, goes hearty 
personal 
 
 
 
GENERAL GRANT'S REPLY. 
 
Mr. accept commission, gratitude high 
honor 
 
aid noble armies fought many fields 
common country, earnest endeavor disappoint 

 
feel full weight responsibilities me, 
know due all, 
favor Providence leads nations men. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER U. S. GRANT COMMAND ARMIES UNITED STATES. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., March 10, 1864. 
 
authority act Congress revive grade 
lieutenant-General United States Army, approved February 29, 1864, 
Lieutenant-General S. Grant, United States Army, assigned 
command Armies United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., March 12, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Little Rock, 
 
appointing officers Arkansas now, try remember 
best get largest vote possible, 
course much possible right side. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL (Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 13, 1864 
 
HON. MICHAEL 
 
DEAR SIR:--I congratulate fixed name history 
first free-state governor Louisiana. Now, 
convention, among things probably define elective 
barely suggest private consideration, whether 
colored people may let instance, 
intelligent, especially fought ranks. 
would probably help, trying time come, keep 
liberty within family freedom. 
public, alone. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND MEN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, MARCH 14, 1864. 
 
order supply force required drafted Navy 
provide adequate reserve force addition 
five hundred thousand men called February 1, 1864, call 
hereby made draft ordered two hundred thousand men 
military service Navy, Marine United States. 
 
proportional quotas different 
election districts, counties, made known 
account taken 
credits former 
 
15th day April, 1864, designated time 
numbers required ward city, town, etc., may raised 
voluntary made ward city, 
town, etc., shall filled quota assigned within 
time designated number required fill said 
commenced soon 15th April 
 
Government bounties paid continue April I, 1864, 
time additional bounties cease. date one hundred 
dollars bounty paid, provided act approved July 22, 
1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 15, 1864 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
General assigned command department, 
could General Frank Blair, without difficulty detriment 
service, assigned command Corps commanded last 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PASS GENERAL D. E. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 15, 1864. 
 
MAY CONCERN 
 
Major-General making way 
New Orleans, returning ocean, land naval 
officers and, directed furnish reasonable transportation 
reasonable facilities personal staff 
inconsistent public service. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 15, 1864. 
 
EXCELLENCY MICHAEL Governor Louisiana 
 
order, hereby invested powers exercised 
hitherto military governor Louisiana. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS FAIR PATENT OFFICE, 
 
WASHINGTON, MARCH 16, 1864. 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN: 
 
appear say word. extraordinary war engaged 
falls heavily upon classes people heavily upon 
soldier. said, "All man hath give 
contribute substance, soldier puts 
life often yields country's cause. highest 
then, due soldier. 
 
extraordinary war, extraordinary developments manifested 
themselves, seen former among 
manifestations nothing remarkable 
relief suffering soldiers chief agents 
women America. 
 
accustomed use language never studied 
art paying must say, 
said orators since creation world 
praise women applied women America, would 
justice conduct war. close saying, God 
bless women America. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE ASSOCIATION NEW YORK, 
 
MARCH 21, 1864. 
 
GENTLEMEN 
 
generously 
gratefully accepted. 
 
address shows, existing rebellion means 
tends perpetuation African 
is, fact, war upon rights working people. Partly 
show view escaped attention, partly cannot 
better express myself, read passage message Congress 
December, 
 
"It continues develop insurrection 
exclusively, war upon first principle popular government, 
rights people. Conclusive evidence found 
grave maturely considered public documents, well General 
tone insurgents. documents find 
existing right denial people right 
selection public officers, except legislature, 
boldly labored argument prove large control 
people government source political evil. 
sometimes hinted possible refuge power people. 
present position could scarcely justified omit 
raising warning voice approach returning despotism. 
 
"It needed, fitting here, General argument 
made favor popular one point, 
others, ask brief 
attention. effort place capital equal 
labor, structure government. assumed labor 
available connection capital; nobody labors unless 
somebody else, owning capital, somehow use induces 
labor. assumed, next considered whether best capital 
shall hire laborers, thus induce work consent 
buy them, drive without consent. proceeded 
naturally concluded laborers either hired laborers, 
call slaves. And, further, assumed whoever 
hired fixed condition life. 
relation capital labor assumed, thing 
free man fixed life condition hired 
assumptions false, inferences 
groundless. 
 
prior to, independent of, capital. Capital fruit 
labor, could never existed labor first existed. 
Labor superior capital, deserves much higher 
consideration. Capital rights, worthy protection 
rights. denied is, probably always 
be, relation capital labor, producing mutual 
error assuming whole labor community exists within 
relation. men capital, avoid labor themselves, 
and, capital, hire buy another labor them. 
large majority belong neither work others, 
others working them. Southern States, majority 
whole people, neither slaves 
large majority neither Men 
families, sons, themselves, 
houses, shops, taking whole product 
themselves, asking favors capital one hand, hired 
laborers slaves other. forgotten considerable 
number persons mingle labor capital; is, labor 
hands, also buy hire others labor them, 
mixed distinct class. principle stated 
disturbed existence mixed class. 
 
already said, not, necessity, 
thing free hired laborer fixed condition life. 
Many independent men everywhere States, years back 
hired laborers. prudent penniless beginner world 
labors wages while, saves surplus buy tools land 
himself, labors account another while, length 
another new beginner help him. generous 
prosperous system way hope all, 
consequent energy progress, improvement condition all. 
men living worthy trusted toil 
less inclined touch take aught 
honestly Let beware surrendering political power 
already possess, which, surrendered, surely used close 
door advancement they, fix new 
burdens upon them, till liberty shall 
 
views expressed remain much None 
deeply interested resist present rebellion working 
people. Let beware working division hostility 
among themselves. notable feature disturbance 
city last summer hanging working people working 
people. never so. strongest bond human sympathy, 
outside family one working people, 
nations, lead war 
upon property, owners property. Property fruit 
property positive good world. 
rich shows others may become rich, and, hence, 
encouragement industry enterprise. Let 
pull house another, let labor diligently build 
one himself, thus example shall safe 
violence 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 22, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Hon. W. R. says requested letter effect 
special exchange Col. A. F. Illinois 
Volunteers, shall glad effect it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CORRESPONDENCE GENERAL C. SCHURZ. 
 

 
WASHINGTON, March 13, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHURZ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours February reached four days ago; 
delay little consequence, found, feeling 
could invite without difficulty least would 
perhaps would public service. Allow 
suggest wish remain military service, 
dangerous get temporarily it; because, 
major-general out, next impossible even President 
get again. appreciation ability correct 
principle, course would glad service 
country approaching political fear cannot 
properly without 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION 
 
MARCH 26, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, become necessary define cases insurgent 
enemies entitled benefits Proclamation President 
United States, made 8th day December, 1863, 
manner shall proceed avail 
whereas objects Proclamation suppress 
insurrection restore authority United States; 
whereas amnesty therein proposed President offered 
reference objects 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby proclaim declare said Proclamation apply 
cases persons who, time seek obtain 
benefits thereof taking oath thereby military, 
naval, civil bonds, 
civil, military, naval agents United States, 
prisoners war, persons detained offences kind, either 
contrary apply 
persons who, yet large, free arrest, 
shall voluntarily come forward take said 
oath, purpose restoring peace, establishing national 
authority. 
 
Persons excluded amnesty offered said Proclamation may 
apply President like 
application receive due consideration. 
 
declare proclaim oath presented aforesaid 
proclamation 8th December, 1863, may taken 
commissioned officer, civil, military, naval, service 
United States, civil military officer State 
Territory insurrection, who, laws thereof, may qualified 
administering 
 
officers receive oaths hereby authorized give 
thereof persons respectively made, 
officers hereby required transmit original records 
oaths, early day may convenient, Department 
State, remain 
Government. 
 
Secretary State keep thereof, will, 
proper cases, issue records 
customary form official 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 28, 1864. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The Governor Kentucky here, desires 
following points definitely 
 
First. quotas troops furnished, furnished, 
Kentucky may adjusted upon basis actually reduced able-bodied 
men gone rebel required 
furnish quotas upon fair adjustment upon 
basis. 
 
Second. whatever extent enlistment one both, 
colored troops may found necessary within State, may 
conducted within law Congress; and, far practicable, free 
collateral 
 
think requests Governor shall 
obliged give full hearing, best 
effect objects. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. G. MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 29, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter Colonel inclosing slip 
asking court laid 
Secretary War, request would consider it. quite 
natural feel subject; yet 
think country belief 
honor demands, public interest demands, 
country knows events done good believe 
agrees much better engaged trying 
more, necessarily would be, court 

 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, Army Potomac: 
 
Captain spoke desiring go 
camp, company Mrs. Senator Mrs. Grant I, 
others, agreed last night should, despatch, kindly 
call attention Captain 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. G. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 4, 1864. 
 
A. G. ESQ., Frankfort, Kentucky: 
 
DEAR SIR:--You ask put writing substance 
verbally said day, presence, Governor 
Senator follows: 
 
"I naturally slavery wrong, nothing wrong. 
cannot remember think feel, yet never 
understood Presidency conferred upon right 
act officially upon judgment feeling. oath took 
would best ability protect, defend 
Constitution United States. could take office without 
taking oath. view might take oath get 
power, break oath using power. understood, too, 
ordinary civil administration oath even forbade practically 
indulge primary abstract judgment moral question slavery. 
publicly declared many times, many ways. aver that, 
day, done official act mere deference abstract 
judgment feeling slavery. understand, however, oath 
preserve Constitution best ability, imposed upon 
duty every indispensable means, government, 
nation, Constitution organic law. 
possible lose nation yet preserve Constitution? General 
law, life limb must yet often limb must 
save life; life never wisely given save 
felt measures, otherwise unconstitutional, might become 
becoming indispensable preservation Constitution, 
preservation nation. Right wrong, assumed ground, 
avow it. could feel best ability even 
tried preserve Constitution, if, save slavery, 
minor matter, permit wreck government, country, 
Constitution, altogether. When, early war, General Fremont 
attempted military emancipation, forbade it, 
think indispensable necessity. When, little later, General 
Cameron, Secretary War, suggested arming blacks, 
yet think indispensable necessity. 
When, still later, General Hunter attempted military emancipation, 
forbade it, yet think indispensable necessity 
come. When, March, May, July, 1862, made earnest 
successive appeals Border States favor compensated emancipation, 
believed indispensable necessity military emancipation 
arming blacks would come, unless averted measure. 
declined proposition, was, best judgment, driven 
alternative either surrendering Union, 
Constitution, laying strong hand upon colored element. chose 
latter. choosing it, hoped greater gain 
entirely year trial shows 
loss foreign relations, none home popular sentiment, 
none white military force, loss how, anywhere. 
contrary, shows gain quite one hundred thirty thousand 
soldiers, seamen, laborers. palpable facts, which, 
facts, men; could 
without measure. 
 
"And let Union man complains measure test 
writing one line rebellion force 
next, taking hundred thirty 
thousand men Union side, placing would 
measure cannot face case stated, 
cannot face 
 
add word verbal conversation. telling 
tale attempt compliment claim 
controlled events, confess plainly events controlled me. 
Now, end three years' struggle, nation's condition 
either party, man, devised expected. God alone claim 
it. Whither tending seems plain. God wills removal 
great wrong, wills also North, well 
South, shall pay fairly wrong, impartial 
history find therein new cause justice 
goodness God. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MRS. HORACE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 5, 1864. 
 
HORACE 
 
petition persons would 
free slave children, petition appears 
handed days since Senator Please tell 
little people glad young hearts full 
generous sympathy, that, power grant 
ask, trust remember God has, that, seems, 
wills it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 12, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
pressed get special Jacob C. 
first Company Pennsylvania Volunteers. Please 
without detriment 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 17, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Private William Company B, New York 
Volunteers, convicted desertion, execution suspended 
numerous cases. Captain commanding regiment, 
nearly company officers, petition 
full pardon restoration company. good 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LECTURE LIBERTY 
 
ADDRESS SANITARY FAIR BALTIMORE, 
 
APRIL 18, 1864. 
 
LADIES mind Baltimore, 
cannot fail note world Looking upon many people 
assembled best may, soldiers Union, 
occurs three years ago soldiers could much 
pass Baltimore. change till great 
Blessings brave men wrought change, 
fair women strive reward it! 
 
Baltimore suggests could happen within Baltimore. change 
within Baltimore part far wider change. war began, 
three years ago, neither party, man, expected would last till 
now. looked end, way, long ere to-day. Neither 
anticipate domestic slavery would much affected war. 
are; war slavery much affected 
much needs true man proposes 
God 
 
see past, though may claim directed it; 
seeing it, case, feel hopeful confident 
future. 
 
world never good definition word liberty, 
American people, now, much want one. declare 
liberty; using word mean thing. 
word liberty may mean man pleases 
himself, product others word may 
mean men please men, product 
men's labor. two, different, incompatible 
things, called name, liberty. follows 
things is, respective parties, called two different 
incompatible 
 
shepherd drives wolf throat, sheep 
thanks shepherd wolf denounces 
act, liberty, especially sheep black 
one. Plainly, sheep wolf agreed upon definition 
word liberty; precisely difference prevails to-day among 
us human even North, love liberty. 
Hence behold process thousands daily passing 
bondage hailed advance liberty, 
others destruction liberty. Recently, 
seems, people Maryland something define liberty, 
thanks that, done, dictionary 

 
becoming one position make speeches length; 
another subject upon feel ought say word. 
painful true, fear, reached us, 
rebel forces Fort Pillow, west end Tennessee, 
Mississippi River, three hundred colored soldiers white 
officers believe latter turned 
seems 
anxiety public mind whether Government duty 
colored soldier, service, point. beginning 
war, time, use colored troops 
change purpose wrought 
take time explain. Upon clear conviction duty resolved turn 
element strength responsible 
American people, Christian world, history, final 
account God. determined use negro soldier, 
way give protection given soldier. 
difficulty stating principle, practically applying 
it. mistake suppose Government indifferent 
matter, best regard it. to-day 
know colored soldier, white officer commanding colored soldiers, 
rebels made fear it, 
believe it, may know it. take life one 
prisoners assumption murder ours, short 
certainty murder ours, might serious, 
mistake. Fort affair thoroughly 
investigation probably show conclusively truth is. 
said shall turn 
massacre Fort Pillow, almost safe say 
none, none, elsewhere. massacre 
three hundred there, even tenth part three hundred, 
conclusively shall surely 
come. matter grave consideration exact course 
apply supposed case must come. 
 
massacre black company officers Fort 
prisoners later on, day 
ordered executed. black soldiers tied alive individual 
man plank like cord wood 
white officers D.W.] 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 20, 1864. 
 
ESQ., Rock Island, Ill.: 
 
Thomas J. late agent Department 
island Rock Island, removed suspended position 
charge sold stone island private 
Mr. old acquaintance friend mine, 
thank you, will, set day days place 
take testimony point. Notify Mr. one J. B. 
understand, makes present 
Take testimony writing offered sides, report 
full me. Please me. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMANDING FORT 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 20, 1864. 
 
OFFICER MILITARY COMMAND, Fort Warren, Boston Harbor, Mass.: 
 
man name Charles sentence 
death desertion, Fort Warren, suspend execution order 
send record trial. sentenced 
telegraph executed. Answer events. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMANDING FORT 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 
 
OFFICER COMMAND FORT WARREN, Boston Harbor, Mass.: 
 
order sent yesterday regard Charles hereby 
withdrawn act never existed. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., April 21, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, New York: 
 
Yesterday induced telegraph officer military command 
Fort Warren, Boston Harbor, Massachusetts, suspending execution 
Charles executed desertion. now, 
reaching order case, telegraphed officer 
withdrawing leave case entirely you. 
man's friends pressing me, refer you, take 
action myself. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 23, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Senator Ten anxious special exchange Frank 
J. Ninth Tennessee Cavalry now, lately, Island, 
T. Ten Eighteenth U. S. Infantry, Richmond. 
would like done. be? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT OFFER TROOPS, APRIL 23, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
1. Governors Ohio, Indiana, Illinois, Iowa, Wisconsin offer 
President infantry troops approaching campaign follows: 
Ohio, thirty Indiana, twenty Illinois, twenty 
Iowa, ten Wisconsin, five thousand. 
 
2. term service one hundred days, reckoned date 
muster service United States, unless sooner 
 
3. troops mustered service United States 
regiments, regiments filled up, according regulations, 
regiments organized according 
regulations War Department. whole number furnished within 
twenty days date notice acceptance proposition. 
 
4. troops 
paid United States infantry volunteers, serve 
wherever services may required, within 
without respective States. 
 
5. bounty paid troops, service charged credited 
draft. 
 
6. draft three years' service go State district 
quota filled up; officer soldier 
special service shall credited service 

 
JOHN Governor Ohio. O. P. MORTON, Governor Indiana. RICHARD 
Governor Illinois. WILLIAM M. STONE, Governor Iowa. JAMES T. 
LEWIS, Governor Wisconsin 
 

 
April 23, 1864. 
 
foregoing proposition governors accepted, Secretary 
War directed carry execution. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 23, 1864. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR: 
 
DEAR understanding Major-General Frank P. 
Blair time took seat Congress last winter, asks 
withdraw resignation sent 
field. Let done. Let order sending shown 
to-day names 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM JOHN 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, April 25, 1864. 
 
JOHN WILLIAMS, Springfield, Ill.: 
 
15th received. Thanks kind 
would accept offer once, fear might 
impropriety it, though see would. think 
while. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, April 25, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Mr. brought note foot petition 
believe, case executed to-day. record 
examined here, shows strong case pardon 
unless something poor man's favor outside record, 
ground may know, not. note means 
know thing rendering suspension execution 
proper, judgment, liberty suspend it. Otherwise 
interfere. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL THOMAS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., April 26, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL THOMAS, Chattanooga, 
 
Suspend execution death sentence young Wisconsin, 
condemned sleeping till orders, forward 
record examination. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., April 27, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Little Rock, 
 
much gratified learn got large vote, nearly 
right way, late election; less State 
government including legislature, organized good working 
order. Whatever protect you; meanwhile must 
utmost protect yourselves. Present all. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, APRIL 28, 1864. 
 
HONORABLE SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
honor transmit herewith address President 
United States, Houses Congress, 
condition wants people east Tennessee, asking 
attention necessity action part Government 
relief, address presented committee 
organization called "The East Tennessee Relief 
 
Deeply condition loyal suffering 
people, make specific recommendation 
relief. military continue best 
within power. address represents construction direct 
railroad communication Cincinnati way central 
Kentucky would great consequence present emergency. may 
remembered annual message December, 1861, railroad 
construction add that, hearty concurrence 
Congress, would yet pleased construct road, 
relief people continuing military importance. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
APRIL 28, 1864. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
obedience resolution honorable body, copy 
herewith honor make following brief statement, 
believed contain information 
 
Prior meeting present Congress, Robert C. Schenck, 
Ohio, Frank P. Blair, Jr., Missouri, members elect thereto, 
consent Senate held commissions Executive 
volunteer army. General Schenck tendered 
resignation said commission, took seat House 
Representatives, assembling thereof, upon distinct verbal 
understanding Secretary War Executive might, 
time session, withdraw said 
resignation return field. 
 
General Blair was, temporary assignment General Sherman, command 
corps battles front Chattanooga, march 
relief Knoxville, occurred latter days November 
early days December last, course present 
assembling Congress. subsequently arrived here, 
allowed Secretary War Executive, conditions 
promise allowed made General Schenck. 
 
General Schenck applied withdraw 
General Grant made producing change 
General Blair sought assigned command 
made known Generals Grant Sherman, assented 
them, particular corps 
 
arranged understood, remembered, much 
month ago; formal withdrawal General 
making order command corps, 
War Department last week, perhaps 23d 
April instant. summary whole, may stated General 
Blair holds military commission appointment herein 
stated, believed acting major-General upon 
assumed validity commission herein stated, connection 
facts herein stated, otherwise. letters, notes, 
orders, perhaps documents connection 
subject, believed would throw additional light upon 
it, cheerfully furnished 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 30, 1864. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
expecting see spring campaign wish 
express way entire satisfaction done 
time, far understand it. 
 
particulars plans neither know seek know. 
and, pleased this, wish 
restraints upon you. anxious 
great disaster capture men great number shall 
know points less likely escape attention 
would mine. anything wanting within power 
give, fail let know it. 
 
now, brave army cause, may God sustain you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES 
 
MAY 2, 1864. 
 
HONORABLE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
compliance request contained resolution 29th 
copy resolution herewith honor 
transmit following: 
 
orders relating resignation 
Major-General Frank P. Blair, Jr., 
 
foregoing constitutes sought resolution far 
remembered found upon search. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., May 4, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, Chattanooga, Tenn.: 
 
imploring appeal behalf citizens say Order 
compel go north sense 
order, even request anything 
least shall upon military operations, anything 
consistently operations suffering people 
shall glad of. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 5, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
President directs inquire whether day yet fixed 
execution citizen Robert 
 
JOHN HAY, Major Assistant 
 
 
 
 
MRS. S. B. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 9, 1864. 
 
MRS. B. West Pa.: 
 
mutual friend, Judge Lewis, tells honor 
inquire personal anxious days 
regard armies field, considerably now, 
favorable news them. 
 
sure join hope 
yourself, good 
can, relieve comfort gallant soldiers compose 
them. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RECOMMENDATION 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 9, 1864 
 
FRIENDS UNION 
 
Enough known army operations, within last five days, claim 
special gratitude God. remains demands 
sincere prayers reliance upon effort 
recommend patriots homes, places 
public worship, wherever may be, unite common thanksgiving 
prayer Almighty God. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, 
 
MAY 9, 1864. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I much obliged compliment 
call, though apprehend owing good news received to-day 
Army, desire see me. indeed grateful 
brave men struggling enemy field, 
noble commanders directed them, especially 
commanders following victories 
think, without knowing particulars plans 
General Grant, accomplished importance 
first believe, know (and especially grateful 
General Grant purposes, made 
points, to-day line 
moved armies. volunteer say glad 
happened, great deal still done. 
grateful brave men officers events past 
days, should, all, grateful Almighty God, gives us 
victory. 
 
enough yet us requiring loyal men patriots 
perform share labor follow example modest 
General head armies, sink personal consideration 
sake country. commend keep 
mood characteristic brave loyal man. 
said expected came you. thanks 
call, bid 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., May 10, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Please tell trouble Dr. Also please ask 
Whittington give view case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 11, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Complaints coming 
Buchanan counties. Please ascertain truth, correct found 
wrong, telegraph me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
P. B. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 12, 1864 
 
F. B. ESQ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I honor acknowledge receipt 
communication 28th April, offer replace present 
garrison Port Trumbull volunteers, propose raise 
seems time accept 
proposition account special duties upon 
garrison mentioned, cannot pass instance 
individual Permit me, Government, express 
cordial thanks generous 
worthy note among many called forth times national 
trial. 
 
truly, obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE METHODIST DELEGATION, MAY 14, 1864. 
 
response address, allow accuracy 
historical indorse sentiments thank 
nation's name sure promise Nobly 
Government been, churches, would utter nothing 
might least appear any. Yet without this, 
may fairly said, Methodist Church, less 
devoted best, greatest numbers important 
all. fault others Methodist Church 
soldiers field, prayers 
Heaven other. God bless Methodist Church Bless 
blessed God, great trial us 

 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 18, 1864. 
 
EXCELLENCY RICHARD YATES, Springfield, Ill.: 
 
proclamation forgery. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ARREST IMPRISONMENT NEWSPAPER REPORTERS 
 
ORDER GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 18, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL JOHN A. DIX, Commanding New York: 
 
Whereas printed published 
morning New York World New York Journal Commerce, 
newspapers printed published city New York, false 
proclamation purporting signed President 
Secretary State, publication 
treasonable nature, designed give aid comfort enemies 
United States rebels war Government 
therefore hereby commanded forthwith 
arrest fort military prison command, 
publishers aforesaid newspapers, 
persons as, public notice given falsehood 
said publication, print publish intent give aid 
comfort enemy; hold persons arrested close 
custody brought trial military commission 
also take possession military force 
printing New York World Journal Commerce, 
hold orders, prohibit publication 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
morning May 18, forged proclamation published 
World, Journal Commerce, New York. proclamation named 
day prayer, called fresh troops, 
raise whatever quotas 
furnished day 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL B. P. BUTLER. 
 

 
WASHINGTON, D. C., May 18, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Hundred, Va.: 
 
receiving dispatch yesterday, idea commissions 
volunteers end three years occurred me. 
think trouble come it; and, events, shall take care 
far regular 
army, think shall another, least combined 
operations progress, direction General Grant, within 
command shall 
 
Meanwhile, behalf yourself, officers, men, please accept 
hearty thanks far done. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING EXEMPTION AMERICAN CONSULS MILITARY SERVICE 
 
MAY 19, 1864. 
 
officially announced State Department citizens 
United States holding commissions recognized Consuls foreign 
powers, law exempt military service 
 
Therefore mere enrolment citizen holding foreign 
held commission, shall drafted 
revoked unless shall previously resigned 
order another may received. 
 
bearing date 3d day May, 1858, issued 
Charles citizen United States, recognizing 
St. Louis, Missouri, declaring free exercise 
enjoy powers, privileges allowed Consuls 
favored nations United States, said Hunt 
sought military duty country, 
consequence thus invested consular functions 
foreign power United States, deemed advisable said 
Charles Hunt longer permitted continue exercise 
said powers, 
 
therefore declare longer recognize said Hunt 
St. Louis, Missouri, permit 
exercise enjoy powers privileges allowed 
consuls nation, hereby wholly revoke 
said heretofore given, declare absolutely 
void day forward. 
 
testimony whereof, caused letters made 
seal United States America hereunto 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR OTHERS. EXECUTIVE MANSION, May 21, 1864 
 
GOVERNOR O. P. 
 
getting forward troops sustain General 
lines promises much good. Please put best efforts 
work. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Governor Yates, Springfield, Illinois; Governor Stone, 
Governor Lewis, Madison, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. WAR DEPARTMENT WASHINGTON, D. C., May 21, 
1864 
 
A. Baltimore, Md.: 
 
cannot postpone execution convicted spy mere telegraphic 
despatch signed name never heard before. General may give 
pass see 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR WASHINGTON CITY, May 24, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Columbus, Ohio: 
 
Secretary War asking something 
nothing bad anywhere. seen despatch Grant, 
11 P.M., May 23, North Anna partly across it, ends 
follows: looks exceedingly favorable us." nothing 
later him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Mr. J. C. Swift wishes pass follow army pick 
give say so, otherwise not. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
job big even request 
D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM CONCERNING TRANSPORTATION NEW YORK NAVAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 26, 1864. 
 
MAY 
 
pressed claim Mr. O. 
transportation called Naval Brigade New York 
Fortress force special organization got one 
pretended pursuance written authority me, 
fact, pursuing authority scarcely anything whatever. 
credit given Mr. given teeth express 
declaration Government would responsible class 
expenses part transportation 
became useful Government, paid 
neither time means ascertain equitable 
appropriation pay New 
York ascertain would compensate much transportation 
result Government, might step towards 
reaching justice. write memory, believe 
substantially correct. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
P. A. CONKLING OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, June 3, 1864. 
 
HON. F. A. CONKLING OTHERS. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter, inviting present mass meeting 
loyal citizens, held New York 4th instant, 
purpose expressing gratitude Lieutenant-General Grant signal 
services, received yesterday. impossible 
approve, nevertheless, whatever may tend strengthen sustain 
General Grant noble armies direction. previous 
high estimate General Grant maintained 
occurred remarkable campaign 
magnitude difficulty task prove less 
expected. brave soldiers midst great 
trial, trust meeting shape good words 
may turn men guns, moving support. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT LETTER TOUCHING REPUBLICAN NATIONAL CONVENTION. 
 
JUNE 5, 1864. 
 

 
unquestionably right. Mr. good man, 
heard thought Wish interfere 
Cannot interfere platform. Convention must judge 
itself. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 6, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Private James New York 
Volunteers, sentence Dry attempt 
friends appeal colonel consent, 
send Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. WASHINGTON, June 8, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
to-day received. unable conceive message 
less safe express send verbal 
message, messenger one additional person let 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE PRESIDENT LINCOLN 
 
JUNE 9, 1864. 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN GENTLEMEN 
 
neither conceal gratification restrain expression 
gratitude Union people, convention, 
continued effort save advance nation, deemed 
unworthy remain present position. know reason doubt 
shall accept nomination yet perhaps 
declare definitely reading considering called 
platform. say now, however, approve declaration favor 
amending Constitution prohibit slavery throughout nation. 
people hundred days explicit notice 
could within days resume allegiance without overthrow 
institution, could resume afterward, 
elected stand out, amendment Constitution proposed 
became fitting necessary conclusion final success 
Union cause. alone meet cover 
unconditional Union men, North South, perceive importance 
embrace it. joint names Liberty Union, let us labor give 
legal form practical effect. 
 
 
 
 
PLATFORM UNION NATIONAL CONVENTION HELD BALTIMORE, JUNE 
8, 1864. 
 
1. Resolved, highest duty every American citizen 
maintain enemies integrity Union 
paramount authority Constitution laws United States; 
that, laying aside differences political opinion, pledge 
ourselves, Union men, common sentiment 
common object, everything power aid Government 
force arms rebellion authority, 
bringing punishment due crimes rebels 
arrayed it. 
 
2. Resolved, approve determination Government 
United States compromise rebels, offer terms 
peace, except may based upon unconditional surrender 
hostility return allegiance Constitution 
laws United States, call upon Government 
maintain position, prosecute war utmost possible 
vigor complete suppression rebellion, full reliance 
upon patriotism, heroic 
devotion American people Country free 
institutions. 
 
3. Resolved, slavery cause, constitutes 
strength, rebellion, must be, always everywhere, 
hostile principles republican government, justice 
national safety demand utter complete soil 
maintain acts 
proclamations Government, 
gigantic evil, favor, furthermore, 
amendment Constitution, made people conformity 
provisions, shall terminate forever prohibit existence 
slavery within limits jurisdiction United States. 
 
4. Resolved, thanks American people due 
soldiers sailors Army Navy, lives 
defense country honor 
nation owes permanent recognition patriotism 
ample permanent provision 
received honorable wounds service 
country; memories fallen 
defense shall held grateful everlasting 
 
5. Resolved, approve practical wisdom, 
patriotism, fidelity Constitution 
principles American liberty, Abraham Lincoln 
discharged circumstances difficulty great duties 
responsibilities Presidential office; approve 
indorse demanded essential preservation 
nation, within provisions Constitution, measures 
acts adopted defend nation open 
secret approve, Proclamation 
Emancipation, employment Union soldiers men heretofore held 
slavery; full confidence determination carry 
constitutional measures essential salvation 
country full complete effect. 
 
6. Resolved, deem essential General welfare harmony 
prevail national regard worthy 
public confidence official trust cordially indorse 
principles proclaimed resolutions, 
administration Government. 
 
Resolved, Government owes men employed armies, 
without regard distinction color, full protection laws 
war, violation laws, civilized 
nations time war, rebels arms, made 
subject prompt full 
 
Resolved, foreign past added much 
wealth, development resources, increase power 
nation, oppressed nations, 
encouraged liberal policy. 
 
9. Resolved, favor speedy construction 
railroad Pacific coast. 
 
Resolved, national faith, pledged redemption 
public debt, must kept purpose 
recommend economy rigid responsibility public expenditures, 
vigorous system duty every 
loyal State sustain credit promote use national 

 
Resolved, approve position taken Government 
people United States never regard indifference 
attempt European power overthrow force 
fraud institutions republican government Western 
Continent, view extreme menacing 
peace independence country, efforts 
power obtain new governments, sustained 
foreign military force, near proximity United States. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY DELEGATION NATIONAL UNION 
 
JUNE 9, 1864. 
 
say response remarks chairman, 
grateful renewed confidence accorded 
me, convention National 
personal compliment this, yet 
allow believe small portion 
personal compliment me. convention 
nation, alike higher view interests 
country, present great future, part 
entitled appropriate compliment part may lay 
hold opinion convention 
entirely unworthy intrusted place occupied 
last three years. permitted myself, gentlemen, 
conclude best man country; reminded 
connection story old remarked companion 
"it best horses crossing 
 
 
 
 
REPLY DELEGATION OHIO, 
 
JUNE 9, 1864. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--I much obliged 
saying, repeat it, speeches 
answer never know say occasions. 
suppose done kindness connection action 
Baltimore convention, recently taken place, 
which, course, well satisfied. want still 
Baltimore Presidential elections, success General 
Grant. propose constantly bear mind support 
owe brave officers soldiers field first 
importance, therefore bend energies point. 
without longer, propose help close 
saying three cheers General Grant 
officers soldiers command. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS ENVOY 
 
JUNE 11, 1864. 
 
every light State 
object profound interest United States. 
Virtually near intimate 
shelter 
seamen, citizens, lawful occasions 
eastern people free, 
laws, language, religion largely fruit teaching 
example. distinguished part you, Mr. acted 
history interesting country, well known here. gives 
pleasure assure sincere desire render 
United States agreeable yourself, satisfactory 
beneficial people. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS OHIO REGIMENT, 
 
JUNE 11, 1864. 
 
understand come come help us 
nation's day trial, also thank 
promptness call troops. services 
never needed now. know may stay 
take places sent front, 
may go yourselves. Wherever go know best. 
thank you. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL L. THOMAS. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 13, 
1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL THOMAS, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
Complaint made vicinity militia 
seizing negroes carrying without consent, 
according rules whatever, except absolute violence. wish 
would look inform me, see making soldiers 
negroes done according rules acting upon, 
unnecessary irritation avoided. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM THOMAS WASHINGTON, D. C., June 13, 1864. 
 
THOMAS WEBSTER, Philadelphia: 
 
try leave Wednesday afternoon, say 4 P.M., remain till 
Thursday afternoon return. subject events. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, June 15, 1864. A.M. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, Headquarters Army Potomac: 
 
received dispatch 1 P.M. yesterday. begin see it: 
succeed. God bless all. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS SANITARY FAIR PHILADELPHIA, 
 
JUNE 16, 1864. 
 
suppose intended open way say 
something. War best magnitude 
duration one terrible world ever known. 
business totally many places, perhaps all. 
destroyed property, destroyed life, produced 
national debt degree taxation unprecedented history 
country. caused among us may 
almost said hung yet 
known history world. mean 
Sanitary Christian labors relief 
soldiers, Volunteer understood better 
hear myself, first begun Chicago 
next held Boston, Cincinnati, motive 
object lie bottom worthy 
soldier goes fight battles country. 
fair tender hand women much, much, done soldier, 
continually care thought home. 
knowledge forgotten grateful heart. Another 
view institutions worthy thought. voluntary 
giving proof national resources 
national patriotism sustain us all. 
pertinent question, war end? wish name 
day end, lest end come given time. 
accepted war, begin it. accepted object, 
object accomplished war end, hope God 
never end object going 
task, far concerned, takes us three 
years longer. habit making 
almost tempted hazard one. will. is, Grant 
evening position, Meade Pennsylvania, whence 
never enemy Richmond taken. shall 
discover General Grant may greatly capture 
Richmond rapidly large number armed men 
notice, march him? [Cries "Yes, 
shall call upon necessary. 
 
 
 
 
ATTORNEY-GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 24, 1864 
 
HONORABLE 
 
authority Constitution, moved thereto fourth 
section act Congress, entitled "An act making 
support army year ending thirtieth June, 
eighteen hundred purposes, approved June 
is, require opinion writing pay, 
allowed law persons color free 
nineteenth day April, 1861, enlisted mustered 
military service United States month 
December, 1862, sixteenth June, 1864. 
 
Please answer would do, act June 15, 
1864, passed, use opinion satisfy 
act. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 24, 1864. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, Boston, 
 
well Tad General Grant's army. 
Returned yesterday safe sound. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. WASHINGTON, June 24, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Complaint made General Brown best 
suppress Please ascertain report me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER ACCEPTING NOMINATION PRESIDENT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 27, 1864. 
 
HON. WILLIAM OTHERS, Committee Union National 
Convention. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter 14th formally 
nominated convention represent Presidency 
United States four years 4th March next, 
received. nomination gratefully accepted, resolutions 
convention, called platform, heartily 
 
resolution regard republican government 
upon Western Continent fully concurred in, might 
misunderstanding say position Government 
relation action France Mexico, assumed State 
Department indorsed convention among measures acts 
Executive, faithfully maintained long state facts 
shall leave position pertinent 
 
especially gratified soldier forgotten 
convention, forever must remembered 
grateful country whose salvation devote lives. 
 
kind terms 
communicated nomination proceedings convention, 
subscribe myself, 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL P. STEELE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 29, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
understand Congress admit seats persons sent 
Senators Representatives Arkansas. persons apprehend that, 
consequence, may support new State government 
otherwise would. wish give government people 
support protection would members 
admitted, event, view case, 
best toward suppressing 
rebellion. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL GRANT. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 29, 1864. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point: 
 
Dr. wishes visit view getting permission 
introduce army Shall give pass 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM DAVID 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 30, 1864. 
 
HON. DAVID Ohio: nominated Secretary 
Treasury, place Governor Chase, Please come 
without moment's delay. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. L. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 4, 1864. 
 
JOHN L. ESQ. 
 
DEAR made using official power 
defeat Mr. nomination Congress. well satisfied 
Mr. member Congress, know man 
might would correct principle, 
think, friends absolute freedom choice 
among friends. wish, therefore, 
think fit suffrage case, 
thinks fit his. 
precisely rule adhered part, certain 
nomination, recently made, for. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. W. WASHINGTON, July 5, 1864. 
 
J. W. President & R. 
 
say telegraphic communication Well, 
Hook say operations enemy Sigel 
to-day? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, July 5, 1864. 
 
EXCELLENCY SEYMOUR, Governor New York, 
 
President directs inform rebel force, 
estimated fifteen twenty thousand men, invaded State 
Maryland, taken Martinsburg Harper's Ferry, 
threatening public safety requires call 
upon State militia force repel 
therefore directs call militia force twelve thousand 
men State serve one hundred days, 
request utmost despatch forward troops 
Washington steamboat may 
 
Please favor answer earliest 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, 
 
Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SUSPENDING WRIT HABEAS CORPUS, 
 
JULY 5, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, proclamation issued 15th day April, 
1861, President United States announced declared 
laws United States time past, were, 
opposed execution thereof certain States therein 
mentioned, combinations powerful suppressed ordinary 
course judicial proceedings power vested 
law; 
 
Whereas, immediately issuing said proclamation land 
naval forces United States put activity suppress 
said insurrections rebellion; 
 
Whereas, Congress United States, act approved 
third day March, 1863, said rebellion 
President United States, whenever judgment public safety 
may require it, authorized suspend privilege writ 
habeas corpus case throughout United States, part 

 
Whereas, said insurrection rebellion still continue, endangering 
existence Constitution Government United States; 
 
Whereas, military forces United States actively engaged 
suppressing said insurrection rebellion various parts 
States said rebellion successful 
laws public especially States Virginia 

 
Whereas, fifteenth day September last, President 
United States duly issued proclamation, wherein declared 
privilege writ habeas corpus suspended throughout 
United States, Cases whereby authority President 
United States, military, naval, civil officers United 
States, them, hold persons command 
either prisoners war, 
enemy, officers, soldiers, seamen enrolled 
enlisted in, belonging land naval forces United 
States, deserters therefrom, otherwise military law, 
rules articles war, rules regulations prescribed 
military naval service authority President 
United States, resisting draft, offence 
military naval 
 
Whereas, many citizens State Kentucky joined forces 
insurgents, several occasions entered said State 
Kentucky large force without aid comfort furnished 
disloyal citizens United States residing therein, 
greatly disturbed public peace 
civil authorities made flagrant civil war, destroying property 
life various parts State; 
 
Whereas, made known President United States, 
officers commanding National armies, combinations 
formed said State Kentucky, purpose rebel 
forces renew said operations civil war within said State, 
thereby embarrass United States armies operating 
said States Virginia Georgia, even endanger safety. 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
virtue authority vested Constitution laws, 
hereby declare judgment public safety especially requires 
suspension privilege writ habeas corpus 
proclaimed said proclamation 15th September, 1863, 
made effectual duly enforced throughout said State 
Kentucky, martial law present declared therein. 
therefore hereby require military officers said State 
privilege habeas corpus effectually suspended within 
said State, according aforesaid proclamation, martial law 
established therein take effect date proclamation, 
said suspension establishment martial law continue 
proclamation shall revoked beyond period 
said rebellion shall suppressed come end. 
hereby require command, well military officers, civil 
officers authorities existing found within said State 
Kentucky, take notice proclamation give full effect 
same. martial laws herein proclaimed things 
respect herein ordered deemed taken interfere 
holding lawful elections, proceedings constitutional 
Legislature Kentucky, administration justice 
courts law existing therein citizens United States 
suits proceedings affect military operations 
constituted authorities government United States. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done City Washington 5th day July, year 
Lord 1864, independence United States eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION DAY PRAYER, JULY 7, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, Senate House Representatives last session 
adopted resolution, approved second day 
July instant, words following, namely: 
 
President United States requested appoint day 
humiliation prayer people United States, request 
constitutional head Executive Departments 
unite him, Chief Magistrate nation, City 
Washington, members Congress, civil, 
military, naval officers, soldiers, 
loyal people, convene usual places worship, 
wherever may be, confess 
sins, implore Almighty, that, 
consistent will, existing rebellion may speedily 
suppressed, supremacy Constitution laws United 
States may established throughout States; implore Him, 
Supreme Ruler world, destroy us people, suffer 
us destroyed hostility nations, 
adhesion counsels may conflict 
purposes, implore mind nation 
know will, believing accordance 
place maintained united people among 
family implore grant armed 
masses people, courage, power resistance, endurance 
necessary secure implore infinite goodness 
hearts, conscience 
rebellion, may lay arms, speedily return 
allegiance United States, may utterly 
destroyed, blood may 
may restored, peace established throughout 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President States, 
cordially concurring Congress United States, 
sentiments expressed aforesaid resolutions, 
heartily approving design purpose thereof, 
hereby appoint first Thursday August next observed 
people United States day national humiliation 
 
hereby invite request heads Executive 
Departments Government, together judges 
persons exercising authority land, 
whether civil, military, naval, soldiers, seamen, 
national service, loyal people 
United States, assemble preferred places public worship 
day, render Almighty Ruler 
Universe, offer 
Congress United States have, 
aforesaid resolution, earnestly, 

 
testimony whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. Done city Washington 
seventh day July, year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
independence United States 
eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING BILL "TO GUARANTEE CERTAIN STATES, 
 
WHOSE GOVERNMENTS REPUBLICAN FORM 
CONCERNING RECONSTRUCTION, 
 
JULY 8, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas late session Congress passed bill "to guarantee 
certain states whose governments 
republican form copy hereunto 
 
Whereas, said bill presented President United States 
approval less one hour die adjournment 
said session, signed him; 
 
Whereas said bill among things, plan restoring 
States rebellion proper practical relation Union, 
plan expresses sense Congress upon subject, 
plan thought fit lay people 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
declare, make known (as December 
last, when, proclamation, propounded plan 
formal approval bill committed 
single plan restoration, also declare 
free State constitutions governments already adopted 
installed Arkansas Louisiana shall set aside held 
thereby discouraging loyal citizens 
set effort, declare constitutional 
Congress abolish slavery States, 
time sincerely hoping expecting constitutional amendment 
abolishing slavery throughout nation may adopted, nevertheless 
fully satisfied system restoration contained bill 
one proper plan loyal people State choosing adopt 
it, times shall prepared give Executive 
aid assistance people soon military resistance 
United States shall suppressed States 
people thereof shall sufficiently returned obedience 
Constitution laws United States, cases 
appointed directions proceed according 
bill. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
HORACE GREELEY. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., July 9, 1864 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter received. 
 
find person, anywhere, proposition 
Jefferson Davis writing, peace, embracing restoration 
Union slavery, whatever else say 
may come you; really brings proposition, 
shall least safe conduct paper (and without 
point shall meet him. 
two persons. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. W. WASHINGTON, D. C., July 9, 1864 
 
J. W. 
 
heard battle to-day? nothing 
except say. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HALLECK GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, July 9, 1864. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL L. Commanding Middle 
 
directed President say rally forces 
make every possible effort enemy's march Baltimore. 
 
H. W. HALLECK, Major-General Chief 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. OTHERS. WASHINGTON, D. C., July 10, 1864. 
A.M. 
 
THOMAS OTHERS, Baltimore, 
 
last night received. single soldier 
disposed military best protection all. latest 
accounts enemy moving Washington. cannot fly either 
place. Let us keep cool. hope neither Baltimore 
Washington 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. WASHINGTON CITY, July TO, P.M. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
dispatch General Halleck, referring may think 
present shown me. General Halleck says absolutely 
force fit go field. thinks 
men defend Washington, and, 
Baltimore. Besides eight thousand, 
Harper's Ferry Hunter approaching point 
slowly, number suppose know better I. 
part came 
badly beaten yesterday left attempt 
defend Baltimore. shall get Pennsylvania New 
York scarcely worth fear. Now, think is, 
provide retain hold are, certainly, bring 
rest personally, make vigorous effort destroy 
enemy's forces vicinity. think really fair chance 
this, movement think upon 
suggestion, order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, July 11, 1864. 8 A.M. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
10.30 P.M. yesterday received, satisfactory. enemy 
learn difficulty unite 
Wright Hunter south enemy Potomac. 
firing now. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., July 12, 1864. 
AM. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Vague reaching us two three days 
corps also way vicinity. Look absence 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM LETTER HORACE GREELEY. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 
12, 1864. 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY, New York: 
 
suppose received letter received 
disappointed it. expecting send 
letter, bring man, men. Mr. Hay goes answer 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Major John 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, JULY 15, 1864. 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY. 
 
DEAR 13th received, disappointed 
already reached commissioners, 
would consent come shown letter 9th instant. 
Show them, come terms stated 
former, bring them. intend sincere effort peace, 
intend shall personal witness made. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SAFE CONDUCT C. CLAY OTHERS, 
 
JULY 16, 1864. 
 
President United States directs four persons whose 
names follow, wit, HON. C. Clay, HON. Jacob 
James P. George N. shall safe conduct city 
Washington company HON. HORACE GREELEY, shall exempt 
arrest annoyance kind officer United States 
journey said city Washington. 
 
order President: JOHN HAY, Major Assistant Adjutant-General 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. July 1864. A.M. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
dispatch yesterday General Sherman, find following, 
wit: 
 
"I shall make desperate effort get position here, hold 
enemy without necessity many men." 
 
Pressed lapse time glad hear say this; yet 
hope may find way effort shall desperate 
sense great loss life. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. HUNTER WASHINGTON JULY 17, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER, Harper's Ferry, West Va. 
 
morning received. order complain 
mine, framed really made 
thought making seemed General Grant's wish 
forces General Wright join 
drive enemy General Wright. Wright larger part 
force, thought would prefer 
commanding part serving person Wright. 
it. General Grant wishes remain command department, 
wish order otherwise. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 18, 1864. A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, River, 
 
seen despatches agents Northern States opening 
recruiting near act Congress authorizes this, 
giving appointment agents States, Executive 
Government. War Department, myself, restrain 
modify law, execution, actual necessity may 
require. passage law, 
time would produce armies 
field cause fear. Many States anxious 
it, hoped that, State active 
would get substantial additions colored forces, which, 
unlike white help us come from, well 
go to. still hope advantage law; law, must 
treated us. consistently 
save difficulties arising it. May ask, therefore, 
give hearty 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ANNOUNCEMENT CONCERNING TERMS PEACE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, July 18, 1864. 
 
MAY 
 
proposition embraces restoration peace, integrity 
whole Union, slavery, comes 
authority control armies war 
United States, received considered Executive 
Government United States, met liberal terms 
substantial collateral bearer thereof shall 
safe conduct ways. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CALLING FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND VOLUNTEERS, 
 
JULY 18, 1864, 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas act approved July 4, 1864, entitled "An act 
regulate provide enrolling calling national forces 
purposes," provided President United 
States may, "at discretion, time hereafter, call number 
men, volunteers respective terms one, two, three 
years military "that case quota part 
thereof town, ward city, precinct, election 
district, county shall filled within 
space fifty days call, President shall immediately 
order draft one year fill quota part thereof 
may 
 
Whereas new enrolment heretofore ordered far completed 
act Congress may put operation 
recruiting keeping strength armies field, 
military operations may required purpose 
suppressing rebellion restoring authority United 
States Government insurgent States: 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
issue last call five hundred thousand volunteers 
military Provided, nevertheless, call shall reduced 
credits may established section eight 
aforesaid act account persons entered naval service 
present rebellion credits men furnished 
military service excess calls heretofore made. Volunteers 
accepted call one, two, three years, may 
entitled bounty provided law period 
services 
 
hereby order, direct immediately 5th 
day September, 1864, fifty days date call, 
draft troops serve one year shall every town, 
ward city, precinct, election district, county 
fill quota shall assigned 
call part thereof may volunteers said 
5th day September, 1864. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done City Washington, 18th day July, A.D. 1864, 
independence United States eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 20, 1864. 4.30 p.m. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
yesterday, call three hundred thousand, received. 
suppose seen call five hundred thousand, made 
day before, which, suppose, covers case. Always glad 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. L. WRIGHT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, JULY. 20, 1864. 
 
J. L. WRIGHT, Indianapolis, 
 
mistake. Mr. Stanton 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. HUNTER. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, JULY 23, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER, Harper's Ferry, West Va. 
 
able take care enemy, turns back upon you, 
probably finding Wright 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, LETTER WILLIAM O. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 25, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
Herewith manuscript letter gentleman sent 
hands. life cannot make therefore 
cut letter on, see. suppose 
remember is, thank forward letter. 
letter Philadelphia. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRESENTATION 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 25, 1864. 
 
WILLIAM O. 
 
honor present Governor duly 
placed hand him. Please accept and, time, 
pardon sooner found time tender them. obedient 
servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN HAY J. C. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON. July 25, 1864. 
 
J. C. ESQ. 
 
request contained note, placed Mr. 
letter resignation hands President. read 
letter, says glad 
other, may is, purpose 
taking attitude hostility him. 
 
says aware much indebted Mr. 
accepted office first, remembering ever pressed 
so, gave otherwise usual, upon request 
made behalf Mr. 
 
thanks Mr. acknowledgment treated 
personal kindness consideration, says knows two small 
upon Mr. right still receive one 
never could learn giving much attention 
duties office, studied attempt Mr. 
him. 
 
truly, 
 
obedient servant, 
 
JOHN 
 
 
 
 
FIRST N. Y. CAVALRY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, JULY 25, 1864. 
 
Thomas private First New York Cavalry, 
hard labor desertion. Colonel said Regiment 
say writing willing receive back 
Regiment, pardon, send him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 26, 1864. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, near 
 
seen complaining appointment 
point make unquestionably good one, yet 
please hear word us. recollection General Grant 
recommended O 
these, strong drew us 
could neither safely blamed coming 
away manner did, knew apparent reason 
feel disappointed felt best crush one 
certainly good soldier. know 
leaving time made appointment, 
know terms left. appointed him, case 
appeared us time, would 
violation word. word given thought high 
merit somewhat beg believe act 
spirit disregarding expect await 
changes army. profoundest thanks 
whole army present campaign far. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, July 27, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Chief Staff 
 
Grant signified that, owing 
difficulties delay communication headquarters 
Washington, necessary present military orders 
must issued directly Washington, President directs 
instruct military operations defense 
Middle Department, Department Department 
Washington, Department West Virginia, forces 
departments, placed general command, 
expected take military measures necessary defense 
attack enemy capture 
issue time time orders commanders 
respective departments military authorities therein may 
proper. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. WASHINGTON, July 27, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
relation General A. C. received. look 
matter to-day. 
 
also received General Carl Schurz. appreciate 
certainly, highly do; never know 
trial, difficult find place officer high rank 
place seeking him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Mrs. ANNE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 29, 1864. 
 
Mrs. ANNE 
 
send placed hands. thank 
pretty useful present, still good wishes 
country, prompted present it. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
INDORSEMENT, AUGUST 3, 1864. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, August 2, 1864. 
 
MR. note introduce Mr. Baltimore, 
desires appeal order General 
Hunter, removing persons, citizens beyond lines, 
others. Department information reasons 
proofs General Hunter acts, therefore feel 
liberty suspend interfere action except 
direction. 
 
truly, 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
August 3, 1864. 
 
Secretary War suspend order General Hunter mentioned 
order direct send Department 
brief report known one proposed dealt with. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. GRANT. 
 

 
WASHINGTON, D. August 3, 1864 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
seen despatch say, "I want Sheridan put 
command troops field, instructions put 
south enemy, follow death. Wherever enemy goes, 
let troops go 
 
This, think, exactly right forces 
please look despatches may received here, ever 
since made order, discover, can, 
idea head one army south 
following direction. repeat you, 
neither done attempted, unless watch every day 
hour, force it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
     President mistaken thinking Sherman, 
     Sheridan, Grant 
     previous general officers.  one needed watch Grant 
     Sherman Sheridan, needed get 
     way. D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM HORACE GREELEY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 6, 1864 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY, New York: 
 
Major Hay publication correspondence received. 
suppression passages letters regard 
think would glad 
Please come see me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM HORACE GREELEY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 8, 1864 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY, New York: 
 
telegraphed Saturday. receive Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DISLOYAL FAMILY MEMBER 
 
GENERAL S. O. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 8, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Lexington, Ky.: 
 
Last December Mrs. Emily T. Mrs. Lincoln, widow 
rebel general, Hardin stopped way 
Georgia Kentucky, gave paper, remember, protect 
mere fact General hear rumor 
to-day recently sought arrest her, prevented 
presenting paper me. intend protect 
consequences disloyal words acts, spoken done since 
return Kentucky, paper given construed 
give protection words acts, hereby revoked pro 
Deal current conduct would other. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 14, 1864. P.M. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Secretary War concur better confer General 
Lee, mutual 
destruction private property. time manner conference 
particulars stipulation leave, part, convenience 
judgment. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, near Atlanta, 
 
Government purchase, account, cotton 
you, line communications, would 
you, detriment military service, come north 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INTERVIEW JOHN T. 
 
AUGUST 1864. 
 
 
"Mr. said Governor "why can't seek 
play would you." 
 
said President, three weeks would good. 
cannot fly solicitude great country follows 
wherever go. think personal vanity ambition, though 
free cannot feel 
woe great nation decided 
offered wing Democratic party must result 
permanent destruction Union." 
 
"But, Mr. President, General McClellan favor 
rebellion force. Chicago 
 
slightest knowledge prove man 
rebel armies cannot destroyed Democratic would 
sacrifice white men North it. 
service United States nearly one hundred fifty thousand 
able-bodied colored men, arms, defending acquiring 
Union territory. Democratic demands forces 
masters restoring 
slavery. black men assist Union prisoners escape 
enemies, vain hope gaining 
shall fight two nations instead one. 
 
"You cannot South guarantee ultimate 
experience present war proves success 
inevitable labor millions black men 
side give enemies military 
advantages insure success, depend 
concession get back Union? Abandon posts 
black men, take one hundred fifty thousand men 
side put battle-field us, 
would compelled abandon war three weeks. 
 
"We hold territory 
Democrats this? free fight, field open 
war Democrats put rebellion fighting master 
slave, long present policy 
 
"There men base enough propose return slavery 
black Port thus win respect 
masters so, deserve damned time 
Come will, keep faith friend 
enemies pretend carrying war sole purpose 
long President, shall carried 
sole purpose restoring Union. human power 
rebellion without use emancipation policy, every 
policy calculated weaken moral physical forces 
rebellion. 
 
given us one hundred fifty thousand men, raised 
Southern soil. give us yet. much 
enemy, and, instead South, 
evidences fraternal feeling growing men rank 
file rebel soldiers. Let enemies prove country 
destruction slavery necessary restoration Union. 
abide 
 
 
 
 
APPLICATION AUGUST 15, 1864. 
 
always man wishes shall glad 
man get suitable employment Cavalry elsewhere. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, August 15, 1864 
 
HON. HENRY J. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I proposed Mr. Greeley 
correspondence published, suppressing parts letters 
red pencil drawn copy herewith 
giving consent publication letters unless 
parts published rest. concluded better 
time, consequences false position 
consider placed me, subject country 
consequences discouraging injurious send 
this, accompanying copy, publication, merely 
explain you, may preserve proper time 
shall come. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 17, 1864. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
seen despatch expressing break hold 
are. Neither Hold 
much possible. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING COMMERCIAL REGULATIONS, AUGUST 18, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas act Congress 28th September, 1850, entitled "An 
act create additional collection districts State California, 
change existing districts therein, modify existing 
collection districts United States," extends merchandise 
bond privilege exported British North 
American adjoining United States, manner prescribed 
act Congress 3d March, 1845, certain 
ports merchandise may 
provides "that ports, situated United 
States adjoining British North American may hereafter 
found expedient, may extended like 
recommendation Secretary Treasury, proclamation duly 
made President United States, specially designating 
ports aforesaid privileges 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
America, accordance recommendation Secretary 
Treasury, hereby declare proclaim port 
State Vermont, shall entitled privileges regard 
exportation merchandise bond British North American 
adjoining United States, extended ports 
enumerated seventh section act Congress 3d 
March, 1845, aforesaid, date proclamation. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. Done city Washington, 
eighteenth day August, year Lord one thousand eight 
hundred independence United States 
America, eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT CONCERNING EXCHANGE PRISONERS, AUGUST 18, 1864. 
 
General effect special exchange Thomas D. 
conviction something sort, prison 
Major made prisoner war, prison 
Richmond, let done. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS OHIO REGIMENT, 
 
AUGUST 18, 1864. 
 
return homes friends, 
learn, performed camp comparatively short term duty 
great contest. greatly obliged you, 
come forward call country. wish might 
generally universally understood country engaged in. 
have, agree, free government, every man right 
equal every man. great struggle, form 
government every form human right endangered enemies 
succeed. involved contest realized 
every one. involved struggle, question whether 
children children shall enjoy privileges say 
this, order impress upon you, already 
small matter divert us great purpose. 
 
may practical application system. 
fair man shall pay taxes exact proportion value 
property; collecting adjust 
taxes upon man exact proportion every man, 
never collect tax all. may mistakes made 
things may done wrong, officers Government 
prevent beg you, citizens great 
Republic, let minds carried great work 
us. struggle large diverted 
small matter. return homes, rise height 
generation men worthy free government, carry 
great work commenced. return sincere soldiers, 
honor done afternoon. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 
20, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Hundred, Va.: 
 
Please allow Judge go family Eastern give 
good reason not. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS OHIO REGIMENT, 
 
AUGUST 22, 1864. 
 
suppose going home see families friends. 
services done great struggle 
engaged, present sincere thanks country. 
 
almost always feel say anything soldiers, impress 
upon them, brief remarks, importance success 
contest. merely day, time come, 
perpetuate children's children great free 
government enjoyed lives. beg remember 
this, merely sake, yours. temporarily, 
occupy big White House. living witness one 
children may look come father's child has. order 
one may have, free government 
open field, fair chance industry, enterprise, 
may equal privileges race 
life desirable human 
struggle maintained, may lose 
one, two three years, necessary. nation 
worth fighting for, secure inestimable 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 23, 1864. 
 
morning, days past, seems exceedingly probable 
administration re-elected. duty 
co-operate save Union 
election secured election 
ground cannot possibly save afterward. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 26, 
1864. 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON, Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
Thanks General making news also sending 
it. meet mean 
scared wanted save 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM B. H. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 

 
HON. B. H. House, New York: 
 
letter yesterday received. Thank it. Please 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 31, 1864. 
 
person persons engaged bringing cotton, strict conformity 
authority given W. P. Secretary United States 
Treasury, must War, Navy, Department 
Government, person engaged said 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, SEPTEMBER 1, 1864 
 
COLONEL H. C. 
 
SIR: represented Rock Island, Illinois, 
rebel prisoners war, many persons Northern foreign birth 
unwilling exchanged sent South, wish take oath 
allegiance enter military service Union. Colonel 
behalf people parts Pennsylvania, wishes 
pay bounties Government would pay proper persons 
class, enter service United States, 
credited localities furnishing bounty money. therefore 
proceed Rock Island, ascertain names persons (not 
including telegraph 
Provost-Marshal-General here, direction given 
discharge persons named upon taking oath 
upon official evidence furnished shall 
duly received mustered service United States, 
number credited may directed Colonel 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION THANKSGIVING, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, September 3, 1864. 
 
signal success Divine Providence recently 
operations United States army harbor Mobile, 
reduction Fort Fort Fort Morgan, 
glorious achievements army Major-General Sherman, 
State Georgia, resulting capture city Atlanta, call 
acknowledgment Supreme whose hands 
nations. therefore requested next Sunday, 
places worship United States, offered 
mercy preserve national existence insurgent 
rebels cruel war Government 
United States also prayer made Divine 
protection brave soldiers leaders field 
often lives enemy, 
blessings comfort Father 
wounded, prisoners, 
fallen service country, continue 
Government United States efforts 
public enemies secret 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDERS GRATITUDE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, September 3, 1864. 
 
national thanks tendered President Admiral 
Major-General skill harmony recent 
operations Harbor Fort Fort Fort 
Morgan carried execution. Also Admiral 
Major-General whose immediate command 
gallant commanders sea land, 
sailors soldiers engaged operations, energy 
courage, which, blessing Providence, crowned 
brilliant success, won applause thanks 
nation. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, September 3, 1864. 
 
national thanks tendered President Major-General William 
T. Sherman gallant officers soldiers command 
Atlanta, distinguished ability, courage, 
displayed campaign Georgia, Divine power resulted 
capture city battles, 
military operations campaign must 
render famous war, entitled 
participated therein applause thanks nation. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, September 3, 1864. 
 
Ordered: First, Monday, fifth day September, commencing 
hour twelve o'clock shall given one 
hundred guns arsenal Washington, Tuesday, 
6th September, day receipt order, 
arsenal navy-yard United States, recent brilliant 
achievements land forces United States 
harbor Mobile, reduction Fort Fort 
Fort Secretary War Secretary Navy issue 
necessary directions respective departments execution 
order. 
 
Second, 7th September, commencing hour 
twelve o'clock shall fired one hundred guns 
arsenal Washington, New York, Boston, Philadelphia, 
Baltimore, St. Louis, New Orleans, 
Mobile, Head, day receipt 
order, brilliant achievements army command 
Major-General Sherman, State Georgia, capture 
Secretary War issue directions execution 
order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President United States. 
 
 
 
 
MRS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, SEPTEMBER 4, 1864. 
 
P. 
 
ESTEEMED forgotten probably never shall forget 
occasion friends visited 
two years kind letter, written nearly 
year later, even all, purpose 
strengthen reliance God. much indebted good Christian 
people country constant prayer 
one them, yourself. purposes Almighty 
must though may fail accurately 
perceive advance. hoped happy 
terrible war long this; God knows best, ruled 
otherwise. shall yet acknowledge wisdom, error therein. 
Mean must work earnestly best light gives us, trusting 
working still great ends Surely 
intends great good follow mighty mortal 
could make, mortal could 
 
had, great trial. 
principle, faith, opposed war 
practically oppose oppression war. appealing 
grounds, done, shall do, best could 
can, oath law. believe 
doubt not, believing it, shall still country 
earnest prayers Father 
 
sincere friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE COLORED PEOPLE BALTIMORE 
 
PRESENTED BIBLE, 
 
SEPTEMBER 7, 1864. 
 
say now, often said before, always 
sentiment me, mankind free. far 
able, far came within sphere, always acted believed 
right, done could good mankind. have, 
letters sent forth office, expressed better 
now. 
 
regard great Book, say best gift 
God ever given man. good world 
communicated us book. Book, could know 
right wrong. things desirable man contained it. 
return sincere thanks elegant copy great Book 
God present. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 8, 
 
GOVERNOR W. 
 
patriotic despatch yesterday received 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER THANKS TROOPS OHIO. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, September 10, 1864. 
 
term one hundred days National Guard Ohio 
President directs official 
acknowledgment made patriotic valuable services 
recent term service enlistment short, 
distinguished events. Valley Shenandoah, 
operations James River, around Petersburg 
Richmond, battle 
Washington, important service, National Guard Ohio 
performed duty patriotic volunteers, 
entitled hereby Governor 
State, national thanks. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 12, 1864. 
 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Sheridan Early facing Could pick 
regiment there, number say ten thousand men, 
quietly suddenly concentrate camp enable 
make 
 
suggestion. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM JAMES G. WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 
13, 1864. 
 
HON. J. G. behalf Union, thanks Maine. 
Thanks personally sending news. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. L. B. Smith M. A. Me. A. L. 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 
13, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Saint 
 
Postpone execution S. H. Anderson two weeks. Hear 
friends say report me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
MAJOR Please send 
 
JNO. G. Private 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 16, 1864. 
 
GENERAL Alexandria, Va.: 
 
14th sentence may 
received notice send this. execute him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. WASHINGTON, D. C., September 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, Atlanta, 
 
feel great interest subjects despatch corn 
contemplated visit you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President United States. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 19, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
State election Indiana occurs 11th October, loss 
friends Government would go far towards losing 
whole Union cause. bad effect upon November election, 
especially giving State government oppose 
war every possible way, much risk avoided. 
draft notwithstanding strong tendency lose us State. 
Indiana important State voting October whose soldiers 
cannot vote field. Anything safely let soldiers 
part go home vote State election greatly 
point. need remain Presidential election, may 
return once. sense order, merely 
intended impress importance Army 
safely can, judge safely 
do. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT CONCERNING EXCHANGE PRISONERS, SEPTEMBER 1864. 
 
writer this, appeals brother, minister 
would like obliged 
special exchange brother. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL P. SHERIDAN. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 
20, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERIDAN, Winchester, Va.: 
 
heard great victory. God bless all, officers 
men. Strongly inclined come See you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 21, 1864. 
 
GENERAL 
 
Please see Mr. question mutual 
supplying clothes prisoners. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 22, 1864. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
send explanation you, justice Secretary 
War. upon pressing authorize agents 
one districts Pennsylvania one prison 
Illinois; thing went far came 
knowledge Secretary that, judgment, could abandoned 
without greater evil would follow going through. know 
time protested class thing done; 
say particular job must 
sort without understanding you, 
all. Secretary War wholly free part 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 23, 1864. 
 
 
HON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--You generously said me, once, 
whenever resignation could relief me, 
time come. well know proceeds 
dissatisfaction mine personally uniform 
kindness friend, 
true war greatly add difficulties 
department others, yet much say, 
truly can, three years half 
administered General remember single complaint 
connection 
 
Yours, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING PURCHASE PRODUCTS INSURRECTIONARY STATES. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, September 24, 1864. 
 
I. Congress authorized purchase United States 
products States declared insurrection, Secretary 
Treasury designated New Orleans, Nashville, 
Port Royal, Norfolk, places purchase, 
and, approval, appointed agents made regulations 
said products may 
 
II. persons except may civil, military, naval 
service government, possession products 
States parts States declared insurrection, said agents 
authorized persons owning controlling 
products therein authorized convey products either 
places hereby may hereafter designated places 
purchase, products destined shall liable 
forfeiture store waiting 

 
III. person certificate purchasing 
prescribed Treasury Regulation authorized pass 
necessary means transportation points named said 
return products required 
stipulations set forth said 
 
IV. person sold delivered purchasing agent 
products insurrectionary State accordance regulations 
relation thereto, possession certificate setting 
forth fact purchase character quantity 
products, aggregate amount paid prescribed 
Regulation I, shall permitted military authority commanding 
place sale purchase authorized place 
merchandise articles contraband war prohibited 
order War Department, foreign 
amount exceeding value one-third aggregate value 
products sold certified agents 
merchandise articles purchased may 
place, products sold 
delivered reached purchasing set forth 
merchandise articles shall safe 
shall subject forfeiture 
places set forth said 

 
V. Generals commanding military districts, military 
posts officers commanding 
give safe conduct persons products, 
articles duly authorized aforesaid, contraband war, 
prohibited order War Department, order 
generals duly authorized military naval officer, 
made pursuance persons preventing 
safe conduct persons property will, deemed guilty military 
offense punished accordingly. 
 
VI. person attempting transport merchandise 
articles except pursuance regulations Secretary 
Treasury, dated July 29, 1864, pursuance order, 
attempting transport merchandise articles 
contraband war forbidden order War Department, 
deemed guilty military offense punished 
products insurrectionary States found person 
purchasing agent designated purchase shall seized 
forfeited States, except may moving loyal 
state duly authorized permits proper officer Treasury 
Department, prescribed Regulation concerning commercial 
intercourse, dated July 29, 1864, may found 
abandoned, captured moving pursuance act 
March 12, 1864. 
 
VII. military naval officer United States, person 
military naval service, civil officer, except 
appointed purpose, shall engage trade traffic 
products insurrectionary States, furnish transportation 
pain deemed guilty unlawful enemy 
punished accordingly. 
 
VIII. Secretary War make general orders regulations 
insure proper observance execution order, 
Secretary Navy give instructions officers commanding 
gunboats conformity 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. WASHINGTON, D. C., September 27, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SHERMAN, Atlanta, 
 
say Jefferson Davis visit judge Brown 
Stephens objects visit. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D.C., September 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
hope you, harm way, 
say little afraid lest Lee reinforcements thus 
enables turn upon Sheridan. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
September 29, 1864. 
 
think bearer this, Second Lieutenant deserves hearing. 
Secretary War please accord him? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER RETURNING THANKS VOLUNTEERS ONE HUNDRED DAYS 
 
STATES INDIANA, ILLINOIS, IOWA, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, October 1, 1864. 
 
term one hundred days volunteers States 
Indiana, Illinois, Iowa, Wisconsin call 
respective months May June, aid 
campaign General Sherman, President directs 
official acknowledgment made patriotic service. 
good fortune render efficient service brilliant operations 
Southwest contribute victories national arms 
rebel forces Georgia command Johnston 
occasions every service assigned duty 
patriotic volunteers performed courage, 
entitled hereby tendered national thanks 
governors respective States. 
 
Secretary War directed transmit copy order 
governors Indiana, Illinois, Iowa, Wisconsin cause 
certificate honorable service delivered officers 
soldiers States named recently served military 
force United States volunteers one hundred days. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 5, 1864 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
copy correspondence regard contemplated 
exchange naval prisoners lines, distant 
came knowledge War Department 
yesterday, gives us therefore send 
statement that, numbers exchanged 
small, much already done effect 
hope may find consistent let go forward general 
supervision General Butler, particularly reference points 
holds vital Still, liberty arrest whole 
operation judgment public good requires it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT MEMORANDUM GENERAL McDOWELL, OCTOBER 7, 1864 
 
well remember meetings herein See nothing object 
made General McDowell, except phrase 
attributed "of 
 
     [This memorandum private discussions 
     transfer McClellan's army Potomac, 
     confronted See H. 
     J. Life Lincoln, p. 
 
phrase remember using literally substance, 
wish published event. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. W. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, October 10, 1864. 
 
HON. HENRY W. 
 
DEAR convention Maryland framed new constitution 
State; public meeting called evening Baltimore aid 
securing ratification people, ask word 
occasion. presume feature instrument 
serious controversy provides extinction 
slavery. needs secret presume 
wish success desire every consideration. wish 
men free. wish material prosperity already free, 
feel sure extinction slavery would wish see 
process thing ever could bring nation 
civil war. attempt argument. Argument upon question already 
exhausted better informed, immediately interested 
sons Maryland herself. add shall gratified exceedingly 
good people State shall, votes, ratify new 
constitution. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 10, 1864, 5 P.M. 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, Harrisburg, Pa.: 
 
to-day moment received, Secretary left 
impossible answer to-day. received letter 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM ROBERT T. LINCOLN, Mass.: 
 
letter makes us little uneasy health. Telegraph us 
are. think would help you, make us visit. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., October 12, 1864. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Secretary War in, answer election. Pennsylvania 
close, still doubt home vote. Ohio largely us, 
members Congress two three. Indiana largely 
said, fifteen thousand, eight eleven 
members Congress. Send us may know army vote. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, 
 
OCTOBER 19, 1864. 
 
 
FRIENDS FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I notified compliment paid 
loyal resident District. infer 
adoption new constitution State furnishes occasion, 
view slavery constitutes chief 
merit new constitution. heartily congratulate you, 
Maryland, nation, world, upon event. regret 
occur two years which, sure, would saved 
nation money would met private loss incident 
come last, sincerely hope friends 
may fully realize good it, 
opponents may effects profitably disappointed. 
 
word upon another subject. Something said Secretary State 
recent speech construed 
shall beaten election, will, 
end constitutional term, may able ruin 
Government. 
 
Others regard fact Chicago Convention 
meet again, called particular individual, 
intimation purpose shall elected 
seize control Government. hope good people 
permit suffer uneasiness either point. struggling 
maintain Government, overthrow it. struggling 
especially prevent others it. therefore say, 
live, shall remain President 4th next March, 
whoever shall constitutionally elected, November, shall duly 
installed President 4th March, interval shall 
utmost whoever hold next shall 
start best possible chance saving due 
people, principle Constitution. will, 
constitutionally expressed, ultimate law all. 
deliberately resolve immediate peace, even loss 
country know power right resist 
them. business, must please 
own. believe, however, still resolved preserve country 
this, office it, resolved 
stand them. may add, purpose save country 
classes people seem nearly unanimous soldiers 
field sailors it? 
not? God bless soldiers seamen, 
brave commanders. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION THANKSGIVING, OCTOBER 20, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
pleased Almighty God national life another year, 
defending us care unfriendly designs 
abroad, us mercy many signal victories 
enemy, also pleased Heavenly 
Father favor well citizens homes soldiers 
sailors rivers unusual health. 
largely augmented free population emancipation 
opened us sources wealth, 
crowned labor working-men every department industry 
abundant Moreover, pleased 
minds hearts courage, resolution sufficient 
great trial civil war brought 
adherence nation cause freedom humanity, afford 
us reasonable hopes ultimate happy deliverance 
dangers 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby appoint set apart last Thursday November next day 
desire observed fellow-citizens, wherever 
may then, day thanksgiving praise Almighty God, 
beneficent Ruler Universe. recommend 
fellow-citizens aforesaid, occasion 
humble thence offer 
prayers great events 
return inestimable blessings peace, union, harmony 
throughout land pleased assign 
posterity throughout 

 
testimony whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, twentieth day October, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
independence United States eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. G. WASHINGTON, D. C., October 21, 1864. P.M. 
 
J. G. Saint Louis, Missouri: 
 
Curtis fighting Price, idea force 
Rosecrans is, doing? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM B. CAMPBELL OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 22, 1864. 
 
 
WILLIAM B. CAMPBELL, THOMAS A. R. JAMES T. P. CARTER, JOHN 
WILLIAMS, A. HENRY JOHN 
JOHN D. 
 
15th day month, remember, printed paper 
manuscript called protest, 
names appended thereto, accompanied another printed paper, 
purporting proclamation Andrew Johnson, Military Governor 
Tennessee, also manuscript paper, purporting extracts 
Code Tennessee, laid me. 
 
protest, proclamation, extracts respectively follows: 
 
[The protest also proclamation Governor 
Johnson, dated September 30, together list 
counties East, West Tennessee; also extracts 
Code Tennessee relation President Vice-President, 
voters members General Assembly, places 
holding elections, officers popular 
 
time papers presented, stated, never 
seen either them, heard subject 
except general way one day 
 
present moment, nothing whatever upon subject 
passed Governor Johnson, one else, connected 
proclamation, myself. 
 
Since receiving papers, stated, given subject brief 
consideration able do, midst many pressing 
public duties. 
 
conclusion is, nothing matter, either 
sustain plan convention Governor Johnson initiated it, 
revoke modify 
 
Constitution laws, President charged duty 
presidential election State, case perceive 
military reason interference matter. 
 
movement set foot convention Governor Johnson not, 
seems assumed you, National 
 
proper sense considered independent movement 
of, least, portion loyal people Tennessee. 
 
perceive plan menace, violence, coercion towards 
one. 
 
Governor Johnson, like loyal citizen Tennessee, right 
favor political plan and, military governor, 
duty keep peace among loyal people State. 
 
cannot discern plan purposes more. object 
plan. 
 
Leaving alone perfect security it. 
proposed force it. please, account, 
peaceably Governor Johnson you, 
protect violence far power. 
 
presume conducting presidential election Tennessee 
strict accordance old Code State, 

 
scarcely necessary add, election shall held 
votes shall cast State Tennessee President 
Vice-President United States, military 
yet Executive Department, exclusively another 
department Government, determine whether entitled 
counted conformity Constitution laws United States. 
 
Except give protection violence, decline interfere 
way presidential election. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL P. H. SHERIDAN. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 
22, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
great pleasure tender brave army thanks 
nation, personal admiration month's 
operations Shenandoah especially splendid work 
October 19, 1864. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. H. THOMAS. WASHINGTON, D. C., October 23, 1864 5 
P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL THOMAS, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
received information to-day, great appearance 
rebel raid Western 
consist four thousand infantry three thousand cavalry, 
start Corinth, Mississippi, fourth day 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
Send copy General A. L. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. T. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D.C., October 31, 
1864. 
 
HON. THOMAS T. DAVIS, 
 
ordered D. discharged taking oath. 
Please notify mother. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION ADMITTING NEVADA UNION 
 
OCTOBER 31, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas Congress United States passed act, 
approved 21st day March last, entitled "An act enable 
people Nevada form constitution State government, 
admission State Union equal footing 
original and, 
 
Whereas said constitution State government formed, 
pursuant conditions prescribed fifth section act 
Congress aforesaid, certificate required said act 
also copy constitution ordinances submitted 
President United States: 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, accordance duty imposed upon act 
Congress aforesaid, hereby declare proclaim said State 
Nevada admitted Union equal footing original 
States. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 4, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Lexington, 
 
Suspend execution deserters ordered executed Sunday 
Louisville, order, send records cases. 
Acknowledge 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM NAVAL OFFICER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 6, 1864. 9 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL New Orleans, 
 
Please forward possible despatch naval officer commanding 
Bay following order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 6, 1864. 
 
NAVAL OFFICER COMMAND BAY 
 
account, showing authority whatever, 
purporting come, allow blockade 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM FAIR, BOSTON, 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., November 8, 1864. 
 
COMMITTEE FAIR, Boston, Massachusetts 
 
Allow wish great success. old fame Navy made 
present war cannot fail. name none lest wrong 
others all, honest tender 
nation's admiration 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. H. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 8, 1864. 
 
HON. A. H. Boston, 
 
received. notice mine. 
really so, present Fair 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD. WASHINGTON, November 8, 1864. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, New York: 
 
News Grant, Sherman, Thomas Rosecrans satisfactory, 
important. Florida captured October 7, 
coast information certain. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, NOVEMBER 9, 1864. 
 
FRIENDS informed 
compliment paid loyal citizens Pennsylvania, friendly 
me, inferred portion countrymen 
think best interests nation 
support present administration. pretend say you, 
think so, embrace patriotism loyalty country, 
believe, trust without personal interest, welfare 
country require support indorsement given. 
 
earnestly believe consequences day's work, 
assume, seems probable, lasting 
country. cannot hour say 
result election. But, whatever may be, 
desire modify labored to-day 
behalf Union wrought best interests country 
world; present, future ages. 
 
thankful God approval people; but, deeply 
grateful mark confidence me, know heart, 
gratitude free personal triumph. 
motives one opposed me. pleasure triumph 
one, give thanks Almighty evidence 
people's resolution stand free government rights 

 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM H. W. WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C. November 10, 
1864. 
 
H. Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Maryland soldiers Army Potomac cast total vote 
fourteen hundred get eleven hundred 
sixty majority. directly General Meade General Grant. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DEMOCRATIC GOVERNMENT 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, NOVEMBER 10, 1864. 
 
long grave question whether government, strong 
liberties people, strong enough maintain 
existence great point present rebellion 
brought government severe presidential election 
occurring regular course rebellion, added little 

 
loyal people united put utmost strength 
rebellion, must fail divided partially 
political war among election necessity. 
cannot free government without election could 
force us forego postpone national election, might fairly claim 
already conquered us. strife election 
human nature practically applied facts case. 
occurred case must ever recur similar cases. Human nature 
change. future great national trial, compared men 
this, weak strong, silly wise, bad 
good. Let us, therefore, study incidents philosophy 
learn wisdom from, none wrongs 
 
election, along incidental strife, 
done good, too. demonstrated people's government sustain 
national election midst great civil war. now, 
known world shows, also, 
sound strong still are. shows even among candidates 
party, devoted Union opposed 
treason receive people's votes. shows, also, 
extent yet known, men war 
began. Gold good place; living, brave, patriotic men 
better gold. 
 
rebellion and, election over, may 
common interest common effort save 
common country? part, shall strive avoid 
placing way. long here, 
willingly planted thorn man's duly sensible 
high compliment duly trust, 
Almighty God, directed countrymen right conclusion, 
think, good, adds nothing satisfaction 
man may disappointed result. 
 
May ask differed join 
spirit towards now, let close asking three 
hearty cheers brave soldiers seamen, gallant 
commanders. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. O. WASHINGTON, D.C., November 10, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Lexington, Ky.: 
 
received telegram Governor saying: "General 
John B. loyal man prominent citizen, arrested, 
yesterday, started General sent beyond lines 
way offense opposition 
answered follows below, please 
take notice report me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., November 10, 1864. GOVERNOR Frankfort, Ky.: 
 
yesterday received. scarcely believe General John 
B. arrested "for offense opposition 
for, deemed sufficient cause arrest, 
heard one arrest Kentucky election day. 
If, however, General arrested cause 
opposition General discharge 
once, sending copy order effect. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL S. A. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 14, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
things since impressed painfully 
what, four five months past, appeared bitter military 
opposition new State government Louisiana. still indulged 
hope mistaken copies correspondence 
subject General yourself, shown to-day, 
hope. fair proportion people Louisiana 
inaugurated new State government, making excellent new 
poor black man Illinois. 
done military protection, directed me, belief, still 
sincerely around build 
could get State position sooner otherwise. 
belief general promise protection support, applicable alike 
Louisiana States, given last annual message. 
formation new government constitution supported 
nearly every loyal person, opposed every 
support opposition, respective 
parties, perfectly consistent Every ought 
wish new government succeed; every must desire 
fail. failure would heart Europe, 
every enemy old flag world. Every advocate slavery 
naturally desires see liberty promised 
black man new constitution. General General 
join side 
 
course, condition things New Orleans, military must 
civil authority; Constitutional 
Convention, deems breach arrests editor 
way connected military, military necessity 
convention forcibly editor difficult 
Neither military necessity protecting people 
paying large fixed legislature choosing 
apparent. Equally difficult perceive military necessity 
forcibly prevent bank money 
State. things, occurred, are, best, better 
wish could hope may shown 
make assurance misunderstanding, repeat 
existing condition things Louisiana, military 
must civil authority; add points 
difference commanding general must judge master. also add 
exercise judgment control, purpose, 
scarcely military necessity, order crush 
civil government, overlooked. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MARYLAND UNION COMMITTEE, NOVEMBER 17, 1864. 
 
President, reply, said confess duly 
notified intention make friendly call days ago, 
fair opportunity afforded ready set 
prepared one, busy purpose. would 
say, however, gratified result presidential 
election. kept near could exercise best 
judgment interest whole country, seal 
approbation stamped course pursued exceedingly grateful 
feelings. thought could say, large sense 
man, pleasure consisted belief policy pursued 
best, one, safety country. 
 
said before, repeated, indulged feeling 
triumph man thought acted differently himself. 
feeling toward living man. thought Maryland, 
particular, opinion double share 
occurred recent elections. adoption free-State 
constitution greater thing part taken people 
State presidential election. would day stipulated 
lose Maryland presidential election save adoption 
free-State constitution, presidential election comes every 
four years, thing which, done, cannot 
therefore thought victory right worth 
great deal part presidential election, though 
latter thought said, would say 
again, differed us opposed us see 
result presidential election better good 
successful. 
 
committee brought brief speech 
close. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING BLOCKADE, NOVEMBER 19, 1864 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas proclamation 19th April, 1861, declared 
ports certain States, including Norfolk, State 
Virginia, State Florida, were, 
reasons therein set forth, intended placed and: 
 
Whereas said ports subsequently accordingly, 
time past military possession United States, 
advisable opened domestic foreign 

 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, pursuant authority vested fifth section 
act Congress approved 13th July, 1861, entitled "An 
act provide collection duties imports, 
purposes," hereby declare blockade said ports 
Norfolk, shall far cease determine, 
first day December next, commercial intercourse 
ports, except persons, things, information contraband 
war, may, time, carried on, subject laws United 
States, limitations pursuance regulations may 
prescribed Secretary Treasury, military 
naval regulations force, may hereafter found 
necessary. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. Done city Washington, 
nineteenth day November, year Lord one thousand eight 
hundred independence United States 
eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
MOTHER 
 
MRS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 21, 1864. 
 
MRS. Boston, 
 
DEAR shown War Department 
statement Adjutant-General Massachusetts mother 
five sons died gloriously field battle. feel 
weak fruitless must words mine attempt 
grief loss cannot refrain 
tendering consolation may found thanks 
Republic died pray Heavenly Father may 
leave cherished 
memory loved lost, solemn pride must 
laid sacrifice upon freedom. 
 
sincerely respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 21, 1864. 
 
JOHN 
 
DEAR SIR:--I heard incident polls town, 
acted honorable part, take liberty writing 
express personal gratitude compliment paid 
suffrage citizen 
 
example devotion duties one whose days 
already extended average beyond 
cannot valuable only, 
country sphere served long well, 
thank you. 
 
friend servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR WASHINGTON, D. C. NOVEMBER 22, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR Frankfort, Ky.: 
 
to-day received. seems 
Colonel now. General Mr. 
here, Secretary War trying means 
harmony Kentucky, hope effect soon, 
subject election past. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN, WASHINGTON, D.C., NOVEMBER 25, 1864 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
knowledge, information, belief, three 
States, offer resume 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON D.C., NOV. 
26, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
Please telegraph briefly charge evidence Mrs. Anna B. 
Martin sent 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
DECEMBER 3, 1864. 
 
Thursday last week, two ladies Tennessee came 
President, asking release held prisoners war 
put came again, 
put Saturday. one 
ladies urged husband religious man, Saturday 
President ordered release prisoners, said 
"You say husband religious man; tell meet him, 
say much judge religion, that, opinion, 
religion sets men rebel fight government, 
because, think, government sufficiently help 
men eat bread sweat men's sort 
religion upon people get 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING STEAMER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 3, 1864. 
 
war called built 
country, government instance 
government, deemed public interest, view 
condition relations United States 
steamer allowed proceed If, 
however, Secretary Navy ascertain steamer 
adapted service, authorized purchase her, purchase 
money held trust toward satisfying valid claims may 
presented account construction steamer 
failure deliver same, set forth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, December 5, 1864 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
conformity law July 16, 1862, cordially recommend 
Captain John A. United States Navy, receive vote thanks 
Congress skill gallantry exhibited brilliant 
action whilst command United States steamer led 
total destruction Alabama, 19th 
June, vessel superior superior number guns, 
superior number 
 
recommendation specially made order comply 
requirements ninth section aforesaid act, 
following words, 
 
line officer navy marine corps may advanced one 
if, upon recommendation President name receives 
thanks Congress highly distinguished conduct conflict 
enemy, far extraordinary heroism line profession. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, December 5, 1864. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
conformity law July 16, 1862, cordially recommend 
Lieutenant William B. United States Navy, receive vote 
thanks Congress important, 
destroying rebel ironclad steamer night 
27th October, N. C. 
 
destruction formidable vessel, resisted 
continued attacks number vessels former occasions, 
important event touching future naval military operations, 
would reflect honor officer, credit 
young officer brave assisted successful 
daring 
 
recommendation specially made order comply 
requirements ninth section Aforesaid act, 
following words, namely: 
 
line officer navy marine corps may advanced one 
grade upon recommendation President name receives 
thanks Congress highly distinguished conduct conflict 
enemy, extraordinary heroism line profession. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS, 
 
DECEMBER 6, 1864. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
blessings health abundant harvests claim profoundest 
gratitude Almighty God. 
 
condition foreign affairs reasonably satisfactory. 
 
Mexico continues civil war. political 
relations country change, 
time strictly maintained 
 
request States Costa Nicaragua, competent 
authorized make survey river San 
port San source much satisfaction 
difficulties moment excited political apprehensions 
caused closing transit route 
good prospect route soon 
reopened increase capacity could 
either commercial political importance great 
improvement. 
 
would injustice important South American State 
acknowledge 
United States entered intimate relations 
government. claims convention constituted complete 
unfinished work one closed session 1861. 
 
new liberal constitution gone effect 
universal acquiescence people, government 
recognized diplomatic intercourse opened cordial 
friendly spirit. Island claim 
satisfactorily paid 
 
Mutual payments made claims awarded late joint 
commission settlement claims United States 
earnest cordial friendship continues exist two 
countries, efforts power used remove 
misunderstanding, avert threatened war 
 
relations friendly nature 
Republic, Costa San 
 
past year differences kind arisen 
hand, sympathies United 
States constantly expressed earnestness. 
 
claim arising seizure cargo 
paid full Government 
 
Civil war continues Spanish part San apparently without 
prospect early close. 
 
Official correspondence freely opened Liberia, gives 
us pleasing view social political progress republic. 
may expected derive new vigor American influence improved 
rapid disappearance slavery United States. 
 
authority furnish republic moderate 
cost, United States vessel 
needed safety state native African races, 
hands would effective arresting African 
slave-trade squadron hands. possession least 
organized naval force would generous ambition republic, 
confidence manifest furnishing would win 
forbearance favor toward colony civilized nations. 
 
proposed telegraph America Europe, way 
Russia, sanctioned Congress 
last session, favorable circumstances, 
association American citizens, cordial 
support well Government Great Britain 
received South American 
States high appreciation enterprise readiness 
co-operate constructing lines 
communication. learn much satisfaction noble design 
telegraphic communication eastern coast America 
Great Britain full expectation early 

 
Thus hoped return domestic peace country 
able resume energy advantage former high career 
commerce 
 
popular representative Egypt died April last. 
unpleasant arose temporary 
office Government resulted suspension 
intercourse. evil promptly corrected arrival 
successor relations Egypt, well 
relations Powers, entirely satisfactory. 
 
rebellion long flagrant China last 
suppressed, co-operating good offices Government 
Western commercial States. judicial consular establishment 
become difficult need legislative 
revision extension commerce 
intimate intercourse instituted Government 
people vast Empire. China seems accepting hearty 
laws regulate commercial social 
intercourse among Western nations. 
 
Owing peculiar situation Japan form 
Government, action empire performing treaty stipulations 
Nevertheless, good progress effected 
Western powers, moving enlightened concert. pecuniary 
claims allowed put course settlement, inland 
sea reopened commerce. reason also believe 
proceedings increased rather diminished friendship 
Japan toward United States. 
 
ports Norfolk, opened 
proclamation. hoped foreign consider whether 
safer profitable themselves, well 
United States, resort open ports 
many vast cost, contraband trade 
ports actual military occupation, 
least lawful effective blockade. 
 
myself, doubt power duty Executive, 
law nations, exclude enemies human race 
United States. Congress think proceedings 
cases lack authority law, ought it, 
recommend provision made effectually preventing foreign 
slave acquiring facilities criminal 
occupation country. 
 
possible new open question maritime 
powers, lights would concede privileges 
naval belligerent insurgents United States, 
are, always been, equally ships war ports 
Disloyal neither 
successful last year time 
favor country foreign 
desire determination governments maritime 
states defeat design believed sincere 
earnest own. Nevertheless, political 
difficulties especially British ports 
northern boundary United States, required, 
likely continue practice constant vigilance 
spirit part United States, well 
nations concerned governments. 
 
Commissioners appointed treaty Great Britain 
adjustment claims Bay Sound 
Agricultural Oregon, proceeding execution 
trust assigned them. 
 
view life property region adjacent 
reason recent assaults 
committed inimical desperate persons there, 
thought proper give notice expiration six 
months, period conditionally stipulated existing arrangement 
Great Britain, United States must hold liberty 
increase naval upon shall find 
proceeding necessary. condition border necessarily come 
consideration connection question continuing 
modifying rights transit Canada United States, 
well regulation temporarily established 
treaty 5th June, 1854. 
 
desire, however, understood making statement 
colonial authorities Canada deemed unjust 
unfriendly toward United States, but, contrary, 
every reason expect that, approval Government, 
take necessary measures prevent new across 

 
act passed last session encouragement 
far possible put operation. seems need 
amendment enable officers Government prevent 
practice immigrants way 
arrival ports, secure free choice 
places settlement. liberal disposition toward 
great national policy manifested European States, 
ought reciprocated part giving immigrants effective 
national protection. regard immigrants one principal 
streams appointed Providence repair 
internal war national strength health. 
necessary secure flow stream present 
end Government must every way make 
manifest neither needs designs impose involuntary military 
service upon come lands cast lot 
country. financial affairs Government successfully 
administered last year. legislation last session 
Congress affected although sufficient 
time yet elapsed experience full effect several 
provisions acts Congress imposing increased taxation. 
 
receipts year sources, upon basis 
signed Secretary Treasury, including loans balance 
Treasury 1st day July, 1863, 
aggregate upon basis, 
leaving balance Treasury, shown 

 
amounts amount principal public debt 
redeemed amount issues 
actual cash operations Treasury 
leaves cash balance 
Treasury 
 
receipts derived customs 
lands direct taxes internal revenue 
miscellaneous sources loans 
applied actual expenditures, including former 
 
civil service pensions 
Indians War Department 
Navy Department interest public debt 
making aggregate leaving 
balance Treasury stated. 
 
actual receipts disbursements first quarter 
estimated receipts disbursements three remaining quarters 
current fiscal year, general operations Treasury 
detail, refer report Secretary Treasury. 
concur opinion proportion moneys required 
meet expenses consequent upon war derived taxation 
still earnestly invite attention 
subject end additional legislation shall 
required meet expectations 
 
public debt first day July last, appears books 
Treasury, amounted Probably, war 
continue another year, amount may increased far 
Held, is, part people, 
become substantial branch national, though private, property. 
obvious reasons nearly property distributed among 
people better. favor general greater 
become owners might, perhaps, good effect without 
injury presented persons limited means. view suggest 
whether might competent expedient Congress 
provide limited amount future issue public securities 
might held exempt taxation 
seizure debt, restrictions limitations might 
necessary guard abuse important 
would enable every prudent person set aside small 
possible day want. 
 
Privileges like would render possession securities 
amount limited desirable every person small means might 
able save enough purpose. great advantage citizens 
creditors well relation public debt 
obvious. Men readily perceive much oppressed 
debt owe themselves. 
 
public debt first day July last, although somewhat exceeding 
estimate Secretary Treasury made Congress 
commencement last session, falls short estimate 
officer made preceding December probable amount 
beginning year sum fact exhibits 
satisfactory condition conduct operations Treasury. 
 
national banking system proving acceptable 
people. day November five hundred 
national banks organized, considerable number 
State banks. Changes State systems 
national system rapidly taking place, hoped soon 
United States banks issue authorized 
Congress circulation secured Government. 
Government people derive great benefit change 
banking systems country hardly 
national system create reliable permanent influence support 
national credit protect people losses use 
paper money. Whether legislation advisable 
suppression issues, Congress 
seems quite clear Treasury satisfactorily conducted 
unless Government exercise power 
circulation country. 
 
report Secretary War accompanying documents 
detail armies field since date 
last annual message, also operations several administrative 
War Department last year. also specify 
measures deemed essential national defense keep 
supply requisite military force. 
 
report Secretary Navy presents comprehensive 
satisfactory exhibit affairs Department naval 
service. subject laudable pride 
countrymen Navy vast proportions organized 
brief period conducted much efficiency success. 
 
general exhibit Navy, including vessels construction 
first December, 1864, shows total vessels, carrying 
guns, actual increase year, 
losses battle, vessels, guns, 

 
total number men time naval service, including 
officers, 
 
captured Navy year vessels, 
whole number naval since hostilities commenced 

 
gross proceeds arising sale condemned prize property thus 
far reported amount large amount proceeds 
still adjudication yet 
 
total expenditure Navy Department every 
including cost immense squadrons called 
existence fourth March, 1861, first November, 1864, 

 
favorable consideration invited various recommendations 
Secretary Navy, especially regard navy-yard 
suitable establishment construction repair iron vessels 
machinery reference made 
last annual message. 
 
attention also invited views expressed report 
relation legislation Congress last session respect 
prize inland 
 
cordially concur recommendation Secretary 
propriety creating new rank naval service. 
 
attention invited report Postmaster-General 
detailed account operations financial condition 
Post-Office Department. 
 
postal revenues year ending June 30, 1864, amounted 
expenditures excess 
expenditures receipts 
 
views presented Postmaster-General subject special 
grants Government aid establishment new lines 
ocean mail policy recommends development 
increased commercial intercourse adjacent neighboring countries 
receive careful consideration Congress. 
 
interest steady expansion population, 
governmental institutions new 
portions country scarcely much less 
destroyed, great civil war, first glance would seem 
absorbed almost entire energies nation. 
 
organization admission State Nevada completed 
conformity law, thus excellent system firmly 
established mountains, seemed barren 
waste Atlantic States grown 
coast Pacific 
 
Territories Union generally condition prosperity 
rapid reason great distance 
communication Indian 
partially understood 
difficulties permit governments, 
like others, go speedy full operation. 
 
intimately connected material growth 
nation, ask attention Congress valuable information 
important recommendations relating public lands, Indian affairs, 
Pacific Railroad, mineral discoveries contained report 
Secretary Interior herewith 
report also embraces subjects pensions, topics 
public interest pertaining Department. 
 
quantity public land disposed five quarters ending 
thirtieth September last 
acres entered homestead law. remainder located 
military land agricultural certified States 
railroads, sold cash received sales 
fees 
 
sales fiscal year ending June 30, 1864, 
received preceding year. 
aggregate number acres surveyed year equal 
quantity disposed of, open settlement 
acres surveyed land. 
 
great enterprise connecting Atlantic Pacific States 
telegraph lines entered upon vigor gives 
assurance success, notwithstanding embarrassments arising 
prevailing high materials labor. route main line 
road definitely located one hundred miles 
point City, Nebraska, preliminary 
Pacific Railroad California made 
great bend River 
 
Numerous discoveries mines added 
many heretofore known, country occupied 
Nevada Rocky mountains 
labor, believed 
produce mines precious region year 
reached, 
 
recommended last annual message Indian system 
Congress last session, acting upon recommendation, 
provide system California, believed 
present organization management Indians 
attended reasonable success. Much yet remains done 
provide proper government Indians parts 
country, render secure advancing provide 
welfare Secretary 
attention Congress 
 
 
liberal provisions made Congress paying pensions invalid 
soldiers sailors Republic widows, orphans, 
dependent mothers fallen battle died disease 
contracted wounds received service country 
diligently added pension rolls 
year ending 30th day June last names invalid 
soldiers seamen, making present number army 
invalid pensioners navy invalid pensioners 
 
widows, orphans, mothers placed army 
pension rolls navy present number army 
pensioners class navy pensioners 
beginning year number Revolutionary pensioners 
twelve soldiers, seven since died. 
remainder law receive pensions 
Revolutionary soldiers. year ending 
thirtieth June, 1864, paid pensioners 

 
cheerfully commend continued patronage benevolent 
institutions District Columbia hitherto 
established Congress, respectfully refer 
information concerning relation Washington 
Capitol, matters local interest report 

 
Agricultural Department, supervision present 
energetic faithful head, rapidly great 
vital interest created advance. peculiarly people's 
department, feel directly concerned other. 
commend continued attention fostering care Congress. 
 
war Since last annual message important lines 
positions occupied forces maintained 
arms steadily thus regions left 
Missouri, Kentucky, Tennessee, parts States 
produced reasonably fair 
 
remarkable feature military operations year 
General attempted march three hundred miles directly 
insurgent region. tends show great increase relative 
strength General-in-Chief feel able 
hold check every active force enemy, yet 
large army move result 
yet known, regard 
 
Important movements also occurred year effect 
society Union. Although short complete 
success, much right direction twelve thousand citizens 
States Arkansas Louisiana organized loyal State 
governments, free constitutions, earnestly struggling 
maintain administer them. movements direction 
extensive though less definite Missouri, Kentucky, Tennessee, 
overlooked. Maryland presents example complete 
success. Maryland secure liberty union future. 
genius rebellion claim Maryland. Like another foul spirit 
driven out, may seek tear her, more. 
 
last session Congress proposed amendment Constitution 
abolishing slavery throughout United States passed Senate, 
failed lack requisite two-thirds vote House 
Representatives. Although present Congress nearly 
members, without questioning wisdom patriotism 
stood opposition, venture recommend 
passage measure present session. course abstract 
question intervening election shows almost 
certainly next Congress pass measure not. 
Hence question time proposed amendment 
go States action. go 
events, may agree sooner claimed 
election imposed duty members change views 
votes than, additional element considered, 
judgment may affected it. voice people 
first time heard upon question. great national crisis 
like ours, unanimity action among seeking common end 
desirable, almost indispensable. yet approach unanimity 
unless deference shall paid majority 
simply majority. case common end 
maintenance Union, among means secure end 
will, election, clearly declared favor 
Constitutional amendment. 
 
reliable public purpose country derived 
popular elections. Judging recent canvass 
result, purpose people within loyal States maintain 
integrity Union never firm nearly unanimous 
now. extraordinary good order millions 
voters met mingled polls give strong assurance this. 
supported Union called, great 
majority opposing party also may fairly claimed entertain 
actuated purpose. argument 
effect candidate office whatever, high low, 
ventured seek votes avowal giving Union. 
much motives much heated controversy 
proper means best mode advancing Union cause, 
distinct issue Union Union politicians shown 
knowledge among people. 
affording people fair opportunity showing one another 
world firmness unanimity purpose, election 
vast value national cause. 
 
election exhibited another fact less valuable 
fact approach important branch 
national resources, living men. melancholy reflect 
war filled many carried many 
hearts, relief know that, compared 
fallen corps divisions brigades 
regiments formed fought gone existence, 
great majority men composed still living. 
true naval service. election returns prove this. many voters 
could else found. States regularly holding elections, 
four years ago, wit, California, Connecticut, Delaware, Illinois, 
Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, Michigan, 
Minnesota, Missouri, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Ohio, Oregon, 
Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Vermont, West Virginia, Wisconsin, cast 
votes now, cast then, showing aggregate 
added cast new States 
Kansas Nevada, States vote 1860, thus swelling 
aggregate increase three years 
half war table appended showing 
added number soldiers field 
Massachusetts, Rhode Island, New Jersey, Delaware, Indiana, Illinois, 
California, laws States could vote away 
homes, number less yet all. 
number organized Territories four years 
white black, join us national arms press 
back insurgent lines. much shown, 
election. material inquire increase 
produced show would greater war, 
probably true. important fact remains demonstrated 
men war exhausted 
process gaining strength may need 
maintain contest [This sentence recognizes concern 
war main war men. Material 
resources complete abundant ever. 
 
national resources, then, and, believe, 
public purpose maintain 
national authority and, believe, 
manner continuing effort remains choose. careful 
consideration evidence accessible seems 
attempt negotiation insurgent leader could result good. 
would accept nothing short Union, precisely 
give. declarations effect explicit 
repeated. attempt deceive us. affords us 
excuse deceive ourselves. voluntarily Union; 
voluntarily yield it. us issue 
simple, inflexible. issue tried war 
decided victory. Southern people 
fail him, beaten. Either way would victory defeat 
following war. true, however, heads insurgent cause 
necessarily true follow. Although 
Union, can. them, know, already desire peace 
number may increase. moment 
peace simply laying arms submitting national 
authority Constitution. much Government could not, 
would, maintain war them. loyal people would sustain 
allow it. questions remain, would adjust 
peaceful means legislation, courts, votes, operating 
Constitutional lawful certain, 
possible, questions would beyond Executive power 
as, instance, admission members Congress whatever 
might require appropriation money. Executive power 
would greatly diminished cessation actual war. Pardons 
however, would still within Executive 
control. spirit temper control would exercised 
fairly judged past. 
 
year ago general pardon upon specified terms, offered 
except certain designated classes, time made 
known excepted classes still within contemplation 
special year many general 
provision, many would, signs bad faith 
led measures rendered practical process less 
easy certain. time also special pardons 
granted individuals excepted classes, voluntary 
application denied. Thus practically door full 
year open except condition make free 
is, custody still open 
all. time may come, probably come, public duty shall 
demand closed lieu measures 
heretofore shall adopted. 
 
presenting armed resistance national 
authority part insurgents indispensable 
condition ending war part Government, retract 
nothing heretofore said slavery. repeat declaration made 
year ago, remain present position shall attempt 
retract modify emancipation proclamation, shall return 
slavery person free terms proclamation 
acts Congress." people should, whatever mode means, 
make Executive duty persons, another, I, 
must instrument perform it. 
 
stating single condition peace mean simply say war 
cease part Government whenever shall ceased 
part began it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, DECEMBER 6, 1864. 
 
FRIENDS FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I believe shall never old enough 
speak without embarrassment nothing talk about. 
good news tell you, yet bad news tell. talked 
elections nothing say them. 
interesting news Sherman. know went 
at, can't tell come at. close 
proposing three cheers General Sherman army. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR HALL. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 7, 1864. 
 
GOVERNOR HALL, Jefferson City, Mo.: 
 
Complaint made doings man Mo., 
name who, told, charge militia force, 
United States service. Please inquire matter 
correct anything may find power. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., December 8, 1864. 
 
COLONEL Louisville, Ky.: 
 
appealed behalf man name Frank said 
long time still without definite 
ground stated. it? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER APPOINTING COMMISSIONERS 
 
INVESTIGATE MILITARY DIVISION WEST MISSISSIPPI. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, December 10, 1864. 
 
ORDERED, First, Major-General William P. Smith Hon. Henry 
be, appointed special commissioners 
investigate report, information President; upon 
civil military administration military division upon 
west Mississippi, instructions shall issued 
authority President War Department. 
 
Second, said commissioners shall power examine witnesses 
upon oath, take proofs writing, upon 
investigation may deem expedient, return 
together report. 
 
Third, officers persons military, naval revenue 
services, branch public service authority 
United States Government, required, upon issued 
direction said commissioners, appear time 
place may designated said give testimony 
oath touching matters may inquired commissioners, 
produce books, papers, documents may 
notified required produce commissioners, may 
possession. 
 
Fourth, said special commissioners shall also investigate report upon 
matters may hereafter directed Secretary War, 
shall convenient dispatch make report writing 
investigation, shall also time time make special reports 
Secretary War upon matters may deem importance 
public 
 
Secretary War shall assign said commissioners 
aid assistance may required performance duties, 
make reasonable compensation said 
commissioners persons employed may deem proper. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. THOMAS. WASHINGTON, D.C., December 16, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL THOMAS, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
Please accept yourself, officers, men, nation's thanks 
good work yesterday. made magnificent grand 
consummation within easy let 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
ORIGIN CURRENCY 
 
COLONEL B. D. TAYLOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 1864. 
 
DEAR COLONEL long determined make public origin 
tell world Taylor's 
always friendly me, times fell us, 
shoulders, though broad willing, weak, surrounded 
circumstances people knew trust, 
said "I send Colonel know 
do." think January, 1862, 
so. came, said you: 
 
"What do?" Said you, "Why, issue Treasury notes bearing 
interest, printed best banking paper. Issue enough pay 
Army expenses declare legal 
 
Chase thought thing, finally accomplished it, 
gave people Republic greatest blessing ever 
paper pay 
 
due you, father present people 
know it, take great pleasure making known. many 
times laughed telling plainly lazy 
anything lawyer. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMAND EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
WASHINGTON, December 16, 1864 
 
OFFICER COMMAND Chattanooga, Tenn.: 
 
said private Anderson cavalry, 
long time prison Please report 
condition, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL 300,000 VOLUNTEERS, DECEMBER 19, 1864. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas, act approved July 4, 1864, entitled "An act 
regulate provide enrolling calling national 
forces, purposes," provided President 
United States may, "at discretion, time hereafter, call 
number men, volunteers respective terms one, two, 
three years military "that case quota 
part thereof town, ward city, precinct, election 
district, country shall filled 
within space fifty days call, President shall 
immediately order draft one year fill quota part 
thereof may 
 
Whereas, credits allowed accordance act Congress 
call men, made July 18, 1864, number men 
obtained call reduced 
 
Whereas, operations enemy certain States rendered 
impracticable procure full quotas troops said 

 
Whereas, foregoing causes men put 
Army, Navy, Marine Corps said call July 18, 1864, leaving 
deficiency call two hundred sixty thousand 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
America, order supply aforesaid deficiency provide 
casualties military naval service United States, 
issue call three hundred thousand volunteers 
serve one, two, three years. quotas States, districts, 
call assigned War Department 
bureau Provost-Marshal General United States, 
"in case quota part thereof town, ward 
city, precinct, election district, county 
shall fifteenth February, 1865, 
draft shall made fill quota part thereof 
call may said fifteenth day February, 1865. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
MARCH SEA 
 
GENERAL W. T. SHERMAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 26, 1864 
 
DEAR GENERAL many thanks 
capture 
 
leaving Atlantic 
feeling better judge, 
remembering "nothing nothing interfere. 
Now, success, honor 
believe none us went 
 
taking work General Thomas 
taken, indeed great success. afford obvious 
immediate military showing world 
army could putting stronger part important new 
service, yet leaving enough old opposing force 
brings sat darkness see great 
light. next? 
 
suppose safe leave General Grant decide. 
 
Please make grateful whole army officers 
men. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMAND 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 27, 1864. 
 
OFFICER COMMAND Lexington, Ky.: 
 
within power send particulars causes 
Jacob arrested sent away. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 27, 1864. 
 
 
Dr. JOHN 
 
DEAR SIR:--I honor acknowledge reception note 
twentieth December, conveying announcement 
New Jersey conferred upon degree Doctor 
Laws. 
 
assurance conveyed high course 
Government represent, received approval body 
gentlemen character intelligence, time public 
trial, grateful me. 
 
Thoughtful men must feel fate civilization upon continent 
involved issue contest. Among gratifying proofs 
conviction hearty devotion everywhere exhibited 
schools national cause. 
 
thankful labors seemed conduct preservation 
institutions, alone expect good government 
train sound progress liberal 
 
am, sir, truly, obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMAND 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 28, 1864. 
 
OFFICER COMMAND Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
Suspend execution James R. six weeks Friday 
thirtieth month, time given friends make 
proof, can, upon certain points. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., December 28, 1864. p.m. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
please tell understand 
present 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 29, 1864. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
man Company I, Eleventh Volunteers, First 
Third Division, Twenty-fourth Army Corps, 
assumed name William whose real name Frank 
R. arrest, probably tried 
desertion. son present minister 
close personal friend Senator Trumbull myself. willing 
boy think well trial go 
regularly on, suspending execution order 
me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 30, 1864. 
 
COLONEL Indianapolis, 
 
said court-martial tried John 
disposed advise pardoned sent 
true, telegraph effect once. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 4, 1865. 
 
JOHN WILLIAMS, Springfield, Ill.: 
 
Let substitute regularly mustered in, send evidence 
done discharge 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 5, 1865. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES UNITED STATES: 
 
herewith return honorable body, 
resolution correct certain errors internal revenue 
without approval. 
 
reason informed joint resolution 
prepared last moments last session Congress 
purpose certain errors reference internal 
revenue act, discovered examination official 
copy procured State Department hours 
passed House went Senate, vote 
taken upon it, accident presented President 
Senate 
 
Since adjournment last session Congress, errors 
kind similar resolution designed correct, 
discovered law, thought expedient 
include necessary one act resolution. 
 
attention proper committee House has, informed, 
already directed preparation bill purpose. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 5, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Richard T. Kentucky, 
House, Richmond, order General return 
Kentucky. Please communicate leave pass lines, come 
Washington. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, January 6, 1865, LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point: 
 
man City Point name 
trouble desertion, please case briefly stated 
let executed 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, 
 
WASHINGTON, January 9, 1865. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: transmit Congress 
copy two treaties United States 
etc., concluded twentieth 
May, 1863, twentieth July, 1863, respectively, 
exchanged twenty-fourth June last; 
recommend appropriation carry effect provisions thereof 
relative payment proportion United States toward 
said 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 9, 1865. 
 
HON. Speaker House Representatives. 
 
SIR:--I transmit herewith letter Secretary War, 
accompanying report reply resolution 
House Representatives, dated December 7, 1864, requesting 
"to communicate House report made Col. Thomas M. Key 
interview General fourteenth 
day June, 1862, banks subject 
exchange prisoners 
 
am, sir, respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING COMMERCE, JANUARY 10, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas act Congress September, 1850, 
entitled "An act create additional collection districts State 
California, change existing districts therein, 
modify existing collection districts United States," extends 
merchandise bond privilege exported 
British North American adjoining United States, 
manner prescribed act Congress third March, 1845, 
certain ports merchandise may 
provides "that ports situated 
United States, adjoining British North American 
may hereafter found expedient, may extended 
like privileges recommendation Secretary 
Treasury, proclamation duly made President United 
States, specially designating ports aforesaid privileges 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
America, accordance recommendation Secretary 
Treasury, hereby declare proclaim port St. 
State Vermont, is, shall be, entitled privileges 
regard exportation merchandise bond British North 
American adjoining United States, extended 
ports enumerated seventh section act Congress 
third March, 1845, aforesaid, date 
proclamation. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, tenth day January, year 
Lord one thousand eight 
independence United States America eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL B. F. BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 10, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
principal report expedition ever reached 
War Department, informed there. preliminary report reach 
here, returned General Grant course, leave 
publish cannot given without inspection paper, 
deemed public service. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL B. F. BUTLER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 13, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
asking leave come Washington received. 
summoned Committee Conduct War attend here, which, 
course, do. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., January 15, 1865. 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
announcing ordinance emancipation received. Thanks 
convention you. expect here? Would glad 
suggestion supplying place military 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. M. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 
15, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
represented much violence 
northern Missouri driving away people almost 
it. Please gather information, consider whether appeal 
people go homes let one another alone recognizing 
full right protection others alone, 
refuses let others alone may enable withdraw 
troops, presence cause irritation 
constant thus restore peace quiet, returning 
prosperity. Please consider telegraph write me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FIRST SURRENDER DAVIS 
 
P. P. BLAIR, 
 
WASHINGTON, January 18, 1865. 
 
F. P. BLAIR, ESQ. 
 
shown Mr. letter twelfth 
instant, may say constantly been, now, shall 
continue, ready receive agent influential 
person resisting national authority may informally send 
view securing peace people one common country. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, January 19, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Please read answer letter though President, 
friend. son, twenty-second year, 
wishes see something war wish 
put ranks, yet give commission, 
already served long better entitled better qualified 
hold. Could he, without embarrassment you, detriment service, 
go military family nominal I, 
public, furnishing necessary no, say without least 
anxious deeply interested 
shall yourself. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 19, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Mrs. Mrs. shall sentenced death, notify me, 
postpone execution till order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 19, 1864 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
man arrest desertion passing name 
William think, whose real name different. son 
close friend mine must let executed. Please 
let know present prospective condition. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. M. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 24, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
said old lady Clay County, Missouri, name Mrs. 
B. Price, sent South. let 
remain. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 24, 1865. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
Several members Cabinet, myself, considered question, 
to-day, time coming here. fully appreciate 
wish remain Tennessee State government shall 
completely unanimous conclusion 
4th sure reach 
time. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE, JANUARY 24, 1865. 
 
SIR, LADIES GENTLEMEN: 
 
accept emotions profoundest beautiful gift 
pleased present me. will, course, expect 
acknowledge it. much said Gettysburg well, 
attempt say may perhaps serve weaken force 
already said. eloquent 
paid patriotism labors American 
occasion National 
Gettysburg, friend, Edward now, departed 
earth. life truly great one, think greatest part 
crowned closing years, wish read, 
already done so, eloquent truthful words 
spoke women America. Truly, services rendered 
country time, yet 
never estimated ought be. kind wishes 
personally, beg leave render likewise thanks. 
assure now, gentlemen may God 
bless all. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 25, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point 
 
W. First Heavy Artillery, sentence 
death, please telegraph briefly circumstances. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL GRANT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 25, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
received report case W. 
interfere case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EARLY REBELS 
 
INSTRUCTIONS MAJOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 30, 1865. 
 
MAJOR T. T. 
 
proceed documents placed hands, 
reaching General Ord deliver letter addressed 
Secretary War. Then, General Ord's assistance procure interview 
Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell, them, deliver 
paper letter written. Note 
copy retain time delivery delivered. Receive 
answer writing, waiting reasonable time it, which, 
contain decision come without condition, 
warrant ask General Ord pass directed 
letter Secretary War him. answer decline 
come, propose terms, pass through. 
whole duty, return report me. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY WAR GENERAL 
 

 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 30, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Headquarters Army 
 
direction President instructed inform three 
gentlemen, Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell, messenger 
dispatched near are, without unnecessary 
delay. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT LETTER J. M. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, January 31, 1865. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The report circulation House Peace 
Commissioners way city, used 
us. true, fear shall lose bill. Please authorize 
contradict it, true. 
 
Respectfully, J. M. 
 
President. 
 
 

 
far know Peace Commissioners city likely 
it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. January 31, 1865 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 31, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
messenger coming business contained despatch. 
Detain gentlemen comfortable quarters 
act upon message far applicable, 
made pass General Ord's hands, gentlemen 
supposed beyond lines. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INSTRUCTIONS SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 31, 1865. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State 
 
proceed Fortress Monroe, Virginia, meet 
informally confer Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell, 
basis letter F. P. Blair, Esq., January 18, 1865, copy 
have. make known three things 
indispensable wit: 
 
1. restoration national authority throughout States. 
 
2. Executive United States slavery 
question position assumed thereon late annual message 
Congress, preceding 
 
3. cessation hostilities short end war 
forces hostile Government. 
 
inform propositions inconsistent 
above, considered passed upon spirit sincere 
hear may choose say report me. 
assume definitely consummate anything. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT ABOLISHING SLAVERY 
 
PASSAGE CONGRESS CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT 
ABOLISHING SLAVERY 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, JANUARY 31, 1865. 
 
supposed passage Congress Constitutional amendment 
abolishing slavery throughout United States 
occasion indebted honor call. 
 
occasion one country, whole 
world. task yet go forward consummate 
votes States Congress nobly began yesterday. 
honor inform present Illinois already done 
work. Maryland half through, felt proud Illinois 
little ahead. 
 
thought measure fitting indispensable 
winding great difficulty. wished 
States effected remove causes 
disturbance and, attain end, necessary 
original disturbing cause should, possible, out. 
thought would bear witness never 
could eradicate slavery, issuing Emancipation 
Proclamation. proclamation falls short amendment 
fully question might raised whether 
proclamation legally valid. might added, aided 
came lines, 
give up; would effect upon 
children slaves born fact, would urged 
meet evil. amendment king's cure 
winds whole thing up. would repeat, fitting 
indispensable consummation great game 
could congratulate country, 
whole world upon great moral victory. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, February 1, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point: 
 
Let nothing change, delay military 
movements plans. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MAJOR WASHINGTON, D. C., February 1, 1865. 
 
MAJOR T. T. ECKERT, Care General Grant, City Point, Va.: 
 
Call Fortress Monroe, put direction Mr. Seward, 
find there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., February 2, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Say gentlemen meet personally Fortress Monroe 
soon get there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 2, 1865. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Fortress Monroe, Va. 
 
Induced despatch General Grant, join Fort Monroe, soon 
come. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER MAKE DRAFT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, February 6, 1865 
 
Whereas complaints made localities respecting 
quotas credits allowed pending call troops fill 
Now, order determine controversies respect 
thereto, avoid delay filling armies, ordered, 
 
1. Brigadier-General Richard 
Colonel C. W. Foster, be, hereby board 
examine proper quotas credits respective States 
districts call December 19, 1864, 
errors found therein, make law facts may 
report determination 
determination said board final draft 
made conformity 
 
2. Provost-Marshal-General ordered make draft 
respective districts speedily done 
fifteenth month. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 6, 1865. 
 

 
gentlemen distinctly say morning want 
means office showing people quota assigned 
right. think take little hours, 
say. Please give double time every facility can. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
February 6, 1865. 
 
Provost-Marshal brings letter back says cannot give 
facility required without detriment service, thereupon 
excused it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 7, 1865. 
 
Commanding Post Ky.: 
 
Complaint made forcing negroes military 
service, even rails like 
extort consent. hope may mistake. like must 
done you, one you. must force negroes 
white men. Answer this. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR SMITH. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 8, 1865. 
 
EXCELLENCY GOVERNOR SMITH, 
 
Complaint made me, Vermont, assignment quota 
draft pending call also 
bad faith promise fairly allow credits men 
previously supposed case stated follows: 
 
Vermont New must furnish six thousand men 
pending equal, must furnish many 
long run. Government finds former calls Vermont 
furnished surplus five hundred, New 
fifteen two making two thousand added 
six thousand, making eight thousand furnished two States, 
four thousand less, fair surplus 
five hundred four thousand, leaves three thousand five hundred 
quota pending likewise New 
surplus fifteen hundred four thousand, leaves two thousand 
five hundred quota pending call. three thousand five 
hundred two thousand five hundred make precisely six thousand, 
supposed case requires two States, equal 
Vermont furnish one thousand New Hampshire, New 
heretofore furnished one thousand Vermont, 
burdens two long run. result, far 
bad faith Vermont, indispensable keeping good faith 
New result six thousand men 
obtained two States, and, time deal justly 
keep faith both, questioning 
process right result reached. supposed case perfect 

 
pending call three hundred thousand men subject fair 
three hundred thousand remaining fair 
credits impossible concede Vermont 
asks without coming short three hundred thousand men, making 
localities pay shown her. 
 
upon case stated. different reasons making 
allowance Vermont, let presented considered. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 8, 1865. 
 
HONORABLE SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
joint resolution entitled resolution declaring certain States 
entitled representation electoral signed 
Executive deference view Congress implied 
passage presentation him. view, however, two Houses 
Congress, twelfth article Constitution, 
complete power exclude counting electoral votes deemed 
competent Executive defeat 
power would case action 
essential matter. right Executive 
interfere way matter counting electoral 
votes, also signing said resolution 
expressed opinion preamble judgment 
upon subject resolution. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 
8, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point. Va.: 
 
called House Representatives give account 
interview Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell, 
desirable put despatch February 1, Secretary 
War, which, among things, say: "I fear going 
back without expression one authority bad 
think despatch credit, see 
embarrass you. May use it? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESULT ELECTORAL COUNT 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE CONGRESS, RESULT ELECTORAL 

 
FEBRUARY 9, 1865. 
 
deep gratitude countrymen mark 
ability perform duty required 
favorable circumstances, rendered difficult 
existing national yet firm reliance strength 
free government, loyalty people 
principles upon 
faith Supreme Ruler nations, accept pleased 
respective Houses Congress. 
 
 
 
 
REVIEW PEACE 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 10, 1865 
 
HONORABLE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
response resolution eighth instant, requesting 
information relation conference recently held Roads, 
honor state day date gave Francis P. 
Blair, written follows, wit: 
 
December 28, 1864. 
 
Allow F. P. Blair, pass lines, go South, 
return. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
time informed Mr. Blair sought card means 
getting Richmond, Va., given authority speak act 
Government, informed anything would say 
account otherwise. Afterwards Mr. Blair told 
Richmond seen Mr. Jefferson (Mr. 
time left manuscript letter, follows, wit: 
 
RICHMOND, VA., January 12, 1865. F. P. BLAIR, ESQ. 
 
SIR: deemed proper, probably desirable you, give 
substance remarks made me, repeated 
President Lincoln, etc., etc. 
 
disposition find forms, willing, 
heretofore, enter restoration peace, 
ready send commission whenever reason suppose 
received, receive commission United States Government 
shall choose send one. notwithstanding former 
would, could promise 
agent would received, appoint one immediately, renew 
effort enter conference view secure peace two 
countries. 
 
Yours, etc., JEFFERSON 
 
 
Afterwards, view shown Mr. Davis, 
wrote delivered Mr. Blair letter, follows, wit: 
 
 
WASHINGTON, January 18, 1865. 
 
P. P. BLAIR, ESQ. 
 
SIR:--Your shown Mr. letter twelfth 
instant, may say constantly been, now, 
shall continue ready receive agent influential 
person resisting national authority may informally send 
view securing peace people one common country. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Afterwards Mr. Blair dictated authorized make 
back retained copy letter last 
follows: 
 
January 28, 1865 
 
To-day Mr. Blair tells instant delivered 
Mr. Davis original within copy, left 
him; time delivering Mr. Davis read twice Mr. 
presence, close (Mr. remarked 
part "our one common related part Mr. 
letter "the two Mr. Davis replied 
understood it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Afterwards Secretary War placed hands following 
indorsed him, 
 
OFFICE UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH WAR DEPARTMENT. following 
telegram received Washington January 29, 1865, headquarters Army 
James, 
 
P.M., January 29, 
 
EDWIN M. Secretary War: 
 
"The following despatch received Major-General 
action. refer Lieutenant-General Grant's 

 
  O. C. 
  HEADQUARTERS ARMY POTOMAC, 
  January 29, 1863. 4 
 
  E. O. C. 
  Army 
  'The following despatch forwarded action. Since 
  knowledge General Grant's understanding 
  kind, refer matter officer present 
  two armies. 
  G. 
 
 
  HEADQUARTERS NINTH ARMY 
  JNO. G. Army Potomac: 
  H. Stephens, R. M. T. Hunter, J. A. Campbell desire 
  cross lines, accordance understanding claimed exist 
  Lieutenant-General Grant, way Washington peace 
  Shall desire early answer, 
  come immediately. Would like reach City Point 
  can. this, would like come 
  10 A.M. to-morrow morning. 
  B. 
  Commanding Ninth 
 
 
  29, 8.30 P.M. 
  referred President instructions 
  may pleased give. 
  M. STANTON, 
 
 
appears time placing foregoing telegram 
hands Secretary War dispatched General Ord follows, wit: 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, January 29, 1865. 10 P.M. 2 
A.M., MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Department knowledge understanding General 
Grant allow person come within lines commissioner 
sort. therefore allow one come lines 
character profession receive President's instructions, 
telegraph submitted directions. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
Afterwards, direction, Secretary War telegraphed General Ord 
follows, wit: 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., January 10.30 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL E. O. C. Headquarters Army James. 
 
direction President, instructed inform 
three gentlemen, Messrs. Stephens, Hunter Campbell, messenger 
dispatched near without 
unnecessary delay. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
Afterwards prepared put hands Major Thomas T. Eckert 
following instructions 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
MAJOR T. T. WASHINGTON, January 30, 1865 
 
SIR:--You proceed documents placed hands, 
reaching General Ord deliver letter addressed 
Secretary War; then, General Ord's assistance, procure interview 
Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell, them. Deliver 
paper letter written. Note 
copy retain time delivery delivered. Receive 
answer writing, waiting reasonable time it, which, 
contain decision come without condition, 
warrant ask General Ord pass through, directed 
letter Secretary War him. answer decline 
come, propose terms, pass through. 
whole duty, return report me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
CITY POINT, February 1, 1865. 
 
MESSRS. ALEXANDER H. STEPHENS, J. A. CAMPBELL R. M. T. HUNTER. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--I instructed President United States place 
paper hands, information pass 
United States military lines understood 
purpose informal conference basis letter copy 
reverse side choose pass 
understanding, notify writing, procure 
commanding general pass lines Fortress Monroe 
military may deem prudent, place 
met due time person persons purpose 
informal and, further, shall protection, 
safe safe return events. 
 
THOMAS T. ECKERT, Major 
 
 
WASHINGTON, January 18, 1865. F. P. BLAIR, ESQ. 
 
SIR:--Your shown Mr. letter twelfth 
instant, may say constantly been, now, 
shall continue ready receive agent influential 
person resisting national authority may informally send 
view securing peace people one common country. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
Afterwards, Major Eckert following dispatch 
received General Grant: 
 
OFFICE UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH, WAR DEPARTMENT. 
 
following telegram received Washington January 30, 1865, City 
Point, Va., 10.30 A.M., January 30, 
 
  "His EXCELLENCY 
  A. LINCOLN, 
  President United States: 
 
  "The following communication received last 
 
  VA., January 30, 1865. 
  U.S. GRANT, 
  Commanding Armies United States. 
  desire pass lines safe proceed 
  Washington hold conference President Lincoln upon 
  subject existing war, view ascertaining upon 
  terms may pursuance course indicated 
  letter Mr. Blair January 18, 1865, 
  presume not, wish see person, 
  convenient, confer upon subject. 
  respectfully, yours, 
  H. 
  A. CAMPBELL. 
  M. T. 
 
 
"I sent directions receive gentlemen, expect 
quarters evening, U.S. GRANT, 
Commanding Armies United States." 
 
 
This, transferred General Ord's agency matter 
General Grant. resolved, however, send Major Eckert forward 
message, accordingly telegraphed General Grant follows, wit: 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, January 13, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
messenger coming business contained despatch. 
Detain gentlemen comfortable quarters 
act upon message brings far applicable, 
made pass General Ord's hands, gentlemen 
supposed beyond lines. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
Major Eckert bore letter Secretary 
War General Grant, follows, wit: 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 30, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, etc. 
 
President desires please procure 
Major Thomas T. Eckert, interview Messrs. Stephens, 
Hunter, Campbell, return requests pass 
lines Fortress Monroe route 
military may deem prudent, giving protection 
comfortable quarters there, let none 
effect upon movements plans. 
 
order President: EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
Supposing proper point reached, dispatched Secretary 
State following instructions, Major Eckert, however, going 
ahead him: 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 31, 1865. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary 
 
proceed Fortress Monroe, Va., meet informally 
confer Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell basis 
letter F. P. Blair, Esq., January 18, 1865, copy 
have. 
 
make known three things Wit: 
 
1. restoration national authority throughout States. 
 
2. Executive United States slavery 
question position assumed thereon late annual message 
Congress preceding 
 
3. cessation hostilities short end war 
forces hostile Government. 
 
inform propositions inconsistent 
considered passed upon spirit sincere 
hear may choose say report me. 
 
assume definitely consummate anything. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
day date following telegram sent General Grant: 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February A.M.) 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Let nothing change, delay military 
movements plans. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
Afterwards following despatch received General Grant: 
 
OFFICE UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH WAR DEPARTMENT. following 
telegram received Washington, P.M., February 1, 1865, City 
Point, Va., February 1, 
 
"His EXCELLENCY A. LINCOLN, President United States: 
 
"Your despatch received. armistice consequence 
presence Mr. Stephens others within lines. troops kept 
readiness move shortest notice occasion justify it. 
 
GRANT, 
 
 
notify Major Eckert Secretary State would Fortress 
Monroe, put communication, following despatch 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 1, 1865. 
 
MAJOR T. T. ECKERT, Care General Grant, City Point, Va.: 
 
Call Fortress Monroe put direction Mr. 
find there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
morning 2d instant following telegrams received 
respectively Secretary State Major 
 
FORT MONROE, VA., February PM. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Arrived 10 evening. Richmond party here. remain here. 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
 
CITY POINT, VA., February 1, 1865. 10 P.M. 
 
EXCELLENCY A. LINCOLN, President United States: 
honor report delivery communication letter 
afternoon, received reply 6 P.M., 
satisfactory. 
 
 
8 P.M. following note, addressed General Grant, 
 
CITY POINT, VA., February 1, 1865 
 
GRANT. 
 
desire go Washington City confer informally 
President personally reference matters mentioned letter 
Mr. Blair 18th January without personal compromise 
question letter. permission 
authorities Richmond. 
 
respectfully yours, 
 
H. STEPHENS R. M. T. HUNTER. J. A. 
 
 
P.M. notified could proceed unless 
complied terms expressed letter. point meeting 
designated note would not, opinion, insisted 
upon. Think Fort Monroe would complied 
instructions, return Washington to-morrow unless otherwise 
ordered. 
 
T. ECKERT, etc. 
 
 
reading despatch Major Eckert recall 
Secretary State, following telegram General Grant 
Secretary War shown me: 
 
OFFICE UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH, WAR DEPARTMENT. 
 
following telegram received Washington A.M., February 2, 1865, 
City Point, Va., February 1, 10.30 P.M., 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, War: 
 
"Now interview Major Eckert, written 
instructions, Mr. Stephens party state 
officially become matter record, 
convinced upon conversation Messrs. Stephens Hunter 
good desire sincere restore peace union. 
felt liberty express even views 
account placed awkward position, 
could avoided seeing first fear 
going back without expression anyone authority 
bad time, recognize difficulties way 
receiving informal commissioners time, know 
however, Mr. Lincoln 
interview two named despatch, three within 
lines. letter President's instructions 
contemplated secure safe conduct used 
language Major 
 
GRANT 
 
 
despatch General Grant changed purpose, accordingly 
telegraphed Secretary State, respectively, follows: 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 2, 1865. 9 A.M.) 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
Say gentlemen meet personally Fortress Monroe 
soon get there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., February 2, 1865. 9 A.M.) 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Fortress Monroe, Va.: 
 
Induced despatch General Grant, join Fort Monroe 
soon come. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
following despatch shown me. 

 
OFFICE UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH, WAR DEPARTMENT. 
 
following telegram received Washington, February 2, 1865, City 
Point, Va., 9 A.M., February 2, 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State, Fort Monroe: 
 
"The gentlemen accepted proposed terms, leave 
Fort Monroe A.M. 
 
S. GRANT, 
 
HON. Edwin M. Stanton, Secretary War, 
 
 
night reached Roads, found Secretary 
State Major Eckert steamer learned 
Richmond gentlemen another steamer also 
Roads, Secretary State yet seen 
communicated them. ascertained Major Eckert literally 
complied instructions, saw first time answer 
Richmond gentlemen him, despatch 1st 
"not answer follows, wit: 
 
CITY POINT, VA., February 1, 1865. THOMAS T. ECKERT, Major 
note, delivered day, 
considered. reply say furnished copy 
letter President Lincoln Francis P. Blair, Esq., 18th 
January another copy appended note. 
instructions contained letter following 
 
January 28, 1865. "In conformity letter Mr. 
Lincoln, foregoing copy, proceed 
Washington City informal conference upon issues involved 
existing war, purpose securing peace two 
countries. "With great respect, obedient servant, 
 
 
substantial object obtained informal conference 
ascertain upon terms existing war 
 
instructions contemplate personal interview President 
Lincoln Washington City, explanation 
ready meet person persons President Lincoln may appoint 
place may 
 
earnest desire honorable peace may agreed 
upon, prepared receive submit propositions may 
possibly lead end. 
 
respectfully, yours, 
 
     ALEXANDER H. 
     R. M. T. HUNTER. 
     JOHN A. CAMPBELL. 
 
 
note gentlemen, subsequently addressed General Grant, 
already given Major despatch 1st instant. 
 
also saw, first time, following note, addressed 
Richmond gentlemen Major 
 
CITY POINT, VA., February 2, 1865. THOMAS T. ECKERT, Major 
reply verbal statement 
instructions allow alter conditions upon 
could given us, say willing proceed 
Fortress Monroe informal conference person 
persons President Lincoln may appoint basis letter 
Francis P. Blair 18th January upon terms 
conditions may hereafter propose inconsistent 
essential principles self-government popular rights, upon 
institutions 
 
earnest wish free ideas 
information, upon principles terms, any, honorable 
peace established without blood, 
contribute utmost efforts accomplish result. 
 
think better add accepting 
understood committing anything carry 
informal conference views feelings 
 
respectfully, yours, etc., 
 
ALEXANDER H. STEPHENS, J. A. CAMPBELL, R. M. T. HUNTER. 
 
 
communication delivered Fort Monroe 4.30 
P.M. February 2 General Grant's 
 
THOMAS T. ECKERT Major 
 
 
morning third three gentlemen, Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, 
Campbell, came aboard steamer interview 
Secretary State several question 
meeting made mentioned; 
person present; papers exchanged 
advance agreed conversation informal 
verbal part whole substance instructions 
Secretary State hereinbefore stated insisted upon, 
nothing said inconsistent party 
said event condition ever would consent 
reunion, yet equally omitted declare never would 
consent. seemed desire postponement question 
adoption course first, which, seemed 
might might lead reunion, course thought 
would amount indefinite conference ended without 
result. 
 
believed, information sought 
respectfully 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. WASHINGTON, February 10, 1865 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
answer resolution Senate eighth instant, 
requesting information concerning recent communications 
insurgents, executive sanction, transmit report 
Secretary State, resolution 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
PRESIDENT: 
 
Secretary State, referred resolution Senate 
8th instant, requesting "the President United States, if, 
opinion, incompatible public interests, furnish 
Senate information possession concerning recent 
communications certain rebels, said taken place 
executive sanction, including communications rebel Jefferson 
Davis, correspondence relating honor report 
Senate may properly referred special message 
President bearing upon subject resolution, transmitted 
House day. Appended report copy instruction 
addressed Charles Francis Adams, Esq., envoy 
extraordinary minister United States London, 
correspondence found department touching 
subject referred resolution. 
 
Respectfully submitted, 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
DEPARTMENT STATE, WASHINGTON, February 10, 1865. 
 
 
 
 
MR. SEWARD MR. ADAMS. 
 
No. 
 
DEPARTMENT STATE, WASHINGTON, February 
 
morning President, attended 
received Messrs. Stephens, Hunter, Campbell board United 
States steam transport River conference 
altogether 
Nothing written read. conversation, although 
earnest free, calm, kind sides. 
Richmond party approached discussion rather indirectly, time 
either make demands, tender formal stipulations 
absolute Nevertheless, lasted 
four hours, several points issue Government 
insurgents distinctly discussed fully, 
amicable spirit. insurgent party seemed chiefly favor 
postponement question separation, upon war 
mutual direction efforts Government, well 
insurgents, policy scheme season 
passions might expected armies 
trade intercourse people sections 
suggested postponement 
might immediate peace, certain prospect 
ultimate satisfactory adjustment political relations 
Government States, section, people engaged conflict 
it. 
 
suggestion, though deliberately considered, nevertheless regarded 
President one armistice announced 
agree cessation suspension except 
basis insurgent forces, restoration 
national authority throughout States Union. 
proposition thus 
antislavery policy United States 
President announced must expected 
depart positions heretofore assumed proclamation 
emancipation documents, positions reiterated 
last annual message. declared President 
complete restoration national authority indispensable 
condition assent part whatever form peace might 
proposed. President assured party that, must adhere 
positions, would far power 
Executive, exercise power, however, limited 
Constitution; peace made, Congress must necessarily 
act regard money admission 
representatives insurrectionary States. Richmond party 
informed Congress had, 31st adopted 
constitutional majority joint resolution submitting several 
States proposition abolish slavery throughout Union, 
every reason expect soon accepted three 
fourths States, become part national organic law. 
 
conference came end mutual without producing 
agreement views upon several matters discussed, them. 
Nevertheless, perhaps importance able 
submit opinions views directly prominent insurgents, 
hear answer unfriendly manner. 
 
am, sir, obedient servant, 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
 
 
 
ADMIRAL DAVID D. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 10, 1865 
 
DAVID D. PORTER, Commanding North Atlantic 
Roads, Va. 
 
SIR:--It made agreeable duty enclose herewith joint 
resolution approved 24th January, 1865, tendering thanks Congress 
yourself, officers men command gallantry 
good conduct capture Fort 
participated brilliant decisive victory command. 
 
respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 12, 1865 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
understand different parts Missouri 
assuming decide conditions bonds 
therefore seizing selling property pay This, true, 
outrageous allow it. courts, 
decide questions unless military 
necessity makes Also excuse John Clay County, 
sent South, let go East 
anywhere. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
COMMANDING OFFICERS WEST TENNESSEE 
 
WASHINGTON, February 13, 1865. 
 
MILITARY OFFICERS COMMANDING WEST TENNESSEE: 
 
cannot order within allow say 
wish relieve people 
far possible consistently military 
object war restore maintain 
blessings peace good government, desire help, 
every advance direction. 
 
military necessities must judge please 
spirit purpose 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 14, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
yesterday provost-marshal system received. part 
subject, let say pressed regard pending 
St. Louis County. Please examine satisfy 
whether proceed 
decide proceed, please examine propriety 
application gentleman name Charles 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON February 15, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Please ascertain whether General administration good 
might be, answer me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SENATE EXTRA SESSION, 
 
FEBRUARY 17, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas objects interest United States require Senate 
twelve o'clock fourth March next 
receive act upon communications may made part 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
considered duty issue this, proclamation, declaring 
extraordinary occasion requires Senate United States 
convene business Capitol, city 
Washington, fourth day March next, twelve o'clock 
day, shall time entitled act 
members body hereby required take notice. 
 
Given hand seal United States, 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMAND HARPER'S 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 17, 1865 
 
OFFICER COMMAND HARPER'S FERRY: 
 
yesterday sent despatch 
Jackson, shot to-day. despatch 
vague means ascertaining whether 
execution sentence one may already 
ordered. suspend execution sentence m cases 
orders forward records trials examination. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
MAJOR Please send telegram JNO. G. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., February 24, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Virginia: 
 
little induced authorize gentleman 
bring Roger A. view effecting exchange him; 
since seen despatch showing specially 
object Meantime reached reported 
me. thing send back yet 
remain long. Cannot help it? 
conceive may difference days, keep 
days point. heard 
reaching you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 24, 1865 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Please inquire report whether propriety longer 
keeping Street Prison man said name 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, February 25, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Virginia: 
 
General despatch you, to-day, says "will 
"will leave behind two thousand 
causes Secretary War considerable anxiety. 
well considered whether leave open Shenandoah Valley 
entrance Maryland Pennsylvania, or, least, Baltimore 
Ohio 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., February 27, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Virginia: 
 
Subsequent reflection, conference General Halleck, despatch, 
one General Sheridan, relieved beg 
dismiss concern may account, matter 
last despatch. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. W. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., March 1, 1865. 
 
MR. THOMAS W. General Superintendent Department 

 
SIR:--Your statement Major-General condition 
department, success work 
moral physical reached given much pleasure. 
 
shall entirely successful efforts firmly believe. 
 
blessing God efforts good faithful men bring us 
earlier happier consummation sanguine friends 
could reasonably 
 
Yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., March 2, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, Va.: 
 
sent contents Richmond papers Tuesday 
receive them? not, indicate anything? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 3, 1865. 12 PM. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
President directs say wishes 
conference General Lee unless General 
Lee's army, minor purely military matter. 
say decide, confer upon political 
question. questions President holds hands, 
submit military Meantime 
press utmost military 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
SECOND INAUGURAL ADDRESS, MARCH 4, 1865. 
 
 
second appearing take oath 
presidential office less occasion extended address 
first. statement somewhat detail course 
pursued seemed fitting proper. Now, expiration four 
years, public declarations constantly called forth 
every point phase great contest still absorbs 
attention energies nation, little new 
could presented. progress arms, upon else chiefly 
depends, well known public myself, is, trust, 
reasonably satisfactory encouraging all. high hope 
future, prediction regard 
 
occasion corresponding four years ago thoughts 
anxiously directed impending civil war. dreaded it, sought 
avert it. inaugural address delivered 
place, devoted altogether saving Union without war, insurgent 
agents city seeking destroy without war seeking 
dissolve Union divide effects parties 
deprecated war, one would make war rather let nation 
would accept war rather let 
war came. 
 
One eighth whole population colored slaves, distributed 
generally Union, southern part it. 
slaves constituted peculiar powerful interest. knew 
interest somehow cause war. 
extend interest object insurgents would rend 
Union even war, Government claimed right 
restrict territorial enlargement it. Neither party expected 
war magnitude duration already attained. 
Neither anticipated cause conflict might cease 
even conflict cease. looked easier 
result less fundamental read 
Bible pray God, aid 
other. may seem strange men dare ask God's 
assistance bread sweat men's 
let us judge not, prayers could 
answered. neither answered fully. Almighty 
purposes. unto world must needs 
offenses come, woe man offense 
shall suppose American slavery one offenses which, 
providence God, must needs come, which, continued 
appointed time, wills gives 
North South terrible war woe due 
offense came, shall discern therein departure divine 
living God always ascribe Him? 
Fondly hope, fervently pray, mighty scourge war 
may speedily pass away. Yet, God wills continue 
wealth piled two hundred fifty years unrequited 
toil shall sunk, every drop blood drawn lash 
shall paid another drawn sword, said three thousand 
years ago, still must said, "The judgments Lord true 
righteous 
 
malice toward none, charity all, firmness right 
God gives us see right, let us strive finish work 
in, bind nation's care shall 
borne battle widow may 
achieve cherish lasting peace among 
nations. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL JOHN POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 7, 1865 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Please state briefly, telegraph, concluded 
St. Louis County. Early war one Samuel B. 
sent St. Louis Louisville, quite satisfactory 
evidence Still told property St. 
Louis subjected think ought be. 
Still wish know think. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. WASHINGTON, D. C., March 8, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, City Point, 
 
two despatches Secretary War, one relating supplies 
enemy going General 
Judge laid him. 
think Richmond authority, unless you. 
remember nothing could aid getting there, except 
letter you, follows, wit: 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, February 7, 1865. LIEUTENANT-GENERAL 
GRANT, City Point, Va.: General bears this, claims 
already arrangements made, consent, bring large amount 
Southern produce lines. bearing 
would glad done, be, without injuriously 
disturbing military operations, supplying enemy. wish 
judge master points. Please see hear fully, 
decide whether anything, and, anything, what, done 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
believe gave card putting 
letter. However may be, authorize get 
away Richmond, choose, can. also authorize you, 
order, form choose, suspend operations 
Treasury trade places 
make order, notify it, giving copy, give 
corresponding direction Navy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION OFFERING PARDON 
 
MARCH 11, 1865 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas, section act Congress, approved 
3d instant, entitled "An Act amend several acts heretofore passed 
provide enrolling calling national forces 
purposes," requires addition lawful 
crime desertion military naval service, persons 
deserted military naval service United States 
shall return said service report provost-marshal 
within sixty days proclamation mentioned, shall 
deemed taken voluntarily forfeited 
right become citizens, deserters shall 
forever incapable holding office trust profit 
United States, exercising rights citizens 
persons shall hereafter desert military naval service, 
persons who, duly shall depart jurisdiction 
district go beyond limits United 
States intent avoid draft military naval service 
duly ordered, shall liable section; 
President hereby authorized required passage 
act, issue proclamation setting forth provisions 
section, proclamation President requested notify 
deserters returning within sixty days aforesaid shall 
pardoned condition returning regiments 
may assigned to, shall 
served period time equal original term 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, issue proclamation required said act, 
ordering requiring deserters return proper 
hereby notify deserters shall within sixty days 
date proclamation, 10th day 
May, 1865, return service report 
shall pardoned condition return regiments 
companies organization may assigned to, 
serve remainder original terms addition 
thereto period equal time lost desertion. 
 
testimony whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM H. T. BLOW. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 13, 1865. 
 
HON. HENRY T. BLOW, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Miss E. Saint Louis wishes 
take oath return home. say you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER THURLOW 
 
MARCH 15, 1865. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C. 
 
DEAR Mr. 
 
Every one Thank little 
speech recent inaugural address. expect 
latter wear well perhaps better 
believe immediately Men flattered 
shown difference purpose 
Almighty them. deny it, however, case, deny 
God world. truth thought needed 
told, and, whatever humiliation falls 
directly myself, thought others might afford tell it. 
 
Truly yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL ROUGH OTHERS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., March 17, 1865. 
 
COL. R. M. ROUGH OTHERS, Chicago, Ill.: 
 
received. best is, refer 
War Department. Rock Island case referred to, individual 
caused much difficulty many ways 
promised never undertake another. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS INDIANA REGIMENT, 
 
MARCH 17, 1865. 
 
words shall undertake 
say. born Kentucky, raised Indiana, lived Illinois; 
here, business care equally good 
people States. glad see Indiana regiment 
day able present captured flag Governor Indiana. 
saying this, make distinction States, 
done equally well. 
 
views aspects great war upon 
said written something whereby opinions might known. 
recent attempt 
sometimes called, employ negro fight them. neither 
written made speech subject, 
business, mine, wish subject, 
power introduce it, make great question 
whether negro, put army, fight them. 
know, therefore cannot decide. ought know better me. 
heard many arguments negroes ought 
slaves; fight would keep slavery, 
better argument yet heard. fight 
that, ought slave. last, take one 
four slaves put army, one 
four fight keep others slavery, ought slave 
himself, unless killed often said 
men ought free, yet would allow colored persons slaves 
want be, next white people argue favor 
making people slaves. favor giving appointment 
white men try slaves. say one thing regard 
negroes employed fight them. know cannot fight 
stay home make bread too. one important 
them, don't care do. rather favor 
try soldiers. lack one vote that, 
wish could send vote river might cast favor 
allowing negro cannot fight work both. 
must see bottom enemy's resources. stand 
long can, negro fight must allow 
drawn upon last branch resources, 
see glad see end near hand. said 
intended, therefore bid 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING INDIANS, 
 
MARCH 17, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas reliable information received hostile Indians, 
within limits United States, furnished arms 
munitions war persons foreign territory, 
thereby enabled prosecute savage warfare upon exposed 
settlements 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States America, hereby proclaim direct persons 
detected traffic shall arrested tried 
court-martial nearest military shall 
receive punishment due 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER SENTENCE 
 
BENJAMIN G. SMITH FRANKLIN W. SMITH, 
 
MARCH 18, 1865. 
 
 
unwilling sentence stand, extent 
case. absence adequate motive evidence 
wholly unable believe existence criminal 
fraudulent intent part men well established good 
character. evidence went far establish guilty profit one 
two hundred thousand dollars, one two hundred dollars, 
case would, question bear far different 
contract, involving twelve hundred thousand dollars, 
would plan, attempt execute fraud which, most, 
could profit one two hundred, even one thousand dollars, 
mind beyond power rational belief. not, 
case, make far greater proves not, 
guilty fraudulent make all. judgment sentence 
declared fully 
 
 
A. LINCOLN March 18, 1865. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 19, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Understanding plan action Missouri contained 
letter Governor State, letter me, 
concurred Governor, approved me, 
sustained proceeding upon it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 20, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Army James 
 
true George W. Lane detained Norfolk without charge 
him? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM JUDGE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, 
 
WASHINGTON, March 21, 1865. 
 
HON. WALTER B. 
 
choose go New Mexico appoint chief 
justice there. say you? Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., March 22, 1865. MAJOR-GENERAL Winchester, Va.: 
 
Seeing despatch General 
misapprehension something unpleasant may occur, send two 
despatches General Grant, suppose fully explain General 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ANOTHER FEMALE SPY 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 23, 1865. 
 
GENERAL Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Allow Mrs. R. S. benefit amnesty proclamation 
taking oath. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, March 25, 1865. 8.30 A.M. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR, Washington, D. 
 
Arrived safe 9 P.M. yesterday. war news. General Grant 
seem know much thinks well 
far know. 
 
like Mr. much, hence would wish remain resign 
best suits himself. Hearing much me, think best 
matter. General Lee sent Russell letter back, 
understand Grant, dignity admit 
receiving document us. Robert tells 
little line morning, ending began. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 

 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY POTOMAC, March 25, 1865. (Received 5 
 
HON. EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War: 
 
within five miles scene action. 
nothing add General Meade reports except seen 
prisoners look like might number 

 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., March 26, 1865. (Received A.M.) 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR: 
 
approve Fort Sumter Grant don't seem know 
well, thinks well far knows. Thinks 
probable Y. now, place. told yesterday 
well think best Mr. 
suppose receive 
boat later war news went last night. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, March 27, P.M. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR, Washington, 
 
inclosing Fort Sumter order received. think one suggestion. 
feel quite confident Sumter fell 14th 
April, it. fell Saturday, first call 
troops part got Sunday, given date 
issued Monday, Look old 
see right. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, March 28, 1865. 12 M. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR, Washington, think 
little difference whether Fort Sumter takes place 
13th 
 
General Sherman tells well acquainted James 
thinks almost best man country anything 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., March 30, 1865. P.M. (Received 8.30 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR: 
 
begin feel ought home yet dislike leave 
without seeing nearer end General Grant's present movement. 
since yesterday morning although 
diverted considerable effort yet produced 
far know here. Last night P. M. dark 
night without moon could be, furious soon joined 
heavy fire opened near Petersburg lasted two 
sound distinct also flashes guns 
seemed great battle, older hands 
scarcely noticed sure enough morning found 
little done. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, March 31, 1865. 3 P.M. 
 
SECRETARY 
 
P.M. to-day General Grant telegraphed follows: "There 
much hard fighting morning. enemy drove left near 
house back well toward plank road. 
take offensive point, hope 
lost 
 
Later telegraphed follows: 
 
"Our troops, driven back plank road, turned 
drove enemy turn, took White road, have. 
gives us ground occupied enemy morning. send 
rebel flag captured troops driving enemy back. 
four captured 
 
Judging two points General Grant infer 
moved headquarters one mile since sent first 
two 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
CITY POINT, April 1, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Colonel Secretary War shown me. 
here, notice coming. presume mistake 
comes fact Secretary State here. started back 
Washington morning. two despatches morning, 
anxious hear Sheridan. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, April 1, 1865. P.M. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR, Washington, 
 
two despatches General Grant since last you, 
contain little except Sheridan also pretty hot 
work yesterday, infantry sent support night, 
since heard Sheridan. 
 
Mrs. Lincoln started home, thank see 
Arsenal eight o'clock to-morrow morning, 
wait 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., April, 1865. 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD, Secretary State, Fort Monroe: 
 
Despatch received, showing Sheridan, aided Warren, had, 2 
P.M., pushed enemy back, retake Five bring 
headquarters J. Five 
enemy carried division cavalry. part 
enemy seem trying work along White road, join 
main force front Grant, Sheridan Warren pressing 
closely possible. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. CITY POINT, April 1, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
showing success to-day received highly 
great deal here, still sending 
substance despatches Secretary War. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., April 2, 1865. 8.30 A.M. (Received 9 A.M.) 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, Executive 
 
Last night General Grant telegraphed General Sheridan 
cavalry Fifth Corps captured three brigades infantry, 
train several prisoners amounting several 
thousand. morning General Grant ordered attack along 
whole line telegraphs 
 
Robert yesterday wrote little cheerful note Captain 
heard since left. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAMS SECRETARY STANTON. CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, April 2, 1865. 8.30 
A.M. 
 
HON. E. M. STANTON, Secretary War: 
 
Last night General Grant telegraphed General Sheridan, 
cavalry Fifth Corps, captured three brigades infantry, 
train several prisoners amounting several 
thousand. 
 
morning General Grant, ordered attack along whole line, 
telegraphs follows: 
 
Wright got enemy's lines. battle 
General Sheridan, cavalry, Fifth corps, 
Division Second Corps, sent morning, 
sweeping west. 
 
"All looks highly General Ord engaged, 
yet heard result 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
CITY POINT, April 1. A.M. 
 
Despatches frequently coming in. going Generals 
Wright, Ord's lines extending 
Run. broken enemy's lines, 
taking forts, guns, prisoners. Sheridan, cavalry, 
Fifth Corps, part Second, coming west 
enemy's Wright already Railroad. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, April 2. 2 P.M. 
 
A.M. General Grant telegraphs follows: 
 
carried left Ninth Sixth 
Corps alone captured three thousand prisoners. Second 
Twenty-fourth Corps captured forts, guns, prisoners enemy, 
cannot tell numbers. closing around works 
line immediately looks well. 
yet heard Sheridan. headquarters moved 
house, near road, three miles southwest 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, April 2. 8.30 P.M. 
 
4.30 P.M. to-day General Grant telegraphs follows: 
 
"We continuous line troops, hours 
Petersburg river 
above. whole since army started amount 
less twelve thousand men, probably fifty pieces 
know number men guns however. portion 
Division, Twenty Fourth Corps, made gallant charge 
afternoon, captured important fort enemy, 
entire seems well us, everything quiet 
now." 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. CITY POINT, VA., April 1, 1865. 
 
MRS. LINCOLN: 
 
4.30 P.M. to-day General Grant telegraphs Petersburg 
completely river river above, 
since started last twelve thousand prisoners fifty 
suggests shall go see morning, 
think do. Tad well, glad see 
party time name. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
CITY POINT, April 2, 1865 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Allow tender nation's grateful thanks 
additional magnificent success. kind suggestion 
think meet to-morrow. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VIRGINIA, April 3, A.M. 
 
HON. E. M. STANTON, Secretary War: 
 
morning Lieutenant-General Grant reports Petersburg 
confident Richmond also is. pushing forward cut off, 
possible, retreating rebel army. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., April 3, 1865. 5 P.M. 
 
HON. EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War: 
 
received. Thanks caution, already 
General Grant hour half returned here. 
certain Richmond hands, think go 
to-morrow. take care myself. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., April 4, 1865 (Received A.M.) 
 
HON. EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War: 
 
General telegraphs Richmond railroad stock found 
twenty-eight 
one hundred six evening General Grant, 
Station, ten miles Petersburg toward 
telegraphs follows: 
 
"General Sheridan picked twelve hundred prisoners to-day, 
three hundred five hundred gathered troops. 
majority arms left hands Lee's 
army scattered Richmond troops are. 
country also full line retreat marked 
artillery, ammunition, burned charred 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
CITY POINT, APRIL 5, 1865. (Received 
 
HON. SECRETARY 
 
to-day received. think probability remaining 
two days longer. long come down. passed 
last night Richmond returned. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMIES UNITED STATES, CITY POINT, April 6, 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT, 
 
Secretary Seward thrown carriage yesterday seriously 
This, matters, take Washington soon. 
Richmond yesterday day before, Judge Campbell, 
Messrs. Hunter Stephens February, called me, 
made induced put hands informal 
paper, propositions letter instructions Mr. 
Seward, remember, adding war 
rebels, property shall least bear 
additional cost, confiscation shall people 
State promptly good faith withdraw troops 
support resistance Government. 
 
Judge Campbell thought impossible rebel legislature 
Virginia would latter accordingly addressed 
private letter General permission Judge Campbell 
see it, telling attempt this, permit 
protect them, unless attempt something hostile United 
States, case give notice time leave, arrest 
remaining time. 
 
think probable anything win come this, 
thought best notify see signs may 
understand them. 
 
recent despatches seems pretty effectually 
withdrawing Virginia troops opposition Government. Nothing 
done, probably shall do, delay, interfere 
work. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMIES UNITED STATES CITY POINT, April 6, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Richmond, Va.: 
 
intimated gentlemen acted 
legislature Virginia support rebellion may desire 
assemble Richmond take measures withdraw Virginia troops 
support resistance General Government. attempt 
it, give permission protection, all, attempt 
action hostile United States, case notify 
them, give reasonable time leave, end time 
arrest remain. Allow Judge Campbell see this, make 
public. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
CITY POINT, VA., April 7, 1865 (Received 10.30 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR: 
 
P.M. yesterday Station, General Grant 
following General 
 
6, P.M. 
 
GRANT: 
 
honor report enemy made stand 
Station road road upon 
attacked two divisions Sixth Army Corps 
making connection cavalry. still pressing 
cavalry present time captured 
Generals Lee, several 
thousand prisoners, fourteen pieces artillery large 
number thing pressed think Lee 
 
H. SHERIDAN, 
 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LET THING 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMIES UNITED STATES, 
 
CITY POINT, April 7, 11 A.M., 1865. 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
Gen. Sheridan says: 
 
"If thing pressed think Lee 
 
Let thing 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NOTE CARD SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
April 10, 1865. 
 
Tad wants 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE CALL, 
 
APRIL 10, 1865 
 
company assembled appointment, mistake crept 
understanding. appeared larger audience 
one to-day, would repeat said, namely, supposed 
owing great, good news, would would 
prefer to-morrow evening, quite willing, hoped 
ready, say something. desired particular, every thing 
said got Occupying position did, mistake would 
produce therefore wanted careful make mistake. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. H. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 11, 1865. 
 
GEN. G. H. Norfolk, Va.: 
 
Send full statement cause causes which, 
authority tribunal George W. Lane, Charles 
J. M. others restrained liberty. 
promptly fully. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CLOSING CERTAIN PORTS, APRIL 11, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas proclamations 19th 27th days April, A.D. 1861, 
ports United States States Virginia, North Carolina, 
South Carolina, Georgia, Florida, Alabama, Mississippi, Louisiana, 
Texas declared subject 
 
Whereas said blockade has, consequence actual military 
occupation Government, since conditionally set aside 
relaxed respect ports Norfolk Alexandria, State 
Virginia; State North Port Royal, 
State South State 
New Orleans, State Louisiana; 
 
Whereas fourth section act Congress approved 13th 
July, 1861, entitled "An act provide collection 
duties imports, purposes," President, reasons 
therein set forth, authorized close certain ports 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln. President 
United States, hereby proclaim ports Richmond, 
Virginia; 
Washington, 
North Charleston, 
South St. 
Mobile, River 
Vicksburg, St. Key West, St. Marks 
St. 
Louisiana; La de 
Texas, hereby 
right privileges shall, respect 
ports aforesaid, cease shall opened 
order President; said parts closed ship 
vessel beyond United States board articles 
subject duties shall attempt enter same, together 
cargo, shall forfeited 
United States. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, eleventh day April, 1865, 
independence United States America, eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION OPENING PORT KEY WEST, 
 
APRIL 11, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas proclamation date port Key West, State 
Florida, included among open 

 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, hereby declare make known said port Key 
West shall remain open foreign domestic commerce upon 
conditions commerce hitherto 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, eleventh day April, A.D. 1865, 
independence United States America eighty-ninth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CLAIMING EQUALITY RIGHTS MARITIME NATIONS, 
 
APRIL 11, 1865. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas time past vessels war United States 
refused certain foreign ports, privileges immunities 
entitled public law, community nations, 
time vessels war country wherein said 
privileges immunities withheld enjoyed fully 
ports United States, condition things 
always forcibly resisted United States, 
hand, time failed protest 
declare dissatisfaction same. view United 
States, condition longer exists claimed justify 
denial one nations customary naval rights 
heretofore unnecessarily 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby make known if, reasonable time shall elapsed 
intelligence proclamation reached foreign country 
whose ports said privileges immunities shall refused 
aforesaid, shall continue 
privileges immunities shall refused vessels war 
country ports United States, refusal shall 
continue war vessels United States shall placed 
upon entire equality foreign ports aforesaid similar 
vessels countries. United States, whatever claim pretense 
may existed heretofore, now, least, entitled claim 
concede entire friendly equality rights 
maritime nations. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
LAST PUBLIC ADDRESS, 
 
APRIL 11, 1865 
 
meet evening sorrow, gladness 
heart. evacuation Petersburg Richmond, surrender 
principal insurgent army, give hope righteous speedy peace, whose 
joyous expression cannot midst this, however, 
blessings flow must forgotten. 
 
call national thanksgiving duly 
must whose harder part gives us cause 
rejoicing overlooked. honors must 
others. near front, pleasure 
much good news you. part honor plan 
execution mine. General Grant, officers, brave men, 
gallant navy stood ready, reach take 
active part. recent successes, national 
large share thought 
first, pressed much closely upon attention. 
great difficulty. Unlike case war independent nations, 
authorized organ us treat one man authority 
give rebellion man. simply must begin 
mould elements. small 
additional embarrassment we, loyal people, differ among 
manner, measure reconstruction. general rule, 
abstain reading reports attacks upon myself, Wishing 
provoked cannot properly offer answer. spite 
however, comes knowledge much 
supposed agency setting seeking sustain 
new State government Louisiana. done much 
public knows. Annual Message December, 1863, 
accompanying proclamation, presented plan reconstruction, 
phrase goes, promised, adopted State, would 
acceptable sustained Executive Government nation. 
distinctly stated plan might possibly 
also distinctly protested Executive claimed 
right say whether members admitted seats 
Congress States. plan advance submitted 
Cabinet, approved every member it. One suggested 
connection apply Emancipation Proclamation 
excepted parts Virginia Louisiana; 
drop suggestion freed people, 
omit protest power regard admission 
members Congress. even approved every part parcel 
plan since employed touched action Louisiana. 
new constitution Louisiana, declaring emancipation whole 
State, practically applies proclamation part previously 
adopt freed people, 
silent, could well otherwise, admission members 
Congress. that, applied Louisiana, every member 
Cabinet fully approved plan. message went Congress, 
received many plan, written 
single objection professed came 
knowledge news reached Washington people 
Louisiana begun move accordance it. July, 1862, 
different persons supposed interested 
seeking reconstruction State government Louisiana. 
message 1863, plan mentioned, reached New Orleans, 
General Banks wrote confident people, 
military would reconstruct substantially plan. 
wrote try it. tried it, result 
known. agency getting Louisiana 
government. sustaining promise out, stated. But, 
bad promises better broken shall treat bad 
promise break it, whenever shall convinced keeping 
adverse public interest; yet 
shown letter subject, supposed able one, 
writer expresses regret mind seemed 
definitely fixed upon question whether seceded States, called, 
Union it. would perhaps add astonishment 
regret learn since found professed Union men 
endeavoring answer question, purposely forborne public 
expression upon it. appears me, question yet 
practically material one, discussion it, 
thus remains practically could effect 
mischievous one dividing friends. yet, whatever may 
question bad basis controversy, good nothing 
merely agree seceded 
States, called, proper practical relation 
Union, sole object Government, civil military, 
regard States, get proper practical 
relation. believe possible, fact 
without deciding even considering whether States 
ever Union, it. Finding safely 
home, would utterly immaterial whether abroad. Let 
us join acts necessary restore proper practical 
relations States Union, forever 
indulge opinion whether, acts 
brought States without Union, gave proper 
assistance, never it. amount 
speak, Louisiana government would 
satisfactory contained fifty thousand, thirty thousand, 
even twenty thousand, instead twelve thousand, does. also 
unsatisfactory elective franchise given 
colored man. would prefer conferred 
intelligent, serve cause soldiers. Still, 
question whether Louisiana government, stands, quite 
question is, wiser take 
help improve it, reject Louisiana 
brought proper practical relation Union sooner sustaining 
discarding new State government? twelve thousand voters 
heretofore Slave State Louisiana sworn allegiance 
Union, assumed rightful political power State, 
held elections, organized State government, adopted Free State 
constitution, giving benefit public schools equally black 
white, Legislature confer elective franchise 
upon colored man. Legislature already voted ratify 
Constitutional Amendment recently passed Congress, abolishing slavery 
throughout nation. twelve thousand persons thus fully 
committed Union perpetuate freedom 
things, nearly things, nation ask 
nation's recognition assistance make good 
Now, reject them, utmost 
disperse them. We, fact, say white worthless 
neither help helped you. blacks 
say: cup liberty these, old masters, held 
lips, dash you, leave chances 
scattered contents vague when, where, 
how. course, discouraging white black, 
tendency bring Louisiana proper practical relations 
Union, far unable perceive it. If, contrary, 
recognize sustain new government Louisiana, converse 
made true. encourage hearts nerve arms 
twelve thousand adhere work, argue it, 
it, fight it, feed it, grow it, 
complete success. colored man, too, seeing united him, 
inspired vigilance, energy, daring end. Grant 
desires elective attain sooner 
saving already advanced steps towards it, running backward 
them? Concede new government Louisiana 
egg shall sooner 
egg it. Again, reject Louisiana, 
also reject one vote favor proposed amendment National 
Constitution. meet proposition, argued 
three fourths States attempted secession 
necessary ratify amendment. commit 
this, say ratification would 
sure persistently questioned, ratification three 
fourths States would unquestioned 
repeat question, Louisiana brought proper practical 
relation Union sooner sustaining discarding new 
State government? said Louisiana apply 
States. yet great pertain State, 
important sudden changes occur State, withal new 
unprecedented whole case, exclusive inflexible plan 
safely prescribed details exclusive 
inflexible plan would surely become new Important 
principles may must inflexible. present situation 
phrase goes, may duty make new announcement people 
South. shall fail act, satisfied 
action proper. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., April 12, 1865. MAJOR-GENERAL Richmond, Va.: 
 
seen despatch Colonel matter 
remember hearing prayers spoken 
doubt acted appeared spirit 
temper manifested there. sign rebel 
legislature coming together understanding letter you? 
inform is; 
may withdraw 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. WASHINGTON, D.C., April 12, 1865. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Richmond, Va.: 
 
seen Judge letter 
appears me, called insurgent legislature 
Virginia together, rightful legislature State, settle 
differences United States. done thing. spoke 
them, legislature, "the gentlemen acted 
legislature Virginia support 
purpose exclude assumption recognizing 
rightful body. deal men power de 
specific thing, wit: "To withdraw Virginia troops support 
resistance General which, paper handed 
Judge Campbell, promised specific wit: 
people State, except certain cases, confiscation 
property. meant this, more. however, Judge 
Campbell this, still pressing 
contrary explicit statement paper gave him, 
particularly General Grant since captured Virginia troops, 
giving consideration withdrawal longer applicable, 
let letter paper Judge Campbell withdrawn, 
notified it. allow 
come, allow safe return 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INTERVIEW MORNING APRIL 14, 1865. 
 
Mr. want take message miners 
visit. large ideas mineral wealth nation. 
believe practically Western 
country, Rocky Mountains development 
scarcely commenced. war, adding couple 
millions dollars every day national debt, care 
encouraging increase volume precious 
country save first. rebellion 
know pretty nearly amount national debt, gold 
silver mine, make payment debt much 
said he, speaking "I going encourage 
every possible way. shall hundreds thousands 
soldiers, many feared return home great 
numbers might industry, suddenly, greater supply 
labor demand for. going try 
hidden wealth mountain room enough 
all. even war land upon 
hundreds thousands per year Europe. 
intend point gold silver wait 
West. Tell miners me, shall promote interests 
utmost prosperity prosperity 
nation; said he, eye "we shall 
years, indeed treasury world." 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL VAN 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 14, 1865 
 
GENERAL VAN 
 
intend adopt advice friends use due 
thank assurance give shall supported 
conservative men like yourself, efforts may make restore 
Union, make it, use language, Union hearts hands 
well States. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN'S LAST WRITTEN WORDS 
 
Allow Mr. friend come 9 A.M. to-morrow. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. April 14, 1865 
 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME TWO 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
VOLUME 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
FIRST CHILD 
 
JOSHUA F. SPEED. SPRINGFIELD, May 18, 1843. 
 
DEAR 9th instant duly received, 
meet welcome answer 
business part first. 
 
relation Congress matter here, right supposing 
would support Neither Baker I, however, man, 
Hardin, far judge present shall 
split trouble matter; relation 
Butler wrote you, heard one word 
got letter; much confidence judgment 
Butler subject think may reality 
it. day Butler way, 
sort come possessing houses lands, 
sons 
keeping house, Globe 
well kept widow lady name room 
(the Dr. occupied us four 
dollars week. Ann married something year since 
fellow name Campbell, who, Mary says, pretty much 
though little money property. live 
Missouri, heard lately enough 
say anything health. reckon scarcely 
power visit Kentucky year. Besides necessity 
attending business, would somewhat 
way. heartily wish Fanny would fail 
come. let us know time, room provided 
house, together while. sure give 
respects mother assure ever come near 
her, fail call see her. Mary sending love 
Fanny you. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
Gen. J. J. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, May 21, 
 
DEAR Knowing enough, forborne 
trouble get set matter 
right got wrong one best friends. old Uncle 
Thomas Campbell Spring received several 
documents you, says old newspapers documents, 
sort interest them. is, therefore, getting strong 
impression treat This, know, mistaken 
must correct it. way, leave yourself. 
W. says would like document two you. 
 
considerable trouble Van 
letter Texas, Virginia growing sick 
Tariff question; consequently much cutting 
new Texas question. Nearly half leaders swear 
won't stand it. T. Campbell, Calhoun others. 
don't exactly say won't vote say 
candidate, Texas 
 
ever yours, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
SELECTION CONGRESSIONAL CANDIDATES 
 
Gen. J. J. HARDIN, SPRINGFIELD, 19, 
 
DEAR 
 
wish join proposal new plan selection 
Whig candidate Congress 
 
entirely satisfied old system Baker 
nominated elected Congress; Whigs 
district well acquainted system, and, far know 
believe, well satisfied it. old system thought 
delegates county voting way, 
instructions vote for, filling 
willing join provision make matters 
certain. 
 
shall opened every precinct, 
whole shall take place day, personally 
object. seem forbear join 
proposing choose leave decision 
county Whigs county, made judgment 
convenience may 
 
3d. proposed stipulation candidates shall remain 
counties, restrain friends seems 
reflection see fact 
Congress has, various ways, spread name district 
give decided advantage appreciate 
desire keep promise 
circumstances. 
 
already said satisfied old system 
good men desire departure 
principles. must departure it, shall insist upon 
accurate apportionment representative 
votes, body, exists old, 
propose retain new plan. take entire population 
counties shown late shall see old plan, 
proposed new plan, 
 
   Morgan County, population 8 votes 
   Sangamon greater 8  " 
   Scott 4  " 
   Tazewell greater 4  " 
   Mason 1 vote 
   Logan 1  " 
 
less degree matter runs counties, 
wrong principle, advantage 
favor one slight comparison two counties 
mentioned. 
 
Again, take Whig votes counties shown late 
Presidential election basis, thing still worse. 
 
seems obvious old system needs adjustment 
nothing much this; still, notice 
taken it. always habit almost 
proposal friend would make truly sorry cannot 
this. perhaps ought mention friends different places 
endeavoring secure honor sitting convention 
towns respectively, fear would feel much complimented 
shall make bargain sit 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
------ WILLIAMS, 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 1, 
 
FRIEND 
 
Supreme Court adjourned morning term. cases 
vs. vs. vs. 
vs. vs. wrote concerning 
time ago. et vs. Thompson reversed 

 
vs. et reversed leave 
amend bill show real consideration given 
land. 
 
court accordance 
moved case enable take 
new trial court below. court allowed 
guess are. 
 
This, believe, court business. canal men got 
measure Legislature pretty much quite shape 
Nothing else now. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ABOLITION MOVEMENT 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, October 3, 
 
saw home, agreed write 
brother Madison. saw aware 
generally called or, call yourself, Liberty 
man, though well knew many country. 
 
glad hear intended attempt bring about, 
next election Union Whigs proper 
Liberty men Whigs principle questions save 
slavery. far perceive, union neither party need 
yield anything point difference them. Whig 
abolitionists New York voted us last fall, Mr. Clay would 
President, Whig principles Texas 
whereas, division, either stake contest 
lost. And, indeed, extremely probable, would 
result. always understood, Liberty men deprecated 
annexation Texas so, refuse 
cast votes prevent it, even seemed wonderful. 
process reasoning, judge single 
one told me. this: "We evil good may 
general proposition doubtless 
votes could prevented etc., slavery 
would good, evil, used votes, 
even though involved casting 
fruit tree known. evil tree cannot bring forth good 
fruit electing Mr. Clay would prevent extension 
slavery, could act electing 
 
argue further. perhaps ought say 
never much interested Texas question. never could see 
much good come inasmuch already free 
republican people hand, never could 
clearly see annexation would evil slavery. 
always seemed slaves would taken equal 
numbers, without taken 
still would many fewer left 
taken from. possibly true, extent, that, 
slaves may sent Texas continued slavery 
otherwise might whatever extent may true, 
think annexation evil. hold paramount duty us 
free States, due Union States, perhaps liberty 
though may let slavery States 
alone; while, hand, hold equally clear 
never knowingly lend ourselves, directly indirectly, prevent 
slavery dying natural find new places 
live longer exist old. course 
considering would duty cases insurrection among 
slaves. recur Texas question, understand Liberty men 
viewed annexation much greater evil ever would 
like convince you, could, could prevented it, 
intend letter Madison 
either shall think fit drop line, shall 

 
respect, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1846 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST POLITICAL SUPPORT 
 
Dr. ROBERT SPRINGFIELD, January 7, 1846. 
 
Dr. ROBERT Ill. 
 
DEAR saw last fall, often thought writing 
you, understood would, but, reflection, 
always found nothing new tell you. happened 
told expected taking 
track, on. 
 
Hardin stood precisely equal, neither us 
Congress, had, would accord always 
done, sake peace, give way him; expect 
it. voluntarily postpone 
equal seen. 
yield Hardin present circumstances seems nothing 
else yielding one would gladly sacrifice altogether. 
would rather submit to. Hardin usually 
generous affirmed 
deny. know argument fair 
he, practically least, 
 
would much, wish would write me, telling 
aspect things country, rather district; also, 
send names Whig might, 
write. Unless get one this, Hardin, 
old list, advantage me. reliance fair 
shake (and want nothing country chiefly you, 
position standing, acquainted 
others. Let hear soon. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Jan. 15, 1846. 
 
JOHN 
 
FRIEND 
 
here, speaks though contest Hardin 
doubtful Menard County. know candid 
some. asked tell names men 
going strong Hardin, said Morris strong 
tell me, Morris going remember wrote 
would also said man, could 
remember, said lately Menard County going decide 
contest made contest doubtful. know 
Don't fail write instantly receiving this, telling 
names going strong me. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
N. J. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, January 21, 1846. 
 
DEAR SIR:--You perhaps know General Hardin contest 
Whig nomination Congress district. 
 
turn argument fair 
 
shall pleased strikes sufficient argument. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JAMES 
 
SPRINGFIELD, April 26, 1846. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I thank promptness answered 
letter also thank 
comment upon certain part letter; comment affords 
opportunity trying express better before, 
do, part letter, understood 
intended understood. 
 
speaking men yet mean wrong, 
etc., mean special application said Whigs Morgan, 
Morgan & Scott. mind fact previous 
General withdrawal friends mine 
become little felt, meant say, 
meet face face converse together best way 
unpleasant feeling, existed. 
 
suppose General friends greater need 
feelings corrected mine Since saw 
Jacksonville, suspicion Whigs Morgan 
part district. write try 
remove impression Whigs 
country. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JAMES 
 
SPRINGFIELD, May 7, 
 
DEAR SIR:--It matter high moral necessity, 
attend Coles Edwards courts. cases 
them, parties upon me. 
court Coles second Monday, Edgar 
third. court Morgan fourth 
purpose then, make speech. mention Coles 
Edgar courts order reach time 
named may understand reason why. not, however, think 
much danger shall go purpose be, 
consequently shall engage new cases might delay me. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
VERSES WRITTEN LINCOLN VISIT OLD HOME INDIANA 
 
(A 
 
December, 1847, Lincoln Clay, crossed 
Indiana old home. "That part country 
within spot still seeing 
objects inhabitants aroused feelings 
certainly though whether expression feelings 
quite another 
 
   Near twenty years passed away 
   Since bid farewell 
   woods fields, scenes 
   loved well. 
 
   many were, remain 
   old familiar 
   seeing mind 
   lost absent 
 
   friends left parting day, 
   changed, time 
   Young childhood strong 
   half dead. 
 
   hear loved tell 
   death could 
   Till every sound appears 
   every spot grave. 
 
   range fields 
   hollow 
   feel 
   'm living 
 
   VERSES WRITTEN LINCOLN CONCERNING 
   BECAME 
 
   length long 
   Time thy 
   thy song 
   Upon still night rose 
 
   I've heard 
   Far sweet 
   funeral ever seemed 
   reason dead gone. 
 
   Air held trees spell 
   Seemed angels round, 
   Whose swelling tears fell 
   Upon listening ground. 
 
   past, remains 
   raised 
   Thy piercing 
   like, forever 
 
   cause 
   subject 
   mental kind laws 
   lost power know. 
 
   O 
   world fear, 
   tear ones hence, 
   leave here? 
 
 
 
 
SECOND CHILD 
 
JOSHUA P. SPEED 
 
SPRINGFIELD, October 22, 1846. 
 
DEAR doubt, assign suspension correspondence 
true cause; though must confessed us 
rather cold reason allowing friendship 
die propose that, upon receipt this, shall 
considered debt, obligations pay soon, neither 
shall remain long 
 
elected Congress, though grateful friends 
done it, pleased much expected. 
 
another boy, born 10th much child 
Bob age, rather longer order. Bob 
expect always be. plainly 
anybody. quite smart enough. sometimes fear one 
little sort five ever after. 
great deal sort mischief 
animal spirits. Since began letter, messenger came tell Bob 
time reached house mother found 
now, run away again. Mary 
read letter, wishes remembered Mrs. Speed you, 
sincerely join her. 
 
ever yours, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MORRIS BROWN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, October 21, 
 
MESSRS. MORRIS BROWN. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your second letter matter others, came 
hand morning. went see Logan, found 
engaged you, sent word Mr. 
says. says time ago, young man 
knows came him, copy affidavit, engage aid 
getting Governor grant he, Logan, told 
man, opinion, affidavit clearly upon 
young man left, without making engagement him. 
Governor shall arrive leave, Logan attend 
matter, attend it, come till 
upon condition Governor shall acted upon 
matter, arrival here. mention condition because, 
learned morning Secretary State, 
Governor, papers receives case, fast 
receives them. Among papers forwarded letter 
Governor Secretary of, believe, date 
contents last letter me; Governor will, 
events points authorities. case clear one 
whether Governor view another thing. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM H. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 5, 
 
DEAR may remember year ago man name 
Wilson, paid us twenty dollars advance fee 
attend case Supreme Court him, Mr. Campbell, 
record case hands Mr. St. Louis, never 
furnished us. Bloomington last fall met friend 
Wilson, mentioned subject me, induced write 
Wilson, telling would leave ten dollars 
left pay making case, case may 
go came away, forgot it. want 
send money, used accordingly, one comes 
start case, retained one does. 
 
nothing consequence new here. Congress organize 
to-morrow. Last night held Whig caucus House, nominated 
Massachusetts speaker, Pennsylvania 
New Jersey 
District Columbia Whig majority House 
small that, together little leaves 
doubtful whether elect all. 
 
paper thick reason send 

 
ever, A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 13, 
 
DEAR letter, receipt fee 
bank case, received, don't expect hear another good 
piece news Springfield away. obligations 
therefore wish buy bank pay 
debt there, pay least money possible. would soon 
buy Mr. person bank, 
one else, provided get suppose, 
bank debt shall paid, money left, 
would like pay Stout twenty dollars, 
somebody ten dollars, materials got 
shall still left, keep till see hear me. 
 
shall begin sending documents soon get them. wrote 
yesterday anxious 
distinguish myself, concluded long. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESOLUTIONS UNITED STATES HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
DECEMBER 22, 
 
Whereas, President United States, message May 11, 
1846, declared "the Mexican Government refused 
receive [the envoy United listen 
propositions, but, series last 
invaded territory shed blood fellow-citizens 

 
again, message December 8, 1846, "we ample cause 
war Mexico long breaking even 
take redress hands Mexico 
became invading soil hostile 
blood 
 
yet again, message December 7, 1847, "the Mexican 
Government refused even hear terms adjustment 
minister authorized propose, finally, wholly 
involved two countries war, invading 
territory State Texas, striking first blow, 
blood citizens 
 
whereas, House desirous obtain full knowledge 
facts go establish whether particular spot blood 
citizens shed time 
therefore, 
 
Resolved, House Representatives, President 
United States respectfully requested inform 
 
First. Whether spot blood citizens shed, 
message declared, within territory Spain, 
least treaty 1819, Mexican revolution. 
 
Second. Whether spot within territory 
Spain revolutionary government Mexico. 
 
Third. Whether spot within settlement people, 
settlement existed ever since long Texas revolution, 
inhabitants fled approach United States army. 
 
Fourth. Whether settlement isolated 
settlements Gulf Rio Grande south west, 
wide regions north 
 
Whether people settlement, majority them, 
them, ever submitted government laws 
Texas United States, consent either 
accepting office, voting elections, paying serving 
process served upon them, way. 
 
Whether people settlement 
approach United States army, leaving homes 
growing blood shed, message 
whether first blood, shed, shed within 
one people thus fled it. 
 
Whether citizens, whose blood shed, message 
declared, not, time, armed officers soldiers, 
sent settlement military order President, 
Secretary War. 
 
Whether military force United States 
sent settlement General Taylor 
intimated War Department that, opinion, movement 
necessary defence protection Texas. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS UNITED STATES HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
JANUARY 5, 1848. 
 
Mr. Lincoln said made effort, days since, obtain 
floor relation measure direct Postmaster-General 
make arrangements railroad carrying Committee 
failed. One objects view 
great measure fallen gentleman 
Virginia taken seat. assure friends 
side House assault whatever meant upon 
Postmaster-General, glad gentleman said 
modified great extent impression might created 
language used previous occasion. wanted state 
gentlemen might entertained Committee 
Post-office composed five Whigs four Democrats, 
report understood position 
taken Postmaster-General. report met approbation 
Whigs, Democrats also, exception 
one, wanted go even this. 
informally given Mr. Lincoln order mention 
floor taken place observed 
order said took back far 
could. desire, could assure gentlemen, ever 
never could keep long order. 
 
Mr. Lincoln went observe differed opinion, present 
case, honorable friend Richmond [Mr. gentleman, 
begun remarks saying 
matter could removed way, little difficulty would 
experienced coming agreement. Now, could assure 
gentleman begun examination subject 
favor. long often heard him, 
and, heard, favor. 
Postmaster-General also heard, 
favor, though certainly none opposite kind. however, 
gentleman politics, respect agreed 
gentleman Virginia [Mr. wished oblige whenever 
power. gentleman referred report made 
House Postmaster-General, intimated apprehension 
gentlemen would disposed report alone, derive 
views case document alone. happened 
pamphlet slipped [Mr. hand read 
report that, even this, begun 
favor gentleman Virginia. 
 
report, one remark carefully examined 
it, understand dispute facts 
therein stated understood it, confined altogether 
inferences drawn facts. difference 
facts, conclusions. facts 
right this, supposed House might assume facts 
stated, thence proceed draw conclusions. 
 
gentleman said Postmaster-General got personal 
squabble railroad company. Mr. Lincoln knew nothing, 
need desire know anything, nothing whatever 
conclusion gentleman gone 
ask whether great present detention 
Southern mail ought Mr. Lincoln would assure 
gentleman proper way it, man 
anxious done. report made committee 
intended yield much sake removing 
great dispute 
supposed statements made gentleman Virginia show 
entirely correct point fact. suppose 
regular intercourse, 
growing it, gentleman stated be; 
certainly, redress could proper 
rendered soon possible. gentleman said order effect 
new legislative action necessary 
Postmaster-General required law, stood, 
authorized required do. 
 
come then, said Mr. Lincoln, law. Postmaster-General 
says cannot give company two hundred 
dollars fifty per railroad mile transportation, twelve 
half per cent. less transportation considers 
restricted law says, further, 
would give could, apprehension would 
fair 
 
 
 
 
1848 
 
 
 
 
DESIRE SECOND TERM CONGRESS 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 8, 1848. 
 
DEAR letter December received day two ago. 
much obliged trouble taken, promise take 
little business there. speech making, way getting 
hang House made little speech two three days ago 
post-office question general interest. find speaking 
elsewhere thing. badly worse 
speak court. expect make one within week two, 
hope succeed well enough wish see it. 
 
pleasant learn desire 
heartily thank kind 
say, Mr. Clay said annexation Texas, 
would although thought 
time, still think, would quite well return 
law end single term. made declaration 
would candidate again, wish deal fairly 
others, keep peace among friends, keep district 
going enemy, cause personal myself; 
happen nobody else wishes elected, could 
refuse people right sending again. enter 
others, authorize one enter 
word honor 
 
got letters probability much difficulty amongst 
friends lose us district; remember letters 
written Baker case consideration, trust 
ground apprehension then. 
Remember always glad receive letter you. 
 
truly friend, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH DECLARATION WAR MEXICO 
 
SPEECH UNITED STATES HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
JANUARY 12, 1848. 
 
MR gentlemen side House 
addressed committee within last two days spoken 
rather rightly understood them, vote 
given week ten days ago declaring war Mexico 
unnecessarily commenced President. admit 
vote given mere party 
one given justly better 
one joined 
best impression truth case. got 
may possibly try show. war 
began, opinion knowing little, 
knowing much, could conscientiously approve 
conduct President beginning nevertheless, 
good citizens remain silent point, least till 
war leading Democrats, including Van 
Buren, taken view, understand them; adhered 
acted upon it, since took seat here; think 
still adhere President friends 
allow so. Besides continual effort President 
argue every silent vote given supplies indorsement 
justice wisdom besides singularly candid 
paragraph late message tells us Congress 
great unanimity declared "by act Republic Mexico, 
state war exists government United States," 
journals informed also informed 
declaration stood question supplies 
House, fourteen merely, voted it; 
besides open attempt prove telling truth could 
prove telling whole submit 
misrepresented, justice themselves, speak out, besides 
this, one [Mr. early day 
session brought set resolutions expressly indorsing original 
justice war part President. Upon resolutions 
shall put passage shall compelled 
cannot silent would. Seeing this, went preparing 
give vote come. carefully 
examined President's message, ascertain said 
proved upon point. result examination make 
impression that, taking true President states facts, 
falls far short proving President would 
gone proof small matter 
truth would permit him. impression thus made gave 
vote mentioned. propose give process 
examination made, reached conclusion did. 
President, first war message May, 1846, declares soil 
hostilities commenced Mexico, repeats 
declaration almost language successive annual 
message, thus showing deems point highly essential one. 
importance point entirely agree President. 
judgment point upon justified, 
message December, 1846, seems occurred 
him, certainly true, soil anything else 
simple fact, conclusion following one simple 
facts; upon present facts 
concluded soil first blood war 

 
Accordingly, little middle page twelve message last 
referred to, enters upon forming issue introducing 
testimony, extending whole little middle page 
Now, propose try show whole 
beginning end issue, 
presents it, words: "But who, 
true, assume ground true western boundary Texas 
instead Rio that, therefore, marching 
army east bank latter river, passed Texas line 
invaded territory issue made two 
negative. main deception assumes 
true one river necessarily 
entirely idea possibly 
boundary somewhere two, actually either. 
deception let evidence true issue would 
true issue made President would follows: "I 
say soil ours, first blood 
say not." 
 
proceed examine President's evidence applicable 
issue. evidence included following 

 
(1) Rio Grande western boundary Louisiana 
purchased France 
 
(2) Republic Texas always claimed Rio Grande 
eastern boundary. 
 
(3) various acts claimed paper. 
 
Santa Anna treaty Texas recognized Rio Grande 
boundary. 
 
(5) Texas before, United States after, annexation 
exercised jurisdiction beyond two rivers. 
 
Congress understood boundary Texas extend beyond 

 
turn. first item Rio Grande 
western boundary Louisiana, purchased France 
seeming expect argues amount 
nearly page prove true, end us know 
treaty sold Spain whole country Rio 
Grande Now, admitting present 
Rio Grande boundary Louisiana, heaven 
present boundary us How, Mr. Chairman, 
line divided land mine still 
boundary us sold land beyond 
man, honest purpose proving 
truth, could ever thought introducing fact prove 
issue equally next piece evidence "the 
Republic Texas always claimed river western 
true, fact. Texas claimed it, 
always claimed it. least one distinguished 
State constitution solemn 
act, may, without called last 
claim. suppose 
always claimed it. Mexico always claimed 
claim claim, leaving nothing proved get back 
claims find better Though 
order President presents evidence, consider 
class statements substance nothing 
Texas has, various acts Convention Congress, claimed 
Rio Grande boundary, paper. mean says 
fixing Rio Grande boundary old constitution (not 
State forming Congressional districts, counties, etc. 
naked already said 
claims strictly applicable this. claim land word 
mouth, certainly would make claim 
deed made myself, nothing 
do, claim would quite rather, utter 
next consider President's statement Santa Anna 
treaty Texas recognized Rio Grande western boundary 
Texas. Besides position often taken, Santa Anna 
prisoner war, could bind Mexico 
deem this, wish say something relation 
called President, Santa man would like 
amused sight little thing President calls 
big name, turning Register, 1, 
p. one suppose Register curious 
mighty document solemn treaty nations, 
say learned tolerable degree inquiry 
State Department, President never saw anywhere 
else. way, believe declare 
first ten years existence document 
never anybody called never called till 
President, attempted calling something 
justification connection Mexican War. 
none features call 
Santa Anna therein assume bind 
assumes act Mexican 
army present hostilities 
would take arms, influence Mexican 
people take arms, Texas existence war 
independence. recognize independence 
assume put end war, clearly indicated expectation 
say one word boundary, and, 
probably, never thought it. stipulated therein Mexican 
forces territory Texas, passing 
side Rio another article stipulated that, 
prevent armies, Texas army approach 
nearer within five said, clearly, 
object stated, Rio Now, treaty 
recognizing Rio Grande boundary Texas, contains 
singular feature Texas shall go within five 
boundary. 
 
Next comes evidence Texas United States 
afterwards, exercising jurisdiction beyond two 
rivers. actual exercise jurisdiction class quality 
evidence want. excellent far go far 
tells us went beyond tell us 
went Rio tells us jurisdiction exercised 
two rivers, tell us exercised 
territory them. people think possible 
cross one river go beyond without going way next, 
jurisdiction may exercised two rivers without 
country them. know man, unlike myself, 
jurisdiction piece land 
yet far 
rivers one hundred feet long fifty feet 
part much within hundred miles either. 
neighbor is, across street, 
sure could neither persuade force 
give nevertheless could certainly 
done merely standing side street 
claiming it, even sitting writing deed it. 
 
next President tells us Congress United States 
understood State Texas admitted Union extend 
beyond Well, suppose did. certainly understood it. 
far Congress understand extend clear 
Rio Grande quite certain, fact joint resolutions 
admission expressly leaving questions boundary future 
may added Texas proven 
understanding Congress had, fact 
exact conformity new constitution resolutions. 
 
whole President's 
singular fact one declare President sent army 
midst settlement Mexican people never submitted, 
consent force, authority Texas United States, 
thereby first blood war shed, 
one word would either admit deny declaration. 
strange omission seem could occurred 
way living leads courts 
sometimes seen good lawyer, struggling 
desperate case, employing every work round, 
cover many words point arising case dared 
admit yet could deny. Party may help make appear 
so, allowance make still 
appear such, necessity, 
President's struggle case. 
 
Sometime colleague [Mr. introduced resolutions 
mentioned, introduced resolution, 
intended draw President out, possible, hitherto 
ground. show propose state 
understanding true rule ascertaining boundary Texas 
Mexico. wherever Texas exercising jurisdiction 
wherever Mexico exercising jurisdiction 
whatever separated actual exercise jurisdiction one 
true boundary them. If, probably 
true, Texas exercising jurisdiction along western bank 
Mexico exercising along eastern bank Rio 
neither river country 
two was. extent territory region depended 
boundary (for treaty attempted 
revolution. people anywhere inclined power 
right rise shake existing government, form 
new one suits better. valuable, sacred 
right hope believe liberate world. 
right confined cases whole people existing 
government may choose exercise it. portion people 
may make much territory 
this, majority portion people may 
putting minority, near 
them, may oppose movement. minority precisely case 
revolution. quality revolutions 
go old lines old laws, break both, make new ones. 
 
country question, bought France 
sold Spain 1819, according President's 
this, Mexico, including Texas, still 
later Texas Mexico. view, far 
carried resolution obtaining willing 
submission people, far country farther. 
Now, sir, purpose obtaining best evidence 
whether Texas actually carried revolution place 
hostilities present war let President answer 
interrogatories proposed, mentioned, similar 
ones. Let answer fully, Let answer 
facts Let remember Washington 
let answer Washington would answer. 
nation not, Almighty not, let 
attempt if, show 
soil first blood war 
within inhabited country, or, within such, 
inhabitants submitted civil authority Texas 
United States, true Fort Brown, 
case shall 
happy reverse vote gave day. selfish motive 
desiring President may expect gain votes, 
connection war, which, without doing, 
doubtful propriety judgment, free 
doubt so. 
pretence pretence shall refuse omit shall fully 
convinced suspect already deeply conscious 
wrong; feels blood war, like blood 
crying heaven him; originally 
strong stop give opinion concerning 
involve two countries war, trusting escape 
fixing public upon exceeding military 
blood, 
eye plunged it, swept 
disappointed calculation ease 
Mexico might finds knows like 
half insane dream whole war part 
late one time telling us Mexico nothing whatever 
territory; another showing us support 
war Mexico. one time urging national 
honor, security future, foreign 
even good Mexico among objects war; 
another telling us "to reject refusing accept 
cession territory, would abandon demands, 
war, bearing expenses, without purpose definite 
national honor, security future, 
everything territorial may considered 
indefinite objects But, settled territorial 
object, urged legislation here, 
content take months ago, whole 
Lower California still carry war take 
fighting for, still fight on. Again, President resolved 
circumstances full territorial 
expenses war; forgets tell us get 
excess expenses shall surpassed value whole 
Mexican territory. again, insists separate national 
existence Mexico shall tell us 
done, shall taken territory. Lest 
questions suggested considered merely, let 
indulged moment trying show not. war gone 
twenty expenses which, together 
old President claims one half Mexican 
territory, far better half, far concerns ability 
make anything it. comparatively 
could establish it, raise money way. 
half already understand it, tolerably 
nature country, lands, 
valuable, already private property. 
make anything lands them? 
remove suppose one would say kill 
people, drive out, make slaves them, confiscate 
property. How, then, make much part 
prosecution war expenses already better 
half country, long future prosecution 
less valuable half question, 
pressing closely upon us. yet question President 
seems never thought of. mode war 
securing peace, President equally First, 
done vigorous prosecution war vital 
parts enemy's country; apparently talking tired 
point, President drops tone, 
tells us "with people distracted divided contending 
government subject constant changes successive 
continued success arms may fail secure 
satisfactory suggests propriety 
Mexican people desert counsels leaders, and, trusting 
set government secure 
satisfactory telling us "this may become mode 
obtaining soon falls doubt too; 
drops back already ground vigorous 
shows President nowise satisfied 
First takes one, attempting argue 
us argues it, seizes another goes 
process, then, confused able think 
nothing new, old one again, time 
cast off. mind, taxed beyond power, running 
like creature burning surface, finding 
position settle 
 
Again, singular omission message nowhere 
President expects war beginning, General 
Scott President driven 
peace could conquered less three four 
months. now, end twenty months, time 
arms given us splendid successes, every department every 
part, land water, officers volunteers, 
men could do, hundreds things ever 
thought men could this, President 
gives long message, without showing us end 
even imaginary said, knows 
is. man. God grant 
may able show something conscience 
painful mental 
 
following copy so-called referred 

 
 
   Agreement entered Excellency 
David G. President Republic Texas, one part, 
Excellency General Santa 
Mexican army, 
 
   "Article I. General de Santa Anna agrees 
take arms, exercise influence cause 
taken up, people Texas present war 
independence. 
 
   "Article II. hostilities Mexican 
troops cease immediately, land water. 
 
   "Article III. Mexican troops territory 
Texas, passing side Rio Grande 
 
   "Article IV. Mexican army, shall 
take property person without consent 
using articles may necessary 
cases owner may present, 
commander army Texas, commissioners 
appointed adjustment matters, account value 
property place taken, name owner, 

 
   "Article V. private property, including 
horses, negro slaves, indentured persons, whatever 
may captured portion Mexican army, may 
taken refuge said army, since commencement late 
invasion, shall restored commander army, 
persons may appointed Government Texas receive 
them. 
 
   "Article VI. troops armies refrain 
coming contact other; end commander 
army Texas careful approach within shorter distance 
five 
 
   "Article VII. Mexican army shall make 
delay march necessary take 
etc., cross delay necessary 
purposes considered agreement. 
 
   "Article VIII. immediately 
agreement shall sent General General 
T. J. commander army, order may 
end exchange 
comply same. 
 
   "Article IX. prisoners possession 
Mexican army, forthwith 
furnished free return consideration 
corresponding number Mexican prisoners, rank 
possession Government Texas shall immediately 
remainder Mexican prisoners continue possession 
Government Texas treated due 
extraordinary may furnished charge 
Government Mexico. 
 
   "Article General de Santa Anna sent 
soon shall deemed proper. 
 
   "The parties sign instrument 
purposes, port fourteenth day 
May, 1836. 
 
  G. President, 
  Secretary State, 
  DE SANTA 
  Secretary Treasury, 
  W. 
 
 
 
 
REPORT HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, JANUARY 19, 1848. 
 
Mr. Lincoln, Committee Post-office Post Roads, made 
following report: 
 
Committee Post-office Post Roads, referred 
petition Messrs. report: That, proved 
mail 
State Georgia 
let Reeside per former 
latter, term four years, commence first day 
January, that, previous time commencing service, 
Reeside sold interest therein 5th May, 
sold whole 
take effect beginning, January time, 
Assistant Postmaster-General, called purpose, consented 
transfer Reeside 
promised proper transfer made 
books department, which, however, neglected done; 
supposing right, good faith commenced 
transportation mail difficulty 
still trusting would made right, continued service 
till December performed service entire 
satisfaction department, never paid anything 
except difficulty occurred follows: 
 
Mr. Postmaster-General times making 
attempted transfer them; Mr. succeeded Mr. 
finding Reeside apparently debt department, 
still standing names Reeside refused pay 
services them, otherwise credits afterward, 
however, divided still one half 
directing paid order 
right it. service, 
supposing might legal redress brought suit 
New suit failed, ground 
complied contract, done much toward 
transfer accepted satisfied with. Still later 
department Reeside supposed 
jury determined department indebted 
sum much beyond credits given account stated. 
circumstances, committee consider clearly 
entitled relief, report bill however, 
mistake amount already 
received, frame that, adjustment department, 
may paid much remains services actually performed 
charging credits given committee 
think improbable purchased right 
paid service 1st January, till purchase 
May 11, but, evidence point 
forbear report favor allowing it. 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM H. WORK 
 
WASHINGTON, January 19, 1848. 
 
DEAR find letter Louis W. 
wanted shall ascertain whether claim upon note 
described received Court Christian 
County, estate Mr. administered 
on. nothing paid it, withdraw note send me, 
see it. events write it, 
till somehow get hands. already bored 
enough it; least annoyance 

 
made speech, copy send next mail. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REGARDING SPEECH MEXICAN WAR 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, February 1, 1848. 
 
DEAR letter 19th received last night, 
much thing wish talk 
vote amendment 
fear disagree war. regret this, 
fear shall remain read letter, 
misunderstand fear good friends may also. vote 
affirms war unnecessarily commenced 
President; stake life place 
would voted did. Would voted felt 
knew know would not. Would gone 
expect not. one vote, 
would many end session. 
resolutions, introduced made move gave 
vote upon subject, make direct question justice war; 
man silent would. compelled speak; 
alternative tell truth cannot doubt 
would do. 
 
vote nothing determining votes questions 
always intended, still vote 
perhaps precise form recommended President, 
better form purposes, except party purposes. 
particular seem mistaken. efforts 
make impression vote supplies take part war 
necessity approve President's conduct beginning 
it; Whigs beginning made kept distinction 
two. first act nearly Whigs voted 
preamble declaring war existed act yet 
nearly voted Whig men 
participated war, far spoken hearing 
hesitate denounce unjust President's conduct 
beginning war. suppose denunciation 
directed hatred him, Register would 
two Whigs floor Major 
former fought colonel side Colonel Baker 
stands side side vote seem 
dissatisfied with. latter, history whose capture 
Clay well know, arrived vote but, 
understand, stands ready give vote whenever 
occasion shall present. Baker, too, here, says truth 
undoubtedly way; whenever shall speak out, say so. 
Colonel too, favorite Whig Missouri, 
Northern Mexico, return home public speech St. Louis 
condemned administration relation war. remember, G. T. 
M. Davis, almost whole war, declares favor 
Mr. infer sentiments Mr. Clay, 
generally hand, heard one Whig 
war attempting justify President's 
one Captain editor Charleston 
clever fellow. mean letter public, you. 
reaches you, seen read pamphlet speech, 
perhaps scared anew it. get read 
again, sentence sentence, tell honestly think 
it. could fear cut hour rule, 
got spoken minutes. 
 
forever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, February 2, 1848 
 
DEAR take pen say Mr. Stephens, Georgia, 
little, man, voice like 
concluded best speech length ever heard. 
old dry eyes full tears yet. 
 
writes anything like delivered it, people shall see 
good many copies it. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MEXICAN WAR 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, February 15, 1848. 
 
DEAR letter 29th January received last night. 
exclusively constitutional argument, wish submit 
reflections upon spirit kindness know 
you. Let first state understand position. 
shall become necessary repel invasion, President may, without 
violation Constitution, cross line territory 
another country, whether necessity exists given case 
President sole judge. 
 
going consider well whether 
position. is, position neither President himself, 
friend his, far know, ever taken. 
positions soil hostilities 
second, whether rightfully not, 
Congress it, President reason bound 
defend it; clearly proved false fact 
prove house mine. soil ours, Congress 
attempt it. return position. Allow 
President neighboring nation whenever shall deem 
necessary repel invasion, allow whenever may 
choose say deems necessary purpose, allow 
make war pleasure. Study see fix limit power 
respect, given much to-day 
choose say thinks necessary Canada prevent 
British invading us, could stop him? may say 
see probability British invading say 
you, "Be see it, 
 
provision Constitution giving war making power Congress 
understand it, following kings 
always involving people pretending 
generally, good people object. 
convention understood 
resolved frame Constitution one 
man hold power bringing oppression upon us. 
view whole matter, places President kings 
always Write soon again. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPORT HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
MARCH 9, 1848. 
 
Mr. Lincoln, Committee Post Roads, made 
following report: 
 
Committee Post-office Post Roads, referred 
resolution House Representatives entitled "An Act authorizing 
county seats justice receive 
newspapers paid agency 
Post-office Department, purposes," beg leave submit 
following report: 
 
committee reason believe general wish pervades 
community large facility proposed measure 
granted express law, agency 
Post-office Department, newspapers 
intelligence passing events. Compliance 
general wish deemed accordance republican 
institutions, best sustained knowledge 
due encouragement national spirit inquiry 
discussion public events medium public 
committee, however, duty 
Post-office Department injurious sacrifices 
object, whereby ordinary might 
therefore subject much 
confidently hoped bill herewith submitted effectually 
objections might exist regard less matured 
proposition. 
 
committee upon Post-office Department, 
view meeting general wish subject, made experiment 
one internal regulations, new postage system 
went operation first July, 1845, continued 
thirtieth September, reasons 
hereafter stated, proved 
order Postmaster-General. far committee present 
following seem principal grounds 
dissatisfaction 
 
(1) legal responsibility receiving newspaper 

 
(2) authority open instead limited 
specific offices. 
 
(3) consequence extension authority that, 
instances, money, without previous knowledge 
control officers department responsible good 
management offices improper 
funds ordered, 
financial officers, points 
inconvenient department 
 
uncertain sums 
small offices felt seriously consequent 
collecting and, case private mail 
concerning funds special 
service supplying 
 
(5) funds draft offices could known 
financial clerks department time control it, 
often rendered uncertain funds hand. 
 
orders payment part issued upon principal 
offices, New York, Philadelphia, Boston, Baltimore, etc., 
large offices publishers causing 
department funds points 
essential husband regular 
Philadelphia alone per 
cities seaboard 
 
embarrassment department increased 
funds 
concentrated points suitable 
inconvenient offices, could made available till 
collected special transferred considerable expense 
principal offices again. 
 
vast increase duties thrown upon limited force 
necessary conduct business 
delay obtaining arose speedy settlement 
accounts present retired causing 
endangered act limitations, 
causing much danger increase cases. 
 
responsible large ordered 
least responsible small make payments upon 
without means ascertaining whether 
genuine whether 
office, 
 
business publishers 
public expense, delay 
business occasioned it, justified 
sufficient revenue sustain department, required 
every respect regard 
 
committee, view frame 
bill would obnoxious principle practical 
effect. 
 
confidently believed limiting offices receiving 
less one tenth number authorized 
experiment already tried, designating county seat 
county purpose, control department rendered 
particularly power Auditor, 
officer required law check approve 
sanction 
point place payments cause 
principal offices compensated 
funds county 
paid extent 
local convenience seaboard offices. 
 
legal responsibility 
funds point 
points drawn upon, known controlled Auditor, 
occasion embarrassments record kept 
passing hands 
enable settle accounts without delay occasioned 
doubt 
propriety issue, removed 
examination risk loss 
funds certificate payable till 
sanctioned Auditor, sanction need pay 
unless presented known clerk 
 
main principle equivalent agency department 
secured postage required paid upon transmission 
augmenting post-office 
 
committee, report difficulties 
subject fully fairly stated, difficulties 
plan proposed accompanying bill, 
believing measure satisfactorily meet wants wishes 
large portion community, beg leave recommend 

 
 
 
 
REPORT HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
MARCH 9, 1848. 
 
Mr. Lincoln, Committee Post Roads, made 
following report: 
 
Committee Post-office Post Roads, referred 
petition H. M. postmaster Peoria County, 
Illinois, report: satisfied evidence, 
15th December, 1847, said petitioner fifteen 
hundred worth together papers 
entirely destroyed specie funds 
office down, partially lost partially 
large individual loss entirely idea 
due department former quarters 
twenty-five owing destruction papers, 
exact amount due quarter ending December 31, 1847, cannot 
therefore report joint resolution, said 
petitioner paying anything quarter last mentioned. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS UNITED STATES HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, MARCH 29, 1848. 
 
bill raising additional military force limited time, etc., 
reported Committee similar bills reported 
Committee on, Public Lands Military Committee. 
 
Mr. Lincoln said general desire part House 
pass bill glad 
generally, gentleman Arkansas [Mr. 
postponement might safety proposition. If, however, 
reference made, wished make remarks relation 
several subjects desired gentlemen embraced 
amendments ninth section act last session 
Congress. first amendment desired members House 
object give bounty lands persons served time 
never discharged such, promoted 
office. subject, other, embraced bill. 
others desired, legislating subject, 
also give bounty lands volunteers War 
friend Maryland said men. [Mr. 
say many, confident some. friend 
Kentucky near him, [Mr. told one. 
 
still another proposition touching matter; was, 
persons entitled bounty lands law entitled 
lands required one body, 
provided existing law. 
 
carefully drawn bill embracing three separate 
propositions, intended propose substitute 
bills House, Committee Whole State 
Union, suitable time. disposition part 
House act separate proposition, repeated that, 
gentlemen Arkansas, prefer lest 
lose all. reference, desired introduce 
bill embracing three propositions, thus enabling committee 
House act time, whether favorably upon all. 
inquired whether amendment order. 
 
Speaker replied negative. 
 
 
 
 
ARCHIBALD 
 
WASHINGTON, April 30, 1848. 
 
DEAR seen papers evidence movement 
send delegate circuit June convention. wish say 
think delegate Mr. Clay's 
chance election chance all. might get New York, 
would elected now, must 
now, least, lose Tennessee, then, addition 
fifteen new votes Florida, Texas, Iowa, know good 
friend great Mr. Clay, therefore fear 
is, ask discard feeling, try 
matter judgment, count votes necessary 
elect him. 
 
judgment elect nobody General cannot elect 
without Therefore don't fail send 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
MAY 11, 1848. 
 
bill admission Wisconsin Union passed. 
 
Mr. Lincoln moved reconsider vote bill passed. 
stated House made motion purpose 
obtaining opportunity say words relation point raised 
course debate bill, would proceed 
make order. point case referred arose 
amendment submitted gentleman Vermont [Mr. 
Committee Whole State Union, 
afterward renewed House, relation question whether 
reserved sections, which, bills heretofore passed, 
appropriation land made Wisconsin, enhanced 
value, reduced price public lands. 
question reduction value sections 
time matter nearly inclined desire 
Wisconsin obliged gentleman 
Indiana [Mr. C. B. chairman Committee Territories, 
yesterday associated question general question, 
extent agitated Congress, making alternate 
sections land aid States making internal improvements, 
enhancing price sections gentleman 
Indiana took ground policy. make special 
argument favor Wisconsin, took ground generally 
policy giving alternate sections land, enhancing price 
reserved sections. [Mr. time take 
floor purpose attempting make argument general 
subject. rose simply protest doctrine 
gentleman Indiana avowed course [Mr. 
could consider argument. 
 
might, however, true, anything knew, gentleman 
Indiana might convince argument sound; [Mr. 
feared gentleman would able convince majority 
Congress sound. true question appeared 
different aspect persons consequence difference point 
looked it. look persons residing east 
mountains lived among public lands. But, 
part, would state Congress would make 
alternate sections public land purpose internal improvements 
State, forbid reserved sections sold 
glad see appropriation made; though prefer 
reserved sections enhanced repeated, 
glad made, even though reserved 
sections enhanced wish understood 
concurring intimation would refuse receive 
appropriation alternate sections land condition enhancing 
price reserved sections attached believed 
position would not, feared 
able make understood. 
 
But, took seat, would remark Senate 
present session passed bill making land 
principle benefit State resided State 
Illinois. alternate sections given purpose 
constructing roads, reserved sections enhanced value 
consequence. bill came action 
received, Committee Public 
desired much see passed was, could put 
favorable form State Illinois. 
House, member section Union lands 
lie, whose interest might less felt, 
propose reduction price reserved sections 
much think would well 
came section Union lands lay 
wished it, then, understood join 
warfare principle engaged minds members 
Congress favorable improvements western country. 
good deal force, admitted, fell 
chairman Committee Territories. might 
precise justice raising price reserved sections per 
might proper price enhanced extent, 
though double usual glad 
appropriation reserved sections better 
pleased price sections something 
still better pleased without 
all. 
 
one portion argument gentleman Indiana, 
chairman Committee Territories [Mr. wished 
take occasion say view alluded 
statement General Government interested internal 
improvements made, inasmuch increased value lands 
enabled government sell lands 
could sold without them. Thus, then, government gained 
internal improvements well general good people 
derived them, might be, therefore, lands 
sold instead price He, 
however, merely mentioned rose state, 
principle giving lands purposes 
mentioned laid hold considered 
gentlemen constitutional giving money 
would hesitate give land, 
willing understood one made 
war principle. desired say, 
accomplished object rose, withdrew motion 

 
 
 
 
TAYLOR'S NOMINATION 
 
E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 
 
DEAR 
 
moment received short note asking old Taylor 
used up, hope Taylor's 
nomination little higher left. Still, 
case means doubt. Mr. Clay's letter advanced 
interests here. Several Taylor, 
anybody before, since taking ground, Scott 
nominated neither one else 
tell. Now, let pray turn. prayer let nothing 
discourage you, that, spite every difficulty, send 
us good Taylor delegate Make Baker, 
you, suppose, help it. good hand raise 
 
General Senate Arkansas, died yesterday. Nothing else 
new beyond see papers. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
DEFENSE MEXICAN WAR POSITION 
 
REV. J. M. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 21, 1848. DEAR SIR: 
 
view facts. facts kept 
view. fact United States army marching Rio 
Grande peaceful Mexican settlement, frightened 
inhabitants away homes growing fact 
Fort Brown, opposite built army within 
Mexican time army reached young 
cotton crop crop wholly destroyed field 
greatly permanently injured 
like. fact captured Captain 
command, found captured within another Mexican field. 
 
wish bring facts notice, ascertain 
result reflections upon them. deny 
facts, think furnish proofs shall convince 
mistaken. admit facts, shall obliged 
reference law language, law States, law nations, law 
law law, human authority 
found saying facts constitute "no 
 
Possibly consider acts small notice. Would venture 
consider committed nation earth 
people? know would not. ask, 
ye would men you, ye even 

 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ZACHARY TAYLOR NOMINATION 
 
ARCHIBALD 
 
WASHINGTON, June 12, 1848. 
 
DEAR return Philadelphia, attending 
nomination "Old found letter 
mass others many, 
said would abide nomination since 
deed done, fast falling in, opinion shall 
glorious triumph. One unmistakable sign 
ends Native Americans, Tyler 
men, disappointed Lord knows 
important, nothing else, showing way wind 
sanguine men set States certain 
Taylor Illinois, doubtful. Cannot something done even 
Taylor's nomination takes blind side. turns 
war them. war 
built us, hanged 
themselves. 
 
Excuse short letter. many write cannot devote 
much time one. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, 
 
JUNE 20, 1848. 
 
Committee Whole State Union, Civil 
Diplomatic Appropriation 
 
Mr. wish times way fraud upon 
House committee, also desire nothing may 
disagreeable therefore state advance 
object taking floor make speech general subject 
internal order so, give 
chair opportunity take seat. 
 
undertake anticipate gentleman may say 
subject internal improvements. will, therefore, proceed 
remarks, question order shall made, chair 
decide it. 
 
Mr. Lincoln: early day session President sent us 
may properly called internal improvement veto message. late 
Democratic convention, sat Baltimore, nominated General 
Cass Presidency, adopted set resolutions, called 
Democratic platform, among one words: 
 
"That Constitution confer upon General Government 
power commence carry general system internal 
 
General Cass, letter accepting nomination, holds language: 
 
"I carefully read resolutions Democratic national 
convention, laying platform political faith, adhere 
firmly approve 
 
things, taken together, show question internal 
improvements distinctly become 
former period. veto message Baltimore resolution 
understand be, substance, thing; latter 
general statement, former bill 
know many Democrats, floor 
elsewhere, message, understand voted 
General Cass thereafter counted approved it, 
indorsed 
 
suppose all, nearly all, Democrats vote him. Many 
like position question, 
prefer him, wrong this, another 
consider farther wrong questions. way internal 
improvement Democrats be, sort forced consent, carried 
arrayed measure policy. General Cass, 
elected, trouble make constitutional argument, 
perhaps argument all, shall veto river harbor bill; 
consider sufficient answer Democratic point 
Mr. message, Democratic platform. 
case, question improvements final 
friends policy must battle, battle surrender 
all. view, humble am, wish contest well 
may, general positions veto message. say general 
positions, mean exclude consideration much relates 
present state treasury consequence Mexican 
War. 
 
general positions internal improvements ought 
made General would overwhelm 
treasury Second. Because, burdens would general, 
benefits would local involving obnoxious 
Third. would unconstitutional. Fourth. 
States may enough collection tonnage 
Constitution may amended. "Do nothing all, lest 
something sum positions sum 
message. this, exception said 
applying forcibly said making 
improvements State authority national authority; 
must abandon improvements country every 
authority, must resist repudiate doctrines message. 
Let us attempt latter. 
 
first position is, system internal improvements would 
overwhelm treasury. system tendency undue 
denied. tendency founded nature 
subject. member Congress prefer voting bill 
contains appropriation district, voting one 
not; bill shall expanded till every district shall 
provided for, greatly expanded obvious. 
true Congress State member 
Congress must appropriation district, member 
Legislature must one county. one overwhelm 
national treasury, overwhelm State treasury. Go 
will, difficulty same. Allow drive us 
halls Congress, will, drive us State 
Let us, then, it, test Let 
us, judging future past, ascertain whether may be, 
discretion Congress, sufficient power limit restrain 
tendency within reasonable proper President 
values evidence past. tells us certain 
point history two hundred millions dollars 
applied make prove 
treasury would overwhelmed system. tell us 
much Would better Let us turn 
it, see message President tells us 
four succeeding years embraced administration 
President Adams, power appropriate money, apply it, 
direction authority General Government, well 
construction roads improvement rivers, 
fully asserted This, then, period greatest 
These, any, must days two hundred 
millions. much suppose really expended improvements 
four Two hundred One 
No, sir; less two millions. shown documents, 
expenditures improvements 
amounted one million eight hundred thousand six 
hundred dollars one cent. four years 
period Mr. Adams's administration, nearly fact 
shows power make improvements "was fully asserted 
Congress keep within reasonable limits; 
done, seems me, done again. 
 
second portion burdens 
improvements would general, benefits would local 
involving obnoxious degree 
truth position, shall deny. commercial object 
government patronage exclusively general 
peculiar local advantage. navy, understand it, established, 
maintained great annual expense, partly ready 
war war shall come, partly also, perhaps 
protection commerce high latter object is, 
see, principle internal improvements. driving 
track commerce broad ocean, removing 
narrow path Mississippi River, cannot, 
think, distinguished principle. done save life 
property, nothing else. 
 
navy, then, general benefits class 
yet even navy peculiar advantage 
Charleston, Baltimore, Philadelphia, New York, Boston, beyond 
interior towns Illinois. next general object 
think would improvements Mississippi River 
touch thirteen Virginia, 
Kentucky, Tennessee, Mississippi, Louisiana, Arkansas, Missouri, Illinois, 
Indiana, Ohio, Wisconsin, Iowa. suppose denied 
thirteen States little interested improvements 
great river remaining instances 
navy Mississippi River show clearly something 
local advantage general objects. converse also 
true. Nothing local general Take, 
instance, Illinois Michigan Considered apart 
effects, perfectly Every inch within State 
Illinois. canal first opened business last 
days gratified learn, among things, sugar 
carried New Orleans canal New 
York. sugar took doubtless, cheaper 
old route. Supposing benefit reduction cost carriage 
result New Orleans 
sold sugar little people 
coffee little benefit resulting 
Illinois, canal is, Louisiana 
New York, not. transactions Illinois will, course, 
perhaps larger share too, benefits 
instance sugar clearly shows benefits 
improvement means confined particular 
improvement itself. conclusion 
nation refuse make improvements general kind 
benefits may somewhat State may reason refuse 
make improvement local kind benefits may somewhat 
general. State may well say nation, "If nothing 
me, nothing you." Thus seen argument 
sufficient anywhere, sufficient everywhere, puts 
end improvements altogether. hope believe 
nation States would, good faith, respective spheres 
could way improvements, inequality might 
produced one place might compensated another, sum 
whole might 
 
suppose, all, degree 
Inequality certainly never embraced 
every good thing discarded may connected 
degree it? so, must discard government. 
built public expense, public one 
doubt peculiar local advantage 
business people Shall remove 
so, shall set down, free 
make sure object, shall Congress 
hereafter hold "in 
make allusion present President say 
stronger cases world many benefit 
Presidency thought 
be. honest laborer coal seventy day, 
President seventy dollars day. coal 
clearly worth yet monstrous 
inequality President, reason, propose 
abolish not, ought not. true rule, 
determining embrace reject anything, whether evil 
it, whether evil good. things 
wholly evil wholly good. Almost everything, especially government 
policy, best judgment 
continually demanded. 
principle President, friends, world generally act 
subjects. apply it, then, upon question? Why, 
improvements, evil, refuse see good 
them? 
 
Mr. Chairman, third position message constitutional 
much say. man am, speaking, 
do, feel attempt original constitutional argument 
ought listened 
best men gone whole ground long ago. shall attempt 
little brief notice said. 
relation Mr. views, read Mr. veto 
 
Jefferson, message Congress recommended 
amendment Constitution, view apply anticipated surplus 
treasury great purposes public education, roads, 
rivers, objects public improvement may 
thought proper add constitutional federal 
'I suppose amendment Constitution, 
consent States, necessary, objects recommended 
among enumerated Constitution, permits 
public moneys repeated published 
letters opinion power conferred upon Congress." 
 
introduce constitutional opinion, 
show that, question expediency, Mr. opinion 
present President; opinion Mr. Jefferson, 
one branch least, hands Mr. Polk like 
wide owner 
 
constitutional question. Chancellor Kent first 
published American law. devoted portion one 
question authority Congress appropriate 
public moneys internal improvements. subject 
never brought judicial consideration, proceeds give 
brief summary discussion legislative 
executive branches government. shows legislative 
branch usually for, executive power, till 
period Mr. Adams's administration, point considers 
executive influence withdrawn opposition, added 
support power. chancellor published new edition 
adds notes 
question since time read original text 
whole may found page two three 
following pages, first volume edition 
Chancellor Kent seems consider sum whole, read one 

 
"Mr. Justice Story, Constitution United 
States, stated 
large arguments proposition Congress 
constitutional authority lay taxes apply power 
regulate commerce means directly encourage protect domestic 
without giving opinion contested 
doctrine, left reader draw conclusions. 
think, however, arguments stated, every mind 
taken part discussion, felt prejudice territorial 
either side question, would deem arguments favor 
Congressional power vastly 
 
seen extract power make improvements 
directly mentioned; examining Kent Story, 
seen power mentioned extract power 
make improvements regarded denied 
many great good men power; insisted 
quite many, great good, it; 
shown that, full survey whole, Chancellor Kent opinion 
arguments latter vastly 
opinion man; man? one 
learned lawyers age, age. 
Mr. indeed one much time politics, 
placed far behind Chancellor Kent lawyer. attitude 
favorable correct conclusions. wrote 
struggling rear durable monument well knew 
truth thoroughly sound reasoning sure 
party opinion party President law question, purely 
is, compared set opposition man, 
Chancellor constitutional question 
probably never better settled is, shall pass 
judicial think man clear 
questions expediency need feel conscience much upon this. 
 
Mr. Chairman, President seems think enough may done, 
way improvements, means tonnage duties State authority, 
consent General Government. suppose matter 
tonnage duties well enough suppose may 
perhaps sufficient, make slight improvements 
already use much 
correct general idea it, must wholly general 
beneficent purposes improvement. know little, rather nothing 
all, practical matter collecting tonnage 
suppose one principles must lay duty 
improvement particular harbor upon tonnage coming 
collect money one harbor, expended 
improvements extremely form 
inequality President much right this, 
could make entirely new improvement means tonnage 
make road, clear greatly idea 
could involves absurdity Irish bull new 
"I shall 'em on," says wear 'em day 
two, stretch 'em shall never make canal tonnage 
duties shall already made tonnage 
get it. 
 
all, President possibly may great 
objects improvement cannot effected tonnage duties, 
therefore may expedient General Government take 
hand. Accordingly case 
propriety amending Constitution. Amend what? If, like 
Mr. Jefferson, President thought improvements expedient, 
constitutional, would natural enough recommend 
amendment. hear says 
 
"In view consequences, cannot think 
course legislation arrested, even nothing 
forbid fundamental laws Union." 
 
what, then, would Constitution 
proposition remove one merely met others which, 
opinion, cannot removed, enable Congress what, 
opinion, ought could. 
 
Mr. Meade Virginia inquired Mr. Lincoln understood 
President grounds expediency, every 
improvement. 
 
Mr. Lincoln answered: part message 
speaking, understand giving vague expression favor 
possible objects understand 
directly teeth arguments parts it. 
Neither President one possibly specify improvement 
shall clearly liable one another objections 
urged score expediency. shown, might show again, 
general dispense benefits 
precise equality; inequality chief among 
declares improvements 
No, sir. President something way 
improvements may properly done General Government, 
shrinking conclusions arguments would force him. 
feels improvements broad land mighty 
interest; unwilling confess people, perhaps 
himself, built argument which, pressed 
entirely interest. 
 
already said one satisfied expediency 
making improvements needs much uneasy conscience 
wish submit remarks general 
proposition amending Constitution. general rule, think 
would much better let alone. slight occasion us 
touch it. Better take first step, may lead habit 
it. Better, rather, think 
scarcely made better is. New provisions 
would introduce new difficulties, thus create increase appetite 
change. No, sir; let stand is. New hands never 
touched it. men made done work, passed 
away. shall improve 
 
Mr. Chairman, purpose message least 
possible time, well sake 
arguments well could, reduced propositions 
stated. examined wish detain 
committee little longer general remarks upon 
subject improvements. subject difficult one, cannot 
denied. Still difficult Congress State 
counties, smallest municipal districts 
anywhere exist. recur instances difficulty 
case county roads, like. One man offended 
road passes land, another offended 
pass his; one dissatisfied bridge 
taxed river different road leads 
house another cannot bear county got debt 
roads struggle hard 
roads located lands, refuse let 
opened first paid Even different 
streets towns cities find 
difficulty. difficulties 
which, which, President objections 

single alternative them: sufficient, not. 
sufficient, sufficient Congress well it, 
end. must reject lie 
nothing authority. Then, difficulty though be, let us meet 
encounter it. end, never stand nothing 
search find out." Determine thing shall 
done, shall find way. tendency undue expansion 
unquestionably chief difficulty. 
 
something, still much, Let 
contribute mite way suggestion. late Wright, 
letter Chicago convention, his, worth 
contribute mine, may worth nothing. 
events, therefore harm. would 
borrow money. system. Suppose that, 
session, Congress shall first determine much money can, 
year, spared sum 
important objects. far shall determine 
question comes collision 
shall slow acknowledge harbor river 
important mine, vice clear difficulty, let us 
statistical information gentleman Ohio [Mr. 
suggested beginning session. information 
shall basis basis wise subject 
local interest. amount means 
save us much, statistics save us 
wrong Adopt adhere course, and, seems 
me, difficulty 
 
One gentlemen South Carolina [Mr. much 
particularly objects, understand him, 
counting land. perceive much 
force objection. true everything 
portion statistics may useful object. 
products country produced need 
roads rivers, means transportation, proper 
connection subject. produced 
one place another; capacity 
producing greater natural means transportation, 
losses 
life property transportation, causes each, would 
among valuable statistics would 
readily appear given amount expenditure would good. 
statistics might equally would equally 
useful, nation States. way, 
means, let nation take hold larger works, States 
smaller thus, working meeting direction, 
steadily made one place may 
another, whole country put career 
prosperity shall correspond extent territory, 
natural resources, intelligence enterprise people. 
 
 
 
 
OPPORTUNITIES YOUNG POLITICIANS 
 
WILLIAM H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 22, 1848. 
 
DEAR night attending sort caucus Whig 
members, held relation coming Presidential election. whole 
field nation high hope confidence. 
Illinois expected better condition race. 
circumstances, judge come room find 
read discouraging letter made 
lost R. Campbell, four five more." 
Tell would Baker used 
something, think attach importance absence 
another cause. 1840, instance, two senators 
five representatives part one senator 
two representatives. quite one third people then, 
half sort offices sought men speaking 
sort This, think, chief cause. Now, young 
men. must wait brought forward older men. 
instance, suppose ever got notice 
waited hunted pushed forward older men? young men get 
together form Ready regular meetings 
speeches. Take everybody Harrison L. A. 
Lee C. W. begin thing; go 
along gather wild boys town, whether age, 
little age, Logan, 
hundreds such. Let every one play part play speak, 
meetings 
older men, women, go hear you; 
contribute election "Old interesting 
improving intellectual faculties engaged. Don't 
fail this. 
 
ask send speeches made "Old war, 
etc. makes little regularly sent 
Congressional Globe cannot examined them, 
would discovered contain every speech made every man 
houses Congress, every subject, session. 
send send speeches nobody Thinking would 
natural newspapers would feel interested give least 
speeches beginning session 
made arrangements one copy Globe Appendix regularly 
sent Whig paper district. yet, exception 
little speech, published two five, 
four, Whig papers, remember seen single speech, even 
extract one, single one papers. equal full 
means sides, venture State Register thrown 
readers speeches month Whig 
papers district done Whig speeches session. 
 
wish full understanding war, repeat believe 
said letter before, whole, nearly so, 
found speech sent 
pamphlet well Examine study every sentence 
speech understand whole subject. ask 
Congress came declare war existed act Mexico. 
possible don't understand least twenty speeches 
possession fully explain it. will, however, try 
more. news reached Washington commencement hostilities 
Rio great peril General Taylor's army. 
Whigs Democrats, sending aid, men 
money. necessary pass bill this. majority 
houses, brought bill preamble saying: 
Whereas, War exists act Mexico, therefore send General Taylor 
money. Whigs moved strike could 
vote send men money, without saying anything 
war minority, voted down, 
preamble Then, passage bill, question came 
upon them, Shall vote preamble bill together, 
want vote sending help 
General Taylor, therefore voted together. 
difficulty understanding this? Even little speech shows 
go library, may get Journal 
find whole yourself. 
 
nothing published yet special reference Taylor 
soon have, send made 
speech day yesterday, shall send home 
soon get written suppose 
nobody read. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JUDGE WESTERN VIRGINIA 
 
REMARKS HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, JUNE 28, 1848. 
 
Discussion judge western increase 

 
Mr. Lincoln said felt unwilling either unjust 
wanted understand real case judicial 
gentleman Virginia stated hold eleven courts. 
everybody knew habit district judges 
United States States hold anything like number 
courts; therefore took granted must happen 
peculiar law required large number courts every 
laws, supposed, passed request 
people judicial district. came, then, this: 
people western district Virginia got eleven courts 
held among one year, thus 
better accommodated neighbors elsewhere, wanted judge 
little better paid. Illinois present 
season one district court held year. two. 
Could western district Virginia furnished business 
judge whole State 
 
 
 
 
NATIONAL BANK 
 
JULY, 
 

 
question national bank rest. President, 
urge upon Congress; Congress see fit pass 
act establish institution, arrest 
unless consider subject constitutional objection 
believe two former banks free. 
 
 
 
 
YOUNG JEALOUSY 
 
W. H. HERNDON. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 10, 1848. 
 
DEAR 
 
letter newspaper received last night. 
subject letter exceedingly painful me, cannot 
think mistake impression motives old 
men. suppose one old men; declare veracity, 
think good you, nothing could afford 
satisfaction learn others young friends home 
battle contest people 
taking stand far ever able reach 
cannot conceive men feel differently. course 
cannot demonstrate say; young once, sure 
never thrust back. hardly know say. way 
young man rise improve every way can, never suspecting 
anybody wishes hinder him. Allow assure suspicion 
jealousy never help man situation. may sometimes 
ungenerous attempts keep young man succeed, 
too, allows mind diverted true channel 
attempted Cast see feeling 
injured every person ever known fall it. 
 
Now, said sure suspect nothing sincere 
would save fatal 
young man. far better informed almost subjects ever 
been. cannot fail laudable object unless allow 
mind advantage 
world's experience, merely induces 
still seem little mistaken Congressional 
Globe contain speeches published 
way. speech speech say got pamphlet 
form word word repeat again, 
there. 
 
friend, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL TAYLOR VETO 
 
SPEECH HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, JULY 27, 1848. 
 
Mr. SPEAKER, Democratic friends seem great distress 
think candidate Presidency don't suit us. 
cannot find General Taylor principles all; some, 
however, discovered one, one entirely wrong. 
one principle position veto power. gentleman 
Tennessee [Mr. taken seat, indeed, said 
little, any, difference question General 
Taylor seems think sufficient 
General Taylor's position nothing new 
it. others heard speak assail new 
member Kentucky [Mr. considerable ability, 
particular concerned it. thought altogether novel 
unprecedented President Presidential candidate think 
approving bills whose constitutionality may entirely clear 
mind. thinks safety gone unless Presidents 
shall always veto bills judgment may doubtful 
However clear Congress may authority 
pass particular act, gentleman Kentucky thinks President 
must veto doubts it. neither time 
inclination argue gentleman veto power original 
question; wish show General Taylor, he, agrees 
earlier statesmen question. bill 
first Bank United States passed Congress, constitutionality 
Mr. Madison, House Representatives, well 
others, opposed ground. General Washington, President, 
called approve reject it. sought obtained 
constitutionality question separate written opinions Jefferson, 
Hamilton, respectively Secretary 
State, Secretary Treasury, Attorney general. opinion 
power; 
it. Mr. Jefferson, giving opinion deciding 
constitutionality bill, letter paragraph 
read: 
 
"It must admitted, however, unless President's mind, view 
everything urged bill, tolerably clear 
pro hang 
even balance judgment, respect wisdom 
legislature would naturally decide balance favor opinion. 
chiefly cases clearly error, ambition, 
interest, Constitution placed check negative 
President. 
 

 
15, 
 
 
General Taylor's opinion, expressed letter, 
read: 
 
"The power given veto high conservative power; but, 
opinion, never exercised except cases clear violation 
Constitution, manifest haste want consideration 
Congress." 
 
seen that, Mr. opinion, 
constitutionality given bill President 
veto it, gentleman Kentucky would do, 
Congress approve it. compare opinion Jefferson 
Taylor, expressed shall find exactly 
alike often find two expressions 
difference. None interested think, discover 
substantial 
 
gentlemen side unanimously agreed General Taylor 
principles. utter darkness opinions 
questions policy occupy public attention. 
doubt prominent questions 
possible know would 
every imaginable case, many questions passed away, 
others doubtless arise none us yet thought 
prominent questions currency, tariff, internal improvements, 
Wilmot Proviso, General Taylor's course least well defined 
General Why, get General Taylor, several 
Democratic members desired know whether, case 
election, law tell us General 
opinion question? 
 
member answered, "He 
 
Aye, know nothing platform, 
elsewhere, seen. gentleman knows anything 
know show it. return. General Taylor, 
letter, says: 
 
subject tariff, currency, improvement 
great rivers, people, 
expressed representatives Congress, ought respected 
carried 
 
whole matter. substance, this: people say 
General Taylor, "If elected, shall national 
answers, "Your will, gentlemen, mine." "What 
"Shall rivers "Just 
please. desire bank, alteration tariff, internal 
improvements, all, hinder you. desire 
them, attempt force you. Send members 
Congress various districts, opinions according own, 
measures, them, shall nothing 
them, shall not, 
whatever, attempt 
 
difficulty understanding this? Democrats 
may seem like principle; surely cannot fail perceive 
position plainly enough. distinction position 
candidate broad admit clear right 
show wrong can; right pretend cannot 
see all. see it, us appears like principle, 
best sort principle principle allowing people 
please business. friend Indiana B. 
asked, "Are willing trust 
answered substantially, "We willing trust people; 
President much representative people Congress." 
certain sense, certain extent, representative 
people. elected them, well Congress is; he, 
nature things know wants people well three hundred 
men, coming various localities so, 
propriety Constitution gives 
President negative legislation, know; negative 
combined platforms enable 
him, fact almost compel him, take whole legislation 
hands, object to, General Taylor objects to, 
constitutes broad distinction us. thus 
transfer legislation clearly take understand 
interests people, give one 
cannot well understand it. understand idea 
Presidential candidate avow opinion upon given question, rather 
upon questions, people, full knowledge this, elect 
him, thereby distinctly approve opinions. means it, 
measures adopted rejected contrary wishes whole 
one party, often nearly half other. Three, four, half 
dozen questions prominent given time; party 
candidate, takes position questions. 
one positions already indorsed former elections, 
party fully committed them; one new, large 
portion it. do? whole 
must take all, reject all. cannot take 
like, leave rest. already committed 
majority, shut eyes, whole. Next 
election, still another introduced way. run eyes 
along line past, shall see almost quite 
articles present Democratic first forced upon 
party way. now, so, opposition 
internal improvements established General Cass shall 
elected. Almost half Democrats 
vote Cass, vote aided 
closing doors improvements. process 
think wrong. prefer candidate who, like General Taylor, allow 
people way, regardless private 
think Democrats, least, ought 
prefer candidate. would force nothing 
don't want, would allow improvements 
candidate, elected, not. 
 
Mr. Speaker, said General Taylor's position well defined 
General saying this, admit certainly know 
would Wilmot Proviso. Northern man rather 
Western Free-State man, believe be, 
personal feelings know be, extension slavery. such, 
information have, hope believe General Taylor, 
elected, would veto proviso. know it. Yet 
knew would, still would vote him. because, 
judgment, election alone defeat General because, 
slavery thereby go territory have, much 
certainly happen election Cass, addition course 
policy leading new new territory still 
slavery. One two President. 

 
much doubt Cass improvements Taylor 
proviso. doubt General Cass question; 
know Democrats differ among position. 
colleague [Mr. stated floor 
day satisfied Cass improvements, 
voted bills [Mr. had. far good. 
Mr. Polk Baltimore convention passed 
set resolutions, among things, approving 
General Cass letter accepting nomination, 
carefully read resolutions, adheres firmly 
words, General Cass voted 
thinks President right veto them; friends 
enough consider one side 
other, one may correspond respective 
colleague admits platform declares 
constitutionality general system improvements, General 
Cass still thinks General Cass favor 
sort improvements. Well, they? 
general objects, must particular 
taking subject precisely wrong end. 
money whole people object benefit portion 
greatest real objection improvements, 
held General Jackson, Mr. others, believe, till 
now. now, objects free 
liable 
cannot help believing General Cass, 
wrote letter acceptance, well understood claimed 
advocates sides question, closed 
door expressions opinion purposely retain 
benefits double position. subsequent 
mind, proves case. 
 
One word more, shall done branch subject. 
Democrats, candidate, main favor laying 
advance set party 
forcing people, every sort ratify them, however 
may be. candidate favor 
making Presidential elections legislation country distinct 
people elect please, afterward 
legislate please, without save much 
may guard Constitution, undue haste, want 
consideration. difference us clear 
right cannot doubt. hold true Republican position. 
leaving people's business hands, cannot wrong. 
willing, even go people issue. 
 
suppose cannot reasonably hope convince 
principles. expect assure think 
quite contented them. day one gentlemen 
Georgia [Mr. eloquent man, man far 
judge, learned myself, came upon us 
spoke calls 
end second severe flash struck 
found feeling fingers assurance continued 
existence. little left, gradually 
Mr. Clay high beautiful terms, declared 
deserted principles, turned Henry Clay out, like 
old horse, terribly cannot answered 
least cannot answer it. merely wish ask 
gentleman Whigs party think sometimes 
turn old horses certain Martin Van Buren old 
horse party turned 
little now? nominating Mr. Clay 
deserted principles, say. what? Tell us, ye men 
principle, principle say violate principle 
discarding Van Buren, tell how. violated 
one great living principle democratic 
representative principle representative bound 
carry known large majority 
Baltimore convention were, instructed 
procure Van Buren nomination could. utter 
this, rejected him; rejected him, gentleman 
New York [Mr. day expressly admitted, 
"general charge upon 
us, daily here, something exceedingly odious 
gentleman Georgia [Mr. gave us 
second speech yesterday, well considered put writing, 
Van Buren present position 
cannot remember precise 
remember put Van Buren down, down, till got 
finally 
 
Mr. Speaker, business inclination mine defend Martin 
Van Buren war old 
say, take 
origin 
fall first greatest principle 
matter, suggest gentleman Georgia 
present bound take upon themselves. 
gentleman Georgia says deserted principles, 
taken shelter General Taylor's military seems 
think exceedingly Well, faith is, 
unto him. remember military 
certain party near quarter 
acquaintance ample military coat tail General 
know party run five last 
Presidential races running 
sixth Yes, sir, used 
General Jackson himself, clung to, grip death, 
every Democratic candidate since. never dare 
it. campaign papers constantly "Old 
rude old general upon them; 
Mr. Polk 
something so; even campaign paper 
Cass Butler true Now, 
sir, dare give up. Like stuck 
tail Lion end life; 
still it, drawing it, 
dead. fellow made discovery 
could make new man old one, enough left 
make little yellow discovery General Jackson's 
popularity you. twice made President 
it, enough left make Presidents 
several comparatively small men chief reliance 
make still another. 
 
Mr. Speaker, old horses military sort, 
figures speech would first introduce 
discussions here; gentleman Georgia thought fit 
introduce them, welcome made, make 
them. old horses, out; 
come us. repeat, would introduce mode 
discussion here; wish gentlemen side understand 
use degrading figures game may find 
able take 
 
give 
 
Aye, give up, well different reason 
would us understand. power 
figures consists 
and, understanding this, may well give up. weapons 
hit you, miss us. 
 
hurry near closing subject military 
done it. one entire article sort 
discussed mean military tail Democrats engaged 
great Yes, sir; 
biographies (and hand, 
military like many mischievous boys dog 
True, material drive 
might invaded Canada without resistance, 
without orders, suppose 
neither credit them; constitute large part 
close 
volunteer aid General Harrison day battle 
said 1840 Harrison two miles 
battle fought, suppose conclusion 
say Cass aiding Harrison pick all, 
except question broken authors say broke 
it, say threw away, others, ought know, say 
nothing it. Perhaps would fair historical compromise say, 
break it, anything else it. 
 
way, Mr. Speaker, know military Yes, sir; 
days Black Hawk war fought, came away. Speaking 
General career reminds own. 
near Cass and, 
like him, saw place soon afterward. quite certain 
break sword, none bent pretty 
badly one occasion. Cass broke sword, idea broke 
bent General Cass went 
advance guess surpassed charges 
upon wild saw live, fighting Indians, 
good many bloody struggles 
although never loss blood, truly say 
often Mr. Speaker, ever conclude whatever 
Democratic friends may suppose 
me, therefore shall take candidate 
Presidency, protest shall make fun me, 
General Cass, attempting write military 
 
General Cass hand, wish say word 
political principles. take record progress 
Wilmot Proviso. Washington Union March 2, 1847, 
report speech General Cass, made day Senate, 
Wilmot Proviso, delivery Mr. Miller New Jersey 
reported interrupted follows, wit: 
 
"Mr. Miller expressed great surprise change sentiments 
Senator Michigan, regarded great champion 
freedom distinguished 
Last year Senator Michigan understood decidedly 
favor Wilmot reason stated 
change, [Mr. could refrain expression 
extreme 
 
General Cass reported replied follows, wit: 
 
"Mr. Cass said course Senator New Jersey 
Last year [Mr. voted 
proposition, come up. circumstances altogether changed. 
honorable Senator read several passages remarks, given 
above, committed writing, order charge 
Senator New 
 
reduced one numbered four, 
follows, wit: 
 
Legislation would wholly territory 
hereafter acquired governed without act Congress 
providing government; act, passage, would open 
whole subject, leave Congress called pass free 
exercise discretion, entirely declaration 
found 
 
Register, p. letter General 
Cass ------ Nashville, Tennessee, dated December 24, 1847, 
following correct 
 
"The Wilmot Proviso country time. 
repeatedly discussed Congress public strongly 
impressed opinion great change going 
public mind upon well 
doubts principle 
involves kept national legislature, left 
people confederacy respective local 
Briefly, then, opposed exercise jurisdiction 
Congress matter; favor leaving people 
territory may hereafter acquired right regulate 
themselves, general principles Constitution. 
see Constitution grant 
requisite power Congress; disposed extend doubtful 
precedent beyond establishment territorial 
governments inhabitants right 
compatible relations bear 
 
extracts show 1846 General Cass proviso 
March, 1847, still it, then; 
December, 1847, altogether. true 
whole man. question raised 1846, 
hurry take ground it. sought advance, avoid 
position mere soon began see 
great Democratic face, hear 
voice saying, Back, Back shakes 
head, eyes, back position March, 
still voice grows distinct 
still, Back, say! back goes 
position December, 1847, still, 
voice says, Stand that!" 
 
fears, gentlemen, candidate. exactly suits you, 
congratulate upon it. However much may 
candidate, cause contented happy own. 
elected, may maintain even positions previously 
sure whatever party time 
may precisely want. Van Buren 
and, like Van Buren, never desert 
till first desert him. 
 
Mr. Speaker, adopt suggestion friend, General Cass 
general successful sure, 
upon public enemy, upon public treasury. Governor 
Michigan territory, Superintendent Indian Affairs, 
9th October, till 31st July, period 
seventeen years, nine months, days. period 
received United States treasury, personal services 
personal expenses, aggregate sum thousand twenty 
eight dollars, average fourteen dollars 
per day every day time. large sum reached assuming 
service several different places, several 
different capacities place, time. correct 
accounts period, following propositions 
may 
 
First. paid three different capacities whole 
governor rate per year 
(2) estimated office clerk etc., 
Indian affairs Michigan, rate per year 
(3) compensation expenses various miscellaneous 
Indian service Michigan, average per year 
 
Second. part is, 9th October, 
29th May, paid four different 
say, three above, and, addition thereto, 
ten rations per day, amounting per year 
 
Third. another part is, beginning 
31st July, also paid four different 
say, first three, (the rations 
dropped 29th May, and, addition thereto, 
Indian Fort 
Chicago, Illinois, rate per year observed 
last commencing beginning item 
ending 29th May, 
much time lies two 
 
Fourth. Still another part is, 31st October, 
29th May, paid six different 
say, three first, item 
and, addition thereto, another item ten rations per day 
Washington settling rate per year 
also allowance expenses Washington, 
there, rate per year 
 
yet little portion time lies 
1st January, 29th May, paid seven 
different say, six last mentioned, also, 
rate per year, Fort Chicago 
service, mentioned above. 
 
accounts already discussed here; 
amongst them, Patent Office, must 
good deal see shall tedious 
them. large item per 
aggregate office clerk etc., barely 
wish remark that, far discover public documents, 
evidence, word inference, either 
witness General Cass himself, ever kept separate 
office, ever hired kept even used extra amount 
etc., consequence Indian Indeed, General entire 
silence regard two long letters urging 
claims upon government, is, mind, almost conclusive 
claims real existence. 
 
introduced General accounts chiefly show 
wonderful physical capacities man. show 
labor several men time, often 
several places, many hundreds miles apart, time. 
too, capacities shown quite wonderful. 
October, May, eat ten rations day Michigan, ten 
rations day Washington, near five worth day 
road two important discovery 
art paid one instead 
pay it. Hereafter nice young man owe bill 
cannot pay way, board out. Mr. Speaker, 
heard animal standing doubt two hay 
death. like would never happen General 
Place thousand miles apart, would stand 
them, eat once, green grass along 
line would apt suffer some, too, time. means 
make President, feed 
left shall helped himself. 
 
But, General Taylor is, par hero Mexican War, 
Democrats say Whigs always opposed war, think 
must awkward embarrassing us go General Taylor. 
declaration always opposed war true false, 
according one may understand term say "the 
war unnecessarily commenced 
opposing war, Whigs generally opposed it. 
Whenever spoken all, said this; said 
appeared good reason them. marching army 
midst peaceful Mexican settlement, inhabitants away, 
leaving growing property may 
appear perfectly amiable, peaceful, 
appear us. call act, us appears 
speak accordingly. if, 
war become cause country, giving 
money blood, common yours, support 
war, true always opposed war. 
individual exceptions, constantly votes 
necessary And, this, services, 
blood, lives political brethren every trial 
every field. boy mature man, humble 
them. suffering death, disease 
battle endured fought fell you. Clay 
Webster gave son, never returned. State 
besides worthy less known Whig names, sent 
Baker, fought, one fell, 
fall one lost best Whig man. Whigs 
number, day danger. 
breathless struggle man's hard task beat 
back five die himself, five high officers 
four 
 
speaking this, mean odious comparison 
Whigs Democrats fought there. occasions, 
among lower officers occasion, doubt 
proportion different. wish justice all. think 
brave men Americans, whose proud American, 
Many them, Whigs Democrats constituents 
personal thank thank all, 
high honor conferred common State. 
 
distinction cause President beginning 
war, cause country distinction 
cannot President country seem 
one. interested see distinction them; 
venture suggest probably interest little. 
see distinction, think, clearly friends 
fought war difficulty seeing also. 
fallen would say, alive here, course never 
know; returned difficulty. Colonel 
Major members here, fought war, 
extraordinary still they, like 
Whigs here, vote, record, war unnecessarily 
commenced President. even General Taylor 
himself, noblest Roman all, declared citizen, 
particularly soldier, sufficient know 
country war foreign nation, power 
bring speedy honorable vigorous 
energetic operations, without inquiry justice, anything else 
connected it. 
 
Mr. Speaker, let Democratic friends assurance 
content position, content company, 
content although they, generous 
sympathy, think ought really not, 
may dismiss great anxiety account. 
 
Mr. Speaker, see three minutes left, forces 
throw one whole branch subject. single word still another. 
Democrats keen enough frequently remind us 
ranks. good friend Baltimore immediately 
[Mr. expressed doubt day 
branch party General Taylor would ultimately fall hands 
of. new idea me. knew 
know trying get candidate away us. would like 
say word time. 
certainly none, gentlemen union 
harmony doubt 
divisions get candidate, doubt 
candidates get heard things 
New true, one might well say party 
there, fellow said heard reading 
clerk read till got 
words, "did take, carry away ten ten ten 
ten exclaimed, "Well, 
equally divided gang ever hear 
gang equally divided Democrats New York 
time, heard it. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH DELIVERED SEPT. 12, 1848. 
 
Boston 
 
Mr. introduced meeting Hon. Lincoln, Whig 
member Congress Illinois, representative free soil. 
 
Mr. Lincoln tall thin intellectual face, 
showing searching mind, cool judgment. spoke clear 
cool eloquent manner, hour half, carrying 
audience able arguments brilliant 
interrupted warm frequent applause. began expressing real 
feeling addressing audience "this side 
part country where, opinion people section, 
everybody supposed instructed devoted 
attention question coming Presidential election, 
unwilling exchange might ideas 
began show arguments 
Gen. Taylor, making chief fashionable statement 
oppose old well 
principles, Whig party abandoned principles 
adopting candidate. maintained Gen. Taylor 
occupied high Whig ground, took first 
instance proof statement 
regard bank, tariff, rivers 
people produce results, without executive 
principle people 
please, Whig principle. Gen. Taylor consent 
to, appeal people judge act themselves. 
new doctrine 
fought battles, resistance executive influence, 
principle enabling people frame government according 
will. Gen. Taylor candidate, assist 
people think duty, think best 
national affairs, don't want tell ought 
do, accused principles. Whigs maintained 
years neither influence, prohibition 
executive control expressed people; 
that, ground, Gen. Taylor says use 
power given people do, best judgment, 
people, accused want principle, inconsistency 
position. 
 
Mr. Lincoln proceeded examine absurdity attempt make 
platform national party, parts 
must consent agree, clearly intention true 
philosophy government, Congress opinions principles 
wisdom compared 
majority carried out. ground 
conceived (and audience seemed go Gen. Taylor 
held correct, sound republican principles. 
 
Mr. Lincoln passed subject slavery States, 
saying people Illinois agreed entirely people 
Massachusetts subject, except perhaps keep 
constantly thinking it. agreed slavery evil, 
responsible cannot affect States 
Union live. question extension slavery 
new territories country part responsibility 
care, control. opposition Mr. L. believed 
"Free party far behind parties 
opposed understood new party principle 
except opposition. platform held other, 
general way like pair 
offered enough man, small enough 
therefore taken position calculated break single 
important declared object. working election either 
Gen. Cass Gen. Taylor. speaker went show, clearly 
danger extension slavery, likely result 
election Gen. unite new territory 
prevent extension slavery territory seemed 
highest degree absurd Suppose gentlemen 
succeed electing Mr. Van Buren, specific means prevent 
extension slavery New Mexico California, Gen. Taylor, 
confidently believed, would encourage it, would prohibit 
Gen. Cass elected, felt certain plans 
farther extension territory would 
extension slavery would meet "Free claiming 
name indirectly attempts Whigs 
Free Soil men. Declaring would "do duty leave 
consequences merely gave excuse taking course 
able maintain fair full argument. make declaration 
show duty was. use 
judgment, might well made without divine 
human law clearly point duty, means 
finding using intelligent judgment 
consequences. divine law human law voting Martin 
Van Buren, fair examination consequences reasoning 
would show voting would bring ends pretended 
would give argument. since fixed 
law subject, since whole probable result action 
would assistance electing Gen. Cass, must say 
behind Whigs freedom soil. 
 
Mr. Lincoln proceeded rally convention 
say previous declarations members 
formerly subject Mexican War, Van 
known supported it. declared 
parties asking confidence country, new one less 
principle other. 
 
wondered whether still opinion Free Soil gentlemen, 
declared Whig Democratic 
parties entirely absorbed body. 
Vermont election given calculated making 
great impression State part Union, 
attempts wholly failure 
greater success would find part Union. 
 
Mr. Lincoln went say honestly believed 
wished keep character Union; believe 
enlarging field, keeping 
present making improving 
education people, 
purpose; real Whigs, friends good honest race 
ours. opportunities hearing almost every part Union 
reliable sources heard county 
received parties. true Whigs come forward 
join new friends, need doubt. candidate 
whose personal character principles already 
could would. Gen. Taylor 
quietly standing up, duty asking praise 
reward it. must man interests, 
principles, prosperity country might safely 
never failed anything although many 
duties considered almost impossible. 
 
Mr. Lincoln went though rapid review origin 
Mexican War connection administration General 
Taylor it, deduced strong appeal Whigs present 
duty support General Taylor, closed 
confidence success. 
 
close truly convincing speech, audience 
gave three enthusiastic cheers Illinois, three 
eloquent Whig member State. 
 
 
 
 
FATHER'S REQUEST MONEY 
 
THOMAS LINCOLN 
 
WASHINGTON, Dec. 24, 1848. 
 
DEAR letter 7th received night last. 
cheerfully send twenty dollars, sum say 
necessary save land singular 
forgotten judgment you; singular 
plaintiff let forget particularly suppose 
always property enough satisfy judgment 
pay it, would well sure paid, 
least, cannot prove paid it. 
 
Give love mother Affectionately son, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1849 
 
BILL ABOLISH SLAVERY DISTRICT COLUMBIA 
 
Resolved, Committee District Columbia instructed 
report bill substance follows: 
 
Sec. 1. enacted Senate House Representatives 
United States, Congress assembled, person within 
District Columbia, owned person persons resident 
within it, hereafter born within it, shall ever held slavery 
within said District. 
 
Sec. 2. person within said District, owned 
person persons resident within same, hereafter born within 
it, shall ever held slavery without limits said 
Provided, officers Government United States, 
citizens slaveholding States, coming said District public 
business, remaining long may reasonably necessary 
object, may attended said District, 
there, necessary servants families, without 
right hold servants service thereby 
 
Sec. 3. children born slave mothers within said District, 
first day January, year Lord eighteen 
hundred shall free; shall reasonably supported 
educated respective owners 
representatives, shall owe reasonable service 
owners, representatives, respectively arrive 
age years, shall entirely free; municipal 
authorities Washington within respective 
limits, hereby empowered required make 
suitable necessary provision enforcing obedience section, 
part masters 
 
Sec. 4. persons within District, lawfully held 
slaves, owned person persons resident within said 
District, shall remain respective owners, 
legal representatives: Provided, owner, legal 
representative, may time receive Treasury United 
States full value slave, class section 
mentioned, upon slave shall forthwith forever 
provided further, President United States, Secretary 
State, Secretary Treasury shall board 
determining value slaves owners may desire 
emancipate section, whose duty shall hold 
session purpose first Monday month, 
receive and, satisfactory evidence case 
person presented slave, class 
section mentioned, owned shall value slave 
full cash value, give applicant order 
Treasury also slave certificate freedom. 
 
Sec. 5. municipal authorities Washington 
within respective limits, hereby empowered 
required provide active efficient means arrest deliver 
owners fugitive slaves escaping said District. 
 
Sec. 6. election officers within said District Columbia 
hereby empowered required open usual places 
holding elections, first Monday April next, receive vote 
every free white male citizen age twenty-one years, 
resided within said District period one year next 
preceding time voting act, proceed 
taking said votes, respects herein elections 
municipal laws, little delay possible transmit 
correct statements votes cast President United 
States; shall duty President canvass said votes 
immediately, majority found act, 
forthwith issue proclamation giving notice 
act shall full force effect day 
proclamation. 
 
Sec. involuntary punishment crime, whereof 
party shall duly shall wise prohibited 
act. 
 
Sec. purposes act, limits 
Washington extended parts District Columbia 
included within present limits 
 
 
 
 
BILL GRANTING LANDS STATES MAKE 
 
REMARKS HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES, FEBRUARY 13, 1849. 
 
Mr. Lincoln said risen purpose making speech, 
purpose meeting objections bill. 
understood first bill become 
law, would used lock large portions public lands 
without last effecting object 
construction railroads new States; secondly, Congress 
would forced large portions public lands 
States might without paying 
them. understood substance objections 
gentleman Ohio passage bill. 
 
could get attention House minutes, would ask 
gentlemen tell us motive could induce State Legislature, 
individual, company individuals, new States, money 
surveying roads might know could make. 
 
(A voice: required make 
 
Mr. Lincoln continued: case motive 
would set men go extensive survey railroad 
intend good would do? men act 
without business men commonly go expenditure money 
could account them? generally found men 
money disposed hold it, unless could see something 
made could see motive advantage 
new States could merely keeping public lands 
preventing settlement. far could see, 
new States wholly without motive thing. This, then, 
took good answer first objection. 
 
relation fact assumed, while, new States 
got hold public lands certain extent, would turn round 
compel Congress relinquish claim them, word say, 
way history past. time come 
States public lands situated would 
compose majority representation Congress, anything like 
it? majority Representatives would soon reside west 
mountains, would come States 
public lands certainly would not; for, 
Western States grew strong Congress, public lands passed away 
them, got side question; gentleman 
Ohio [Mr. example fact. 
 
Mr. interrupted say stood question 
now, five twenty years. 
 
Mr. Lincoln making argument purpose 
gentleman impropriety all. speaking fact history, 
State example. referring plain principle 
nature things. State Ohio grown 
large delegation favor 
granting lands new States, used be? New England 
States, New York, Old Thirteen rather quiet upon 
subject; seen member one new States 
first man rise opposition. would 
history question future. never would come time 
people residing States embracing public lands would 
entire control subject; matter 
certainty Congress would never respect 
would dictated therefore, 
public lands danger General 
Government strength delegation Congress new 
States, utterly never could thing. take 
lands without consent. never 
you. result fear new States turning 
right Congress public domain must effectually 
opposed interest must always hold vast 
majority here, never surrender whole part 
public lands unless choose so. 
desired say. 
 
 
 
 
FEDERAL POLITICAL APPOINTMENTS 
 
SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 9, 1849. 
 
HON. SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
DEAR SIR: Colonel R. D. Baker Whig members 
Congress Illinois 
reason think Whigs State hold us responsible, 
extent, appointments may made citizens. 
know personally, efforts far 
therefore hope saying way, 
myself, citizen Illinois appointed 
department, office either State, 
respectfully ask heard. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POLITICAL PATRONAGE REQUESTS 
 
SECRETARY STATE. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 10, 1849. 
 
HON. SECRETARY STATE. 
 
several office United States 
Marshal District Illinois. Among prominent 
Benjamin Esq., Thomas, Esq., Mr. Bond 
know personally every way worthy office; 
papers send you; 
claims full fair consideration. 
 
said much, add individual judgment 
appointment Mr. Thomas would better. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Mr. 
 
accompanying envelope recommendations 
two hundred good citizens parts Illinois, Benjamin Bond 
appointed marshal district. include names nearly 
Whigs are, ever been, members State 
Legislature, besides Democratic members present 
Legislature, many good citizens. add personal 
knowledge consider Mr. Bond every way worthy office, 
qualified fill it. Holding individual opinion appointment 
different gentleman would better, ask especial attention 
consideration opinions expressed favor 
claim 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, April 7, 1849 
 
HON. SECRETARY HOME DEPARTMENT. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I recommend Walter Davis appointed 
land-office place, whenever shall cannot 
say Mr. Herndon, present failed proper 
discharge duties office. warm 
openly actively opposed election General Taylor. 
also understand since General Taylor's election received 
Mr. old commission 
Whether true records department show. may add 
Whigs almost universally desire 
 
give opinion own, state facts, express hope 
department act cases proper 
general 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. land district office belongs nearly 
entirely within district; Colonel Baker, Whig 
representative, claims voice A. L. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, April 7, 1849. 
 
HON. SECRETARY HOME DEPARTMENT. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I recommend Turner R. King, Illinois, 
appointed register land-office place whenever shall 

 
know Mr. present failed 
proper discharge duties office. decided 
openly actively opposed election General Taylor. 
understand, too, since election General Taylor, Mr. 
received Mr. old commission 
Whether true, records department show. 
 
Whether removed give opinion, merely express 
wish department may act upon proper general rule, 
Mr. case may made exception it. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. land district office belongs nearly 
entirely within district; Colonel Baker, Whig 
representative, claims voice A. L. 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, April 
 
HON. POSTMASTER-GENERAL. 
 
DEAR Sir:--I recommend Y. appointed postmaster 
place, whenever shall J. R. present 
cannot say failed proper discharge 
duties office. He, however, active partisan 
opposition us. 
 
Located seat government State, been, part 
whole time held office, member 
Democratic State Central Committee, signing name addresses 
been, understand, Mr. Polk 
since General Taylor's election. facts case 
understand them, give opinion mine whether 
removed. wish department may adopt 
proper general rule cases, Mr. may made 
exception it, one way other. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. office, entirely within district; 
Colonel Baker, Whig representative, claims voice 

 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, April 7, 1849. 
 
HON. SECRETARY HOME DEPARTMENT. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I recommend William Butler appointed pension agent 
Illinois place shall Mr. 
present believe performed duties well. 
decided believe expects removed. Whether shall, 
submit department. office confined district, 
pertains whole State; Colonel Baker equal right 
heard concerning it. However, office located here; 
think probable one would desire remove 
distance take it. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, April 25, 1849. 
 
DEAR still kept recommending 
T. R. morning openly avowed supposed influence 
Washington shall broken generally, King's prospects defeated 
particular. Now, done matter done 
request friends therefore ask 
either admit wrong come forward sustain me. truth 
propose sustain following copy 
inclosed scrap handwriting get everybody (not three 
four, three four sign it, send me. Also, 
six, eight ten best known Whig friends write 
individual letters, stating truth matter understand 
it. Don't neglect delay matter. understand information 
found three years ago, 
keeping house, sent department. shall try 
take care department till action 
forwarded on. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
SPRINGFIELD ILLINOIS. May 10, 1849. 
 
HON. SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I regret often relation 
here, hope perceive necessity it, excuse me. 
7th April wrote recommending Turner R. King register, 
Walter Davis Subsequently wrote that, private 
reason, concluded them. private reason 
request old personal friend desired 
felt duty refuse said would 
King Davis would satisfied. thought but, 
anxious oblige him, Immediately commenced assault 
upon King's character, suppose, defeat appointment, 
thereby secure another chance himself. double offence bad 
faith upon good man totally outrageous 
ask King Davis placed originally 
is, King register Davis 
 
effort made Mr. present register, 
already said done duties office well, 
add gentleman true sense. Still, 
instrument party injure us. high character enables 
Last year convention 
nominated Democratic candidate Congress district, 
afterward ran State Senate himself, desiring seat, 
avowedly aid strengthen party. made speech speech 
degree General Taylor quite 
consistent habitually least one (and 
think trying retained 
applicant office, and, failing get recommendation, 
takes turn. 
 
writing third time relation offices, stated 
supposed charges forwarded King, would 
inquire truth them. send herewith suppose 
ample defense ask attention 
papers, particularly letters Mr. David 
paper long list mistake King's 
good man. unjust assault upon him, considering 
claims Tazewell County, indicated letters you, 
would opinion withal appoint 
him, least soon one appointed either offices 
here. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., May 19, 1849. 
 
DEAR 
 
commissioner Land Office, unless 
prevented strong speedy him, 
appointed yet Old 
 
reliable information this. Now, agree 
appointment would rather Whigs 
State, would energies future 
appointment old patiently 
word appointment would fatal 
administration political men Illinois, 
write effect. control matter. 
write fear President would never hear letter. may 
mere suspicion. might write directly Old 
best judge propriety that. moment's time lost. 
 
Let confidential except Mr. Edwards others 
know would trust you. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST GENERAL LAND-OFFICE 
 
E. 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, May 25, 1849. 
 
HON. E. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I ask favor you, one hope 
cost much. understand General Land-Office given 
Illinois, Mr. desires Chicago, 
man. give word, appointment Mr. 
political give offence whole Whig 
party here, worse dead loss administration much 
Now, conscientiously so, wish 
write General Taylor once, saying either man recommend 
opinion appointed office, one 
Illinois shall be. restrict request Illinois may 
man State, ask interfere that. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST PATENT 
 
IMPROVED METHOD VESSELS 
 
Application 
 
claim desire secure letters 
combination placed sides 
vessel main means 
pass made fast 
series manner 
turning main one direction 
forced water, time 
expanded filled air vessel displacement 
water, turning opposite direction 
contracted small space secured 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., June 3, 1849 
 
HON. SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
DEAR office place subject 
district; much 
express preference Dr. Mr. one man 
better qualified office others, Dr. 
man; still, believe large majority Whigs district prefer 
Mr. also good man. Perhaps papers file enable 
judge better can. within good men, 
residing within land district. 
 
servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. H. HERNDON. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 5, 1849. 
 
DEAR two letters received last night. great 
many letters write, cannot write long ones. must 
mistake Walter Davis saying promised 
promise him. tell distribution 
offices fall hands, 
shall convinced said this, shall 
disappointed. said much because, understand, 
good character, one young men, mechanics, always 
faithful never Whig, poor, support 
widow mother thrown almost exclusively death brother. 
wrong reasons, wrong; certainly 
selfish it, greatest need friends 
me, 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. S. Let confidential. 
 
 
 
 
J. GILLESPIE. 
 
DEAR 
 
Mr. Edwards unquestionably offended connection 
matter General wrote letter 
filed department. 
 
better part one's life consists and, them, 
mine Mr. Edwards one 
false it. word could office time 
department committed Mr. least Mr. 
President say much. word speak, partly 
reasons, chiefly Mr. sake, losing office 
might gain it) always lose effort 
him, would much, sustained utmost 
consciousness first determined 
upon informed 
telegraphic despatch question narrowed Mr. B 
myself, Cabinet postponed appointment three 
doubting Mr. Edwards wholly 
question I, nevertheless, would become applicant 
supposed would thereby brought suspect him. 
Two three days afterwards conversation Davis convinced 
Mr. Edwards far get out. 
letter, written 25th April, fully informed 
passed, within days time, gave 
assurance entire confidence felt uniform 
strong friendship entitled to. Among things says, 
course judgment may dictate proper pursued, shall 
never excepted me." also letter Washington, 
saying Republic, brought rumor then, Mr. 
declined favor, rumor judged came Mr. himself, 
breathed letter living saying 
June, determined 
mean admit that, then, said 
substantially would take office rather lost 
State, given one State Whigs 
aver every instance spoke myself, intended 
believe Mr. myself. Mr. first 
suspicion allowed Baker me, friend, 
behalf knew result 
proved it. understand view is, gone open war 
Baker could down, thing way. 
believe thing. Baker strong man Military 
tract & elsewhere strong man 
& elsewhere Mr. possible either succeed. 
believed March, know now. thing gave 
either chance thing Baker & adjustment 
themselves. 
 
may wish know finally beat me. tell 
particulars now, see you. meantime let 
understood greatly wish offer 
encourage friends future regret 
exceedingly Mr. feelings towards me. two things away, 
least think would not. 
 
Write soon. 
 
friend, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESOLUTIONS SYMPATHY CAUSE FREEDOM, 
 
SEPTEMBER 1849. 
 
meeting express sympathy cause freedom, Dr. 
Todd, Lewis, Hon. A. Lincoln, Wm. appointed 
committee present appropriate resolutions, reported Hon. 
A. Lincoln following: 
 
Resolved, That, present glorious struggle liberty, 
command highest admiration 
 
Resolved, ardent prayers speedy triumph 
final success. 
 
Resolved, Government United States acknowledge 
independence nation freemen earliest moment 
consistent amicable relations government 

 
Resolved, That, opinion meeting, immediate 
acknowledgment independence government due 
American freemen struggling general cause 
republican liberty, rights nation 
people. 
 
 
 
 
Dr. WILLIAM 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Sept. 14, 1849. 
 
Dr. WILLIAM Ill. 
 
DEAR letter 9th received day two ago. 
notes enclosed duly received. also got 
original Campbell, 
left you. got decree but, owing 
redemption sale 
court allowed till first March pay money, 
empowered appear him, 
take decree would consent to, none all. 
cast matter mind concluded could get 
decree would put interest interest, thereby 
match fact throwing debt back twelve six 
per better it. present state case. 
 
well enough understand appreciate suggestions 
Land-Office present condition, nothing. 
 
Yours, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Dec. 15, 1849. 
 
------ ESQ. 
 
DEAR return Kentucky found letter 7th 
November, delayed answering till reason 
briefly state. beginning acquaintance felt 
greatest kindness supposed reciprocated 
part. Last summer, circumstances mentioned you, 
painfully constrained withhold recommendation desired, 
shortly afterwards way believe it, 
open abuse me. course feelings 
receiving last letter question occurred whether 
attempting use time would injure me, whether 
might me. former, ought 
answer you; latter, remained 
enclose letter, may use see fit. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1850 
 
 
 
 
RESOLUTIONS DEATH JUDGE NATHANIEL POPE. 
 
Circuit District Court U. S. State District 
Illinois. Monday, June 3, 1850. 
 
opening Court morning, Hon. A. Lincoln, member 
Bar Court, suggested death Hon. Nathaniel 
Pope, late judge Court, since adjournment last 
respect memory 
ordered Court to-morrow morning ten 
o'clock. 
 
Hon. Stephen T. Logan, Hon. H. Hon. David L. 
Hon. A. Lincoln, George W. Esq., appointed 
Committee prepare resolutions. 
 
Hon. Stephen T. Logan, behalf Committee, 
presented following preamble 
 
Whereas Hon. Nathaniel Pope, District Judge United States Court 
District Illinois, departed life 
last said Court, members Bar said Court, 
entertaining highest memory, profound respect 
ability, great experience, learning judge, 
many public private, earnest simplicity character 
public private relations, 
lively affectionate 
 
Resolved, That, manifestation deep sense loss 
sustained death, wear usual 
term. 
 
Resolved, Chairman communicate family deceased 
copy proceedings, assurance sincere 
account heavy 
 
Resolved, Hon. A. Williams, District Attorney Court, 
requested behalf meeting present proceedings 
Circuit Court, respectfully ask may entered 

 
E. N. SAMUEL H. 
 
 
 
 
NOTES LAW LECTURE 
 

 
JULY 1, 1850 
 
DISCOURAGE Persuade neighbors compromise whenever 
can. Point nominal often real 
fees, expenses, waste time. lawyer 
superior opportunity good man. still business 
enough. 
 
Never stir worse man scarcely found one 
this. nearly habitually 
register deeds search 
stir strife, put money moral tone ought 
profession drive men it. 
 
matter fees important, far beyond mere question bread 
Properly attended to, fuller justice done 
lawyer fee never general 
rule never take whole fee advance, small 
fully paid common mortal 
feel interest case something still 
prospect you, well lack interest 
case job likely lack skill 
Settle amount fee take note advance. 
feel working something, sure 
work faithfully well. Never sell fee least 
consideration service performed. leads 
losing interest case, 
refusing refund allowed consideration fail. 
 
idea refund reduction charges lawyer failed 
case new one bad one. 
 
 
 
 
1851 
 
 
 
 
LETTERS FAMILY MEMBERS 
 
 
 
 
JOHN D. JOHNSTON. 
 
January 2, 1851 
 
DEAR request eighty dollars think best 
comply now. various times helped little 
said me, "We get along well short 
time find difficulty again. Now, happen 
defect defect is, think know. 
still doubt whether, since saw you, 
done good whole day's work one day. much 
dislike work, still work much merely 
seem could get much it. habit 
time whole difficulty; vastly important you, 
still children, break 
important them, longer live, keep 
idle habit it, easier get 
in. 
 
need propose is, shall 
go work, somebody give money it. 
Let father boys take charge things home, prepare 
make go work best money 
discharge debt and, secure 
fair reward labor, promise you, every dollar 
will, first May, get labor, either 
money give one 
this, hire ten dollars month, get 
ten more, making twenty dollars month work. 
mean shall go St. Louis, lead mines, gold mines 
California, mean go best wages 
get close home Coles County. Now, this, 
soon debt, and, better, habit 
keep getting debt again. But, clear 
debt, next year would deep ever. say would 
almost give place heaven seventy eighty dollars. 
value place heaven cheap, sure can, 
offer make, get seventy eighty dollars four five months' 
work. say furnish money deed 
land, and, don't pay money back, deliver possession. 
can't live land, live 
without it? always kind me, mean 
unkind you. contrary, follow advice, 
find worth eighty times eighty dollars you. 
 
Affectionately brother, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
C. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Jan. 11, 
 
 
C. ESQ. 
 
DEAR case decided us. decision announced 
morning. history case 
since came this. Friday morning last, Mr. Joy filed 
papers, entered motion urged take 
motion soon possible. already points authority sent 
Mr. studied them. began preparing 
fast possible. 
 
evening day urged take case. 
refused ground ready, plea also 
got Saturday. Monday (the go it. 
occupied whole day, using large part. made every point 
used every authority sent Mr. 
addition points could think authorities could 
find myself. closed argument part, large 
handed me, proved sent me. 
 
court received me, different 
already record. think could ever argued case 
better did. nothing else, prepare argue argue 
case, Friday morning till Monday evening. sorry 
think could 
 
friend, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN D. JOHNSTON. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, January 12, 1851 
 
DEAR day yesterday received letter 
written says returned 
house, father low hardly also says 
written two letters, that, although expect 
come now, wonder write. 
 
received letters, although answered 
forgotten them, them, 
appeared could write nothing would 
good. already know desire neither father mother shall 
want either health 
feel sure failed use name, necessary, procure 
anything else father present business 
could hardly leave home now, is, 
wife sick case suppose 
sincerely hope father may health, 
events, tell remember call upon great 
good turn away 
notes fall numbers 
forget dying man puts trust Him. Say 
could meet doubtful whether would painful 
lot go now, soon 
joyous meeting many loved ones gone before, rest us, 
help God, hope ere long join them. 
 
Write receive this. 
 

 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PETITION BEHALF ONE JOSHUA 
 
JUDGE SANGAMON COUNTY COURT, 
 
MAY 13, 
 
JUDGE COUNTY COURT 
 
COUNTY SANGAMON STATE 
 
Joshua respectfully represents 
21st day December, 1850, judgment rendered 
Petitioner J. C. one Peace 
said County Sangamon, suit wherein Petitioner 
plaintiff James L. C. B. said 
judgment result part 
said judgment, opinion, unjust erroneous this, 
time indebted Petitioner 
full amount principal interest note on, 
principal being, thirty-one dollars 
eighty two that, informed 
succeeded trial said cause proving old claims 
said note, claims 
settled, adjusted paid said note executed. 
Petitioner states reasons present 
said trial, not, power take 
appeal ordinary way, not, Petitioner 
resided Edgar County one hundred twenty miles 
short time suit commenced 
Petitioner Sangamon County purpose collecting debts 
due him, rest, note question, note 
given year, Petitioner saw J. 
L. principal said note, payment 
same; said made pretense owe 
same, contrary expressly promised would come 
Springfield, days either pay money, give new 
note, payable next Petitioner accordingly 
left said note said J. C. directions give 
full time pay money give new note above, 
neither came home Edgar County, 
slightest suspicion suit would 
make defense Petitioner never way learn 
said suit commenced twenty days 
decided him. therefore writ 
 
   
 JOSHUA x 
   MARK 
 
 
 
 
J. D. JOHNSTON. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 31, 1851 
 
DEAR Inclosed deed land. well, 
nothing way news. two 
weeks. 
 
Give love all, especially Mother. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. D. JOHNSTON. 
 
Nov. 4, 1851 
 
DEAR 
 
came Charleston day yesterday learned 
anxious sell land live, move Missouri. 
thinking ever since, cannot think notion utterly 
Missouri better here? land 
there, here, raise corn without 
work? anybody there, here, work you? 
intend go work, better place right 
are; intend go work cannot get along anywhere. 
place place good. 
raised crop year, really want sell land, 
get money spend it. Part land have, and, life upon 
it, never spot big enough bury in. Half 
get land spend moving Missouri, half 
eat drink wear out, foot land 
feel duty hand piece 
feel even account, particularly Mother's 
account. eastern forty acres intend keep Mother 
cultivate it, rent enough support 
least rent something. two 
let have, thanks me. 
 
misunderstand letter. write 
write order, possible, get face truth, 
truth is, away time. 
thousand getting along better 
deceive nobody yourself. Go work cure 
case. 
 
word Chapman tells wants go live him. 
would try get tired (as think 
return home. Chapman feels kindly 
you; doubt make situation 
 
Sincerely yours, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Nov. 4, 1851 
 
DEAR 
 
Chapman tells wants go live him. 
would try get tired (as think 
return home. Chapman feels kindly you; 
doubt make situation 
 
Sincerely son, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN D. JOHNSTON. 
 
November 9, 1851 
 
DEAR wrote before, received letter. 
still think did, land sold get three 
hundred dollars put interest Mother, object, 
not. make deed, money must had, secured 
beyond doubt, ten per cent. 
 
want him, understand 
wants live me, go school get fair start 
world, much wish have. reach home, 
make convenient take, take him, provided mistake 
us object terms taking him. haste, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN D. JOHNSTON. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November 25, 
 
DEAR letter 22d received. proposal 
selling east forty acres land want could 
claim myself; satisfied Mother's 
want living, feel duty, 
extent, see right is, 
use one-third two but, seems, 
already let take that, hook line. use 
whole east long 
course entitled interest money long 
propose sell three hundred dollars, take 
one hundred away you, leave two hundred 8 per 
making enormous sum dollars year. Now, 
satisfied treating way, not. true 
forty two hundred dollars, Mother's death, 
before. confident land made produce 
Mother least year, not, oblige living person, 
consent shall put allowance sixteen dollars year. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1852 
 
 
 
 
EULOGY HENRY CLAY, 
 
DELIVERED STATE HOUSE SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, JULY 16, 
 
fourth day July, people feeble oppressed 
colonies Great Britain, portion Atlantic coast 
North America, publicly declared national independence, made 
appeal justice cause God battles 
maintenance declaration. people number 
without resources, save wise heads stout Within 
first year declared independence, maintenance 
yet bloody struggle resolute rebels 
masters still 
parents obscure district one colonies Henry Clay 
born. infant nation infant child began race life 
together. three quarters century hand 
hand. ever. nation passed perils, 
free, child reached 
middle age, old age, dead. 
concerned nation man ever nation 
man. 
 
day death one public opposed 
politically, held following beautiful language, 
adopt partly high exclusive 
political friend, might good chiefly could 
language well express 
 
realize Henry Clay realize never 
form shall rise country 
beat back anarchy may pour 
peace upon troubled rage menace 
realize mighty mind ceased, 
gallant heart mighty sweep 
arm felt more, magic eloquent 
tongue, tongue besides, hushed hushed 
realize freedom's champion civilized 
world tongues people, indeed Alas, 
dark hours peril dread land 
may called experience again, may people 
look counsel advice wisdom experience 
patriotism give, confidence nation 
whole circle great 
land remains one whose shoulders mighty 
departed statesman may one write doubtless 
tears brother friend brother, friend, 
ever, yet political sentiment far apart party could make them. 
Ah, times like mere party 
see great, noble features 
departed even beg permission bow 
feet mingle tears ever political 
beg claim right, though 
feel Henry Clay belonged 
world; mere party cannot claim men like him. career national, 
fame filled earth, memory endure last 
recorded time. 
 
Clay breathed last yesterday, twenty minutes 
chamber Washington. followed lead 
public affairs, belongs pronounce eulogy 
pay specific honors memory dead. 
Americans may show grief death character 
fame national property. question liberty knew 
North, South, East, West, Union held 
sacred countrymen know grief 
career Henry Clay 
public career. youth devoted public 
service, period, too, world's history justly regarded 
remarkable era human affairs. witnessed beginning 
French Revolution. saw rise fall 
called upon legislate America direct policy Europe 
battlefield contending struggle 
supremacy rights neutral nations. voice spoke 
war peace contest Great 
 
"When rose struck liberty, name 
mingled freedom. South America threw 
Spain, speeches read head armies 
name been, continue be, two 

 
     few, immortal names 
      born 
 
"To ardent patriot profound statesman added quality possessed 
earth. eloquence 
effective power move heart man, Clay without equal, 
spirit 
exhibited least three 
important occasions civil power 
influence belonged statesman age times. 
last internal Union trembled 
old age left private life, gave 
fraternal strife, vigor earlier years, series 
senatorial efforts would bring 
comparison efforts statesman age. 
demon possessed body gave peace 
distracted land. cost life. sank day 
day pale noble bound put 
grateful country. May rest peace, spirit 
goes take station among great good men him." 
 
customary proper upon occasions like present give 
brief sketch life case Mr. Clay 
less necessary others; written 
read last twenty-five years; that, 
exception latest incidents life, 
well known be. short sketch give is, therefore, 
merely maintain connection discourse. 
 
Henry Clay born twelfth day April, Hanover County, 
Virginia. father, died fourth fifth year 
age, little seems known, except respectable man 
Mr. Clay's education end 
life comparatively say "to end 
understood time time added something education 
greater part whole life. Mr. Clay's lack 
perfect early education, however may generally, teaches 
least one profitable teaches country one 
scarcely poor that, will, acquire sufficient 
education get world 
year Mr. Clay licensed law, Lexington, 
Kentucky. commenced continued practice till year 
first elected Kentucky Legislature. successive 
elections continued Legislature till latter part 
elected fill vacancy single session 
United States Senate. elected Kentucky House 
Representatives, body chosen 
body. chosen fill vacancy 
two years United States Senate. elected 
United States House Representatives, first day taking 
seat body chosen elected 
Early period last British war, Mr. Clay 
sent others, treaty peace, 
treaty concluded latter part year. 
return Europe elected lower branch Congress, 
taking seat December, called old 
chair, position retained successive 
elections, one brief till inauguration John 
Quincy Adams, March, appointed Secretary State, 
occupied important station till inauguration General 
Jackson, March, returned Kentucky, resumed 
practice law, continued till autumn 
Legislature Kentucky placed United States Senate. 
continued Senate till resigned seat 
March, 1848. December, 1849, took seat 
Senate, resigned months death. 
 
foregoing perceived period beginning Mr. 
Clay's official life end 1852 one year short 
half century, sum 
amount ten years. mere duration time office constitutes 
smallest part Mr. Clay's history. Throughout long period 
constantly loved followed friends, 
dreaded living American 
great questions agitated country, particularly 
fearful Missouri question, 
question, late slavery question, connected newly 
acquired territory, involving endangering Union, 
leading conspicuous part. first 
candidate Presidency, and, although 
defeated office 1832 
never moment since till 1848 large portion 
American people cling enthusiastic hope 
purpose still Presidency. men, 
defeated defeat 
neither changing world's estimate him. Even 
political parties preferred highest 
office run far he, left still shining 
high political world. Jackson, Van Buren, 
Taylor rose after, set long him. 
souls men bound 
it? probably true owed 
one fortunate combination 
many eloquent men fail 
not, class, generally successful. judgment 
many men good judgment live die 
quality often secures owner nothing better 
character useless These, then, Mr. Clay's 
leading one together 
rarely combined single individual, probably reason 
men Henry Clay rare world. 
 
Mr. Clay's eloquence many fine specimens eloquence 
do, elegant arrangement words 
rather deeply earnest tone 
manner proceed great thorough 
conviction speaker justice importance cause. 
truly chords heard 
Mr. Clay never failed moved it, ever afterward forgot 
impression. efforts made practical effect. never spoke 
merely heard. never delivered Fourth July 
eulogy occasion like this. politician statesman, one 
habitually careful avoid sectional ground. Whatever 
whole country. construction measures, 
ever carefully surveyed every part field, duly weighed every 
conflicting interest. Feeling did, truth surely is, 
world's best hope depended continued union States, 
ever jealous whatever might slightest 
tendency separate them. 
 
Mr. Clay's sentiment, first last, deep devotion 
cause human strong sympathy oppressed 
everywhere, ardent wish 
primary conduct 
whole life. loved country partly 
country, mostly free country; burned 
zeal prosperity, saw 
prosperity, glory human liberty, human right, 
human nature. desired prosperity countrymen, partly 
countrymen, chiefly show world free men 
could 
 
views measures always wisest needs 
occasion, many thinking 
differently join honor memory. free people times 
peace quiet pressed common divide 
parties. times man neither party not, cannot be, 
consequence. Mr. Clay therefore party. Taking prominent 
part, did, great political questions country 
last half century, wisdom course many doubted 
denied large portion 
proper speak many others, course 
upon little amongst intelligent 
patriotic Americans. last War Missouri 
question, recent compromise measures. 
Mr. Clay, though still young man. Whether 
go war Great Britain question day, minority 
opposed declaration war Congress, majority, though 
apparently inclined war, years hesitated act 
Meanwhile British grew daring 
Mr. Clay man struggle 
brought decision Congress. question, fully 
Congress, came variety ways rapid succession, 
occasions Mr. Clay spoke. Adding logic 
subject noble inspiration came 
came other, aroused inspired friends, 
bore opposition. Several speeches 
occasions reported still best 
never was. delivery reporters forgot 
dropped sat near beginning quite 
close. speech lives memory old men, 
enthusiasm cherish recollection absolutely 
precise language speech shall never know; 
know cannot help deep 
cause injured genius Revolution, 
names Henry, Washington, 
appealed interests, pride, honor, glory 
nation, friends, 
domestic 
bearded British lion, and, rising swelling 
course, sounded till charge, 
steady struggle, glorious victory passed vivid review 

 
Important exciting war question never 
alarmed statesmen country safety 
Republic afterward Missouri question. sprang 
unfortunate source slavery. Federal 
Constitution adopted, owned territory beyond limits 
States, except territory northwest River Ohio 
east Mississippi. since formed States 
Maine, Kentucky Tennessee, was, believe, within limits 
owned Massachusetts, Virginia, North Carolina. 
Northwestern Territory, provision made even adoption 
Constitution slavery never go there. admission 
States Union, carved territory owned 
Constitution, question, considerable question, arose 
within limits owned old 
States following respectively condition State, 
within Northwest Territory following previously made 
purchased Louisiana French, included 
much since formed State Missouri. 
regard it, nothing done question slavery. 
When, therefore, 1819, Missouri, formed State constitution 
without excluding slavery, slavery already actually existing 
within limits, knocked door Union admission, almost 
entire representation States 
fearful angry struggle instantly followed. alarmed thinking 
men previous question, because, unlike former, 
divided country geographical lines. questions 
opposing localities country almost every 
family, division Union could follow without 
separation friends quite great extent 
Missouri question. geographical line could 
main would separate opponents only. 
danger. Mr. Jefferson, 
 
"I long time ceased read newspapers pay attention 
public affairs, confident good hands content 

momentous question, like night, awakened filled 
considered Union. 
indeed, moment. only, final 
geographical line marked principle, moral 
political, conceived held angry passions men, 
never every irritation mark deeper 
say conscious truth man earth 
would sacrifice would relieve us heavy 
practicable way. 
 
"The cession kind 
would cost second thought way 
general emancipation could gradually 
due sacrifices think might be. is, wolf 
neither hold safely let go. Justice 
one 
 
Mr. Clay Congress, and, danger, engaged 
whole energies avert it. began, said, 
terminate till Missouri would yield Congress 
is, majority repeated votes showed determination 
admit State unless several 
great labor part Mr. Clay present question 
majority could consent admission, vote and, 
seemed think, hung nation. 
felt Missouri equivalent dissolution 
Union, States already Missouri rejected 
refusing relinquish would go Missouri. deprecated 
this, none saw avert it. judgment members 
convinced necessity yielding whole difficulty; 
meet answer to. Mr. Clay, though worn 
appealed members renew efforts 
compromise. so, judicious modifications plan, 
coupled efforts individual members 
eloquence upon floor, finally secured admission 
State. previously shown, 
perceived great eloquence mere 
helping hand genius devotion 
country day extreme 
 
settlement Missouri question, although portion 
American people differed Mr. Clay, majority even 
appear generally opposed questions ordinary 
administration, seems constantly regarded 
man crisis. Accordingly, days 
recently slavery question connected 
territory newly acquired Mexico, task mode 
adjustment seems cast upon Mr. Clay common 
performance task case little else 
public 
 
Mr. Clay's efforts behalf South Americans, afterward 
behalf times respective struggles civil 
liberty, among finest record, upon noblest 
bear ample said ruling 
love liberty right, 
 
led allude domestic slavery frequently 
unwilling close without referring particularly Mr. Clay's 
views conduct regard it. ever principle feeling 
opposed slavery. one public 
efforts life, separated period fifty years, 
made favor gradual emancipation. perceive 
question human right negroes excepted human 
race. yet Mr. Clay owner slaves. Cast life 
slavery already widely spread deeply seated, perceive, 
think wise man could 
without producing greater evil even cause human liberty 
itself. feeling judgment, therefore, ever led oppose 
opinion subject. would 
Union States, tear 
Constitution, even burn last copy Bible, rather 
slavery continue single hour, together 
received, 
name opinions influence Mr. Clay fully 
and, trust, effectually arrayed them. 
would also, could, name, opinions, influence 
opposite increasing number men who, 
sake slavery, beginning assail 
ridicule white man's charter freedom, declaration "all men 
created free equal." far first American 
note attempt late John C. 
mistake not, soon found way messages 
Governor South Carolina. We, however, look much 
political South Carolina. 
last year saw astonishment letter 
distinguished influential Virginia, apparent 
St. Louis newspaper, containing following 
unsatisfactory language: 
 
"I fully aware text mine. 
Professional abolitionists made use passage 
Bible. came, however, trace it, Saint 
Thomas Jefferson, since almost universally regarded 
men born free 
 
"This genuine political currency generation. 
sorry say never seen two men true. must 
admit never saw therefore 
say man ever saw proof sage 
 
sounds strangely republican America. like heard 
days republic. Let us contrast language 
truly national man whose life death 
quote speech Mr. Clay delivered American Colonization 
Society 
 
"We mischief agitation question. 
society goes household disturb domestic 
addresses slaves weaken obligations 
seeks affect man's property. neither power 
affect property one contrary consent. 
execution scheme would instead value 
property left behind. society, composed free men, 
free. Collateral consequences responsible for. 
society produced great moral revolution 
age would thus us 
would repress tendencies toward liberty ultimate emancipation, 
must put benevolent efforts society. 
must go back era liberty independence, muzzle 
cannon thunders annual joyous return. must renew 
slave trade, train must suppress 
British seeking condition 
unfortunate West Indian slave. must arrest career South 
American deliverance must blow moral lights 
around us greatest America presents 
way rights, 
happiness. achieved purposes 
work yet must penetrate human soul, 
eradicate light reason love liberty. Then, till 
then, universal darkness despair perpetuate 
slavery repress sympathy humane benevolent efforts 
among free men behalf unhappy portion race 

 
American Colonization Society organized Mr. Clay, though 
one earliest died, 
many preceding years been, president. one 
cherished objects direct care consideration, 
association name probably greatest 
collateral support. considered society 
tended relieve presence 
free far whole merit 
speech quoted says: 
 
"There moral idea returning Africa children, 
whose torn hand fraud 
violence. foreign land, carry back 
native soil rich fruits religion, law, liberty. 
May one great designs Ruler universe, whose 
ways often thus 
original crime signal blessing unfortunate portion 

 
suggestion possible ultimate redemption African race 
African continent made twenty-five years ago. Every succeeding 
year added strength hope May indeed 
country 
lost Red Sea, retain people 
already served four hundred years. May like never 
If, friends colonization hope, present coming 
generations countrymen shall means succeed freeing 
land dangerous presence slavery, time 
restoring people bright 
prospects future, gradually neither races 
individuals shall suffered change, indeed 
glorious consummation. consummation efforts Mr. 
Clay shall ardently 
none labors valuable country 
kind. 
 
Henry Clay dead. long life country 
prosperous could quite 
been, is, be, without Henry man times 
demanded, providence God given us. gone. 
Let us strive far may, continued care 
Divine Providence, trusting future national 
fail provide us instruments safety 
 
NOTE. indebted copy speech Major 
Wm. H. formerly one Illinois State 

 
 
 
 
VOTERS 
 
OPINION ILLINOIS ELECTION LAW. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November 1, 1852 
 
leading article Daily Register morning induced 
friends request opinion election laws applicable 
examined present constitution 
State, election law 1849, parts election 
law revised code opinion person 
taking oath prescribed act 1849 entitled vote unless 
made satisfactory majority judges 
oath purpose obtaining 
proposed voter may asked questions way 
independent testimony may received. base opinion 
receiving upon Section 
election law revised 
 
 
   A. LINCOLN, 
   B. S. EDWARDS 
   S. T. 
   S. H. TREAT 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
LEGAL OFFICE WORK 
 
 
 
 
JOSHUA R. 
 
MAY 12, 
 
Mr. JOSHUA R. 
 
SIR:--I hope letter appear sufficient 
apology liberty I, total take addressing 
you. persons holding two lots made you, 
attorney Daniel M. nearly years ago, 
great danger losing much, perhaps all, depend 
testimony give whether account 
proceeds received sale I, 
therefore, one beg fully 
recollection means power time may called 
persons come you, show disposition 
subject, may prudent remember 
may possible design misrepresent embarrass real 
testimony may ultimately give. may six months year 
called 
 
Respectfully, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1854 
 
O. L. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 22, 1854. 
 
O. L. DAVIS, ESQ. 
 
DEAR doubt, remember enclosed memorandum handed 
office. made desired search, find 
deed ever here. Campbell, auditor, says here, 
would office, hunted dozen times, 
could never find it. says one time another, heard 
much matter, deed Right Way, 
deed, least, sale 
may never says, deed, 
probable General Paris, it. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NEBRASKA MEASURE 
 
J. M. 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, Sept. 7, 1854. 
 
HON. J. M. 
 
DEAR SIR:--You know anxious Nebraska measure shall 
condemned everywhere. course hope something 
position; yet expect anything may wrong 
would anything personally injurious 
yourself. are, always been, honestly sincerely 
know painful must sincere man 
urged party support measure conscience 
believes wrong. severe struggle yourself, 
determined wrong. 
should, public speeches, state reasons, thus 
justify wish yet say, don't it, 
think injure you. may given word vote Major 
so, course stick it. allow suggest 
avoid speaking this; probably would induce 
friends like manner cast votes. understand. 
let beg pardon letter upon you, 
ever opposed politics. party omitted make 
Nebraska test party probably would 
Democratic candidate Congress district. it, 
believe would given you. case 
quite happy Nebraska events. still 
voted Whig made speeches, 
written would elected least thousand 
majority. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. B. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, September 7, 1854 
 
A. B. ESQ. 
 
though am, personally, brother faith, 
venture write you. come court next week. 
obliged court case, fee five 
hundred dollars, two hundred dollars already paid. neglect would 
unjust himself, Harris you, 
head tail up, Nebraska. must one make 
anti-Nebraska speech. best, get him, think. 
get somebody 
get press Senatorial district, 
believe. 
 
etc., 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY SENATOR SPEECH 
 
SPEECH PEORIA, ILLINOIS, REPLY SENATOR DOUGLAS, 
 
OCTOBER 16, 1854. 
 
rise speak now, audience meet 
half-past six seven o'clock. several minutes 
past five, Judge Douglas spoken three hear 
all, wish hear through. take long 
taken him. carry us beyond eight o'clock night. Now, every 
one remain long well get 
meet remain hour two later. Judge already 
informed hour reply me. doubt 
little surprised learn consented give 
one high reputation known ability advantage me. Indeed, 
it, though wholly 
understood Judge entirely done, 
Democrats would leave hear me; giving close, felt 
confident would stay fun hearing skin me. 
 
audience signified assent arrangement, adjourned 
seven o'clock P.M., time Mr. Lincoln spoke 
substantially follows: 
 
repeal Missouri Compromise, propriety 
restoration, constitute subject say. desire 
present connected view subject, remarks 
specifically answer Judge Douglas; yet, proceed, main 
points presented arise, receive 
attention may able give them. wish say 
propose question patriotism assail motives man 
class men, rather strictly naked 
merits question. also wish less national 
positions may take, whenever take ground others 
thought, may think, sectional, dangerous Union, 
hope give reason appear sufficient, least some, 
think differently. 
 
subject part parcel larger general 
question domestic slavery, wish make keep distinction 
existing institution extension broad 
clear honest man misunderstand me, one 
successfully misrepresent me. 
 
order clear understanding Missouri Compromise is, 
short history preceding kindred subjects perhaps proper. 
 
established independence, claim 
country compromise Indeed, strictly speaking, 
Confederacy owned country all; States respectively owned 
country within limits, owned territory 
beyond strict State limits. Virginia thus owned Northwestern 
country principal part Ohio, 
Indiana, Illinois, Michigan, Wisconsin since 
formed. also owned within since 
formed State Kentucky. North Carolina thus owned 
State Tennessee; South Carolina Georgia 
separate parts, Mississippi Connecticut, 
think, owned little remaining part Ohio, 
send Congress beat creation making 
 
territories, together States themselves, constitute 
country Confederacy claimed sort 
living Articles 
Constitution several years afterward. question 
territories General Government set Mr. 
author Declaration Independence, otherwise 
chief delegate Congress; afterward, 
twice President; was, is, perhaps continue be, 
distinguished politician birth 
continued withal idea 
taking occasion prevent slavery ever going Northwestern 
Territory. prevailed Virginia Legislature adopt views, 
Territory, making prohibition slavery therein 
condition got understanding, 
condition deed Congress accepted cession 
condition; first ordinance (which acts Congress 
government Territory provided slavery 
never permitted therein. 
often spoken of. 
 
Thenceforward years, last scrap 
Territory came Union State Wisconsin, parties 
acted quiet obedience Jefferson 
happy home millions free, white, 
prosperous people, slave among them. 
 
Thus, author Declaration Independence, policy 
prohibiting slavery new territory originated. Thus, away back 
Constitution, free breath Revolution, State 
Virginia national Congress put policy practice. Thus, 
sixty best years republic, policy 
steadily work great beneficent end. thus, five 
States, five millions free, people, 
us rich fruits policy. 
 
new light upon us. Congress declares ought never 
been, like must never again. sacred right 
self-government grossly violated it. even find men drew 
first every breath 
restriction, live dread absolute 
restricted "sacred taking slaves Nebraska. 
perfect liberty sigh liberty making slaves 
people, Jefferson never thought of, fathers never thought of, 
never thought themselves, year ago. fortunate 
sooner become sensible great Oh, difficult 
treat respect assaults upon ever really held 

 
return history. purchased called 
Louisiana, included present States Louisiana, 
Arkansas, Missouri, also Territory Minnesota, 
present Kansas Nebraska. Slavery already existed 
among French New Orleans, extent St. Louis. 
Louisiana came Union slave State, without controversy. 
Missouri showed signs wish come slavery. 
resisted Northern members Congress; thus began first 
great slavery agitation nation. controversy lasted several 
months, became angry House Representatives 
voting steadily prohibition slavery Missouri, Senate 
voting steadily it. breaking Union 
freely made, public men day became seriously 
length compromise made, which, 
sides yielded something. law, passed 6th March, 
1820, providing Missouri might come Union slavery, 
remaining part territory purchased France 
lies north thirty-six degrees thirty minutes north 
slavery never provision law 
excluding slavery north line, language 
employed Ordinance directly applied Iowa, 
Minnesota, present Kansas Nebraska. 
Whether slavery south line, nothing 
said law. Arkansas constituted principal remaining 
part south since admitted slave State, 
without serious controversy. recently, Iowa, north line, came 
free State without controversy. Still later, Minnesota, north 
line, territorial organization without controversy. Texas, 
south line, west Arkansas, though originally 
within purchase France, had, 1819, Spain 
treaty acquisition thus become part 
Mexico. Mexico became independent American 
citizens began settling rapidly slaves southern part 
Texas. Soon Mexico, established 
independent government own, adopting constitution slavery, 
strongly constitutions slave States. still 
another rapid move, Texas, claiming boundary much farther west 
parted 1819, brought back United States, 
admitted Union slave State. little 
settlement northern part Texas, considerable portion 
lay north Missouri resolutions admitting 
Union, Missouri restriction expressly extended across 
territory. 1845, nine years ago. 
 
Thus originated Missouri Compromise; thus respected 
even four years later, 1849, distinguished 
Senator, public address, held following language relation 
it: 
 
"The Missouri Compromise practical operation 
quarter century, received sanction approbation men 
parties every section Union. sectional 
growing vexed question, 
whole country. given Henry 
Clay, prominent proud 
title, service, political 
friends repeatedly appealed people rally standard 
Presidential candidate, man exhibited patriotism 
power suppress treasonable preserve 
Union. aware man party, section 
Union, ever urged objection Mr. Clay 
great champion Missouri Compromise. contrary, effort 
made opponents Mr. Clay prove entitled 
exclusive merit great patriotic measure, honor 
equally due others, well him, securing 
origin hearts patriotic men, desired 
preserve perpetuate blessings glorious origin 
Constitution United States, conceived 
spirit fraternal calculated remove forever 
danger seemed distant day, 
social bond union. evidences public opinion day 
seemed indicate compromise hearts 
American people, sacred thing hand would 
ever reckless enough 
 
read extract involve Judge Douglas 
afterward thought wrong, right change. 
bring forward merely show high estimate placed 
Missouri Compromise parties late year 1849. 
 
going back little point time. war Mexico broke 
1846. Congress session, President Polk 
asked place two millions dollars control, used 
found practicable expedient, 
treaty peace Mexico, acquiring part territory. 
bill duly gotten purpose, 
House Representatives, member name David 
Democrat Pennsylvania, moved amendment, 
territory thus acquired never shall slavery." 
 
origin Wilmot Proviso. created great 
stuck like voted bill, bill 
passed House. Senate, however, adjourned without 
final action it, appropriation proviso lost 
time. war continued, next session President renewed 
request enlarging think, 
three millions. came proviso, defeated measure. Congress 
adjourned again, war went on. December, 1847, new Congress 
lower House term. Wilmot Proviso, 
principle it, constantly coming shape other, 
think may venture say voted least forty times 
short time there. Senate, however, held 
never became law. spring 1848 treaty peace made 
Mexico, obtained portion country 
constitutes Territories New Mexico Utah present State 
treaty Wilmot Proviso far 
intended condition acquisition territory. 
friends, however, still determined find way restrain 
slavery getting new country. new acquisition lay 
directly west old purchase France, extended west 
Pacific Ocean, situated Missouri line 
extended straight west, new country would divided extended 
line, leaving north south it. Judge Douglas's motion, 
bill, provision bill, passed Senate extend 
Missouri line. proviso men House, including myself, voted 
down, because, implication, gave southern part slavery, 
bent free. 
 
fall 1848 discovered 
attracted people unprecedented on, soon 
after, meeting new Congress December, 1849, already 
population nearly hundred thousand, called convention, formed 
State constitution excluding slavery, knocking admission 
Union. proviso men, course, letting in, 
Senate, always true side, would consent 
admission, California stood, kept Union 
would let slavery circumstances, 
perhaps, wrong. points dispute connected 
general question Slavery, equally needed 
South efficient fugitive slave law. North 
abolition peculiar species slave trade District 
Columbia, connection which, view windows 
Capitol, sort negro negroes 
temporarily finally taken Southern 
precisely like horses, openly maintained fifty 
years. Utah New Mexico needed territorial whether 
slavery prohibited within another 
question. indefinite western boundary Texas settled. 
slave State, consequently farther west slavery men could 
push boundary, slave country farther 
east slavery opponents could thrust boundary back, less slave 
ground Thus clearly slavery question 
others. 
 
points needed held up, perhaps 
make help adjust one another. Union now, 1820, 
thought danger, devotion Union rightfully inclined 
men yield somewhat points nothing else could inclined 
them. compromise finally South got new fugitive 
slave law, North got California, far best part 
acquisition free State. South got provision 
New Mexico admitted States, may come without 
slavery may North got slave trade 
abolished District North got western boundary 
Texas thrown farther back South but, 
turn, gave Texas ten millions dollars pay old 
Compromise 1850. 
 
Preceding Presidential election great political 
parties, Democrats Whigs, met convention adopted resolutions 
indorsing Compromise final settlement, 
far parties could make so, slavery agitation. Previous 
this, Illinois Legislature indorsed it. 
 
long period time, Nebraska (the Nebraska Territory, 
State know remained substantially 
country, emigration settlement within began take 
place. one third large present United States, 
importance, long begins come view. 
restriction slavery Missouri Compromise directly applies 
fact first made, since maintained expressly 
it. bill give territorial government passed House 
Representatives, and, hands Judge Douglas, failed passing 
want time. bill contained repeal Missouri 
Compromise. Indeed, assailed contain 
repeal, Judge Douglas defended existing form. January 4, 
1854, Judge Douglas new bill give Nebraska territorial 
government. bill report, last 
expressly recommends Missouri Compromise shall neither 
affirmed long bill modified make two 
territories instead one, calling southern one Kansas. 
 
Also, month introduction bill, Judge's 
motion amended declare Missouri Compromise 
and, substantially, people go settle may 
establish slavery, exclude it, may see fit. shape 
bill passed branches Congress became law. 
 
repeal Missouri Compromise. foregoing history 
may precisely accurate every particular, sure 
sufficiently use shall attempt make it, 
us chief material enabling us judge correctly 
whether repeal Missouri Compromise right wrong. think, 
shall try show, direct effect, 
letting slavery Kansas Nebraska, wrong prospective 
principle, allowing spread every part wide world 
men found inclined take it. 
 
declared but, must think, covert real 
spread slavery, cannot hate 
monstrous injustice slavery itself. hate 
republican example influence world; enables enemies 
free institutions us causes 
real friends freedom doubt especially 
forces many good men among open war 
fundamental principles civil liberty, Declaration 
Independence, insisting right principle action 

 
proceeding let say think prejudice 
Southern people. would situation. 
slavery exist among them, would introduce it. 
exist among us, instantly give up. believe 
masses North South. Doubtless individuals 
sides would hold slaves circumstances, others 
would gladly introduce slavery anew existence. know 
Southern men free slaves, go North become 
abolitionists, Northern ones go South become cruel 
slave 
 
Southern people tell us responsible 
origin slavery are, acknowledge fact. said 
institution exists, difficult get rid 
satisfactory way, understand appreciate saying. 
surely blame know 
myself. earthly power given me, know 
existing institution. first impulse would free 
slaves, send Liberia, native land. moment's 
reflection would convince whatever high hope (as think 
may long run, sudden execution 
impossible. landed day, would perish 
next ten days; surplus surplus money 
enough carry many times ten days. then? Free 
all, keep among us quite certain 
condition? think would hold one slavery 
rate, yet point clear enough denounce people upon. 
next? Free them, make politically socially 
feelings admit this, mine would, well know 
great mass whites not. Whether feeling 
accords justice sound judgment sole question, 
indeed part it. universal feeling, whether well ill 
cannot safely disregarded. cannot make 
seem systems gradual emancipation might adopted, 
undertake judge brethren 
South. 
 
remind us constitutional rights, acknowledge 
grudgingly, fully would give 
legislation reclaiming fugitives 
likely carry free man slavery 
ordinary criminal laws hang innocent one. 
 
this, judgment, furnishes excuse permitting 
slavery go free territory would reviving 
African slave trade law. law forbids bringing slaves 
Africa, long forbidden taking 
Nebraska, distinguished moral principle, 
repeal former could find quite plausible 
latter. 
 
arguments repeal Missouri Compromise sought 
justified 
 
First. Nebraska country needed territorial government. 
 
Second. various ways public repudiated compromise 
demanded repeal, therefore complain it. 
 
 And, lastly, repeal establishes principle 
right. 
 
attempt answer turn. 
 
First, country need territorial organization, 
could well without Iowa 
Minnesota, Missouri restriction had, without 
repeal, succession, territorial even 
year before, bill Nebraska within passing 
without repealing hands men 
champions necessity 
still later, bill first brought in, contained 
But, say they, people demanded, rather 
repeal, repeal accompany organization 
whenever 
 
Now, deny public ever demanded repudiated 
Missouri Compromise, ever commanded deny it, call 
proof. believe, command 
ever given express terms. said done 
principle. support Wilmot Proviso first fact mentioned 
prove Missouri restriction repudiated principle, 
second refusal extend Missouri line country 
acquired Mexico. near enough alike treated together. 
one exclude chances slavery whole new 
acquisition reject division it, 
one half given Now, whether 
Missouri line principle depends upon whether 
Missouri law contained principle requiring line extended 
country acquired Mexico. contend not. insist 
contained general principle, was, every sense, 
terms limit country purchased France 
could principle beyond intention 
made it. intend extend line country 
own. intended extend event 
acquiring additional territory, say so? 
easy say "in country west Mississippi 
own, may hereafter shall never say 
say; would said meant it. 
intention extend law mentioned law, 
mentioned contemporaneous history. law itself, 
history times, blank principle 
neither known rules statutes 
common sense, principle 
 
Another fact showing specific character Missouri 
intended expressed, showing line 
intended universal dividing line Free Slave territory, 
present north slavery could never 
fact law Missouri came slave State, north 
line. law contained prospective principle, whole law must 
looked order ascertain principle was. 
rule South could fairly contend that, inasmuch got one slave 
State north line law, right 
another given north then, 
indefinite extension line. absurdity 
attempting prospective principle Missouri 
Compromise line. 
 
voted Wilmot Proviso voting keep slavery 
whole Mexican little think thereby 
voting let Nebraska lying several hundred miles 
voted extending Missouri line, little think 
voting destroy old line, near thirty years' 
 
argue thus repudiated Missouri Compromise less absurd 
would argue far forborne acquire 
principle, repudiated former 
determined throw Union. less absurd 
would say may refused build addition 
house, thereby decided destroy existing 
catch setting fire house, turn upon say 
instructed it! 
 
conclusive argument, however, Wilmot Proviso, 
voting extension Missouri line, never 
thought disturbing original Missouri Compromise, found 
fact then, still is, tract fine 
country, nearly large State Missouri, lying immediately west 
Arkansas south Missouri Compromise line, never 
attempted prohibit slavery it. wish particular attention 
this. original Missouri Compromise line northern 
boundary, consequently part country 
slavery permitted go compromise. 
open ever still yet effort made 
time South. struggles prohibit 
slavery within Mexican never much lifted 
finger prohibit entirely conclusive 
times held Missouri Compromise sacred thing, 
even well us? 
 
Senator Douglas sometimes says Missouri line principle 
extension line Ordinance say, 
extension Ohio River. think weak enough face. 
however, that, glance map show, Missouri 
line long way farther south Ohio, Senator 
proposing extension stuck principle 
perhaps might voted 
 
next said compromises ratification 
political parties established new principle 
required repeal Missouri Compromise. deny. deny 
it, demand proof. already stated fully compromises 
are. particular part measures 
repeal Missouri Compromise sought inferred (for 
admitted contain nothing express provision 
Utah New Mexico laws permits seek 
admission Union States come without slavery, 
shall see fit. insist provision made Utah 
New Mexico, place whatever. direct 
reference Nebraska territories moon. But, 
say they, reference Nebraska principle. Let us see. 
North consented provision, considered right 
itself, it. 
 
time got California Union free State. 
far best part struggled Wilmot Proviso. 
also got area slavery somewhat narrowed settlement 
boundary Texas. Also got slave trade abolished 
District Columbia. 
 
desirable objects North could afford yield 
yield South Utah New Mexico 
mean whole North, even majority, law 
passed; enough added vote South, 
carry measure. pretended principle 
arrangement requires us permit provision applied 
Nebraska, without equivalent all. Give us another free State; press 
boundary Texas still farther give us another step toward 
destruction slavery District, present us similar case. 
ask us repeat, nothing, paid first 
wish thing again, pay again. principle 
compromises if, indeed, principles beyond 
specific system 
 
Again, Congress, time, intended future Territories 
should, admitted States, come without slavery 
say so? universal provision, 
know bills could passed. they, 
principle contrary Still further, 
intended establish principle that, whenever Congress control, 
left people thought fit slavery, 
authorize people District Columbia, 
abolish slavery within 
 
personally know left 
of. frequently spoken members Congress, 
citizens Washington, six years ago; heard one express doubt 
system gradual emancipation, compensation owners, 
would meet approbation large majority white people 
District. without action Congress could say 
Congress said "No." measures 1850, Congress subject 
slavery District expressly hand. establishing 
principle allowing people please slavery, 
apply principle people? 
 
claimed resolutions Illinois Legislature, 
passed repeal Missouri Compromise demanded. 
deny also. Whatever may worked criticism language 
resolutions, people never understood 
indorsement compromises 1850, release 
senators voting Wilmot Proviso. whole people living 
witnesses view. Finally, asked, "If 
mean apply Utah New Mexico provision future 
territories, mean we, indorsed compromises 

 
answer question meant ask 
repeal modification Fugitive Slave law. meant ask 
abolition slavery District Columbia. meant 
resist admission Utah New Mexico, even ask come 
slave States. meant nothing additional Territories, because, 
understood, Territory whose character slavery 
already settled. Nebraska, regarded character 
fixed Missouri Compromise thirty fixed 
home Illinois. new said, 
unto day evil make new 
will, heretofore, try manage 
meant appeal people 
say whether also universal meaning 
free States. 
 
now, turn, let ask questions. If, 
matters, repeal Missouri Compromise 
command sooner repeal omitted Nebraska 
Bill omitted original bill 
accompanying report repeal characterized departure 
course pursued 1850 continued omission 
 
aware Judge Douglas argues subsequent express repeal 
substantial alteration bill. argument seems wonderful 
me. one argue white black different. 
however, change bill, 
made change deference senators would support 
bill proves senators thought 
change substantial one, Judge thought opinions worth 
to. opinions, therefore, seem rest firm 
basis, even suppose world 
continue believe, precisely substance change 
whole agitation 
 
then, public never demanded repeal 
Missouri Compromise. 
 
come consider whether appeal avowed principles, 
right. insist not. Take particular case. 
controversy arisen advocates opponents slavery, 
relation establishment within country purchased 
best, part purchase already 
slave State. controversy settled also letting Missouri 
slave State; agreement within remaining 
part purchase, north certain line, never 
slavery. done remaining part, south 
line, nothing perhaps fair was, 
come slavery choose. southern part, except 
portion heretofore mentioned, afterward come slavery, 
State Arkansas. many years, since 1820, northern part 
remained length settlements began also. due 
course Iowa came free State, Minnesota given territorial 
government, without removing slavery Finally, 
sole remaining part north 
proposed, blot old dividing 
line years' standing, open whole country 
introduction slavery. this, mind, 
angry dangerous controversy, parties made friends 
dividing one party first 
beyond power disturbed possession it, 
seizes share party. two men 
divided one hastily swallowed half, 
other's half putting mouth. 
 
Let drop main argument, notice consider rather 
inferior matter. argued slavery go Kansas 
Nebraska, event. hope 
not; let us climate, glance 
map shows five slave Maryland, 
Virginia, Kentucky, Missouri, also District Columbia, 
north Missouri Compromise line. census returns 1850 show 
within eight hundred thousand two 
hundred seventy-six slaves, one fourth 
slaves nation. 
 
climate, then, keep slavery Territories. 
anything peculiar nature country? Missouri 
Territories entire western boundary, slavery already 
within every one western counties. even heard said 
slaves proportion whites northwestern county 
Missouri within county State. Slavery pressed 
entirely old western boundary State, rather 
recently part boundary northwest moved little 
farther west, slavery followed quite new line. Now, 
restriction removed, prevent going still 
Climate not, country will, nothing nature 
will. disposition people prevent it? nearest 
scene favor opposed 
may but, military phrase, battlefield far 
base operations. 
 
said law Nebraska subject slavery, 
that, case, taking slave operates freedom. 
good rule actual practice. Wherever slavery 
first introduced without law. laws find 
concerning laws introducing it, already 
existing thing. white man takes slave Nebraska now. 
inform negro take court test 
question ignorance legal emancipation 
kept Others move 
last, ever time voting comes question 
slavery institution fact, exists country, 
cannot well removed. fact presence, difficulty 
carry vote favor. Keep vote 
taken, vote favor cannot got population forty 
thousand earth, drawn together ordinary motives 
emigration settlement. get slaves Territory simultaneously 
whites stages settlement precise stake 
played won Nebraska measure. 
 
question asked "If slaves go notwithstanding 
general principle law them, would equally go 
positive statute in, even Missouri restriction 
answer, takes much man venture 
property latter case 
positive Congressional enactment known respected all, 
nearly all, whereas negative principle law free law 
much known except among experience practical 
difference. spite Ordinance '87, negroes brought 
Illinois, held state enough, however, 
carry vote people favor institution came 
form constitution. adjoining Missouri country, 
Ordinance carried 
ten times, hundred times, actually made slave State. 
fact. 
 
Another argument taking slaves new countries 
increase number, make one slave would otherwise 
free. truth this, glad it; 
wholly true. African slave trade yet effectually 
and, make reasonable white people among us 
foreigners descendants foreigners arriving since 
shall find increase black population 
white extent except supposing them, 
too, coming so, opening new 
countries institution increases demand 
price slaves, does, fact, make slaves causing 
brought Africa sold 
 
however may be, know opening new countries slavery 
tends perpetuation institution, keep men 
slavery would otherwise free. result feel like 
legal obligation suppress feelings 

 
Equal justice South, said, requires us consent 
extension slavery new countries. say, inasmuch 
object taking Nebraska, therefore must object 
taking slave. Now, admit perfectly logical 
difference negroes. thus 
require deny humanity negro, wish ask whether 
South, yourselves, ever willing kindly 
provided come world small percentage 
natural percentage larger slave States 
free. great majority South, well North, human 

physical sympathies bosoms 
Southern people many ways, sense wrong 
slavery, consciousness that, all, humanity 
negro. deny this, let address plain questions. 
1820 (the joined North, almost declaring 
African slave trade punishment 
death. this? feel wrong, 
join providing men hung it? practice 
bringing wild negroes Africa would buy them. 
never thought hanging men catching selling wild horses, 
wild wild 
 
Again, among individual class native 
known 
buy slave, cannot help 
it, sell him; help it, drive door. 
despise recognize friend, even 
honest man. children must play his; may 
freely little negroes, children. 
obliged deal him, try get job 
without much touching him. common join hands 
men avoid 
shrinking grows rich 
business, still remember him, still keep 
upon family. Now, this? 
treat man deals cotton, 
 
yet again: United States Territories, including 
District Columbia, free blacks. five hundred dollars per 
head worth two hundred millions dollars. comes 
vast amount property running without see 
free horses free cattle running large. this? free 
blacks descendants slaves, slaves themselves; 
would slaves something 
white owners, inducing vast pecuniary sacrifice liberate them. 
it? cases 
sense justice human sympathy continually telling 
poor negro natural right deny 
make mere merchandise deserve death. 
 
ask us deny humanity slave, 
estimate equal ask us 
yourselves? ask us nothing two hundred millions 
dollars could induce do? 
 
one great argument support repeal Missouri Compromise 
still come. argument "the sacred right self-government." 
seems distinguished Senator found great difficulty getting 
even Senate, meet fairly argument. 
said: 
 
rush angels fear 
 
hazard thought one fools 
meet rush take bull trust 
understand truly estimate right self-government. faith 
proposition man precisely pleases 
exclusively lies foundation sense 
justice me. extend principle communities men 
well individuals. extend politically wise, 
well naturally politically wise saving us 
matters concern us. Here, Washington, would 
trouble oyster laws Virginia, cranberry laws 
Indiana. doctrine self-government 
application attempted. 
perhaps rather say whether application depends 
upon whether negro man. man, case 
man may matter self-government pleases 
him. negro man, extent total 
destruction self-government say shall govern 
white man governs himself, 
governs also governs another man, 
despotism. negro man, why, then, 
ancient faith teaches "all men created equal," 
moral right connection one man's making slave 
another. 
 
Judge Douglas bitter 
argument saying: "The white people Nebraska good enough 
govern themselves, good enough govern miserable 

 
Well, doubt people Nebraska continue 
good average people elsewhere. say contrary. 
say man good enough govern another man 
without other's consent. say leading principle, 
American Declaration Independence 
says: 
 
"We hold truths men created equal; 
endowed certain inalienable rights; 
among life, liberty, pursuit happiness. 
secure rights, governments instituted among men, 
POWERS CONSENT 
 
quoted much time merely show that, according 
ancient faith, powers government derived consent 
relation master slave pro total 
violation principle. master governs slave without 
consent, governs set rules altogether different 
himself. Allow governed 
equal voice government, that, only, 
self-government. 
 
Let said contending establishment political 
social equality whites blacks. already said 
contrary. argument necessity, arising 
fact blacks already among us; set 
moral argument allowing taken never 
yet extension bad thing, which, 
already exists, must necessity manage best can. 
 
support application doctrine Senator 
Douglas sought bring aid opinions 
Revolutionary fathers. glad done this. love sentiments 
men, shall happy abide opinions. 
shows us contemplation colonies break 
Great Britain, set new government themselves, 
several States instructed delegates go measure, 
provided State allowed regulate domestic concerns 
way. right; see 
nothing objectionable it. also think probable 
reference existence slavery among them. deny 
had. reference carrying slavery new 
question, let fathers 
answer it. 
 
generation men, mostly individuals 
generation declared principle, declared independence, 
fought war Revolution through, afterward made 
Constitution still men passed 
Ordinance '87, declaring slavery never go Northwest 
Territory. 
 
doubt Judge Douglas thinks inconsistent this. 
question him. 
inch ground left claiming opinions, 
example, authority, side controversy. 
 
Again, Nebraska, Territory, part us? 
country? surrender control it, surrender 
right part ourselves. say shall 
control it, part, true every part; 
parts gone, become 
left us? use General Government, 
nothing left 
 
say question left people Nebraska, 
particularly interested. rule, 
must leave individual say whether 
slaves. better moral right thirty-one citizens Nebraska 
say shall hold slaves people 
thirty-one States say slavery shall go 
State all? 
 
sacred right people Nebraska take hold 
slaves there, equally sacred right buy 
buy that, coast Africa, 
provided consent hang going buy 
them. must remove restriction, too, sacred right 
self-government. aware say taking slaves States 
Nebraska make slaves African 
say much. catch free negroes bring here. 
finds already slaves hands black 
honestly rate red cotton head. 
cheap, great sacred right 
self-government hang men profitable trade. 
 
Another important objection application right 
self-government enables first deprive succeeding 
many free exercise right self-government. first 
may get slavery in, subsequent many cannot easily get out. 
common remark slave States, "If clear 
slaves, much better would us." actually 
deprived privilege would, 
action beginning. thing true 
whole nation time Constitution formed. 
 
Whether slavery shall go Nebraska, new Territories, 
matter exclusive concern people may go there. whole 
nation interested best use shall made Territories. 
want homes free white people. cannot be, 
considerable extent, slavery shall planted within them. Slave States 
places poor white people remove from, remove to. New 
free States places poor people go to, better 
condition. use nation needs Territories. 
 
Still constitutional relations slave 
free States degrading latter. legal 
obligations catch return slaves them: sort 
disagreeable job, which, believe, general rule, 
perform one another. again, control 
management 
greatly advantage us. Constitution State two 
senators, number representatives proportion number 
people, number Presidential equal 
whole number senators representatives together. 
ascertaining number people purpose, five slaves 
counted equal three whites. slaves 
counted used swell influence white people's 
votes. practical effect shown comparison 
States South Carolina Maine. South Carolina six 
representatives, South Carolina eight Presidential 
Maine. precise equality course 
equal senators, two. Thus control 
government two States equals 
number white people? Maine South Carolina 
Maine twice many South Carolina, over. Thus, 
white man South Carolina double man 
Maine. South Carolina, besides free people, 
slaves. South precisely advantage 
white man every free State well Maine. 
double one us crowd. 
extent, held citizens slave States 
free; absolute truth, without 
voter slave State legal power 
government voter free State. instance 
exact equality; disadvantage us whole chapter 
through. principle, gives slave States 
present Congress twenty additional representatives, seven 
whole majority passed Nebraska Bill. 
 
yet mention complain 
it, far already settled. Constitution, 
cause, cause, propose 
disregard Constitution. stand it, fully, firmly. 
 
told must leave altogether people say 
whether new brought firm, 
degrading terms me, respectfully insist 
whether shall whole man half one, comparison 
others question somewhat concerned, one 
man sacred right deciding me. wrong 
this, really sacred right self-government man 
shall go Nebraska decide whether equal 
double me, then, shall exercised right, thereby 
shall reduced still smaller man already 
am, like gentleman, deeply 
sacred rights, provide about, 
find out, can, become sacred rights. surely 
small naked eye. 
 
Finally, insist anything duty 
whole people never hands own, thing 
preservation perpetuity liberties institutions. 
shall think do, extension slavery endangers 

submit question, fate country, mere 
men bent question slavery 
extension insignificant one, one power 
might aside way; being, is, great 
danger, shall strong grip nation upon 
him, hands feeble 
 
done mighty argument self-government. Go, sacred 
thing! Go peace. 
 
Nebraska urged great measure. Well, go 
saving Union. Much hate slavery, would consent extension 
rather see Union would consent 
great evil avoid greater one. go must 
believe, least, means employ 
end. mind, Nebraska 
 
"It hath salvation it." 
 
rather, one thing ever endangers 
Union. came upon us, peace quiet. nation 
looking forming new union, long course peace 
prosperity seemed lie us. whole range possibility, 
scarcely appears anything 
slavery agitation could except project 
repealing Missouri Compromise. Every inch territory owned 
already definite settlement slavery question, 
parties pledged Indeed, country 
continent could except extreme northern 
regions wholly question. 
 
state affairs Genius Discord could scarcely 
invented way setting us ears turning back 
destroying peace measures past. counsels Genius 
seem Missouri Compromise 
midst new slavery such, think, 
never seen before. responsible this? resist 
measure, brought forward, pressed 
through, reason know, fact must would 
could expected author would 
looked upon measure extension slavery, 
gross breach faith. 
 
Argue long will, naked front aspect 
measure. aspect could produce agitation. 
Slavery founded man's 
love justice. principles eternal 
brought collision fiercely slavery extension brings them, 
must follow. Repeal 
Missouri Compromise, repeal repeal Declaration 
Independence, repeal past history, still cannot repeal human 
nature. still abundance man's heart slavery 
extension wrong, abundance heart mouth 
continue speak. 
 
too, Nebraska Bill people 
decide question slavery themselves; 
decide, decide, whether, question 
decided, remain subject indefinite 
succession new law say. decided 
first dozen settlers arrive there, await arrival 
decided vote people vote 
Legislature, or, indeed, vote questions law 
gives answer. mystery this; member proposed 
give Legislature express authority exclude slavery, 
friends bill. fact worth 
East sending Nebraska exclude 
slavery it; and, far judge, expect question 
decided voting way other. 
too. within contested ground. hold 
meetings pass resolutions, slightest allusion 
voting made. resolve slavery already exists Territory; 
shall go there; they, remaining Missouri, protect 
it, abolitionists shall hung driven away. 
seen plainly enough, never 

 
And, really, result this? party within 
numerous determined probable 
contest come blows Could apt 
invention bring collision violence slavery question 
Nebraska project charge believe 
intended Congress; literally formed ring placed 
champions within fight controversy, fight could 
likely come is. fight 
likely take peaceful, first drop 
blood shed real Union? 
 
Missouri Compromise ought restored. sake Union, 
ought restored. ought elect House Representatives 
vote means omit this, 
Slavery may may established Nebraska. whether 
not, shall councils 
spirit compromise; who, this, ever trust 
national spirit mutual spirit 
first gave us Constitution, saved 
shall cast us forever. shall 
lieu it? South flushed triumph tempted 
North, betrayed believe, wrong burning 
One side one 
one Already 
North defy constitutional resist execution 
Fugitive Slave law, even menace institution slavery 
States exists. Already South claim 
constitutional right take hold slaves free States, demand 
revival slave trade, demand treaty Great Britain 
fugitive slaves may reclaimed yet 
either side. grave question lovers union whether 
final destruction Missouri Compromise, spirit 
compromise, these, 
increase number both. 
 
restore compromise, then? thereby restore national 
faith, national confidence, national feeling 
thereby spirit concession compromise, spirit 
never failed us past perils, may safely trusted 
future. South ought join this. peace 
nation dear us. memories past hopes 
future, share largely would part 
great spirit, great effect. would worth 
nation hundred years purchase peace prosperity. 
sacrifice would surrender us gave 
us consideration long, long ago; asked for, 
struggled cared thrust upon them, less 
astonishment ours. 
 
said cannot restore it; though elect every member 
lower House, Senate still us. quite true 
senators passed Nebraska Bill majority whole Senate 
retain seats spite elections next 
year. elections several shall clearly 
express Nebraska, senators disregard 
neither obey make room 
 
even fail restore compromise, still 
great point carry popular vote favor 
moral weight vote cannot estimated authors 
Nebraska satisfied destruction 
indorsement principle proclaim 
great object. them, Nebraska alone small establish 
principle future use particularly desire. 
 
future use planting slavery wherever wide world 
local opposition cannot prevent it. Now, wish 
give indorsement, wish establish principle, 
so. shall regret it, right. contrary, 
opposed give indorsement, let 
divert throwing direct vote 
it. 
 
men, mostly Whigs, repeal Missouri Compromise, 
nevertheless hesitate go restoration, lest thrown 
company allow me, old Whig, 
tell them, think Stand 
anybody stands right. Stand right, part 
goes wrong. Stand abolitionist restoring 
Missouri Compromise, stand attempts repeal 
Fugitive Slave law. latter case stand Southern 
that? still right. cases 
right. cases oppose dangerous stand 
middle ground, hold ship level 
national, nothing less national. good old Whig 
ground. desert ground company less 
American. 
 
particularly object new position avowed principle 
Nebraska law gives slavery body object 
assumes moral right enslaving 
one man another. object dangerous free 
sad evidence that, feeling prosperity, forget right; 
liberty, principle, ceased object 
fathers republic rejected it. argument 
argument ever admitted favor slavery; 
far, far only, carried ever go. 
found institution existing among us, could help, 
cast blame upon British king permitted 

 
appointed Governor Georgia early 
threatened King removal continued oppose slavery 
time King England made small profit every 
slave imported later British criticism United 
States slavery early combined 
support Civil War prime 
example 
ever right. 
 
Constitution prohibited introduction 
Northwestern Territory, country owned free it. 
framing adoption Constitution, much 
mention word "slavery" whole instrument. 
provision slave spoken 
held service prohibiting abolition 
African slave trade twenty years, trade spoken "the 
importation persons States existing 
shall think proper etc. provisions alluding 
slavery. Thus thing away Constitution, 
afflicted man away dares cut 
once, lest nevertheless, 
cutting may begin certain time. Less fathers could 
do, would do. Necessity drove far, farther 
would go. all. earliest Congress 
Constitution took view slavery. 
limits necessity. 
 
prohibited outgoing slave is, taking 
slaves United States prohibited 
bringing slaves Africa Mississippi Territory, 
Territory States Mississippi 
ten years authority 
thing States existing adoption Constitution. 
prohibited American citizens slaves 
foreign countries, as, instance, Africa 
passed law aid one two laws restraint 
internal slave trade. apparent hot haste, passed law, 
nearly year take effect first day 
first day Constitution would prohibiting African slave 
trade heavy pecuniary 1820, finding 
provisions declared slave trade 
extreme penalty death. passing 
General Government, five six original slave States adopted 
systems gradual emancipation, institution rapidly 
becoming extinct within limits. Thus see plain, 
unmistakable spirit age toward slavery hostility 
principle necessity. 
 
transformed "sacred right." Nebraska brings 
forth, places extension 
back says it, God speed you." 
chief nation ship 
state. Little little, steadily man's march grave, 
giving old new faith. Near eighty years ago began 
declaring men created equal; beginning 
run declaration, men enslave 
others "sacred right self-government." principles cannot 
stand together. opposite God ever holds 
one must despise other. connection 
support Nebraska Bill, called Declaration Independence "a 
self-evident require 
Nebraska men do. Nebraska senators sat 
present heard him, one him. 
Nebraska newspaper, Nebraska whole nation ever 
yet him. said among men, 
though were, would become man said it? 
said men captured man said would 
probably hung sooner was. said old 
Independence Hall years ago, doorkeeper would 
man thrust street. Let one 
deceived. spirit seventy-six spirit Nebraska utter 
former rapidly latter. 
 
Fellow-countrymen, Americans, South well North, shall make 
effort arrest this? Already liberal party throughout world 
express apprehension "the one institution America 
principles progress, violating 
noblest political system world ever 
enemies, warning friends. quite safe disregard 
despise it? danger liberty discarding 
earliest practice first ancient greedy 
chase make profit negro, let us beware lest tear 
even white man's charter freedom. 
 
republican dust. Let us 
it. Let us turn wash white spirit, blood, 
Revolution. Let us turn slavery claims right," back 
upon existing legal rights arguments Let us 
return position fathers gave it, let rest 
peace. Let us Declaration Independence, 
practices policy it. Let North South, let 
lovers liberty everywhere join great good 
work. this, shall saved Union, shall 
saved make keep forever worthy 
shall saved succeeding millions free happy 
people world shall rise call us blessed latest 

 
Springfield, twelve days ago, spoken substantially 
here, Judge Douglas replied me; reply here, 
shall attempt anticipate noticing points made 
there. commenced stating assumed way 
principle Nebraska Bill would effect extending slavery. 
denied intended effect would follow. 
 
argument upon point. 
intention world believed start, continue believe. 
countenance thing, friends enemies 
instantly recognized such. countenance cannot changed 
argument. easily argue color negro's Like 
may wash wash it, red witness 
still sticks horribly you. 
 
Next says Congressional intervention never prevented slavery 
prevent Northwestern Territory, 
Illinois; that, fact, Illinois came Union slave State; 
principle Nebraska Bill Illinois, 
several old States, everywhere. 
 
mere quibbling way through. Ordinance '87 
keep slavery Northwest Territory, happens 
northwest Ohio River entirely free it, 
less mile along nearly whole length 
river, entirely covered it? 
 
ordinance keep Illinois, made 
difference Illinois lie side side, 
Mississippi River dividing them, early settlements 
within 1820 number slaves 
Missouri increased Illinois ten years 
appears census nearly 
ten years Territories, States. time 
ordinance forbade slavery go Illinois, nothing forbade 
go Missouri. go Missouri, go Illinois. 
fact. one doubt reason it? says 
Illinois came Union slave State. Silence, perhaps, would 
best answer flat known history 
country. facts upon assertion 
first acquired country, far back 1787, slaves 
within held French inhabitants territorial 
legislation admitted negroes slave States indentured 
One year adoption first State constitution, 
whole number think? one hundred 
aggregate free population four 
hundred seventy one. Upon state facts people framed 
constitution prohibiting introduction slavery, 
sort owners indentured servants, giving 
freedom children born making mention 
whatever supposed slave life. small matter 
Judge manufactures argument Illinois came Union 
slave State. Let facts answer argument. 
 
principles Nebraska Bill, says, slavery 
Illinois. principle bill first planted is, 
first came law prevent it, first came 
owned country; finding here, Ordinance '87 
prevent people struggled along, finally got rid 
best could. 
 
principle Nebraska Bill abolished slavery several 
old States. Well, true several old States, last 
quarter last century, adopt systems gradual emancipation 
institution finally become extinct within limits; 
may may true principle Nebraska Bill 
cause led adoption measures. 
fifty years since last States adopted system 
emancipation. 
 
Nebraska Bill real author benevolent works, 
rather long time ceased working 
altogether. reason suspect principle 
Revolution, principle Nebraska Bill, led 
emancipation old States? Leave people old 
States, quite certain decide neither 
good thing ever ever come Nebraska 
Bill. 
 
course main argument, Judge Douglas interrupted say 
principle Nebraska Bill originated 
God made man, placed good evil him, allowing 
choose himself, responsible choice make. 
time thought merely answered accordingly. 
reply renewed serious argument. 
then, facts proposition true stated. 
God place good evil man, telling make 
contrary, tell one tree fruit 
eat, upon pain certain death. scarcely 
wish strong prohibition slavery Nebraska. 
 
argument strikes little remarkable another 
strong resemblance old argument 
right latter, king pleases 
white responsible God alone. former, 
white man pleases black slaves, 
responsible God alone. two things precisely alike, 
natural find similar arguments sustain them. 
 
argued application principle 
contended for, would require revival African slave 
argument could made favor man's right take slaves 
Nebraska could equally well made favor right 
bring coast Judge replied 
Constitution requires suppression foreign slave trade, 
require prohibition slavery Territories. 
mistake point fact. Constitution require action 
Congress either case, authorize both. 
still difference cases. 
 
regard said advantage slave States 
free matter Judge replied 
free States count five free negroes five white people, 
slave States count five slaves three whites 
last, side free States. 
 
Now, slave States count free negroes do; 
happens that, besides slaves, many free negroes 
have, thirty thousand over. Thus, free negroes balance 
ours; advantage us, consequence slaves, still 
remains stated it. 
 
reply argument compromise measures 1850 system 
provisions one could fairly 
carried subjects without corresponding equivalent 
carried it, Judge denied measures 
connection dependence upon other. mere 
always spoken 
spoken thousand constantly 
called series everybody call 
California kept Union six seven months, 
connection 
leading definition "to "to adjust settle 
difference, mutual claims 
precisely popular understanding word 

 
knew, Judge told us, measures passed 
distinct two passed votes 
precisely also know, know, 
one could passed branches Congress 
understanding others pass also. Upon understanding, 
got votes could got way. fact 
gives measures true universal 
knowledge fact given name 
expressive true character. 
 
asked: carrying Utah New Mexico laws Nebraska, 
could clear away could leave Nebraska 
introduce slavery forms constitution, 
territorial government, Utah New Mexico laws 
authorize form constitutions admitted 
Judge Douglas answered Utah New Mexico laws 
also authorized before; prove read one 
laws, follows: "That legislative power said Territory shall 
extend rightful subjects legislation, consistent 
Constitution United States provisions 
 
perceived reading nothing express 
upon subject, authority sought implied merely 
general provision "all rightful subjects 
reply insist, legal rule construction, well 
plain, popular view matter, express provision Utah 
New Mexico coming slavery, choose, shall form 
constitutions, exclusion implied authority 
subject; Congress subject distinctly minds 
made express provision, therein expressed whole 
meaning subject. 
 
Judge rather found convenient forget 
Washington territorial law passed division Oregon, 
organizing northern part Territory Washington. asserted 
act Ordinance '87, existing Oregon, 
nearly members Congress voted it, beginning 
House Representatives Charles Massachusetts, 
ending Richard Illinois; could understand 
opposed Nebraska Bill voted there, unless 
soon great political parties 
ratified compromises 1850, ratification therefore 
fresh 
 
seen Washington act before, carefully examined 
aver repeal Ordinance '87, 
prohibition slavery, it. express terms, absolutely 
nothing whole law upon fact, nothing lead 
reader think subject. judgment equally free 
everything repeal legally but, however 
may be, men legal implication, 
covert language, introduced perhaps purpose 
them? sincerely wish every man could read law quite through, 
carefully watching every sentence every line repeal 
Ordinance '87, anything equivalent it. 
 
Another point Washington intended 
Utah New Mexico acts, Judge Douglas 
inserted it, them, Washington come 
without slavery may choose adoption constitution? 
provision it; defy ingenuity man give 
reason intended follow 
Utah New Mexico laws regard question slavery. 
 
Washington act differs Utah New Mexico 
acts, Nebraska act differs both. latter 
act people left "perfectly regulate domestic 
former, laws submitted 
Congress, Washington act goes 
even absolutely territorial Legislature, 
strong guarded language, establishing banks money 
faith Territory. sacred right self-government 
hear No, sir; Nebraska Bill finds model 
acts Washington act. finds model law 
till to-day. says Napoleon, Nebraska act 
wrapped 
without model without shadow upon earth. 
 
course reply Senator Douglas remarked substance 
always considered government made white people 
negroes. Why, point mere fact, think too. 
remark Judge significance think key 
great mistake (if made 
Nebraska measure. shows Judge vivid 
impression negro consequently idea 
moral question legislating him. view 
question whether new country shall slave free matter 
utter indifference whether neighbor shall plant farm 
tobacco stock Now, whether view right 
wrong, certain great mass mankind take totally 
different view. consider slavery great moral wrong, 
feeling lies 
foundation sense justice, cannot with. 
great durable element popular action, think statesman 
safely disregard it. 
 
Senator also objects oppose matter 
entirely agree one another. reminds firm adherence 
constitutional rights slave States differ widely 
others opposing Nebraska Bill, 
says quite fair oppose variety ways. 
remember took us us measure. 
fell utter confusion. 
rose, fighting, whatever could first 
struck 
direction sound, rapidly closing upon him. 
must think divert us purpose showing us 
weapons entirely perfect 
storm shall past shall find us still Americans, less devoted 
continued union prosperity country heretofore. 
 
Finally, Judge memory Clay Webster, 
great men, men great assailed them? 
enemy shall make profit assuming 
defend me, go repeal 
Missouri Compromise; ever go it? went 
Compromise ever go them? greatly devoted 
Union; small measure ability ever less so? Clay 
Webster dead question authority shall 
Senator say would side Mr. Clay 
leading spirit making Missouri Compromise; 
alive would take lead breaking it? truth 
support Whigs necessity Judge, 
names Clay Webster old friends 
deserted numbers leave live by. 
came own, received not; turns unto 

 
word Judge's desperate assumption compromises 
1850 connection one another; Illinois came Union 
slave State, similar ones. 
denial history country. know 
compromises 1850 dependent other; know 
Illinois came Union free know anything. 
know things, know ever 
Revolutionary War chief Washington. deny things 
deny national puts end 
argument. man stand repeat 
two two make four, know nothing power argument 
stop him. think answer Judge long sticks 
flies them, cannot work argument 
mental actually close mouth it. 
case commend seventy thousand answers 
Pennsylvania, Ohio, Indiana. 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST SENATE SUPPORT 
 
CHARLES 
 
De Co., Nov. 10, 1854 
 
DEAR SIR:--You used express good deal me, 
still so, time. friends really 
U.S. Senate, grateful could make mark 
among Please write events, giving 
names, members round you. 
Direct Springfield. 
 
Let confidential. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. J. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 
 
November 27, 1854 T. J. ESQ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--It come round whig may, possibility, 
elected United States Senate, want chance 
man. member Legislature, vote give. Think 
over, see whether better go me. 
 
Write me, let confidential. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Dec. 1, 1854. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I really got head try United States 
Senator, and, could support, chances would reasonably 
good. know, claims 
place therefore cannot ask yield me, 
thinking becoming candidate, yourself. If, however, not, 
like remembered affectionately you; also 
make mark Anti-Nebraska members way. 
 
know, objection tell, let know whether Trumbull 
intends make does, suppose two men St. 
one, both, Madison, him. Legislature, 
clearly enough, joint Senate close, 
told to-day Nebraska men election, 
can. Even get joint vote, shall difficulty unite 
forces. Please write me, let confidential. 
 
friend, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POLITICAL 
 
JUSTICE 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., December 6, 1854. 
 
SIR:--I understand contemplation present clerk 
appoint new one Circuit District Courts Illinois. 
friendly present and, sake 
family, wish retained long possible 
court so. 
 
however, recommended William 
Butler successor, wish write taken 

 
William J. Black also applicant appointment, write 
friends say every way worthy 
office, doubt upon give 
great satisfaction. 
 
servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. J. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, December 1854 
 
HON. T. J. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 11th received last night, 
thank you. course prefer others; yet neither 
heart conscience say better man Mr. 
shall terrible struggle desperate 
bent desperate accidentally learned one leaders 
writing member south here, following language: 
 
beaten. clean majority least joint 
us, must them. Douglas must 
must elect must elect Nebraska United 
States Senator, none all." Similar letters, doubt, 
written every Nebraska considering best 
beat them. send you, mail, copy Peoria speech. 
may seen before, may think worth seeing now. 
 
speak Nebraska letter mentioned wish 
become public, received information. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1855 
 
 
 
 
LOSS PRIMARY SENATOR 
 
E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, February 9, 1855 DEAR SIR: 
 
began votes, Shields Trumbull Trumbull 
elected. fact different members voted three new 
ones second losing four old ones. came 
yield Trumbull's Governor work. 
secretly candidate ever since fall election. 
 
members round canal 
nevertheless nearly Democrats old personal friends his. 
plan privately impress belief good 
Anti-Nebraska one least could secured 
instructions, could easily passed. 
 
Nebraska men, course, found 
could elect avowed Nebraska man, determined let 
get men could, whatever means could, ask 
questions. 
 
Nebraska men confident election though 
denying candidate, much believing also 
would elect him. wanted first make show good faith 
Shields voting times, secret men also 
wanted make show good faith voting us times. 
led off. seventh think, signal given 
Nebraska men turn acted man, one 
. . Next ballot remaining Nebraska man one pretended 
went him, giving next still another, giving 
wanting three election. meantime friends, 
view expected turning 
Trumbull till risen reduced would 
never desert except became satisfied 
could prevent election one two ballots more, could 
possibly single ballot friends begin return 
determined strike once, accordingly 
advised remaining friends go him, elected 
tenth 
 
way thing done. think would done 
circumstances. 
 
could headed every combination elected, 
double defeat gives pleasure 
gives whole, perhaps well 
general cause Trumbull elected. Nebraska men confess 
hate worse anything could happened. great 
consolation see worse am. 
 
forever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RETURN LAW PROFESSION 
 
PORTER, NEW YORK. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, MARCH 10, 1855 
 
5th received, also 15th 
last, inclosing bond received bond 
politics, course business. since 
beaten gone work again. 
 
practice to-day open correspondence 
Henry E. Esq., Ill., view getting 
job hands. good man undertake it. 
 
Write whether shall return bond you. 
 
respectfully, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
O. H. BROWNING. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 23, 
 
HON. O. H. BROWNING. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter Judge Logan shown us him; and, 
consent, answer it. became probable would 
vacancy Supreme Bench, public opinion, side 
river, seemed universally directed Logan proper man 
fill it. mean public opinion side politics, small 
manifestation different direction side. result is, 
good deal pressed allow name used, 
consented it, provided done perfect 
good feeling part friends. We, 
anxious it; 
mind turned upon matter. We, therefore glad 
letter, information brings us, mixed regret 
elect Logan both. shall 
name, Quincy papers. 
 
truly friends, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, B. S. JOHN T. 
 
 
 
 
H. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 7, 
 
H. C. WHITNEY, ESQ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your note containing election news 
thank you. use, however. Logan worse beaten 
man ever since elections 
twelve hundred county. hands 
law also beaten. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE FRIEND 
 
F. SPEED. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, August 24, 1855 
 
DEAR know poor am. Ever since 
received agreeable letter 22d May, 
write answer it. suggest political 
action, now, would suppose quite 
much, however, may think. know dislike slavery, fully 
admit abstract wrong it. far cause difference. 
say sooner yield legal right slave, 
especially bidding 
would see Union dissolved. aware one bidding 
yield right; certainly not. leave matter entirely 
yourself. also acknowledge rights obligations 
Constitution regard slaves. confess hate see poor 
creatures hunted caught carried back 
unrequited lips keep quiet. 1841 
together tedious trip steamboat Louisville St. 
Louis. may remember, well do, Louisville mouth 
Ohio board ten dozen slaves together 
sight continued me, see something 
like every time touch Ohio slave 
fair assume interest thing has, 
continually power making ought rather 
appreciate much great body Northern people 
feelings, order maintain loyalty Constitution 
Union. oppose extension slavery judgment 
feeling prompt me, obligations contrary. 
must differ say, 
President, would send army hang leaders Missouri 
outrages upon Kansas still, Kansas fairly votes 
slave State must admitted Union must dissolved. 
votes slave State is, means 
say would hang men? Must still admitted, 
Union phase question first 
becomes practical one. assumption may fair 
decision slavery question Kansas, plainly see would 
differ Nebraska law. look upon enactment law, 
violence beginning. conceived violence, 
maintained violence, executed violence. say 
conceived violence, destruction Missouri Compromise, 
circumstances, nothing less violence. passed 
violence could passed votes 
many members violence known 
maintained violence, elections since clearly demand 
demand openly disregarded. 
 
say men ought hung way executing law; say 
way executed quite good 
executed precise way intended first, 
else Nebraska man express astonishment Poor 
public man silly enough believe 
anything like fairness ever intended, bravely 

 
Kansas form slave constitution, ask 
admitted Union, take already settled question, 
settled means every principle 
law ever held court North South, every negro taken Kansas 
free; yet, utter disregard spirit violence 
beautiful Legislature gravely passes law hang 
man shall venture inform negro legal rights. 
subject real object law. If, like hang upon 
building, shall among 
fate. humble sphere, shall advocate restoration 
Missouri Compromise long Kansas remains Territory, when, 
foul means, seeks come Union slave State, 
shall oppose it. loath case withhold assent 
enjoyment property acquired located good 
admit good faith taking negro Kansas held slavery 
probability man. man sense enough 
property much sense misunderstand 
outrageous character whole Nebraska business. 
opposition admission Kansas shall company, 
may beaten. are, shall account attempt dissolve 
Union. think probable, however, shall beaten. Standing 
unit among yourselves, can, directly indirectly, bribe enough 
men carry day, could open proposition 
establish Get hold man North whose position 
ability make support measure, whatever 
may be, Democratic party necessity, thing done. 
this, let tell Douglas introduced Nebraska Bill 
February afterward called session Illinois 
Legislature. one hundred members composing two branches 
body, seventy latter held caucus 
Nebraska Bill talked of, formally thereby 
discovered three, more, favor measure. 
day two Douglas's orders came resolutions passed approving 
bill; passed large truth 
Democratic masses, too, Democratic 
well Whig, even nearer unanimous it; but, soon 
party necessity supporting became apparent, way 
Democrats began see wisdom justice perfectly 

 
say Kansas fairly votes free State, Christian 
rejoice it. decent talk way, 
doubt never vote way. Although 
private letter conversation express preference 
Kansas shall free, would vote man Congress would say 
thing man could elected district 
slave State. think company ought 
yet next Presidential election vote exact type 
representative 
small, class among you; yet politics 
dictate course you, completely masters 
master negroes. inquire stand. 
point. think others say 
Whigs, Washington, voted 
Wilmot Proviso good forty times; never heard 
one attempting that. oppose 
extension slavery. certain. could 
be? one abhors oppression negroes favor 
degrading classes white people? progress appears 
pretty nation began declaring "all men 
created equal." practically read "all men created equal, 
except get control, read "all men 
created equal, except negroes foreigners 
comes this, shall prefer country make 
pretense Russia, instance, despotism 
taken without base 
 
Mary probably pass day two Louisville kindest 
regards Mrs. Speed. leading subject letter 
sympathy yet let say am, 
 
friend forever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1856 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST RAILWAY PASS 
 
R. P. MORGAN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, February 13, 1856. 
 
R. P. MORGAN, 
 
Says John, "Here's old rotten I've broke 
it. wish would it, shall want borrow 
Acting precedent, say, "Here's old 
wish would take send new one, 
shall want use first 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
(A common term, time, railroad 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH DELIVERED FIRST REPUBLICAN STATE CONVENTION 
 
ILLINOIS, HELD BLOOMINGTON, MAY 29, 1856. 
 
Report William C. 
 
(Mr. notes made time, written 
claim speech, literally 
correct followed argument, many cases 
sentences Mr. Lincoln spoke 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN GENTLEMEN: [Cries "Take 
say, Court, 
friends Anti-Nebraska got together Springfield elected one 
delegate represent old Sangamon convention, 
certainly movement virtue 
meeting hardly called delegates 
inasmuch as, properly speaking, represent nobody ourselves. think 
altogether fair say Anti-Nebraska party Sangamon, 
although good deal Anti-Nebraska feeling there; say 
myself, think may speak also 
fully approve platform done [A 
voice, even regularly 
right answer call speak. suppose truly stand 
public sentiment Sangamon great question repeal, 
although yet represent many numbers taken distinct 
position question. 
 
trying mere movement 
call halt turn steps backward needs help good 
counsels unless popular opinion makes strongly 
felt, change made present course, blood flow 
account Nebraska, hands raised 
 
[The last sentence uttered earnest, not, 
indeed, manner, make cold chill me. Others gave 
similar 
 
listened great interest earnest appeal made Illinois 
men gentleman Lawrence S. addressed 
us deeply moved statement 
wrongs done free-State men there. think say 
true men North them, ought willing 
possible needful thing right must 
promise ought not, lest called perform 
must calm consider whole difficulty, 
determine possible must led excitement 
passion sober judgments would approve 
higher serious business 
temporary measures. 
 
stand firmly stand firmly right. 
know great political moral wrongs done, outrages 
committed, denounce wrongs although cannot, 
present, much more. desire reach beyond personal 
outrages establish rule apply all, prevent 
future 
 
seen to-day every shade popular opinion represented 
here, Freedom, rather Free Soil, basis. come 
together sort representatives popular opinion 
extension slavery territory free fact well law, 
pledged word statesmen nation more. 
assembled protest well 
great wrong, take measures, well can, 
make wrong right; place nation, far may possible 
now, repeal Missouri Compromise; plain 
way restore Compromise, demand determine 
Kansas shall free! [Immense applause.] 
necessary, devotion principles Declaration 
Independence, let practical work limited above. 
know perfect agreement sentiment public 
questions might rightfully considered convention, 
indignation must feel cannot 
us must give something good cause. one desire 
mind, one wish common us all, 
made; counsel earnestly bury 
sink personal feeling, make things work common purpose 
united agreed about, present agree 
absolutely must done rightful mode 
Slavery must kept [Applause.] 
right there. lose Kansas freedom, example 
set prove fatal freedom end. We, therefore, 
language Bible, must axe root 
time firm, 
resolute action. [Applause.] 
 
Nebraska Bill, rather Nebraska law, one 
legislation, act legislative whose 
result, indeed intention, make slavery unless 
headed effective way, fair way see land 
freedom land slavery fact. [Sensation.] 
open two eyes, see so. need 
state, command universal approval, almost entire North, 
well large following border States, radically opposed 
planting slavery free territory. Probably popular vote 
throughout nation nine voters free States, 
least one-half border States, could express 
sentiments would vote issue; safe say 
two votes entire nation would opposed it. 
yet, spite sentiment free country, 
fair way see Kansas present admission slave 
State. Indeed, local law Kansas, deny 
slavery exists even now. every principle law, negro 
Kansas free; yet bogus Legislature makes infamous crime 
tell free! 
 
Statutes Kansas, chapter Sec. free person, 
speaking writing, assert maintain persons right 
hold slaves Territory, shall introduce Territory, 
print, write, . . . book, paper, 
circular containing denial right persons 
hold slaves Territory person shall deemed guilty 
punished imprisonment hard labor term 
less two years. Sec. person conscientiously opposed 
holding slaves, admit right hold slaves 
Territory, shall sit trial prosecution 
violation Sections Act. 
 
party lash fear ridicule justice liberty; 
singular fact, none less fact, well known 
common experience, men things terror 
party lash would account consideration 
men march mouth cannon 
without shrinking run terrible name 
even pronounced worthless creature they, good reason, 
press point Douglas 
introduced Nebraska Bill extra session 
Legislature succeeding February, seventy-five 
party caucus, fully three 
votes, whole measure. days 
orders came Washington, commanding approve 
party lash brought caucus, 
passed large majority. masses it, party 
necessity carried it; passed lower house 
Congress people, reason. 
greatest danger lies that, profess government 
law reason, law give way violence demand 
awful power. Like great think 
great everything comes way, 
makes read once, law book, "a slave 
human legally person thing." 
safeguards liberty broken down, attempted, 
made things free negroes, long, think you, 
begin make things poor white men? [Applause.] deceived. 
Revolutions go Democratic party 
declared men created equal. successor leadership 
written word men, making read "all white men 
created equal." Pray, may 
get power, add word making read "all 
white 
 
Meanwhile negro fruitful subject 
John paid respects to, 
calls immortal Declaration "a self-evident 
shadow Hill 
home Warren 
side house, dares away birthday promise 
liberty Declaration "a string 
Southern Whigs, working hand hand 
proslavery Democrats, making theories practical. Thomas 
Jefferson, moral element slavery, 
solemnly declared trembled country remembered 
God Judge Douglas, insignificant wave hand, 
"don't care whether slavery voted voted down." Now, slavery 
right, even negative, right treat 
manner. moral political wrong, 
considers be, answer God attempt spread 
fortify it? [Applause.] 
 
man, Judge Douglas other, maintain 
negative, merely position question; and, accordingly, 
Union made white men white men 
matter fact, first branch proposition 
historically true; government made white men, 
superior race. 
government, speak, declaration "all men created 
equal," entitled "life, liberty, pursuit happiness." 
[Applause.] 
 
so, framers Constitution particular 
keep instrument word reason 
slavery would ultimately come end, wish 
free country human beings ever 
slavery. [Applause.] argument superior 
negro one talent Let 
negro possess little independence; one 
permitted keep little has. slavery 
endure test reason yet like 
Douglas, use sort assumption might better 
like above, order prepare mind gradual, 
none less certain, slavery upon 
fair domain freedom. however much may argue upon it, 
soft phrase, slavery maintained violence. 
repeal Missouri Compromise violence. violation 
law sacred obligations honor, overthrow trample 
foot solemn compromise, obtained fearful loss freedom 
one fairest Western Congress violated 
confidence constituents voting bill; public 
sentiment, shown elections 1854, demanded restoration 
compromise, Congress violated trust refusing simply 
force numbers hold it. murderous violence 
used now, order force slavery Kansas; cannot done 
way. [Sensation.] 
 
necessary result establish rule instead 
rule law perpetuate spread slavery, 
time make general. see ends line. 
Washington, spot outrage started, 
Sumner beaten slowly senators 
claim gentlemen stood by, 
act, even applauding afterward places Senate. Even 
Douglas, man, saw within helping distance, yet let 
murderous blows fall Then, end line, 
time Sumner Lawrence destroyed 
crime freedom. prominent liberty 
Kansas, must give way power slavery. 
two days ago, Judge Trumbull found necessary propose bill 
Senate prevent general civil war restore peace Kansas. 
 
live midst anxiety expect 
new disaster newspaper read. healthful 
political state? tendencies signs 
times point plainly way [Sensation.] 
 
early days Constitution slavery South 
North alike, evil, division sentiment 
controlled geographical lines considerations climate, 
moral views. Petitions abolition slavery 
presented first Congress Virginia Massachusetts 
show harmony state fugitive slave 
law passed dissenting voice Senate, 
seven dissenting votes House. was, however, wise law, 
and, Constitution, one. Twenty-five years 
later, law proposed thirty-five 
years that, present law, drafted Mason Virginia, 
passed Northern votes. not, now, complaining law, 
trying show current proposed law 
far less offensive present one. Continental Congress 
pledged itself, without dissenting vote, wholly slave 
trade, neither purchase less three 
months passage Declaration Independence, 
Congress adopted declaration unanimously resolved "that 
slave imported thirteen United [Great 
applause.] 
 
second day July, draft Declaration 
Independence reported Congress committee, 
slave trade characterized "an "a 
"a cruel war 
human [Applause.] agreed except South 
Carolina Georgia, order preserve harmony, 
necessity case, expressions Indeed, abolition 
societies existed far south Virginia; well-known fact 
Washington, Jefferson, Madison, Lee, Henry, Mason, 
qualified abolitionists, much radical subject 
Whig Democratic parties claim to-day. March 1, 1784, 
Virginia ceded confederation lands lying northwest 
Ohio River. Jefferson, Chase Maryland, Rhode Island, 
committee territory thereafter reported 
slavery exist year report adopted, 
Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Mississippi 
also would free; required assent nine States 
ratify it. North Carolina thus vote 
Delaware, Georgia, New Jersey refused vote. point fact, 
was, assented six States. Three years later square vote 
exclude slavery one vote, New 
York, it. yet, years later, five thousand 
citizens Illinois, voting mass less twelve thousand, 
deliberately, long heated contest, voted introduce slavery 
Illinois; and, to-day, large party free State Illinois 
willing vote slavery fair domain 
Kansas, notwithstanding received freedom long 
birth political community. repeat, therefore, question: 
plain direction [Sensation.] colonial 
time, Mason, Jefferson hostile slavery 
Virginia 
Virginia made earnest effort get rid old Massachusetts 
did. circumstances 
good leading men Yet within less fifty years 
Virginia changed made cotton 
sugar States one leading applause.] 
 
Constitutional Convention, George Mason Virginia made 
violent abolition speech friends Lovejoy would desire 
make speech could safely repeated anywhere 
Southern soil enlightened year. But, 
differences opinion subject even then, discussion 
see Kansas slave code, which, know, 
Missouri slave code, merely across river, 
even express opinion hostile foul blot land 
Washington Declaration Independence. [Sensation.] 
 
1849, test vote, mighty influence 
Henry Clay many good could get 
expression favor gradual emancipation plain issue marching 
toward light civilization Ohio Illinois; State 
Hardin Henry Clay, arm, took 
black toward deadly 
doubt doubt must 
lay aside prejudices march, shoulder shoulder, great 
army [Applause.] 
 
Every Fourth July young orators proclaim "the land 
free home Well, now, orators get 
next year, and, may be, year, would like 
old farmer get deny it? 
would like that? suppose Kansas comes slave State, 
it, free-State men come 
back North, like 
legs, 
let go so, won't dare say 
[Sensation 
 
man doubt that, even spite people's will, slavery 
triumph violence, unless made manifest 
Even Governor claimed outset contest Kansas 
fair, got eyes open last; believe that, 
result moral physical violence, Kansas soon apply 
admission slave State. yet can't mistake people 
don't want so, land free natural 
political law. law, free understanding 
case, decided nearly century ago, great 
Lord held slavery nature must take 
rise positive (as distinguished law; 
country age could traced back 
one please tell positive law establishes slavery 
[A voice: "The bogus Aye, bogus And, 
principle, gang Missouri could come Illinois 
declare legal would 
legal slavery Kansas. express land 
Washington Jefferson, may soon brought face face 
fact showing world acts prefer 
slavery [Sensation.] 
 
is, believe, principle law one party contract 
violates grossly chiefly destroy object 
made, party may rescind it. ask ain't 
good law. [Voices: Well, right, go 
whole, entire Missouri Compromise thus turning Missouri 
free State; like know like 
one point making free State 
Missouri making slave State Kansas. [Great applause.] 
ain't one bit difference, except way would great mercy 
never said, Whig party never said, 
oppose Nebraska Bill body say, 
intention interfering slavery slave States. 
platform says contrary. allow slavery exist slave 
States, slavery right good, necessities 
Union. grant fugitive slave law 
fathers bound 
carry agreement. agree introduce slavery 
regions previously exist. contrary, said 
example teachings deem n't 
consider so; wise right 
it. [Voices: 
interfere slavery exists never tried 
give reasonable efficient fugitive slave law. [A voice: 
say [Applause.] part bargain, 'm 
living it; go I'm bound more, 
won't agree further. [Great applause.] 
 
We, Illinois, feel especially proud provision 
Missouri Compromise excluding slavery Kansas; 
Illinois man, Jesse B. Thomas, father. Henry Clay, credited 
Compromise general terms, even vote 
provision, advocated ultimate admission second 
compromise; Thomas was, beyond controversy, real author 
branch Compromise. show 
Northern members toward Southern test vote exclude 
slavery Missouri, ninety voted exclude, 
exclude, every vote slave States ranged former 
fourteen votes free States, seven New England 
alone; vote exclude slavery Kansas, 
vote one hundred for, 
whole, was, course, Southern triumph. idle 
contend otherwise, done 
shown votes quite emphatically expressions 
representative men. Mr. South Carolina never known 
commit political great judgment section; 
declared measure "would restore 
result demanded every consideration discretion, 
wisdom, measure came 
President Monroe approval, put member cabinet 
question: "Has Congress constitutional power prohibit slavery 
John C. Calhoun William H. 
South, equally John Quincy Adams, Benjamin Smith 
Thompson North, alike answered, without qualification 
measure, great consequence South, 
passed; Missouri was, means it, finally enabled knock 
door Republic open passage slaves. And, 
spite this, Freedom's share taken 
force votes, called popular will. 
name I, common give wicked 
[Sensation.] 
 
even contest Missouri constitution 
came Congress approval, forbade free negro 
entering State. short, Illinois "black 
hidden away constitution controversy thus 
Mr. Clay's talents shone 
controversy shook union foundation finally settled 
satisfaction conservative parties sides line, 
though either, Missouri admitted 
small majority six lower House. great majority, 
think, would given Kansas also secured slavery? 
[A voice: "A majority "A majority way," 
answered. think would safe Northern man 
confronted constituents voted 
Missouri Kansas hopeless slavery? yet man Douglas, 
constituents highest talents 
direction, carried triumph State hailed 
honor applauding act. 
shows whither thing slavery powerful 
high minister 
even greatest men. strength, like rolling 
Monstrous crimes committed name 
persons would dare commit individuals. 
almost belief. 
one might wonder see slavery advance steadily 
new even 
see steady advance land dedicated proposition "all 
men created [Sensation.] 
 
yields nothing itself; keeps has, gets 
really came dangerously near securing Illinois 
get Missouri first proposition admit 
Arkansas Missouri one slave State. territory divided 
Arkansas came in, without serious question, slave State; 
afterwards Missouri, not, sort equality, free, also slave 
State. Florida Kansas forced 
[Sensation.] wherever 
six years dangerously near 
California came slave State. Texas slave State, four 
slave States may carved vast yet, 
year slavery abolished throughout vast region royal 
decree sovereign Mexico. please tell 
right slavery exists Texas to-day? right as, higher 
greater than, slavery seeking political 
(as 
(as Senate required. history repeats 
itself; even slavery kept course 
violence past, judgment, met 
people bent 
 
have, afternoon, heard bitter Brooks 
Washington, 
slavery. certainly going advocate 
them; acts necessary 
Nebraska law. reserve highest censure authors 
use. believe 
Shakespeare said, "Where offence let axe 
and, opinion, man Douglas Northern men Congress 
advocate guilty thousand 
murderous be. [Applause.] 
 
made good beginning to-day. Methodist friends would 
say, "I feel good here." may find fault 
moderation platform, recollect "the 
battle always strong, race grave 
moderation generally safer 
struggle likely long earnest, must not, action, 
repel sympathy us rather win 
must overlook facts 
new comparatively weak, enemies 
relatively strong. administration 
political power; and, right wrong, present numbers. 
friends urge appeal arms much force eloquence 
recollect government arrayed us, 
numbers arrayed us or, state nearer 
truth, yet expressly us; 
repel friends rather gain anything revolutionary 
stands, must appeal sober sense 
patriotism people. make day grow 
strong grow strong violence 
injustice And, unless truth justice 
hollow lie, majority while, 
revolution accomplish none less radical 
result pacific measures. battle freedom 
fought principle. Slavery violation eternal right. 
necessities condition; sure 
God school children read, BLACK FOUL LIE NEVER 
CONSECRATED GOD'S [Immense applause lasting 

 
One greatest difficulties is, men know slavery 
crime ruinous nation peculiar 
condition circumstances, advocate though 
damning Henry Clay brilliant example 
others statesmen compelled so; thus 
slavery secures actual support heart. Yet 
Henry Clay forced compromise secured 
slavery great State well political advantage. hated 
slavery less, loved whole Union more. long slavery 
great compromise, proslavery could 
sufficiently cover compromise stands 

 
   never mention him, 
   name never 
   lips forbid speak 
   familiar 
 
one cherished measures, ghost 
would arise rebuke them. [Great applause.] 
 
Now, let us friends, appeal moderation 
patriotism sober second thought; awakened 
public conscience. repeal sacred Missouri Compromise 
installed weapons incendiary 
weapons 
ignorance, see 
fruits dying bed heroic "Free 
smoking 
free-State Governor Kansas chained stake freedom's soil like 
crime freedom. [Applause.] see Christian 
statesmen, Christian newspapers, Christian applauding 
act low UPON VICTIM BEHIND BACK 
DEALT DEADLY BLOW. [Sensation applause.] note political 
coming common 
one hand, sometimes 
and, hand, fully 
significance cannot pass 
constitute sign times. Everything world 
everything else, fruits Nebraska Bill like 
poisoned source come. say may 
sooner later compelled meet force time 
yet come, and, true ourselves, may never come. mistake 
ballot stronger Therefore let 
slavery use bullets; let us wait patiently till November fire 
ballots return; peaceful policy believe shall 
ultimately [Applause.] 
 
policy Illinois early fathers fought 
good fight gained victory. free men State, led 
Governor Coles native Maryland President 
private determined beautiful never 
one title himself. resolute 
winds sweep across broad shall never 
cool brow, shall streams bring joy 
gladness free soil water tired feet, long 
heavenly streams bless land, 
memory remain, humanity minister 
SHALL FOREVER FREE! [Great Yates, Williams, 
convention came Kentucky Illinois 
going better conditions, also 
get away slavery. said me, understood among 
us Kentuckians don't like one bit. Now, we, 
blessings liberty early men Illinois left us, refuse 
like privilege free men seek plant Freedom's 
Western stand neighbors 
seek better conditions Kansas 
Christian men, strong free ourselves, 
hold iron anew already oppressed 
unto written, "that decree 
write 
afford deeply human 
 
One great trouble matter is, slavery insidious 
power, equally open violence well 
management Even Ordinance 1787, 
settlers Indiana Illinois one government tried 
get Congress allow slavery temporarily, petitions end 
sent General Harrison, Governor, urged 
capital. liberty here. 
John Virginia made vigorous report it; 
although well get three favorable reports it, 
yet United States Senate, aid slave States, finally 
good. [Applause.] hall to-day 
temple free men instead negro [Great applause 
let slavery get planted locality, ever weak 
doubtful title, ever small numbers, like Canada 
can't root out. may 
slavery; neighbor five six slaves, excellent 
son married beg help 
save property, vote interests principle 
hoping vote losing side. 
others same; ways slavery gets sure 
done whole mighty force 
committed support. process working Kansas 
to-day. must recollect slave property worth 
free-State men must work sentiment alone. 
call secret 
deadly work. 
 
strange thing, moral law know 
of, man loses horse, whole country turn 
help hang man shade two 
crowd hang one aids restoring 
liberty. slavery, horse 
sacred man; essence squatter popular 
don't care call one man chooses make slave 
another, third man shall allowed object. 
free Kansas, allowed stand, next thing see 
negroes Africa Charleston, one thing 
truly lawful other; 
got stamp out, else stamp us out. [Sensation applause.] 
 
Two years ago, Springfield, Judge Douglas avowed Illinois came 
Union slave State, slavery 
operation great, everlasting principle "popular 
sovereignty." Well, now, argument must answered, 
little truth mean 
true would us believe. could essentially 
true Ordinance '87 valid. But, point fact, 
beings called slaves French 
settlements first State constitution fact, 
don't deny it. Slaves brought early 
kept spite Ordinance 1787 it. slavery 
here. contrary, influence ordinance 
number influence 
squatter sovereignty, right across river Missouri, increased 
seven thousand two hundred eleven time; slavery 
finally faded Illinois, influence law freedom, 
grew stronger stronger Missouri, law practice 
"popular sovereignty." point fact one hundred 
seventeen slaves Illinois one year admission, one every 
four hundred seventy or, state another 
way, Illinois slave State 1820, New York New 
Jersey much greater slave States greater numbers, slavery 
established early times. vital 
difference States Judge's Kansas 
sought slavery already 
established, Judge far can, 
freedom, established Missouri Compromise. 
[Voices: 
 
Union fearful stout old ship, 
many hard blow, "the stars aye, 
Power, greater efforts men, fight us. 
must decline burden responsibility, take 
counsel unworthy Whatever duty urges us omit must 
done adversaries break 
laws, counsel afford example us. 
Therefore, let us Declaration Independence; let us continue 
obey Constitution laws; let us keep step music 
Union. Let us draw speak, around slave States, 
hateful institution, like poisoning itself, perish 
[Applause.] 
 
cannot free men is, national choice, 
land slavery. deny freedom others deserve 
themselves; and, rule God, cannot long retain 
applause.] 
 
ever, friends, seriously reflect upon speed 
tending Within memory men present leading 
statesman Virginia could make abolitionist speeches 
old and, said, even "free crime 
declare "free sentiments others 
uttered would entitle us, us, 
yet suppose that, like Paul, "free 
thing allowed continue, one step 
impress rule Illinois. [Sensation.] 
 
conclusion is, must restore Missouri Compromise. 
must highly resolve Kansas must free! [Great applause.] 
must birthday promise must 
Declaration Independence; must make good essence well 
form avowal "the word slave ought appear 
must even go further, decree local 
law, instrument, shall shelter 
must make land liberty fact, name. seeking 
attain indispensable liberty 
pride shall loyal Constitution 
matter though 
Kansas shall come slave State; matter 
shall restore SAY SOUTHERN DISUNIONISTS, 
WON'T GO UNION, 
 
[This audience rose feet en 
waved threw hats air, ran 
several minutes. wrought transformation 
meanwhile, like political 
 
let us, meanwhile, appeal sense patriotism people, 
let us spread enthusiasm 
aroused vast freedom. Let us 
commence electing gallant soldier Governor 
stood honor State alike 
Mexico floor Congress, 
Southern greater moral effect 
border accomplish Kansas. 
power magic popular opinion. let us 
while, probability, resort force needed, 
moderation forbearance stand US good when, ever, 
MUST MAKE APPEAL BATTLE GOD [Immense applause 
rush 
 
One realize ability move people's minds Southern 
Conspiracy right hate man. He, better time 
able tear 

 
 
 
 
POLITICAL CORRESPONDENCE 
 
W. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, July 9, 1856. 
 
DEAR expect go Chicago probably 
shall remain two weeks. 
 
turned blind first heard beaten Lovejoy 
but, much reflection, really believe best let 
stand. This, course, wish confidential. 
 
get went office, got them, put 
hands myself. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
WILLIAM 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, July 12, 1856 
 
29th June duly received. answer 
me. morning received another written 
consultation you. let tell 
 
1. hardly spare time. 
 
2. scarcely known party preceding election 
call help neighboring States lost State. Last 
fall, friends Ohio, others, lost 
State. Last spring adversaries New full South 
lost State. so, generally, seems stir 
enemies friends. 
 
enemy called foreign foreign champion 
objection drive shall 
reach Chicago night attend little business 
court. Consider things write Chicago. 
Especially write whether visit you. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPUBLICAN CAMPAIGN SPEECH 
 
FRAGMENT SPEECH ILLINOIS, FREMONT CAMPAIGN, 
 
AUGUST 1, 1856. 
 
charge us mean 
aim dissolve Union, answer 
act answer untrue. heard us assert 
really believe find 
platform, speeches, not, 
withdraw charge. 
 
may say that, though result 
succeed, therefore fact. 
grave charge make us, certainly right demand 
specify way dissolve Union. 
effect this? 
 
specification offered Mr. Fillmore 
Albany speech. charge elect President 
Vice-President free States, dissolve Union. 
open Constitution provides President 
Vice-President United States shall different States, says 
nothing States. Andrew 
Jackson, Tennessee, John C. South Carolina, 
elected President Vice-President, slave States; one 
thought dissolving Union account. 1840 Harrison, 
Ohio, Tyler, Virginia, elected. 1841 Harrison died John 
Tyler succeeded Presidency, William R. King, Alabama, 
elected acting Vice-President one supposed 
Union danger. fact, time Mr. Fillmore uttered 
idle charge, state things United States it. Mr. 
New Hampshire, Mr. Bright, Indiana, free 
States, President Vice-President, Union stands 
stand. pretend ought dissolve Union, 
facts show therefore charge may dismissed without 
consideration. 
 
specification made, one could made 
restoration restriction 1820, making United States 
territory free territory, would dissolve Union. Gentlemen, 
require decided majority pass act. We, majority, 
able constitutionally purpose, would desire 
dissolve Union. say restriction slavery would 
unconstitutional, States would submit 
grant unconstitutional act law; 
ask take construction Constitution. 
Supreme Court United States tribunal decide 
question, submit also, 
end matter. you? not, 
We, majority, would strive dissolve 
Union; attempt made, must you, 
us Union, event, 
dissolved. don't want dissolve it, attempt won't 
let you. sword, army navy treasury, 
hands command, could it. government would 
weak indeed majority army navy 
treasury could preserve attacked 
minority. talk 
dissolution Union nothing want 
dissolve Union; shall not. 
 
 
 
 
DANGER 
 
JOHN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, AUG. 4, 1856 
 
DEAR SIR:--I understand Fillmore man. If, Fremont 
Buchanan, really prefer election Buchanan, burn 
without reading line further. would like defeat Buchanan 
allow word you: one pretend Fillmore 
carry vote State? heard single man pretend 
so. Every vote taken Fremont given Fillmore much 
favor Buchanan men see this; hence great 
anxiety favor Fillmore movement. know 
greatly prefer man character go 
Fillmore Buchanan expect several go you, 
would go Fremont go directly 
 
think understand relative strength three parties 
State well one man does, opinion to-day 
Buchanan alone Fremont Fillmore 
 
gives B. State leaves minority 
whole 
 
Fremont Fillmore men united already are, 
cannot beaten. long letter, contains whole 
story. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JESSE K. DUBOIS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 19, 1856. 
 
DEAR letter sheet Mr. Miller's 
received. absent four days. know court 

 
Trumbull written committee set appointments 
made commencing Springfield, 11th 
extend throughout south half State. goes 
will, strain every nerve 
him. cannot promise now. 
 
truly ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HARRISON 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, September 8, 1856. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I understand Fillmore man. Let prove 
every vote withheld Fremont given Fillmore State 
actually chance President. Suppose Buchanan 
gets slave States Pennsylvania, one State 
elected, matter gets rest. suppose 
Fillmore gets two slave States Maryland Buchanan 
Fillmore goes House Representatives, may 
made President compromise. suppose, again, friends 
throw away thousand votes Indiana Illinois; 
inevitably give States Buchanan, compensate 
loss Maryland Kentucky, elect him, leave 
Fillmore chance House Representatives it. 
 
plain adding weight three small Mr. 
Fillmore possible chance carry Illinois himself, 
plainly interest let Fremont take it, thus keep 
hands deceived. Buchanan hard horse beat 
race. Let Illinois, nothing beat him; 
get Illinois men throwing away votes upon Mr. 
one persuade Mr. Fillmore carry 
seventy newspapers Illinois opposing Buchanan, 
three four support Mr. rest going 
Fremont. newspapers fair proportion 
not, tell why. 
 
Again, three four Fillmore newspapers, two, least, 
supported part Buchanan men, understand. know 
know Fillmore movement helps them, 
therefore help it. think things over, act according 
judgment. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Dr. R. 
 
Sept. 14, 1856. 
 
Dr. R. Ill. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 8th inviting 
30th received. feel owe friends 
good come can; get there, 
shall think efforts needed farther south. 
 
Present regards Mrs. believe ever, 
 
friend, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HENRY IOWA. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Sept. 14, 1856. 
 
DEAR inviting attend 23d 
received. would pleasant strike hands 
Iowa, led van grand charge 
hope believe end glorious victory. 
honor Iowa danger, time us, 
battle still pay holiday Iowa. sure 
excuse remaining Illinois, much hard work still 
done. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DEMOCRATIC VICTORY BUCHANAN 
 
FRAGMENT SPEECH REPUBLICAN CHICAGO, DECEMBER 10, 1856. 
 
another annual Presidential message. Like rejected making 
President 
late Presidential election. considers result 
signal triumph good principles good men, pointed rebuke 
bad ones. says people it. forgets 
calls voted Buchanan, minority 
whole people four hundred thousand full tenth 
votes. Remembering this, might perceive 
may quite durable seems majority may 
choose remain permanently minority. 
 
President thinks great body us ardently 
attached liberty, abstract, wicked 
men. slight difference opinion this. think 
he, ardently attached hope second term, 
men liberty every way. much 
fire others eat, burnt 
thrown aside use. 
fool said King turned 
"He 
 
far President charges us "with desire change domestic 
institutions existing States," everything power 
deprive Constitution laws moral whole 
party belief, knowledge, pronounce charge 
falsehood. 
 
government rests public opinion. Whoever change public opinion 
change government practically much. Public opinion, 
subject, always minor thoughts 
political public opinion 
beginning was, recently continued be, "the equality 
men." although always submitted patiently whatever 
inequality seemed matter actual necessity, constant 
working steady progress toward practical equality 
men. late Presidential election struggle one party discard 
central idea substitute opposite idea slavery 
right abstract, central idea may 
perpetuity human slavery extension countries 
Less year ago Richmond avowed advocate 
slavery, regardless color, order favor views, invented 
phrase President, message, 
telling us people "have asserted 
constitutional equality States Union 
States." President new central idea 
completely indeed is, far mere fact 
Presidential election inaugurate it. us left know 
majority people yet declared it, hope 
never will. 
 
us vote Mr. Buchanan, taken together, 
majority four hundred thousand. late contest divided 
Fremont come together Let 
every one really believes resolved free society 
shall conscientiously declare 
last contest done thought every one 
charity believe every one say much. Thus let 
let past differences nothing be; steady 
eye real issue let us good old 
republic. it. human heart us; God us. 
shall able, declare "all States States equal," 
yet "all citizens citizens equal," renew 
better declaration, including much more, "all 
men created equal." 
 
 
 
 
Dr. R. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Dec. 25, 1856. 
 
DEAR Chicago two weeks ago saw Mr. 
remark inferred thinking though 
think anxious it. seemed anxious harmony 
generally, particularly contested seats Peoria 
might rightly Since came home talk 
one American representatives here, says 
Speaker also thinks Americans you, 
unless cannot speak. would like 
Speaker go right see practised 
and, think, would credit floor 
seat. Go see him; think fit, show 
letter. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1857 
 
JOHN E. Private. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., February 10, 1857. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your note little paragraph Republican 
received yesterday, since time notice 
it. supposed wrote approved it. whole originated 
mistake. know conversation thought 
establishment paper always expected throw 
way, extent taking 
paying one copy. paper brought house, wife said 
me, "Now going take another worthless little said 
"I directed paper this, 
sent message whole 
story. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE DOUGLAS SPEECH 
 
SPEECH SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, JUNE 26, 1857. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I to-night partly invitation 
you, partly Two weeks ago Judge Douglas spoke 
several subjects Kansas, Dred Scott decision, 
listened speech time, report since. 
intended opinions think just, assail 
men who, common me, entertain 
opinions. reason wished then, still wish, make 
answer it, take opportunity doing. 
 
begin prove true, probable, people 
Utah open rebellion United States, Judge Douglas 
favor repealing territorial organization, 
adjoining States judicial purposes. say, too, 
rebellion, ought somehow 
prepared admit deny Judge's mode 
good any. Republicans fall without taking back 
anything ever said. sure, would considerable 
Judge Douglas doctrine 
self-government Territories; additional proof 
plain beginning, doctrine mere 
pretense benefit slavery. could 
see much Nebraska act itself, forced 
judges people Territories without 
choice consent, could made see, though one rise 
dead. 
 
plain Judge question 
Republicans ever pressed upon Democracy regard 
question Judge well knew this: "If people Utah 
form State constitution Democracy admit 
nothing United States Constitution 
law part Judge's "sacred 
right people it, rather keep 
it, questions, far know, Judge never 
might involve Democracy answer either way, 
go 
 
Kansas. substance Judge's speech Kansas effort 
put free-State men wrong voting election 
delegates constitutional convention. says: 
 
"There every reason hope believe law fairly 
interpreted insure every 
free quiet exercise elective 
 
appears extraordinary Judge Douglas make statement. 
knows that, law, one vote 
knows free-State men place refusal vote 
ground possible 
true, Judge Douglas knows asserted true letters, 
newspapers, public speeches, borne every mail blown 
every eyes ears world. knows boldly 
declared people many whole counties, many whole 
others, left yet venture 
contradict declaration, point vote without 
along, seeming know 
question fact, 
 
 "There every reason hope believe law 
fairly insure every 
free quiet exercise elective 
 
readily agree chance vote ought 
If, contrary, Judge Douglas 
particularly free-State men chance 
vote, perfectly right staying polls body. 
 
way, since Judge spoke, Kansas election come off. 
Judge expressed confidence Democrats Kansas would 
course. returns 
received yet far go, 
indicate one sixth registered voters really 
this, too, more, perhaps, one half 
rightful voters thus showing thing 
altogether exquisite ever watching 
considerable interest ascertain figure "the free-State 
cut course Democrats 
course vote soon 
shall know many delegates elected, many candidates 
pledged free State, many votes cast them. 
 
Allow barely suspicion things 
Kansas altogether good 
figure newspapers speeches free States. 
prove one real living free-State Democrat Kansas, 
suggest might well catch him, preserve 
skin interesting specimen extinct variety 

 
Dred Scott decision. decision declares two 
negro cannot United States courts; 
secondly, Congress cannot prohibit slavery Territories. 
made divided court dividing differently different points. 
Judge Douglas discuss merits decision, 
respect shall follow example, believing could improve 
McLean Curtis could 
 
denounces question correctness decision, 
offering violent resistance it. it? has, spite 
decision, declared Dred Scott free, resisted authority 
master him? 
 
Judicial decisions two absolutely determine case 
decided, secondly, indicate public similar cases 
decided latter use, called 

 
believe much Judge Douglas obedience to, 
respect for, judicial department government. think decisions 
constitutional questions, fully settled, control 
particular cases decided, general policy country, 
subject disturbed amendments Constitution provided 
instrument itself. would revolution. 
think Dred Scott decision know court made 
often overruled shall 
this. offer resistance it. 
 
Judicial decisions greater less authority 
according circumstances. accords 
common sense customary understanding legal profession. 
 
important decision made unanimous concurrence 
judges, without apparent partisan accordance 
legal public expectation steady practice departments 
throughout history, part based assumed 
historical facts really true; or, wanting 
these, court once, 
affirmed course years, might be, 
perhaps would be, even revolutionary, 

 
when, true, find wanting claims public 
confidence, resistance, even 
treat yet quite established settled 
doctrine country. Judge Douglas considers view awful. 
Hear him: 
 
"The courts prescribed Constitution created 
authority people determine, enforce law. 
Hence, whoever final decision highest judicial tribunal 
deadly blow whole republican system blow 
which, successful, would place rights liberties 
mercy passion, violence. repeat, therefore, 
resistance decisions Supreme Court United States, 
matter like points decided Dred Scott case, clearly within 
jurisdiction defined Constitution, shall forced upon 
country political issue, become distinct naked 
issue friends enemies friends 
enemies supremacy 
 
Why, Supreme Court decided national bank 
General Jackson, President United States, 
decision, bill partly 
constitutional ground, declaring public must support 
Constitution "as understands it." hear General's words. 
are, taken veto 
 
"It maintained advocates bank 
ought considered settled precedent, 
decision Supreme Court. conclusion cannot 
Mere precedent dangerous source authority, 
regarded deciding questions constitutional power, except 
acquiescence people States considered well 
settled. far case subject, argument 
bank might based One Congress, 
decided favor another, decided it. One 
Congress, decided another, decided 
favor. Prior present Congress, therefore, drawn 
course equal. resort States, expressions 
executive opinions bank 
probably favor four one. nothing 
precedent, therefore, which, authority admitted, ought 
favor act me." 
 
drop quotations merely remark ever way 
precedent Dred Scott decision, points therein decided, 
decision. hear General Jackson 
 
"If opinion Supreme Court covered whole ground act, 
ought control coordinate authorities government. 
Congress, executive, courts must, itself, guided 
opinion Constitution. public officer takes 
oath support Constitution swears support 
understands it, understood 
 
heard Judge Douglas denounce bank decision 
General Jackson disregarding it. would interesting 
look recent speech, see exactly fierce 
us resisting Supreme Court decisions fall upon 
head. call mind long fierce political war 
country, upon issue which, language, and, course, 
estimation, "was distinct issue friends 
enemies war fought ranks 
enemies Constitution. 
 
said, substance, Dred Scott decision part based 
assumed historical facts really true, ought 
leave subject without giving reasons saying this; therefore 
give instance two, think fully sustain me. Chief Justice 
Taney, delivering opinion majority court, insists 
great length negroes part people made, 
made, Declaration Independence, Constitution 
United States. 
 
contrary, Judge Curtis, dissenting opinion, shows 
five thirteen wit, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, 
New York, New Jersey, North negroes voters, 
proportion numbers part making Constitution 
white people had. shows much 
leave doubt sort conclusion point, 
holds following language: 
 
"The Constitution established people United 
States, action, State, persons 
qualified laws act thereon behalf 
citizens State. States, seen, colored 
persons among qualified law act subject. 
colored persons included body 'the people 
United Constitution 
least five States power act, doubtless 
act, upon question 
 
Again, Chief Justice Taney says: 
 
"It difficult day realize state public opinion, 
relation unfortunate race, prevailed civilized 
enlightened portions world time Declaration 
Independence, Constitution United States framed 

 
again, quoting Declaration, says: 
 
"The general words quoted would seem include whole human 
family, used similar instrument day, would 

 
Chief Justice directly plainly assumes 
fact, public estimate black man favorable 
days Revolution. assumption mistake. 
particulars condition race 
whole, country, change 
decidedly way, ultimate destiny never 
appeared hopeless last three four years. two 
five Jersey North gave free 
negro right right since taken away, 
greatly 
extended, far know, single additional State, though 
number States days, 
understand, masters could, emancipate slaves; 
since legal restraints made upon emancipation 
amount almost prohibition. days Legislatures held 
unquestioned power abolish slavery respective States, 
becoming quite fashionable State constitutions withhold 
power days, common consent, spread 
black man's bondage new countries 
Congress decides continue prohibition, 
Supreme Court decides could would. days 
Declaration Independence held sacred all, thought include 
all; now, aid making bondage negro universal 
assailed construed 
framers could rise could 
recognize it. powers earth seem rapidly 
him. him, ambition follows, philosophy follows, 
day fast joining cry. prison 
searched person, left instrument 
him. One another closed heavy iron doors upon him; 
him, were, bolted lock hundred keys, 
never unlocked without concurrence every keys 
hands hundred different men, scattered hundred 
different distant stand 
mind matter, produced make 
impossibility escape complete is. 
 
grossly say assume public estimate 
negro favorable origin government. 
 
Three years half ago, Judge Douglas brought forward famous 
Nebraska Bill. country 
opposition, carried Congress. Since seen 
Presidential nomination one indorsing 
general doctrine measure, time standing clear 
agitation gross breach national 
seen successful rival constitutionally elected, 
strength friends, division adversaries, 
popular minority nearly four hundred thousand votes. seen 
chief aids State, Shields politically speaking, 
tried, executed offence 
his. sees case standing next 
trial. 
 
natural disgust minds nearly white people 
idea amalgamation white black races; 
Judge Douglas evidently chief hope upon chances 
able appropriate benefit disgust himself. 
can, much idea upon 
adversaries, thinks struggle therefore 
hope, man last makes 
occasion opposition Dred Scott decision. 
finds Republicans insisting Declaration Independence 
includes men, black well white, forthwith boldly denies 
includes negroes all, proceeds argue gravely 
contend does, want vote, eat, 
sleep, marry negroes. cannot 
consistent else. protest logic 
that, want black woman slave must 
necessarily want wife. need either. 
leave alone. respects certainly equal; 
natural right eat bread hands, 
without asking leave one else, equal equal 
others. 
 
Chief Justice Taney, opinion Dred Scott case, admits 
language Declaration broad enough include whole human 
family, Judge Douglas argue authors instrument 
intend include negroes, fact 
actually place equality whites. grave 
argument comes nothing all, fact 
once, ever afterward, actually place white people equality 
one another. argument Chief 
Justice Senator obvious violence plain, 
unmistakable language Declaration. 
 
think authors notable instrument intended include 
men, intend declare men equal respects. 
mean say equal color, size, intellect, moral 
social defined tolerable 
respects consider men created 
inalienable rights, among life, liberty, 
pursuit happiness." said, meant. 
mean assert obvious actually enjoying 
equality, yet confer immediately upon 
them. fact, power confer meant simply 
declare right, enforcement might follow fast 
circumstances permit. 
 
meant set standard maxim free society, 
familiar all, revered all; constantly looked to, constantly 
labored for, and, even though never perfectly constantly 
thereby constantly spreading influence 
augmenting happiness value life people colors 
everywhere. assertion "all men created 
practical use effecting separation Great 
placed Declaration that, future use. authors 
meant thank God, proving 
times might seek turn free people back 
hateful paths despotism. knew proneness prosperity 
meant fair land 
commence find left least one 
hard 
 
briefly expressed view meaning object 
part Declaration Independence declares "all men 
created equal." 
 
let us hear Judge Douglas's view subject, find 
printed report late speech. is: 
 
"No man character, motives, conduct 
Declaration Independence, except upon hypothesis 
referred white race alone, 
declared men created equal; speaking 
British subjects continent equal British subjects 
born residing Great entitled 
inalienable rights, among enumerated life, liberty, 
pursuit happiness. Declaration adopted purpose 
justifying colonists eyes civilized world withdrawing 
allegiance British dissolving connection 
mother country." 
 
good friends, read carefully leisure hour, 
well upon it; see mere makes 
glorious Declaration. 
 
"They speaking British subjects continent equal 
British subjects born residing Great Why, according 
this, negroes white people outside Great Britain 
America spoken instrument. English, 
along white Americans, sure, 
French, white people world gone 
along Judge's inferior 
 
thought Declaration promised something better condition 
British no, meant equal 
oppressed condition. According that, gave 
promise that, kicked king Great Britain, 
king own. 
 
thought Declaration contemplated improvement 
condition men no, merely "was adopted 
purpose justifying colonists eyes civilized world 
withdrawing allegiance British dissolving 
connection mother country." Why, object 
effected eighty years ago, Declaration practical use 
left battlefield 
victory 
 
understand preparing to-morrow week. 
for? doings day reference present; 
quite half even descendants referred 
day. suppose even go far 
read Declaration. Suppose, read 
old-fashioned way, read Judge Douglas's 
run thus: 
 
"We hold truths self-evident, British subjects 
continent years ago created equal 
British subjects born residing Great 
 
appeal Democrats well really 
willing Declaration shall thus left 
more, most, interesting memorial dead shorn 
practical value, left without even 
suggestion individual rights man it? 
 
Judge Douglas especially thought mixing 
blood white black races. Agreed thousand times 
agreed. white men enough marry white women black 
men enough many black let 
point fully agree Judge, shall show 
policy better adapted prevent amalgamation ours, shall drop 
adopt his. Let us see. 1850 United States 
whites free 
nearly sprung black slaves white 
separation races perfect 
immediate separation next best thing 
keep apart already together. white black 
people never get together Kansas, never mix blood Kansas. 
least one self-evident truth. free colored persons 
may get free States, number 
insignificant amount much way mixing blood. 1850 
free States part 
born came slave States, ready made up. 
year slave States home 
proportion free mulattoes free colored classes 
free States much greater slave free States. 
worthy note, too, among free States make 
colored man nearest equal white 
least New Hampshire, State 
goes toward equality races, 
many 
free States together. 
 
statistics show slavery greatest source 
next it, free 
blacks. Yet Judge Douglas slightest restraints spread 
slavery, slightest human recognition negro, tending 
horribly 
 
Dred Scott case affords strong test party 
favors Republicans dear Democracy. 
Dred Scott, wife, two involved 
desired court held citizens far least 
entitle hearing whether free not; 
then, also, fact law really free. Could 
way, chances black girls ever mixing blood 
white people would diminished least extent 
could without consent. Judge Douglas 
delighted decided slaves, human enough 
hearing, even free, thus left subject forced 
masters, liable become mothers 
mulattoes spite state case produces 
nine mulattoes mixing blood nation. 
 
course, state case illustration only, meaning say 
intimate master Dred Scott family, 
percentage masters generally, inclined exercise 
particular power hold female slaves. 
 
said separation races perfect 
right say members 
Republican party favor this, say party 
favor it. nothing platform directly 
subject. say large proportion members it, 
chief plank spread 
favorable 
 
separation, ever effected all, must effected 
political party, such, anything 
directly Party operations present favor 
colonization enterprise difficult one; 
"where way," colonization needs 
hearty will. springs two elements moral sense 
Let us brought believe morally right, 
time favorable to, least interest 
transfer African native shall find way 
it, however great task may be. children numbers 
include four hundred thousand fighting men, went Egyptian 
bondage body. 
 
differently respective Democratic Republican 
parties bear question forming public 
easy see. Republicans 
whatever ability can, negro man, 
bondage wrong, field oppression ought 
Democrats deny 
wrong far possible crush 
sympathy him, cultivate excite hatred disgust 
him; compliment so; call 
indefinite bondage "a sacred right 
self-government." 
 
print cannot read gold 
ever hard find many men send slave Liberia, pay 
passage, send new 
sell fifteen hundred dollars, 
 
 
 
 
WILLIAM 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, August, 1857 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 14th received, much obliged 
legal information give. 
 
scarcely anxious next election Iowa 
result favor Republicans. lost nearly working 
part last year, giving time altogether 
poor lose two years together. engaged suit United 
States Court Chicago, Rock Island Bridge Company 
party. trial commence 8th September, probably 
last two three weeks. trial improbable 
hands may come take look and, 
possible make hit right, could speak courts 
go right without cessation till late Write again, 
pointing striking points difference old 
new constitutions, also whether Democratic Republican party 
lines drawn adoption it, 
it. If, possibility, could get among might 
advantage know things advance. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ARGUMENT ROCK ISLAND BRIDGE CASE. 
 
Daily Press Chicago, Sept. 24, 
 
et Railroad Bridge Co. 
 
United States Circuit Court, Hon. John Judge. 
 
13th day, Tuesday, Sept. 22, 1857. 
 
Mr. A. Lincoln addressed jury. said purpose assail 
expected grow earnest proceeded 
"There conflict testimony said, 
"but one quarter number witnesses seldom agree, even 
one side might expected. try 
them, believe erroneous 
long can." said, 
steamboat men St. Louis, supposed went 
matter people would situation. 
continued, "as commercial place may desire bridge 
stand, adverse commerce, portion 
river; may supposes additional cost 
railroad transportation upon productions Iowa force 
go St. Louis bridge removed. meetings St. Louis 
connected case witnesses it, thus 
prejudice added color last thing would 
pleasing him, Mr. Lincoln said, would one great 
extending almost never never 
up, travel east west whose demands 
less important river. growing larger 
building new countries never seen 
history world. alluded astonishing growth Illinois, 
grown within memory population million 
Iowa young rising communities 
 
"This current said he, "has rights well 
north south. river advantage 
legislation could enter free could 
it. particular railroad line great importance 
statement business little less year shows 
importance. evidence September 8, 1856, August 8, 
cars passengers passed 
Navigation closed four days short four months last year, 
time river use road bridge 
is, too, considerable portion time 
thin makes river useless bridge useful ever. 
shows bridge must treated respect court 
kicked day Judge alluded 
strike contending interest even dissolution 
Union. proper mode parties affair let 
find cessation trouble 
mood steamboat men bridge Why, 
shouting ringing boats 
fell. greater follows 
excited election. first thing proceed record Mr. 
complaint Judge record extend back 
time completion principal part 
navigation bridge burned passed 
bridge repaired boats second time confined 
draw provided record simple 
history book. 
 
"From April 1856, May twenty 
time since twenty 
including seven dangers place 
get cool get may soon expect 
ratio kept all. 
 
said, admitting went straight through, 
difference remember 
indulged us argument support statement. 
difference small body large 
one way True flatboat 
faster egg egg might blown away 
influence would go way. 
various things witnesses say show 
current. test direction 
current same. series would make line 
long boat would show influence upon part parts 

 
"I speak position amount 
course river pier 
line produced upper end long pier straight 
pier distance feet, line drawn point 
channel opposite point head pier, Colonel 
says form angle twenty angle measured 
pier seven is, would move pier 
seven degrees make exactly straight current. Would 
make navigation better witnesses plaintiff seem 
think necessary say pier formed angle 
current settled matter. careful accurate 
witnesses say that, though accustomed seeing 
placed straight yet could see current 
made straight us made slight 
water runs right, straight cannot improved. 
think pier changed would divided 
navigation improved. 
 
"I going discuss question material 
greatly differ law. cases produced 
are, suppose, proper taken consideration court 
jury. think exactly point, 
still willing trust honor, Judge take 
instructions law. reasonable skill thing 
jury judge. differ side says 
bound exercise care taken 
building allowed Legislature build 
bridge require before, pilot comes 
along, unreasonable dash structure 
legally put there. Afton came 5th lay 
Rock Island next morning. boat lies pilot 
would gone around 
bridge gotten acquainted Pilot shown 
understand heard say fall 
head foot pier four needs information. 
could gone day seen fall. 
discarded passion chances would 
disaster all. bound make acquainted place. 
 
says current swell coming long pier 
drove long pier. words drove toward 
pier current 
recollection find current 
White says strikes long pier like 
turns back, might acted somehow manner. 
 
"It agreed boat destroyed 
destroyed upon head short moved 
channel bow head long pier, till 
struck short one, swung around bridge 

 
"I shall try prove average velocity current 
draw boat five half miles 
head pier foot pier. 
lowest estimate evidence six miles hour, highest 
twelve miles. testimony men made 
adopted exact means. water runs 
high water taken point nine feet low 
water. water Afton lost seven feet low water, 
least foot lower time. 
best instruments known measuring 
various circumstances found current five 
miles hour more. found water upper end ran 
five five 
average five miles. Shall men taken care, 
speak twenty miles hour, believed 
favorable well improved 
even result. Several men given 
opinion distance steamboat suppose one 
go measure distance would believe preference 
them. 
 
"These made boat 
ascertained area cross section stream 
area face engineers say 
put increase current space 
boat depth channel 
feet, one hundred sixteen multiply 
across water 
feet. Afton feet wide drew 5 feet, making fourteenth 
Now, five miles one 
one third increase current. call 
current five half miles per hour. next thing try 
prove boat power run six miles hour 
current. testified strong, swift 
able run eight miles hour stream current four miles 
hour, fifteen miles Strike average find 
eleven half miles. Take five 
half miles speed current draw leaves 
power boat draw six miles hour, feet per minute 
8 feet second. 
 
propose show cross know 
witnesses say cross one witness says, 
three cross two far mere statement, 
without mingled go, 
men's testimony compared thorough 
believe go across 
could discovered 
every possible current. boats find cannot 
assume position cross 
there. next proposition Afton passed S. B. 
Iowa 
 
shall show struck first short pier, long 
pier, short one Mr. Lincoln 
testimony eighteen witnesses point. 
 
"How boat strike went in? endless variety 
opinion. ten say pier three testify 
struck first short, long short 
last time. None rest substantially contradict this. assume 
men got truth believe established fact. 
next proposition struck short long pier 
got back short pier boat got right bow 
up. says pilot got 
wheel passed short pier. would make head even 
head long pier. says head high higher 
head long pier. witnesses confirmed one. final 
door Witnesses 
majority say struck 
 
Court 
 
 
14th day, Sept. 23, 1857. 
 
Mr. A. LINCOLN said conclude soon possible. 
said colored map plaintiff brought one 
stage trial showed cross alleged 
exist. current represented would drive boat 
long pier short pier, explained 
model boat door is, behind boat 
struck lower shoulder short pier swung around 
went around struck point end 
pier, said Mr. Lincoln, 
wheel around boat must 
struck upper point pier far back disturb 
forty feet stern Afton door, 
thus appears forty feet go clear pier. 
Afton power channel 
short pier without moving one foot Suppose 
middle wheel would feet short pier. 
reason went thus wheel 
shall try establish fact wheel running 
struck went ahead strong Upon last 
point witnesses agree, wheel running 
witnesses say running 
draw 
 
Mr. Lincoln read various witnesses prove 
wheel working Afton 
 
witnesses show captain said something machinery 
inference knew wheel 
fact move one inch ahead 
moving feet evidence proving current 
five miles hour, explanation 
power one wheel pilot says 
ordered engineers back up. engineers differ 
said kept going ahead. bow swung current 
pressed pilot pressed stern though 
fast bow gained it, one wheel 
motion boat nearly stood still far motion 
concerned, thus thrown upon pier. Afton came 
draw passed doubt kept 
true course Afton going around got proper way, got 
across current west straight line drawn 
long pier, compelled resort changes 
sufficient save her. 
fault entered wrong, far wrong never 
got right? defence blame that? 
 
"For several days entertained boats 
Afton then, come 
close long pier sheer got 
centre nose seemed suddenly lost 
sense smell short 
 
Mr. Lincoln said project building 
river, "is successful 
project world. suspension bridge cannot built high 
boats grow till cannot pass. 
steamboat men take pains make cars railroad 
cannot without immense expense rise high enough get even 
suspension bridge go low enough get expense 

 
"The establish bridge material 
managed boat reasonable care 
last point high winds nothing it, 
day. must show due skill care. Difficulties going 
stream do, going Difficulties 
nothing accident, 
Mr. Lincoln said much say, many things could 
suggest wished close save time. 
 
 
 
 
JESSE K. DUBOIS. 
 
DEAR 
 
BLOOMINGTON, Dec. 19, 1857. 
 
J. M. Douglas I. C. R. R. Co. carry letter. 
says large sum pay 
treasury now, assurance shall 
not. really wish could consent this. 
Douglas says cannot pay more, believe him. 
 
write lawyer seeking advantage 
friend, urging think would 
situation. mean private confidential only, 
feel good deal anxiety it. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSEPH GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Jan. 19, 1858. 
 
DEAR SIR: morning Col. showed petition 
Secretary State compel 
apportionment act last says presented 
court to-morrow morning. shall allowed three four days get 
return, I, one, want benefit consultation you. 
 
Please come right up. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 7, 1858 
 
DEAR SIR: Yesterday morning court overruled 
return case. present; said nothing 
suppose matter 
 
court gave reason decision; tells 
unanimous opinion even 
signed bill right name 
long bill remained custody control. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, December 18, 1857. 
 
HENRY C. WHITNEY, ESQ. 
 
DEAR home Bloomington last night found letter 

 
know express statute decisions J. P. upon 
expiration term shall books, papers, unfinished 
business, etc., far know, practice hand 
successor, cease anything whatever, perfect 
Sections supposed suppose 
law. think successor may forthwith whatever retiring 
J. P. might done. proviso Section think put 
cover possible cases, way caution, authorize J. 
P. go forward finish whatever might begun him. 
 
view take, believe, Common law principle, retiring 
officers remember one 
case Sheriff officers class. 
 
time examine subject fully, great 
confidence right. must think offering pay this. 
 
Mr. John O. Johnson friend; gave name him. 
work trying get Republican organization. suppose "Long 
ever saw heard him. Let say 
entirely appreciate Republican papers Chicago 
constantly saying "Long consider papers truly 
devoted Republican cause, unfriendly me; think 
say "Long dictated personal 
malice conscious of. afford lose 
services "Long believe warfare made upon 
injuring cause. mean confidential. 
 
quietly co-operate Mr. J. O. Johnson getting 
organization, think right. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1858 
 
 
 
 
ANOTHER POLITICAL PATRONAGE REFERENCE 
 
EDWARD G. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 1858. 
 
DEAR SIR: 
 
Mr. G. A. applicant superintendent addition 
Insane understand partly depends whether gets 
it. 
 
friend, therefore wish say 
man integrity master 
surpassed city, known anywhere, 
far judge. hope consider really interested 
Mr. writing merely relieve 
Please show Col. William let consider much 
intended yourself. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POLITICAL COMMUNICATION 
 
W. H. ESQ. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, JUNE 11, 1858 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 9th written received. Two 
three days ago learned McLean appointed delegates favor 
thenceforward considered fixed 
fact. opinion consequence case, 
business mine 
running independent candidate Lovejoy do; 
result nothing disaster round. first place, 
runs beaten life; second place, 
race progress, strongest temptation 
trade Democrats, favor election certain 
friends thirdly, shall held responsible it, 
Republican members Legislature partial Lovejoy 
purpose oppose us; lastly, end lose us 
district altogether. safe way 
convention, upon common platform willing stand upon, 
one known occupying none 
common ground, get majority votes look 
election, safe way 
 
inclination Republicans favor Douglas, one 
chances run, intend run 
 
write court room. Court opened, must close. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
BRIEF 
 
JUNE 15, 1858. 
 
Dictionary Congress states preparing 
work publication, 1858, sent Mr. Lincoln usual 
request sketch life, received following 
 
   Born February 12, Hardin County, Kentucky. 
   Education, 
   Profession, lawyer. 
   captain volunteers Black Hawk war. 
   Postmaster small office. 
   Four times member Illinois Legislature 
   member lower house Congress. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
SPEECHES & LETTERS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
Edited 
 

 
Published 
J. M. & Sons 
New York 
& 
 
First issue Edition 
 
Mr. Introduction printed 
made type set University Press, 
 
Taken permission 'The Complete Works Abraham 
Century Company, 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[Illustration: SENT GREAT VOICE FORTH & 
WORDS FELL LIKE WINTER WOULD MORTAL CONTEND 

 
 
 
 
 
INTRODUCTION 
 
 
man since Washington become Americans familiar 
beloved figure Abraham Lincoln. representative 
typical American, man best political 
nation. typical fact sprang masses 
people, remained whole career man 
people, chief desire accord 
wishes people, never failed trust people 
rely support. Every native American knows life 
speeches. anecdotes passed thought 
conversation whole nation statesman 
done. 
 
however, United States, whole 
civilized mankind. say has, within 
last thirty years, grown conspicuous figure history 
modern world. Without him, course events 
Western Europe also would different, 
called guide greatest crisis fate State already 
far mighty days, 
gave affected march events ever since. life character 
ought known well 
Americans. Among especially ought 
appreciate understand significance life, 
came English spoke English tongue, action told 
upon progress events opinion British 
communities everywhere done upon nation 
outside America itself. 
 
collection Lincoln's speeches seeks make known 
words readers history know 
countries great statesman almost necessity 
though speaker may true measure 
either momentary power permanent wisdom, 
courage bear little direct relation gift speech. 
whether gift present greater lesser degree, 
character ideas statesman best studied 
words. particularly true Lincoln, may 
called professional famous orators whose 
speeches may read beauty language wealth 
ideas comparatively little regard 
circumstances time place led delivered. 
Lincoln one speeches need studied close 
relation occasions called forth. 
philosophical brilliant 
part life. expression derive 
small part weight dignity fact deal 
grave urgent questions, express spirit 
approached questions. great stand clearly 
revealed words, whether spoken written, does. 
 
Accordingly Lincoln's like nearly 
men whose eloquence won think men 
Sheridan, 
Webster, Bright, 
think ideas command 
appropriate gifts invention 
passion fit stir 
audience like think orator 
powerful voice, imposing presence, 
Lincoln profession 
lawyer practised became President United 
think special gifts mark 
expect find man full ingenuity one 
case wise please capture judge 
jury one 
art used, need be, engage 
feelings mind real merits issue. 
 
kind talent Lincoln little. 
indeed, said could argue well 
cases justice personally believed, 
unable make worse appear better reason. 
qualities world look 
vain Lincoln's speeches. fine pieces exquisite 
fit school set 

 
What, then, deserve valued 
comes man powers 
qualities profession men less 
remarkable 
 
answer question, let us first ask preparation 
training Abraham Lincoln whether political 
 
Born rude never education, except 
gave himself, till approaching even books 
inform train mind within 
legal faculty part training powers. 
became lawyer years favourable 
continuous study already passed, opportunities found 
reading knew authors general 
though knew taught little 
mathematics, could read language save own, 
acquaintance European history 
branch 
 
want regular education made persons among 
lot Till grown man, never moved 
society could learn things mind 
orator statesman ought Even gained 
legal practice, many years one mix 
except town, men nearly 
knew little himself. 
 
Schools gave nothing, society gave nothing. 
powerful intellect resolute will. 
habit reflection, and, indeed, prolonged 
intense reflection. made knew part himself. 
thought everything himself. 
positive deny 
certain moments pondered hesitated long decided 
course. though could keep policy waiting 
events guide him, paused 
never way either go back upon decision made, 
waste time vain expected 
attained. took advice left many things 
upon Without vanity 
always prepared take full 
responsibility 
 
passed eyes, 
mind played freely round everything know 
accounts first made famous town 
neighbourhood memory anecdotes 
could bring good purpose, right moment, 
qualities Europe deems American, great man 
action nineteenth century, even America, possessed 
measure. Seldom power observation found 
united abundant power 
 
remarks may seem belong study character rather 
speeches, yet interest 
speeches lies character. Let us, however, 
return speeches letters, which, given 
scarcely less speeches. 
 
merits speeches 
less reputation would led us 
serious, grave, practical. feel man 
care play surface subject, use way 
trying get right 
foundation matter tell us real thoughts 
are. respect sometimes reminds us speeches, 
which, way, always go straight 
destined always hit head. too, 
effort fundamental facts, Lincoln's bear sort 
speeches, though far less power 
always seems difficulty 
finding language convey others plain, true weighty 
himself. difficulty makes great though 
usually see driving at, frequently confused 
Lincoln, however, always clear. breadth 
notes thought. clearness, again, 
notes American speakers 
like preceding unlike 
earlier generation Alexander Hamilton, John Adams, 
Madison generally made 
Europe. Even men brilliant Edward 
means free effect 
to-day 
virtually vanished United States, largely change 
public perhaps example set Lincoln may 

especially West South, taste less polished 
older States. Lincoln escaped striking mark 
independence well 
nothing nothing 
part, addresses reason credits 
desiring none solid arguments laid them. 
appeal quietly, perhaps even note 
struck always high note. appeal comes 
language, sincerity 
Sometimes one see whole course 
argument feeling, time comes 
feeling directly expressed, 
steady heat intense soul. 
 
impression speeches leave reader 
matter carefully thought even words 
learnt heart. one occasion, 
early career, Lincoln went public meeting least 
speak, presently called audience, rose 
obedience call, delivered long address ardent 
reporters dropped and, absorbed 
watching him, forgot take said. also stated, 
good authority, way railroad 
monument field Gettysburg, turned 
gentleman sitting beside "I 
suppose shall expected say something lend 
pencil bit thereupon notes 
speech become best known best remembered 
words sentences passed 
minds educated men everywhere. 
 
famous Gettysburg speech best example one could desire 
characteristic quality Lincoln's short speech. 
wonderfully expression. quiet, quiet 
moment make upon audience, audience wrought 
long one prominent orators 
day, impression began 
make soon read America Europe. 
touch call effect. Alike 
thought language simple, plain, states 
certain truths principles chosen 
one feels truths could conveyed 
words, deliverance made 
time. Words simple strong could come one 
long upon facts American history 
popular government truths facts taught become 
like truths mathematics clearness, 

 
speeches Slavery read strange us now, slavery living 
system dead forty years, dead buried hell deep 
mankind. hard whose memory 
go back 1865 realize till 
terrible fact, many otherwise good men, 
defended 
order nature, ministers sacred 
part ordinances God. Lincoln's position, 
position one induce fellow-citizens listen 
admit heated 
allow denounce easily 
to-day. though language calm never 
slavery. shows evils 
dangers force. speech Dred Scott decision 
close piece reasoning which, wide view 
Constitutional issues, sometimes reminds one Webster, sometimes 
even though equal former weight 
latter 
 
Among letters, perhaps written Mrs. 
mother five sons died fighting Union 
armies North. short, deals 
hundreds letters written know 
great cause, consolation 
thought sacrifice made set forth 
simple Deep must 
issues pure 
 
career Lincoln often held ambitious young Americans 
example show man may achieve native strength, 
advantages birth environment education. 
nothing nothing moral one may well 
drawn, whose early life Fortune smiled may 
find example is, all, great 
encouragement ordinary men, Lincoln extraordinary man. 
 
adverse conditions early years 
Nature high rare powers. 
saw aspect plain noted 
asked trusted him, answered 
failed see part 
power seeing 
practical question, 
accidental features may 
power, use familiar expression, getting 
bed One part power faculty 
average man think induced do. keeps 
superior mind touch ordinary mind, perhaps 
name used, superior mind seems 
power others part general 
sense community. men high practical capacity 
power. first condition success. men 
received philosophical literary education tendency 
purposes persuasion, perhaps 
language recommend 
state conclusions light large general principles, 
tendency may, unless carefully carry high 
heads crowd. Lincoln, never 
education, spoke people one themselves. seemed 
saying felt, expressing feeling 
would expressed it. reality, quite much 
polished orator 
plain language seemed keep 
strength lay less form thought 
thought itself, large, simple, practical view took 
position. thus, repeat said 
merit speeches his, made effective 
delivered makes worth reading to-day, 
found conclusions 
circumstances time. rose higher air, words 
force 
conviction emotion 
printed words deep upon minds drove home hearts 
people. 
 
great man? Common speech, must guide 
sense terms world gives name many 
sorts men. far greatness lies power range 
intellect, far strength will, far elevation 
view aim question large 
here. Abraham Lincoln may truly said greatness 
three elements present. either 
thought word act, activity 
occasionally front even persons gifts 
first order. melancholy man, whose 
intelligence, working sometimes slowly always steadily surely, 
enough embrace vigorous enough master 
difficult facts problems called deal with. 
executive talent showed sudden startling 
calm formed judgments laid 
plans, firmness adhered 
face popular conflicting counsels 
sometimes, even, others deemed hopeless 
qualities needed one pilot Republic 
heaviest storm ever broken upon it. 
power, evidence lay 

guided action won confidence 
people. Without things neither intellect 
firmness would 
 
saying great men 
may rather said note greatness feel thinking 
speech conduct source 
character. Lincoln's one 
human nature. 
 
JAMES 
 
 
following list Lincoln's published 
 
Questions National Policy, etc., 
Speech President Lincoln, etc., 
Gettysburg Nov. 1863, Last Address 
President Lincoln American People, 1865; 
1865; 1865; A. Lincoln, 1865; President's 
Words, Emancipation Inaugural 
Speech, Two Inaugural Addresses Gettysburg 
Speech, Gettysburg Speech Papers, essay 
Lincoln Literature 
Table Talk Abraham Lincoln, Political 
Debates Abraham Lincoln Stephen A. Douglas 
campaign 1858 Illinois, etc. Also two great speeches 
Abraham Lincoln Ohio 1859, Political Speeches Debates 
Abraham Lincoln Douglas, edited 
Lincoln, Passages Speeches Letters, Introduction 

 
COMPLETE WORKS, LETTERS, 
History Administration Abraham Lincoln Letters, 
Abraham Lincoln, Pen Voice, Complete 
Letters, Public Messages Congress, 
Van Buren, etc., Complete Works, Nicolay J. Hay, 
2 enlarged Introduction etc., 
A. Lincoln's Speeches, 
Writings A. Lincoln, Introduction 
life etc. 
etc. 
 
Life Public Services etc., 
Anecdotes Personal 1865; 
1865; 
Nicolay J. Hay, 
President Lincoln 
Administration, J. Hay (The 
Presidents United Lincoln 
Cabinet, etc., Address delivered 
Philosophical Institution, Nov. 13, 
Curtis, True Abraham Lincoln, A. Lincoln 
Presidency, J. A. Lincoln, 
Master Men, Hill, Lincoln Lawyer, 
 
Among written short lives Mrs. H. 
Power, etc. 
 
 
 
 
CONTENTS 
 
 
Lincoln's First Public Address People Sangamon 
     County, March 9, 1832 
 
Letter Col. Robert June 21, 1836 
 
Letter Published Sangamon June 13, 1836 
 
Address Young Men's Springfield, Jan. 27, 
     1837 
 
Letter Mrs. Springfield, April 1, 
 
Political Debate, Springfield, 
 
Letter Anderson, Ill., Oct. 31, 1840 
 
Extract Letter John T. Springfield, Ill., Jan. 23, 
     1841 
 
Address Springfield Temperance 
     Society, Feb. 22, 
 
Circular Whig Committee, March 4, 
 
Letter Martin M. Springfield, Ill., March 26, 
 
Letter Joshua F. Speed, Springfield, Ill., Oct. 22, 1846 
 
Letter Wm. H. Herndon, Washington, Jan. 8, 1848 
 
Letter Wm. H. Herndon, Washington, June 22, 1848 
 
Letter Wm. H. Herndon, Washington, July 10, 1848 
 
Letter John D. Johnston, Jan. 2, 1851 
 
Letter John D. Johnston, Nov. 4, 1851 
 
Note Law July 1, 1850 
 
July 1, 1854 
 
Fragment Slavery, July 1854 
 
Reply Senator Douglas, Peoria, Oct. 16, 1854 
 
Letter Hon. Geo. Lexington, Springfield, 
     Ill., Aug. 15, 1855 
 
Letter Joshua F. Speed, Aug. 24, 1855 
 
Lincoln's May 19, 1856 
 
Speech Dred Scott Case, Springfield, Ill., June 26, 1857 
 
Speech, Springfield, Ill., June 17, 1858 
 
Speech Chicago Reply Speech Judge Douglas, July 
     10, 1858 
 
Speech Springfield, Ill., July 17, 1858 
 
Lincoln's Reply Douglas First Joint Debate, Ottawa, Ill., 
     Aug. 21, 1858 
 
Lincoln's Judge Douglas Freeport, Ill., Aug. 27, 
     1858 
 
Lincoln's Reply Douglas Sept. 15, 1858 
 
Lincoln's Reply Douglas Charleston, Ill., Sept. 18, 1858 
 
Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Ill., Oct. 7, 1858 
 
Notes Oct. 1, 1858 
 
Lincoln's Reply Douglas Seventh Last Joint Debate, 
     Alton, Ill., Oct. 15, 1858 
 
Speech Columbus, Ohio, Sept. 16, 1859 
 
Speech Cincinnati, Ohio, Sept. 17, 1859 
 
Letter Fell, Dec. 20, 1859 
 
Address Cooper Feb. 27, 1860 
 
Lincoln's Farewell Citizens Springfield, Ill., Feb. 11, 1861 
 
Letter Hon. Geo. Accepting Nomination Presidency, May 
     23, 1860 
 
Letter Miss Grace Springfield, Ill., Oct. 19, 1860 
 
Address Legislature Indianapolis, Feb. 12, 1861 
 
Address Legislature Columbus, Ohio, Feb. 13, 1861 
 
Remarks Feb. 15, 1861 
 
Address Feb. 21, 1861 
 
Address Independence Hall, Philadelphia, Feb. 22, 1861 
 
Reply Mayor Washington, D.C., Feb. 27, 1861 
 
First Inaugural Address, March 4, 1861 
 
Address Feb. 18, 1861 
 
First Message Congress, Special Session, July 4, 1861 
 
Message Congress Regular Session, Dec. 3, 1861 
 
Letter Gen. McClellan, Washington, Feb. 3, 1862 
 
Proclamation Gen. Order Setting Slaves Free, May 
     19, 1862 
 
Appeal Border States Behalf Compensated Emancipation, July 
     12, 1862 
 
Letter Cuthbert July 28, 1862 
 
Letter August July 31, 1862 
 
Letter Horace Greeley, Aug. 22, 1862 
 
Reply Chicago Committee United Religious 
     Sept. 13, 1862 
 
Annual Message Congress, Dec. 1, 1862 
 
Emancipation Proclamation, Jan. 1, 1863 
 
Letter General Grant, July 13, 1863 
 
Letter ---- Washington, July 31, 1863 
 
Letter Mrs. Lincoln, Washington, Aug. 8, 1863 
 
Letter James H. Washington, Aug. 17, 1863 
 
Note Secretary Stanton, Washington, Nov. 11, 1863 
 
Letter James C. Aug. 26, 1863 
 
Proclamation Day Thanksgiving, Oct. 3, 1863 
 
Remarks National Gettysburg, Nov. 
     19, 1863 
 
Annual Message Congress, Dec. 8, 1863 
 
Letter Secretary Stanton, Washington, March 1, 1864 
 
Letter Governor Michael Washington, March 13, 1864 
 
Address Sanitary Fair, March 18, 1864 
 
Letter April 4, 1864 
 
Address Sanitary Fair Baltimore, April 18, 1864 
 
Letter General Grant, April 30, 1864 
 
Address Ohio Regiment, Aug. 22, 1864 
 
Reply Serenade, Nov. 10, 1864 
 
Letter Mrs. Nov. 21, 1864 
 
Letter General Grant, Washington, Jan. 19, 1865 
 
Second Inaugural Address, March 4, 1865 
 
Letter Thurlow March 15, 1865 
 
Address Indiana Regiment, March 17, 1865 
 
Last Public Address, April 11, 1865 
 
APPENDIX 
 
Anecdotes 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 
 
 
permission use extracts "The Complete Works Abraham 
edited John G. Nicolay John Hay, Publishers wish 
thank Century Company. 
 
also wish thank Mr. William H. owner 
Mrs. A. allowing 
publish Lost 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN'S SPEECHES LETTERS 
 
 
_Lincoln's First Public Speech. Address People 
Sangamon County. March 9, 
 
 
Upon subject education, presuming dictate plan 
system respecting it, say view 
important subject we, people, engaged in. every 
man may receive least moderate education, thereby enabled 
read histories countries, may duly 
appreciate value free institutions, appears object 
vital importance, even account alone, say nothing 
advantages satisfaction derived able read 
works, religious moral nature, 
themselves. 
 
part, desire see time means 
enterprise, become much 
general present; gratified power 
contribute something advancement measure might 
tendency happy period. 
 
regard existing laws, alterations thought 
necessary. Many respectable men suggested 
law respecting issuing road law, 
present form, require 
considering great probability framers laws 
wiser myself, prefer them, unless 
first attacked others, case feel 
privilege duty take stand which, view, might tend 
advancement justice. 
 
But, fellow-citizens, shall Considering great degree 
always attend youth, probable already 
presuming becomes me. However, upon subjects 
spoken thought. may wrong 
regard them; but, holding sound maxim 
better sometimes right times wrong, soon 
discover opinions erroneous shall ready them. 
 
Every man said peculiar ambition. Whether true 
not, say, one, great 
truly esteemed rendering worthy 
far shall succeed gratifying ambition yet 
young unknown many you; born 
ever remained humble life. wealthy 
popular relations friends recommend me. case thrown 
exclusively upon independent voters county, elected, 
conferred favour upon shall 
good people 
wisdom shall see fit keep background, 
familiar much 
 
     friend 
       A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Colonel Robert June 21, 
 
 
Dear told absence last week passed 
place, stated publicly possession 
fact facts which, known public, would entirely destroy 
prospects Edwards election; that, 
favour us, forbear divulge them. one 
needed I, and, generally, less unwilling 
accept them; case favour would injustice 
public, therefore must beg pardon it. 
confidence people Sangamon, sufficiently 
since done anything, either design 
known would subject forfeiture 
confidence, knows thing, it, 
country's interest. 
 
find wholly unable form fact 
facts, real supposed, opinion veracity 
permit moment doubt least believed 
said. flattered personal regard manifested me; 
hope that, mature reflection, view public 
interest paramount consideration, therefore determine let 
worst come. assure candid statement facts 
part, however low may sink me, shall never break tie 
personal friendship us. wish answer this, 
liberty publish both, choose. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Opinion Universal Letter published 
Sangamon June 13, 
 
 
go privileges government assist 
bearing consequently go admitting whites 
right suffrage pay taxes bear arms means excluding 

 
 
 
 
_From Address Young Men's Springfield, Illinois. 
January 27, 
 
 
subject remarks evening "The perpetuation 
political great journal things 
happening sun, we, American people, find account 
running date nineteenth century Christian 
find peaceful possession fairest portion 
earth, regards extent territory, soil, 
find government system 
political institutions essentially ends 
civil religious liberty, history former 
times tells us. We, stage existence, found 
legal fundamental 
establishment them; 
us brave, lamented 
departed race ancestors. 
 
task (and nobly performed it) possess themselves, 
us, land, rear upon 
political edifice liberty equal rights; 'tis 
transmit former foot 
latter lapse time. This, duty 
posterity, love species general, 
require us perform. 
 
How, then, shall perform it? point shall expect 
approach means shall fortify it? Shall 
expect military giant step across ocean 
crush us armies Europe, Africa 
treasure earth 
military chest, commander, could not, force, 
take drink Ohio, make track Blue 
trial thousand years. 
 
point, then, approach danger answer, 
ever reaches us, must spring among us. cannot come 
abroad. destruction must author 
nation must live time, die 

 
even something ill among us. mean increasing 
disregard law pervades country; growing disposition 
substitute wild furious passions lieu sober judgment 
courts; worse savage executive ministers 
justice. disposition awfully fearful 
exists ours, though feelings admit, would 
violation truth insult intelligence deny. 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
know American people attached government. 
know would suffer know would endure 
evils long patiently would ever think 
another. Yet, notwithstanding this, laws continually 
rights secure persons 
property held better 
affection government natural 
consequence, sooner later must come. 
 
Here, then, one point danger may expected. question 
recurs, shall fortify it? answer simple. Let every 
American, every liberty, every posterity, 
swear blood Revolution never violate least 
particular laws country, never tolerate 
violation others. patriots seventy-six support 
Declaration Independence, support 
Constitution Laws let every American pledge life, 
property, sacred let every man remember violate 
law trample blood father, tear 
charter children's liberty. Let reverence 
laws breathed every American mother 
Let taught schools, 
Let written 
Let preached pulpit, proclaimed legislative 
enforced courts justice. And, short, let become 
political religion nation. 
 
urge strict observance laws, let 
understood saying bad laws, 
may arise redress legal provisions 
made. mean say thing. mean say 
although bad laws, exist, repealed soon 
possible, still, continue force, sake example 
observed. also cases. 
arise, let proper legal provisions made least 
possible delay, till let them, borne 
with. 
 
fit object redress mob law. 
case may arise, as, instance, 
one two positions necessarily is, thing right 
within itself, therefore deserves protection law 
good citizens, wrong, therefore proper prohibited 
legal neither case interposition mob law 
either necessary, 
 
temple 
liberty; crumbled away, temple must fall 
unless we, supply places 
solid sober reason. Passion helped us, 
more. future enemy. 
furnish materials 
future support Let materials moulded 
general intelligence, sound and, particular, reverence 
Constitution laws; improved last, 
remained free last, revered name last, 
long sleep permitted hostile foot pass 
shall learn last trump 
shall Washington. 
 
Upon let proud fabric freedom rest, rock 
basis; truly said greater institution, 
"the gates hell shall prevail it." 
 
Many great good men, sufficiently qualified task 
may ever found, whose ambition would nothing 
beyond seat Congress, presidential chair. 
belong family lion 
What? Think places would satisfy 
Towering genius beaten seeks 
regions hitherto sees distinction adding story 
story upon fame erected memory others. 
denies glory enough serve chief. 
tread footsteps however 
burns and, possible, it, 
whether expense slaves, enslaving free men. 
then, expect men, possessed 
coupled ambition sufficient push 
utmost time spring among us? 
one does, require people united other, 
attached government laws, generally intelligent, 
successfully 
 
Distinction paramount object, although would 
perhaps so, acquire good yet 
opportunity passed, nothing left done way 
building up, would sit boldly task pulling down. Here, 
then, probable case, highly one could 
well existed heretofore. 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
honour Revolutionary ancestors, indebted 
institutions. forgotten. history hope 
read of, long Bible shall read. 
even granting will, influence cannot 
heretofore been. Even then, cannot universally known, 
felt, generation gone rest. 
close struggle, nearly every adult male 
consequence was, 
form husband, father, son, brother, 
living history found every history bearing 
limbs 
wounds received midst scenes 
history, too, could read understood alike all, wise 
learned histories 
gone. read ever. fortress 
invading could never do, silent 
artillery time walls. gone. 
forest giant swept 
them, left lonely 
shorn murmur 
gentle combat limbs 
sink more. 
 
 
 
 
HUMOROUS ACCOUNT EXPERIENCES LADY REQUESTED 
MARRY 
 
_A Letter Mrs. Browning. Springfield, Illinois. April 1, 
 
 
Dear Without shall make 
history much life elapsed since saw subject 
letter. And, way, discover order give 
full intelligible account things done suffered 
since saw you, shall necessarily relate happened 
before. 
 
was, then, autumn 1836 married lady 
great friend mine, pay 
visit father residing Kentucky, proposed 
return would bring sister 
condition would engage become 
convenient I, course, accepted know 
could done otherwise really averse it; 
me, well pleased 
seen said sister three years before, thought 
intelligent saw good objection 
life her. Time passed on, lady took 
due time sister company, sure enough. 
astonished little, appeared coming readily 
showed trifle willing, reflection occurred 
might prevailed married sister 
come, without anything concerning mentioned her, 
concluded objection presented itself, would 
consent waive this. occurred hearing arrival 
remembered, yet seen her, 
except three years mentioned. days 
and, although seen before, look 
imagination her. knew 
appeared fair match knew called "old 
felt doubt truth least half 
now, her, could life avoid 
thinking this, 
skin full fat permit 
want teeth, appearance general, 
kind notion ran head nothing could commenced 
size reached present less 
thirty-five forty years; and, short, pleased 
her. could do? told sister would take 
better worse, made point honour conscience 
things stick word, especially others induced 
act it, case doubt had, 
fairly convinced man earth would her, hence 
conclusion bent holding "Well," 
thought I, "I said it, and, consequences may, 
shall fault fail it." determined 
consider wife, done, powers discovery put 
work search might fairly set 
tried imagine which, 
unfortunate actually true. Exclusive this, woman 
ever seen face. also tried convince 
mind much valued person, 
inferior, could discover, 

 
Shortly this, without attempting come positive 
understanding her, set first 
saw me. stay letters change 
opinion either intellect intention, but, contrary, 
confirmed both. 
 
while, although fixed 
resolution, found continually 
led make it. life bondage, either 
real much desired 
free. return home saw nothing change opinion 
particular. same, I. spent time 
might get along life contemplated change 
circumstances taken place, might 
evil day time, really dreaded much, perhaps more, 

 
sufferings upon deeply interesting subject, 
am, completely want 
know guess got clear, every sense 
violation word, conscience. don't 
believe guess, might well tell once. 
lawyer says, done manner following, wit: 
delayed matter long thought could honour 
way, brought round last concluded might 
well bring consummation without delay, 
mustered resolution made proposal but, 
answered, No. first supposed 
affectation modesty, thought ill became 
peculiar circumstances case, 
charge found greater firmness before. 
tried again, success, rather 
want success. 
 
finally forced give up, found 
almost beyond seemed 
me, hundred different ways. vanity deeply wounded 
reflection long stupid discover 
time never doubting understood 
also she, taught believe nobody 
else would have, actually rejected fancied 
And, cap whole, first time began suspect 
really little love her. let I'll try 
it. Others made fools 
never truth said me. instance, 
made fool myself. come conclusion never 
think never satisfied 
one would enough me. 
 
receive this, write long something amuse me. 
Give respects Mr. Browning. 
 
 
 
 
_From Debate Lincoln, Baker, others Douglas, 
others. Springfield. December 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
 
... Mr. insists difference Van Buren party 
Whigs is, although former sometimes practice, 
always correct principle, whereas latter wrong 
principle; better impress proposition, uses 
expression words: "The Democrats 
sound heart first 
branch is, Democrats 
admit merely literally true. 
looks moment Prices, 
hundreds others, away 
public money Texas, Europe, every spot earth 
may hope find refuge justice, doubt 
affected heels species running 
seems heels operates 
creatures much like 
song owner, which, got started it, 
tried stop it, would run away. hazard 
wearing point relate seems 
point Irish soldier 
always danger near, 
without orders first charge 
asked captain so, replied, 
brave heart Julius ever somehow other, 
whenever danger legs run away it." 
Mr. party. take public money 
hands laudable purpose wise heads honest hearts 
possibly get again, 
heels run away 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Illinois. October 31, 
 
 
Dear Sir, note yesterday received. difficulty 
us speak, say think 
think was. say imported meant fair 
light 
alone wish understand them. ask present 
entertain unkind feelings you, 
none sort upon subject, except sincere regret 
permitted get 
 
 
 
 
Letter John T. Springfield Illinois. January 
23, 
 
 
giving general summary news, must pardon me; 
power so. miserable man living. 
feel equally distributed whole human family, 
would one cheerful face earth. Whether shall ever better, 
cannot awfully shall not. remain 
impossible; must die better, appears me. matter 
speak account may attend say, unless shall 
hear condition forbidding it. say fear shall 
unable attend business here, change scene might help 
me. could myself, would rather remain home Judge 
write more. 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Temperance Society. 
Springfield, Illinois. February 22, 
 
 
Although temperance cause progress nearly twenty 
years, apparent crowned 
degree success hitherto 
 
list friends daily additions 
thousands. cause seems suddenly transformed 
cold abstract theory living, active powerful 
going forth 
great daily 
worship long 
performed, human sacrifices long made, 
daily deserted. trump fame 
hill hill, sea sea, land land, 
calling millions standard 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
"But," say some, "we shall acknowledge 
joining society, whatever 
influence might be." Surely Christian adhere objection. 
 
believe, take 
form man, and, such, die 
death surely refuse submission 
infinitely lesser perhaps eternal 
salvation large, unfortunate class 
great. judgment, 
us never fallen victims spared 
absence mental moral superiority 
have. Indeed believe, take habitual 
class, heads hearts bear advantageous comparison 
class. seems ever proneness 
brilliant fall demon 
ever seems delighted blood genius 
one us call mind relative 
promising youth fallen sacrifice 
ever seems gone forth like Egyptian angel 
death, commissioned first, fairest born 
every family. Shall arrested 
arrest give aid shall excused 
not? Far around human breath ever keeps 
fathers, sons, friends 
moral 
 
conduct men designed persuasion, kind, 
persuasion, ever adopted. old true 
maxim "that drop honey flies 
men. would win man cause, first convince 
sincere friend. Therein drop honey 
heart, which, say will, great 
reason, which, find little trouble 
convincing judgment justice cause, indeed 
cause really one. contrary, assume dictate 
judgment, command action, mark one 
retreat within himself, close 
head though cause naked truth itself, 
transformed heaviest harder 
steel made, though throw 
force shall able pierce 
penetrate hard man, 
must understood would lead him, even 
best 
 
Another error, seems me, old fell, 
position habitual utterly 
therefore must turned damned without remedy order 
grace temperance might then, 
mankind hundreds years something 
humanity, 
never did, never enthusiasm popular 
cause. could love man taught could hear 
heart could throw open it, 
generous man could adopt could mix blood. 
looked like throwing fathers brothers 
boat security, 
shrank manifest thing. besides this, 
benefits effected system 
point time engage many 
induced labour exclusively none 
Posterity done nothing us; 
may, practically shall little it, unless 
made think time something ourselves. 
 
ignorance human nature ask expect 
whole community rise labour happiness 
others, shall majority 
community take pains whatever secure eternal 
welfare distant Great distance either time space 
wonderful power render human mind. 
Pleasures pains endured, shall dead 
gone, little regarded even cases, much less 
cases others. Still, addition something 
promises good evil great way 
render whole subject connected easily turned 
"Better lay 
don't you'll pay day "Be powers, 
credit long I'll take another 
 
 
 
 
_From Circular Whig Committee. Address People 
Illinois. March 4, 
 
 
... system loans temporary nature, must soon 
system ruinous one 
must soon fail leave us 
 
individual undertakes live soon finds 
original means interest, next, one left borrow 
from, must government. 
 
repeat, then, tariff sufficient revenue, direct 
must soon resorted to; and, indeed, believe alternative 
denied one. system shall 
opponents theory admit propriety tariff sufficient 
revenue, even practice vote 
others boldly advocate direct taxation. therefore, 
boldly advocate direct 
nearly make exceptions adopt tariff, 
think injustice class advocates 
direct taxation. Indeed, believe open 
avowal system till assure people 
tolerate it. Let us, then, briefly compare two 
tariff cheaper system, duties, collected 
large commercial points, require comparatively 
officers direct tax system 
land must literally covered going 
forth like Egyptian every grass 
green thing. And, again, tariff system whole 
revenue paid foreign chiefly 
life. system, man 
contents live upon products country pays 
nothing all. surely country extensive enough, 
products abundant varied enough, answer real wants 
people. short, system burden revenue falls almost 
entirely wealthy few, substantial 
many, live home upon home products, go entirely 
free. direct tax system, none escape. However strictly 
citizen may exclude foreign fine 
fine rich golden 
possession house, 
perpetually views, 
leave determined whether opponents truly 
democratic subject. 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter Martin M. Morris. Springfield, Illinois. March 26, 

 
 
truly gratifying learn people Sangamon 
cast off, old friends known 
best, stick me. would older 
citizens learn (a penniless 
boy, working flatboat ten dollars per put 
candidate pride, wealth, aristocratic family 
Yet so, was. was, too, 
combination church influence me. Baker 
therefore, suppose, exceptions, got 
wife relations churches, 
therefore, wherever would tell, set 
either one other, everywhere contended 
Christian ought go me, belonged church, 
suspected talked fighting 
things, Baker, course, nothing do. 
complain them. church going him, think 
right enough, influences spoken other, 
though strong, would grossly untrue unjust 
charge acted upon body, near so. 
mean influences levied tax considerable per cent. upon 
strength throughout religious controversy. enough this. 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter Joshua F. Speed. Springfield. October 22, 
 
 
another boy, born 10th much 
child Bob age, rather longer order. Bob 
expect always be. 
plainly anybody. quite smart enough. sometimes fear 
one little sort five 
ever after. great deal sort mischief 
animal spirits. Since began letter, messenger 
came tell Bob time reached house 
mother found now, 
run away again. 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter William H. Herndon. Washington. January 8, 
 
 
Dear letter December 27th received day two 
ago. much obliged trouble taken, 
promise take little business there. way 
getting hang House, made little speech two three 
days ago post-office question general interest. find 
speaking elsewhere thing. badly 
worse, speak court. expect make 
one within week two, hope succeed well enough wish 
see it. 
 
pleasant learn desire 
re-elected. heartily thank 
say, Mr. Clay said annexation Texas, 
would although 
thought time, still think, would quite well 
return law end single term. made declaration 
would candidate again, wish deal fairly 
others, keep peace among friends, keep district 
going enemy, cause personal myself; that, 
happen nobody else wishes elected, could 
refuse people right sending again. enter 
others, authorize one enter me, 
word honour 
 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter William H. Herndon. Washington. June 22, 
 
 
young men. must wait brought forward 
older men. instance, suppose ever got 
notice waited hunted pushed forward older men? 
young men get together form Ready 
regular meetings speeches. Take everybody Harrison 
Lee begin 
thing; go along gather wild boys 
town, whether age little Logan, 
hundreds such. Let every one play part 
play speak, 
meetings older men, women, go 
hear you; contribute election "Old 
interesting improving 
intellectual faculties engaged. Don't fail this. 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter William H. Herndon. Washington, July 10, 
 
 
way young man rise improve every way can, 
never suspecting anybody wishes hinder him. Allow assure 
suspicion jealousy never help man situation. 
may sometimes ungenerous attempts keep young man 
succeed, too, allows mind diverted 
true channel attempted Cast about, see 
feeling injured every person ever known fall 
it. 
 
 
 
 
 
_Letter John D. Johnston. January 2, 
 
 
Dear Johnston, request eighty dollars think best 
comply now. various times helped little 
said me, "We get along well 
short time find difficulty again. Now, 
happen defect defect is, think 
know. still doubt whether, 
since saw you, done good whole day's work one day. 
much dislike work, still work much, 
merely seem could get much it. 
habit time whole difficulty; 
vastly important you, still children, 
break important them, 
longer live, keep idle habit it, 
easier get in. 
 
need propose is, shall 
go work, somebody give money 
it. Let father boys take charge things home, 
prepare make go work best 
money discharge debt and, 
secure fair reward labour, promise you, 
every dollar will, first May, get 
labour, either money 
give one this, hire ten dollars 
month, get ten more, making twenty dollars month 
work. mean shall go St. Louis, 
lead mines, gold mines California, mean 
go best wages get close home Coles County. 
Now, this, soon debt, and, 
better, habit keep getting debt 
again. But, clear debt, next year would 
deep ever. say would almost give place 
heaven seventy eighty dollars. value place 
heaven cheap, sure can, offer make, get 
seventy eighty dollars four five months' work. say 
furnish money deed land, and, don't 
pay money back, deliver possession. can't 
live land, live without it? 
always kind me, mean unkind you. 
contrary, follow advice, find worth 
eighty times eighty dollars you. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter John D. Johnston. November 4, 
 
 
Dear Brother, came Charleston day yesterday, 
learned anxious sell land live move 
Missouri. thinking ever since, cannot think 
notion utterly Missouri better 
here? land there, here, 
raise corn without work? anybody there, 
here, work you? intend go work, 
better place right are; intend go 
work, cannot get along anywhere. 
place place good. raised crop 
really want sell land, get money, spend it. 
Part land have, and, life upon it, never 
spot big enough bury in. Half get land 
spend moving Missouri, half eat, 
wear out, foot land Now, feel 
duty hand piece feel 
even account, particularly mother's account. 
eastern forty acres intend keep mother 
cultivate it, rent enough support least, 
rent something. two 
let have, thanks me. Now, misunderstand 
letter; write write order, 
possible, get face truth, truth is, 
away time. thousand 
getting along better deceive 
nobody yourself. Go work cure case. 
 
word mother. Chapman tells wants go live him. 
would try get tired (as think 
return home. Chapman feels 
kindly you, doubt make situation 

 
 
 
 
Law Written July 1, 
 
 
accomplished lawyer. find quite much material 
lecture points wherein failed, wherein 
successful. leading rule lawyer, 
man every Leave nothing 
to-morrow done to-day. Never let correspondence fall 
behind. Whatever piece business hand, 
labour pertaining done. bring 
common facts so, write 
declaration once. law point examine books, 
note authority rely upon declaration itself, 
sure find wanted. 
business likely collection cases, 

note even draft orders advance. 
course saves 
labour done, labour court 
rather court not. 
 
speaking practised 
lawyer's avenue public. However able faithful may 
respects, people slow bring business cannot make 
speech. yet fatal error young lawyers 
much one, upon rare powers 
speaking, shall claim exemption law, 
case failure advance. 
 
Discourage Persuade compromise whenever 
can. Point nominal often real 
fees, expenses, waste time. lawyer 
superior opportunity good man. still 
business enough. 
 
Never stir worse man scarcely found one 
this. nearly habitually 
register deeds search 
stir strife, put money moral tone ought 
profession drive men it. 
 
matter fees important, far beyond mere question bread 
Properly attended to, fuller justice done 
lawyer fee never 
general rule, never take whole fee advance, 
small fully paid common 
mortal feel interest case something 
still prospect you, well lack 
interest case job likely lack skill 
Settle amount fee take note advance. 
feel working something, sure 
work faithfully well. Never sell least 
consideration service performed. leads 
losing interest case, 
refusing refund allowed consideration 
fail. 
 
vague popular belief lawyers necessarily 
say consider extent confidence 
conferred upon lawyers people, 
appears improbable impression distinct 
Yet impression almost Let young 
man choosing law calling moment yield popular 
belief. Resolve honest judgment 
cannot honest lawyer, resolve honest without 
lawyer. Choose occupation, rather one choosing 
do, advance, consent 
 
 
 
 
_A Written July 1, 
 
Equality society alike whether latter 
British aristocratic sort domestic slavery sort. 
 
know Southern men declare slaves better hired 
labourers amongst us. little know whereof 
permanent class hired labourers amongst us. Twenty-five years ago 
hired hired yesterday 
account to-day, hire others labour to-morrow. 
 
order things 
society labour common burden race, 
effort shift share burden shoulders 
others great durable race. Originally 
upon whole race, when, slavery, 
concentrated part only, becomes God 
upon 
 
Free labour inspiration pure slavery hope. 
power hope upon human happiness wonderful. 
conception it, hence system 
among slaves. slave cannot drive lash 
break seventy-five pounds day, task 
break hundred, promise pay over, break 
hundred substituted hope 
 
yet perhaps occur that, extent 
gain case, given slave system adopted 
free system labour. 
 
 
 
 
 
_A Fragment Slavery. July 
 
however may right enslave B, 
may B argument prove equally may 
enslave say white B then; 
right enslave Take care. rule 
slave first man meet skin 
own. 
 
mean colour mean whites 
blacks, therefore right enslave 
them? Take care again. rule slave first man 
meet intellect superior own. 
 
But, say you, question interest, make 
interest right enslave another. well. 
make interest right enslave you. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Reply Senator Douglas Peoria, Illinois. Origin 
Wilmot Proviso. October 16, 
 
 
... war Mexico broke 1846. Congress 
session, President Polk asked place two millions 
dollars control, used found 
practicable expedient, treaty peace Mexico, 
acquiring part territory. bill duly gotten 
purpose, House 
Representatives, Democratic member Pennsylvania name 
David Wilmot moved amendment, territory 
thus acquired shall never slavery." origin 
Wilmot created great stuck like 
voted bill, bill passed 
House. Senate, however, adjourned without final action it, 
appropriation proviso lost time. 
 
... declared but, must think, real, covert 
spread slavery, cannot hate 
monstrous injustice slavery itself. hate 
republican example influence world, enables 
enemies free institutions us 
causes real friends freedom doubt 
especially forces many good men amongst 
open war fundamental principles civil liberty, 
Declaration Independence, insisting 
right principle action 
 
proceeding let say think prejudice 
Southern people. would situation. 
slavery exist among them, would introduce it. 
exist among us, instantly give up. 
believe masses North South. Doubtless individuals 
sides would hold slaves circumstances, 
others would gladly introduce slavery anew 
existence. know Southern men free slaves, go North 
become Abolitionists, Northern ones go South 
become cruel 
 
Southern people tell us responsible origin 
slavery are, acknowledge fact. said 
institution exists, difficult get rid 
satisfactory way, understand appreciate saying. 
surely blame know 
myself. earthly power given me, know 
existing institution. first impulse would free 
slaves, send Liberia, native land. 
moment's reflection would convince whatever high hope (as 
think may long run, sudden 
execution impossible. landed day, 
would perish next ten days; surplus 
surplus money enough carry many times ten 
days. then? Free all, keep among us 
quite certain condition? think would 
hold one slavery rate, yet point clear enough 
denounce people upon. next? Free them, make 
politically socially feelings admit 
this, mine would, well know great mass 
whites not. Whether feeling accords justice sound 
judgment sole question, indeed part it. 
universal feeling, whether well ill cannot safely 
disregarded. cannot make seem 
systems gradual emancipation might adopted, 
undertake judge brethren 
South. 
 
Equal justice South, said, requires us consent 
extension slavery new countries. say, inasmuch 
object taking Nebraska, therefore must 
object taking slave. Now, admit perfectly 
logical, difference slaves. 
thus require deny humanity negro, wish ask 
whether South, yourselves, ever willing 
kindly provided come world, 
small percentage natural percentage 
larger slave States free. great majority, South 
well North, human 
physical 
sympathies bosoms Southern people manifest many 
ways sense wrong slavery, consciousness that, 
all, humanity negro. deny let 
address plain questions. 
 
1820 joined North almost unanimously declaring African 
slave-trade punishment death. 
this? feel wrong, join 
providing men hung it? practice 
bringing wild negroes Africa would buy them. 
never thought hanging men catching selling wild horses, 
wild wild 
 
Again, among individual class native 
known 
buy slave cannot help 
it, sell him; help it, drive 
door. despise recognize friend, 
even honest man. children must play his; may 
freely little negroes, 
children. obliged deal him, try get 
job without much touching him. common join 
hands men avoid 
shrinking grows 
rich business, still remember him, still keep 
upon family. Now, this? 
treat man deals cotton, 
 
yet again. United States Territories, including 
District Columbia, four hundred thirty thousand free 
blacks. five hundred dollars per head, worth two 
hundred millions dollars. comes vast amount property 
running without see free horses free 
cattle running large. this? free blacks 
descendants slaves, slaves themselves; would 
slaves something white owners, 
inducing vast pecuniary sacrifice liberate them. 
it? cases 
sense justice human sympathy continually telling 
poor negro natural right deny 
make mere merchandise deserve death. 
 
ask us deny humanity slave, 
estimate equal ask us 
yourselves? ask us nothing two hundred 
millions dollars could induce do? 
 
one great argument support repeal Missouri 
Compromise still come. argument "the sacred right 
self-government." ... 
 
     rush angels fear 
 
hazard thought one fools 
meet rush take bull 
faith proposition man precisely pleases 
exclusively own, lies foundation 
sense justice me. extend principle communities 
men well individuals. extend 
politically wise well naturally wise saving 
us matters concern us. Here, 
Washington, would trouble oyster laws Virginia, 
cranberry laws Indiana. doctrine self-government 
right; application 
attempted. perhaps rather say whether 
application depends upon whether negro man. 
man, case man may, matter 
pleases him. negro 
man, extent total destruction self-government 
say he, too, shall govern white man governs 
himself, governs also 
governs another man, 
despotism. negro man, ancient faith teaches 
"all men created equal," moral right 
connection one man's making slave another. 
 
Judge Douglas bitter 
argument saying: "The white people Nebraska good enough 
govern themselves, good enough govern 
miserable 
 
Well, doubt people Nebraska continue 
good average people elsewhere. say 
contrary. say man good enough govern another 
man without other's consent. say leading 
American 
 
Slavery founded man's 
love justice. principles eternal 
brought collision fiercely slavery extension brings 
them, must follow. Repeal 
Missouri Compromise; repeal repeal Declaration 
Independence; repeal past still cannot repeal human 
nature. still abundance man's heart slavery 
extension wrong, abundance heart mouth 
continue 
 
Missouri Compromise ought restored. Slavery may may 
established Nebraska. whether not, shall 
councils spirit 
compromise; who, this, ever trust national 
spirit mutual spirit first 
gave us Constitution, saved shall 
cast us ever. shall lieu 
it? South flushed triumph tempted North 
believed, wrong burning 
One side one 
one Already North 
defy constitutional resist execution Fugitive 
Slave Law, even menace institution slavery States 
exists. Already South claim constitutional 
right take hold slaves free States, demand revival 
slave-trade, demand treaty Great Britain 
fugitive slaves may reclaimed yet 
either side. grave question lovers Union, whether 
final destruction Missouri Compromise, spirit 
compromise, these, 
increase number both. 
 
... men, mostly Whigs, repeal Missouri 
Compromise, nevertheless hesitate go restoration, lest 
thrown company allow me, 
old Whig, tell think 
Stand anybody stands right. Stand right, 
part goes wrong. Stand Abolitionist 
restoring Missouri Compromise, stand 
attempts repeal Fugitive Slave Law. latter case stand 
Southern that? still right. 
cases right cases dangerous 
stand middle ground hold ship level 
national, nothing less national. 
good old Whig ground. desert ground 
company less Whig, less man, less 
American. 
 
particularly object new position avowed principle 
Nebraska law gives slavery body object 
assumes moral right enslaving one 
man another. object dangerous free 
sad evidence that, feeling forget right; 
liberty principle ceased object 
Fathers Republic rejected it. 
argument argument ever admitted 
favour slavery, far, far carried them, 
ever go. found institution existing among us, 
could help, cast blame British king 
permitted Thus see plain, unmistakable spirit 
age towards slavery hostility principle, 
necessity. 
 
transformed 
chief 
ship State. Little little, steadily man's march 
grave, giving old new faith. Near eighty 
years ago began declaring men created equal; 
beginning run declaration, 
men enslave others sacred right self-government. 
principles cannot stand together. opposite God 
whoever holds one must despise 
 
Republican dust. Let us it. 
Let us turn wash white spirit blood 
Revolution. Let us turn slavery claims moral right, back 
upon existing legal rights arguments necessity. Let us 
return position fathers gave it, let rest 
peace. Let us Declaration Independence, 
practices policy it. Let North South, let 
Americans, let lovers liberty everywhere, join great 
good work. this, shall saved Union, 
shall saved make keep ever worthy 

 
 
 
 
_From Letter Hon. Geo. Lexington, Kentucky. 
Springfield, Illinois. August 15, 
 
 
dear Sir, ... friend slavery 
speech spoke "the peaceful extinction used 
expressions belief thing was, 
time, end. Since thirty-six years 
experience think, 
peaceful extinction slavery prospect us. signal failure 
Henry Clay good great men, 1849, effect anything 
favour gradual emancipation Kentucky, together thousand 
hope question liberty, 
principle, been. political 
slaves King wanted free, called maxim 
"all men created self-evident 
grown lost dread slaves ourselves, 
become greedy call maxim "a 
self-evident Fourth July quite 
still great day burning 
 
spirit desired peaceful extinction slavery 
become extinct Revolution. 
impulse occasion, nearly half States adopted 
systems emancipation significant fact 
single State done like since. far peaceful, voluntary 
emancipation concerned, condition negro slave America, 
scarcely less terrible contemplation free mind, 
fixed hopeless change better lost souls 
finally resign 
proclaim subjects free republicans, sooner 
American masters voluntarily give slaves. 
 
political problem is, "Can nation continue together 
slave, half problem 
mighty me. May God mercy 
 
     much obliged friend, humble servant, 
       A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Letter Joshua F. Speed. August 24, 
 
 
suggest political action now, would 
suppose quite much, however, may think. know 
dislike slavery, fully admit abstract wrong it. far 
cause difference. say sooner yield 
legal right slave, especially bidding 
would see Union dissolved. aware 
one bidding yield right; certainly not. 
leave matter entirely yourself. also acknowledge rights 
obligations Constitution regard slaves. 
confess hate see poor creatures hunted caught 
carried back unrequited lips 
keep quiet. together tedious trip 
Louisville St. Louis. may remember, 
well do, Louisville mouth Ohio, 
board ten dozen slaves together sight 
continued me, see something like every time 
touch Ohio slave fair 
assume interest thing has, continually 
power making ought rather 
appreciate much great body Northern people 
feelings order maintain loyalty Constitution 
Union. oppose extension slavery, judgment 
feeling prompt me, obligations contrary. 
must differ say 
President, would send army hang leaders Missouri 
outrages upon Kansas still, Kansas fairly votes 
slave State must admitted, Union must 
dissolved. votes slave State 
is, means say would hang men? Must 
still admitted, Union phase 
question first becomes practical one. assumption 
may fair decision slavery question Kansas, 
plainly see would differ Nebraska law. look 
upon law, violence beginning. 
conceived violence, maintained violence, 
executed violence. say conceived violence, 
destruction Missouri Compromise, circumstances, 
nothing less violence. passed violence, could 
passed votes many members violence 
known maintained violence, 
elections since clearly demand repeal, demand 
openly disregarded. 
 
say men ought hung way executing law; 
say way executed quite good 
executed precise way intended 
first, else Nebraska man express astonishment 
Poor public man silly 
enough believe anything like fairness ever intended, 
bravely 
 
Kansas form slave constitution, ask 
admitted Union, take already settled question, 
settled means every principle 
law ever held court North South, every negro taken 
Kansas free; yet utter disregard spirit 
violence beautiful Legislature gravely passes law hang 
man shall venture inform negro legal rights. 
subject real object law. If, like hang 
upon building, shall among 
fate. humble sphere, shall advocate 
restoration Missouri Compromise long Kansas remains 
Territory; when, foul means, seeks come 
Union slave State, shall oppose it. loath case 
withhold assent enjoyment property acquired located 
good admit good faith taking negro 
Kansas held slavery probability man. man 
sense enough property much 
sense misunderstand outrageous character whole Nebraska 
business. opposition admission Kansas, 
shall company, may beaten. are, shall not, 
account, attempt dissolve Union. think probable, 
however, shall beaten. Standing unit among yourselves, 
can, directly indirectly, bribe enough men carry day, 
could open proposition establish Get hold 
man North whose position ability 
make support measure, whatever may be, 
necessity, thing done. this, let tell 
Douglas introduced Nebraska Bill February 
afterward, called session Illinois Legislature. 
one hundred members composing two branches body, 
seventy latter held caucus, 
Nebraska Bill talked of, formally thereby 
discovered three, more, favour measure. 
day two Douglas's orders came resolutions passed 
approving bill; passed large truth 
Democratic masses too, 
Democratic well Whig, even nearer unanimous it; 
soon party necessity supporting became apparent, way 
Democrats began see wisdom justice perfectly 

 
say Kansas fairly votes free State, Christian 
rejoice it. decent talk way, 
doubt never vote way. Although 
private letter conversation express preference 
Kansas free, would vote man Congress would 
say thing man could elected 
district slave State. think company ought 
small, 
class among you; yet politics dictate 
course you, completely masters 
master negroes. inquire stand. 
point. think others say Whigs, 
Washington, voted 
Wilmot Proviso good forty times; never heard one 
attempting that. oppose 
extension slavery. certain. 
could be? one abhors oppression negroes 
favour degrading classes white people? progress 
appears pretty nation, began declaring 
men created practically read it, men 
created equal except get control, 
read, men created equal except foreigners 
comes this, shall prefer 
country make pretence Russia, 
instance, despotism taken without base 
kindest regards Mrs. Speed. leading 
subject letter sympathy 
yet let say friend ever. 
 
     A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Lincoln's Speech. May 19, 
 
 
Mr. Chairman Gentlemen, [cries "Take 
say, Court, 
friends anti-Nebraska got together Springfield elected 
one delegate represent old Sangamon convention, 
certainly movement virtue 
meeting hardly called delegates 
inasmuch as, properly speaking, represent nobody 
ourselves. think altogether fair say 
anti-Nebraska party Sangamon, although good deal 
anti-Nebraska feeling there; say myself, think may 
speak also fully approve 
platform done [A voice: even 
regularly right answer call 
speak. suppose truly stand public sentiment Sangamon 
great question repeal, although yet represent 
many numbers taken distinct position question. 
 
trying mere movement 
call halt turn steps backward needs help good 
counsels unless popular opinion makes 
strongly felt, change made present course, 
flow account Nebraska, hand raised 
[The last sentence uttered earnest, 
not, indeed, manner, make cold chill me. 
Others gave similar 
 
listened great interest earnest appeal made 
Illinois men gentleman Lawrence S. 
addressed us deeply moved 
statement wrongs done free-State men there. think 
say true men North them, 
ought willing possible needful thing right 
must promise ought not, lest called 
perform must calm consider 
whole difficulty, determine possible must 
led excitement passion sober 
judgments would approve higher 
serious business temporary 
measures. 
 
stand firmly stand firmly 
right. know great political moral wrongs done, 
outrages committed, denounce wrongs although 
cannot, present, much more. desire reach beyond 
personal outrages establish rule apply all, 
prevent future 
 
seen to-day every shade popular opinion represented 
here, rather basis. come 
together sort representatives popular opinion 
extension slavery territory free fact well law, 
pledged word statesmen nation more. 
assembled protest well 
great wrong, take measures, well can, 
make wrong right; place nation, far may possible 
now, repeal Missouri Compromise; 
plain way restore Compromise, demand 
determine shall [Immense applause.] 
necessary, devotion principles 
Declaration Independence, let practical work limited 
above. know perfect agreement sentiment 
public questions might rightfully considered 
convention, indignation must feel cannot 
us must give something good 
cause. one desire mind, one wish 
common us made; counsel 
earnestly bury sink personal feeling, make 
things work common purpose united agreed about, 
present agree absolutely 
done rightful mode must kept 
[Applause.] right there. lose 
Kansas freedom, example set prove fatal 
freedom end. We, therefore, language must 
axe root 
time firm, resolute action. 
[Applause.] 
 
Nebraska bill, rather Nebraska law, one 
legislation, act legislative whose 
result, indeed intention, make slavery unless 
headed effective way, fair way see land 
freedom land slavery fact. 
[Sensation.] open two eyes, see so. need 
state, command universal approval, almost 
entire North, well large following border States, 
radically opposed planting slavery free territory. Probably 
popular vote throughout nation voters 
free States, least one-half border States, could 
express sentiments would vote issue; 
safe say two-thirds votes entire nation would 
opposed it. yet, spite sentiment 
free country, fair way see Kansas present 
admission slave State. Indeed, local law 
Kansas, deny slavery exists even now. every 
principle law, negro Kansas free; yet 
legislature makes infamous crime tell free! 
 
party lash fear ridicule justice 
liberty; singular fact, none less fact, well 
known common experience, men things 
terror party lash would account 
consideration men march mouth 
cannon without run terrible name 
even pronounced worthless creature they, 
good reason, press point 
Douglas introduced anti-Nebraska bill 
extra session legislature succeeding February, 
seventy-five party caucus, fully 
three votes whole 
measure. days orders came Washington, 
commanding approve party lash 
brought caucus, passed large majority. 
masses it, party necessity carried it; 
passed lower house Congress 
people, reason. greatest danger 
profess government law reason, law 
give way violence demand awful power. 
Like great think great 
everything comes way, makes read 
once, law book, "a slave human 
legally safeguards liberty 
broken down, attempted, made 
free negroes, long, think you, begin 
make poor white men? [Applause.] deceived. 
Revolutions go Democratic party 
declared _all_ men created equal. successor 
leadership written word men, making read "all 
men created equal." Pray, may 
get power, add word making read 
white 
 
Meanwhile negro fruitful subject 
John paid respects to, 
calls immortal Declaration "a self-evident 
shadow Hill 
home Warren 
side house, dares away 
birthday promise liberty Declaration "a 
string Southern Whigs, working hand 
hand Democrats, making theories 
practical. Thomas Jefferson, moral element 
slavery, solemnly declared country 
remembered God Judge Douglas, insignificant 
wave hand, "don't care whether slavery voted voted 
down." Now, slavery right, even negative, right 
treat manner. moral political 
wrong, considers be, answer God 
attempt spread fortify it? [Applause.] 
 
man, Judge Douglas other, maintain 
negative, merely position question; and, 
accordingly, Union made white men 
white men matter fact, first branch 
proposition historically true; government made white 
men, superior race. 
government, speak, declaration 
men created equal," entitled "life, liberty, 
pursuit happiness." [Applause.] 
 
so, framers Constitution particular 
keep instrument word reason 
slavery would ultimately come end, wish 
free country human beings ever 
slavery. [Applause.] argument 
superior negro one talent 
Let negro possess little independence; 
one permitted keep little has. 
[Applause.] slavery endure test reason yet 
like Douglas, use sort 
assumption, might better like above, order 
prepare mind gradual, none less certain, 
slavery upon, fair domain freedom. 
however much may argue upon it, soft 
slavery maintained violence. repeal 
Missouri Compromise violence. violation law 
sacred obligations overthrow trample 
solemn compromise, obtained fearful loss freedom one 
fairest Western Congress violated 
confidence constituents voting bill; public 
sentiment, shown elections 1854, demanded restoration 
compromise, Congress violated trust simply 
force numbers hold it. murderous 
violence used now, order force slavery Kansas; 
cannot done way. [Sensation.] 
 
necessary result establish rule 
instead rule law perpetuate spread slavery, 
and, time, make general. see ends line. 
Washington, spot outrage started, 
Sumner beaten slowly 
senators claim gentlemen stood by, 
act, even applauding afterward places 
Senate. Even Douglas, man, saw within helping 
distance, yet let murderous blows fall Then, 
end line, time Sumner Lawrence 
destroyed crime Freedom. prominent 
liberty Kansas, must give way 
power slavery. two days ago, Judge Trumbull found necessary 
propose bill Senate prevent general civil war 
restore peace Kansas. 
 
live midst anxiety expect 
new disaster newspaper read. healthful 
political state? tendencies signs 
times point plainly way [Sensation.] 
 
early days Constitution slavery South 
North alike, evil, division sentiment 
controlled geographical lines considerations climate, 
moral views. Petitions abolition slavery 
presented first Congress Virginia Massachusetts 
show harmony state fugitive 
slave law passed dissenting voice Senate, 
seven dissenting votes House. was, however, wise 
law, and, Constitution, one. Twenty-five 
years later, law proposed 
thirty-five years that, present law, drafted Mason 
Virginia, passed Northern votes. not, now, complaining 
law, trying show current 
proposed law far less offensive present one. 
Continental Congress pledged itself, without dissenting vote, 
wholly slave trade, neither purchase 
less three months passage 
Declaration Independence, Congress adopted 
declaration unanimously resolved "that slave imported 
thirteen United [Great applause.] 
 
second day July, draft Declaration 
Independence reported Congress committee, 
slave trade characterized "an "a 
"a 
cruel war human [Applause.] agreed except 
South Carolina Georgia, order preserve harmony, 
necessity case, expressions Indeed, 
abolition societies existed far south Virginia; 
well-known fact Washington, Jefferson, Madison, Lee, Henry, Mason, 
qualified abolitionists, much radical 
subject Whig Democratic parties claim 
to-day. March 1, 1784, Virginia ceded confederation 
lands lying northwest Ohio River. Jefferson, Chase Maryland, 
Rhode Island, committee territory 
thereafter reported slavery exist 
year report adopted, 
Kentucky, Tennessee, Alabama, Mississippi also would free; 
required assent nine States ratify it. North Carolina 
thus vote Delaware, Georgia, New 
Jersey refused vote. point fact, was, assented 
six States. Three years later, square vote exclude slavery 
one vote, New York, 
it. yet, years later, five thousand citizens 
Illinois voting mass less twelve thousand, 
deliberately, long heated contest, voted introduce 
slavery Illinois; and, to-day, large party free State 
Illinois willing vote slavery 
fair domain Kansas, notwithstanding received freedom 
long birth political community. repeat, therefore, 
question, plain direction [Sensation.] 
colonial time, Mason, Jefferson hostile 
slavery Virginia 
Virginia made earnest effort get rid 
old Massachusetts did. circumstances 
leading men Yet 
within less fifty years Virginia changed made 
cotton sugar States one leading 
applause.] 
 
Constitutional Convention, George Mason Virginia made 
violent abolition speech friends Lovejoy would desire 
make speech could safely repeated 
anywhere Southern soil enlightened year. 
differences opinion subject even then, discussion 
see Kansas slave code, which, know, 
Missouri slave code, merely across river, 
even express opinion hostile foul blot land 
Washington Declaration Independence. [Sensation.] 
 
1849, test vote, mighty influence 
Henry Clay many good men could get 
expression favour gradual emancipation plain issue 
marching toward light civilization Ohio Illinois; 
State Hardin Henry Clay, 
arm, took black toward deadly 
doubt doubt 
must lay aside prejudices march, shoulder 
shoulder, great army [Applause.] 
 
Every Fourth July young orators proclaim "the land 
home Well, now, orators 
get next year, and, may be, year, would like 
old farmer get deny it? 
would like that? suppose Kansas comes slave State, 
it, free-State 
men come back North, like 
legs, 
let go so, won't dare 
say [Sensation 
 
man doubt that, even spite people's will, slavery 
triumph violence, unless made manifest 
Even Governor claimed outset contest 
Kansas fair, got eyes open last; believe 
that, result moral physical violence, Kansas soon 
apply admission slave State. yet can't mistake 
people don't want so, land free 
natural political law. law free 
understanding case, decided nearly 
century ago, great Lord held slavery 
nature must take rise (as distinguished 
law; country age could traced back 
one please tell 
law establishes slavery [A voice: "The 
Aye, And, principle, gang Missouri 
could come Illinois declare 
legal would legal slavery Kansas. 
express land Washington Jefferson, may 
soon brought face face fact showing 
world acts prefer slavery 
[Sensation.] 
 
is, believe, principle law one party contract 
violates grossly chiefly destroy object 
made, party may rescind it. ask ain't 
good law. [Voices: Well, right, go 
whole, entire Missouri Compromise thus turning 
Missouri free State; like know 
like one point 
making free State Missouri making slave State 
Kansas. [Great applause.] ain't one bit difference, except 
way would great mercy never 
Whig party never oppose 
Nebraska bill body say, intention 
interfering slavery slave States. platform says 
contrary. allow slavery exist slave 
slavery right good, necessities Union. 
grant fugitive slave law 
fathers bound carry 
agreement. agree introduce slavery regions 
previously exist. contrary, said 
example teachings deem 
consider so; wise right 
[Voices: 
interfere slavery exists never tried 
give reasonable efficient fugitive slave law. [A 
voice: say [Applause.] part bargain, I'm 
living it; go I'm bound more, 
won't agree further. [Great applause.] 
 
We, Illinois, feel especially proud provision 
Missouri Compromise excluding slavery Kansas; 
Illinois man, Jesse B. Thomas, father. Henry Clay, 
credited Compromise general terms, 
even vote provision, advocated ultimate admission 
second compromise; and, Thomas was, beyond controversy, 
real author branch Compromise. 
show Northern members toward Southern 
test vote exclude slavery Missouri, ninety voted 
exclude, exclude, every vote slave States 
ranged former fourteen votes free States, 
seven New England alone; vote exclude 
slavery Kansas, vote one hundred 
whole, was, 
course, Southern triumph. idle contend otherwise, 
done shown votes 
quite emphatically expressions representative men. Mr. 
South Carolina never known commit political 
great judgment section; declared 
measure "would restore result demanded 
every consideration discretion, wisdom, 
measure came President Monroe approval, 
put member cabinet question: "Has Congress 
constitutional power prohibit slavery John C. 
Calhoun William H. South, equally John Quincy 
Adams, Benjamin Smith Thompson North, alike answered, 
without qualification measure, 
great consequence South, passed; Missouri was, means 
it, finally enabled knock door Republic open 
passage slaves. And, spite this, Freedom's share 
taken force 
votes, called popular will. name I, common 
give wicked [Sensation.] 
 
even contest Missouri 
constitution came Congress approval, forbade free 
negro entering State. short, Illinois "black 
hidden away constitution 
controversy thus Mr. Clay's talents shone 
controversy shook Union 
foundation finally settled satisfaction conservative 
parties sides line, though 
either, Missouri admitted small majority six 
lower House. great majority, think, would given 
Kansas also secured slavery? [A voice: "A majority 
"A majority way," answered. think 
would safe Northern man confronted 
constituents voted Missouri Kansas 
hopeless slavery? yet man Douglas, 
highest talents direction, 
carried triumph State, hailed honour 
applauding act. shows 
whither thing slavery powerful 
high minister 
even greatest men. strength, like rolling 
Monstrous crimes committed name 
persons would dare commit 
individuals. almost belief. 
one might wonder see slavery advance steadily 
new 
even see steady advance land dedicated 
proposition "all men created [Sensation.] 
 
yields nothing itself; keeps has, gets 
really came dangerously near securing Illinois 
get Missouri first proposition admit 
Arkansas Missouri one slave State. territory 
Arkansas came in, without serious question, slave 
State; afterward Missouri, sort equality, 
also slave State. Florida Kansas 
forced [Sensation.] 
wherever six years 
dangerously near California came slave State. Texas 
slave State, four slave States may carved vast 
yet, year slavery abolished throughout 
vast region royal decree sovereign Mexico. 
please tell slavery exists Texas to-day? 
right as, higher greater than, slavery seeking 
political 
(as (as Senate 
required. history repeats itself; even slavery kept 
course violence past, 
judgment, met people 
bent 
 
have, afternoon, heard bitter Brooks 
Washington, 
slavery. certainly going 
advocate them; acts necessary 
Nebraska law. reserve highest censure 
authors use. 
believe Shakespeare said, "Where offence let 
axe and, opinion, man Douglas Northern men 
Congress advocate guilty thousand 
murderous be. 
[Applause.] 
 
made good beginning to-day. Methodist friends 
would say, "I feel good here." may find 
fault moderation platform, recollect 
"the battle always strong, race 
grave moderation generally safer 
struggle likely long earnest, 
must not, action, repel sympathy us 
rather win must 
overlook facts new 
comparatively weak, enemies relatively 
strong. administration political power; and, right 
wrong, present numbers. friends urge 
appeal arms much force recollect 
government arrayed us, numbers 
arrayed us or, state nearer truth, 
yet expressly us; repel 
friends rather gain anything revolutionary 
stands, must appeal sober sense 
patriotism people. make day grow 
strong grow strong violence 
injustice And, unless truth 
justice hollow lie, majority while, 
revolution accomplish none less radical 
result pacific measures. battle freedom 
fought principle. Slavery violation eternal right. 
necessities condition; 
sure God school children BLACK FOUL LIE 
NEVER CONSECRATED GOD'S [Immense applause 
lasting One greatest difficulties is, men 
slavery crime ruinous nation, 
peculiar condition circumstances, 
advocate though damning Henry Clay 
brilliant example others statesmen 
compelled so; thus slavery secures actual support 
heart. Yet Henry Clay forced 
Compromise secured slavery great State well political 
advantage. hated slavery less, loved whole 
Union more. long slavery great Compromise, 
could sufficiently cover 
Compromise stands 
 
     never mention him, 
     name never 
     lips forbid speak 
     familiar 
 
one cherished measures, ghost 
would arise rebuke them. [Great applause.] 
 
Now, let us friends, appeal moderation 
patriotism sober second thought; awakened 
public conscience. repeal sacred Missouri Compromise 
installed weapons incendiary 
weapons 
ignorance, see 
fruits dying bed heroic 
"Free smoking 
free-State Governor Kansas chained stake freedom's soil 
like crime freedom. [Applause.] see 
Christian statesmen, Christian newspapers, Christian 
applauding _the act low UPON 
VICTIM BEHIND BACK DEALT DEADLY BLOW. [Sensation 
applause.] note political 
coming common one hand, 
sometimes and, hand, 
fully significance 
cannot pass constitute sign 
times. Everything world everything else, 
fruits Nebraska bill like poisoned source 
come. say may sooner later compelled 
meet force time yet come, 
true ourselves, may never come. mistake ballot 
stronger Therefore let slavery use 
bullets; let us wait patiently till November, fire ballots 
return; peaceful policy, believe shall 
ultimately [Applause.] 
 
policy Illinois early fathers fought 
good fight gained victory. free men State, 
led Governor Coles native Maryland President 
private determined beautiful 
never one title himself. 
resolute winds sweep across broad 
shall never cool brow, shall 
streams bring joy gladness free soil water tired 
feet, long heavenly 
streams bless land, 
memory remain, humanity minister SHALL EVER 
FREE! [Great applause.] Yates, Williams, 
convention came Kentucky Illinois going 
better conditions, also get away 
slavery. said me, understood among us 
Kentuckians don't like one bit. Now, we, 
blessings liberty early men Illinois left us, refuse 
like privilege free men seek plant Freedom's 
Western stand 
seek better conditions Kansas 
Christian men, strong free ourselves, 
hold iron anew already oppressed 
unto written, "that decree 
write 
afford deeply human 

 
One great trouble matter is, slavery insidious 
power, equally open violence well 
management Even ordinance 1787, 
settlers Indiana Illinois one government 
tried get Congress allow slavery temporarily, petitions 
end sent General Harrison, Governor, 
urged capital. 
liberty here. John Virginia made vigorous report 
it; although well get three 
favourable reports it, yet United States Senate, aid 
slave States, finally good. [Applause.] 
hall to-day temple free men instead negro 
[Great applause let slavery get 
planted locality, ever weak doubtful title, ever 
small numbers, like Canada 
can't root out. may slavery; 
five six slaves, excellent 
son married beg help save 
property, vote interest principles 
hoping vote losing 
side. others same; ways slavery gets sure 
done whole mighty force 
committed support. process working 
Kansas to-day. must recollect slave property worth 
dollars free-State men must work 
sentiment alone. call 
secret deadly work. 
 
strange thing, moral law 
know of, man loses horse, whole country turn 
help hang man shade two 
crowd hang one aids restoring 
liberty. slavery, horse 
sacred man; essence popular 
don't care call one man chooses 
make slave another, third man shall allowed object. 
free Kansas, allowed stand, next 
thing see negroes Africa 
one thing truly lawful other; 
got stamp out, else stamp 
us out. [Sensation applause.] 
 
Two years ago, Springfield, Judge Douglas avowed Illinois came 
Union slave State, slavery 
operation great, everlasting principle "popular 
sovereignty." Well, now, argument must answered, 
little truth mean 
true would us believe. could 
essentially true ordinance '87 valid. But, point 
fact, beings called slaves 
French settlements first State constitution 
fact, don't deny it. Slaves brought early 
kept spite ordinance 1787 
it. slavery here. contrary, 
influence number 
influence sovereignty, right 
across river Missouri, seven thousand two 
hundred eleven time; slavery finally faded 
Illinois, influence law freedom, grew 
stronger stronger Missouri, law practice "popular 
sovereignty." point fact one hundred seventeen 
slaves Illinois one year admission, one every four 
hundred seventy or, state another way, 
Illinois slave State 1820, New York New Jersey 
much greater slave States greater numbers, slavery 
established early times. 
vital difference States judge's Kansas 
sought slavery 
already established, judge far can, 
freedom, established Missouri 
Compromise. [Voices: 
 
Union fearful stout old ship, 
many hard blow, "the stars 
aye, power, greater efforts men, 
fight us. must decline burden 
responsibility, take counsel unworthy Whatever duty 
urges us must done 
adversaries break laws, counsel 
afford example us. Therefore, let us 
Declaration Independence; let us continue obey Constitution 
laws; let us keep step music Union. Let us draw 
speak, around slave States, hateful 
institution, like poisoning itself, perish 
[Applause.] 
 
cannot free men is, national choice, 
land slavery. deny freedom others, deserve 
themselves; and, rule God, cannot long retain it. 
applause.] 
 
ever, friends, seriously reflect upon speed 
tending Within memory men present leading 
statesmen Virginia could make abolitionist speeches 
old Virginia; and, said, even "free 
crime declare "free sentiments 
others uttered would entitle us, us, 
yet suppose that, like Paul, 
"free thing allowed continue, 
one step impress rule Illinois. 
[Sensation.] 
 
conclusion is, must restore Missouri Compromise. 
must highly resolve must [Great applause.] 
must birthday promise must 
Declaration Independence; must make good essence well 
form "the word ought appear 
must even go further, decree 
local law, instrument, shall shelter 
must make land liberty fact, 
name. seeking attain indispensable 
liberty pride shall loyal 
Constitution matter 
though Kansas shall come slave State; 
matter shall restore SAY 
SOUTHERN DISUNIONISTS, WON'T GO UNION, 
[This audience rose feet 
waved threw hats air, 
ran several minutes. wrought 
transformation meanwhile, like political 

 
let us, meanwhile, appeal sense patriotism people, 
let us spread enthusiasm 
aroused vast freedom. Let us 
commence electing gallant soldier Governor 
stood honour State alike 
Mexico floor Congress, 
Southern greater moral effect 
border accomplish Kansas. 
power magic popular opinion. let us 
while, probability, resort force needed, 
moderation forbearance stand us good when, ever, 
MUST MAKE APPEAL BATTLE GOD [Immense 
applause rush 
 
speech called Lincoln's 
reporters present carried away eloquence one 
forgot take young lawyer, 
Mr. Whitney, kept head sufficiently take notes, 
would record it. Mr. wrote speech 
Magazine submitted several people 
present Bloomington Convention, said 
accurate considering taken 
 
 
 
 
_From Speech Dred Scott Decision. Springfield, Illinois. June 
26, 
 
 
... Dred Scott decision. decision declares two 
negro cannot United States 
courts; secondly, Congress cannot prohibit slavery 
Territories. made divided differently 
different points. Judge Douglas discuss merits 
decision, respect shall follow example, believing 
could improve McLean Curtis could 
 
denounces question correctness decision, 
offering violent resistance it. it? has, spite 
decision, declared Dred Scott free, resisted authority 
master him? 
 
Judicial decisions two first, absolutely determine 
case secondly, indicate public similar 
cases decided latter use, 
called 
 
believe much Judge Douglas obedience 
respect judicial department government. think 
decisions constitutional questions, fully settled, 
control particular cases decided, general policy 
country, subject disturbed amendments 
Constitution, provided instrument itself. 
would revolution. think Dred Scott decision 
know court made often overruled 
shall this. offer 
resistance it. 
 
Judicial decisions greater less authority 
according circumstances. so, accords 
customary understanding legal profession. 
 
important decision made unanimous concurrence 
judges, without apparent partisan accordance 
legal public steady practice 
departments throughout history, part based 
assumed historical facts, really true; wanting 
these, court once, 
affirmed course 
might be, perhaps would even revolutionary, 

 
when, true, find wanting claims 
public confidence, resistance, 
even treat yet quite established 
settled doctrine country. 
 
said substance, Dred Scott decision part based 
assumed historical facts really true, ought 
leave subject without giving reasons saying this, 
therefore give instance two, think fully sustain me. Chief 
Justice Taney, delivering opinion majority court, 
insists great length negroes part people 
made, made, Declaration Independence, 
Constitution United States. 
 
contrary, Judge Curtis, dissenting opinion, shows 
five thirteen wit, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, 
New York, New Jersey, North negroes voters, 
proportion numbers part making 
Constitution white people had. shows much 
leave doubt sort 
conclusion point, holds following language: 
 
     "The Constitution established people 
     United States, action, State, persons 
     qualified laws act thereon behalf 
     citizens State. 
     States, seen, coloured persons among 
     qualified law act subject. coloured persons 
     included body 'the people United 
     Constitution 
     least five States power act, doubtless 
     act, upon question 
 
Again, Chief Justice Taney says: 
 
     "It difficult day realize state public 
     opinion, relation unfortunate race, prevailed 
     civilized enlightened portions world time 
     Declaration Independence, Constitution 
     United States framed 
 
again, quoting Declaration, says: 
 
     "The general words quoted would seem include whole 
     human family, used similar instrument 
     day, would 
 
Chief Justice directly plainly assumes 
fact, public estimate black man favourable 
days Revolution. assumption 
mistake. particulars condition race 
whole, country, change 
decidedly way; ultimate destiny 
never appeared hopeless last three four years. two 
five Jersey North gave 
free negro right right since taken 
greatly 
extended, far know, single additional State, though 
number States days, 
understand, masters could, emancipate 
slaves; since legal restraints made upon 
emancipation amount almost prohibition. days 
legislatures held unquestioned power abolish slavery 
respective States; becoming quite fashionable State 
constitutions withhold power 
days, common consent, spread black man's bondage 
new countries Congress decides 
continue prohibition, Supreme Court decides could 
would. days Declaration Independence held 
sacred all, thought include all; now, aid making 
bondage negro universal assailed 
at, at, framers could 
rise could recognize it. 
powers earth seem rapidly him. him; 
ambition follows, philosophy follows, day 
fast joining cry. 
searched person, left instrument him. One 
another closed heavy iron doors upon him; 
him, were, bolted lock hundred keys, 
never unlocked without concurrence every keys 
hands hundred different men, scattered hundred 
different distant stand 
mind matter, produced 
make impossibility escape complete is. 
grossly say assume public estimate negro 
favourable origin government. 
 
... natural disgust minds nearly white people 
idea amalgamation white black 
races; Judge Douglas evidently chief hope upon 
chances able appropriate benefit disgust 
himself. can, much 
idea upon adversaries, thinks struggle 
therefore hope man last 
makes occasion opposition 
Dred Scott decision. finds Republicans insisting 
Declaration Independence includes _all_ men, black well 
forthwith boldly denies includes negroes all, 
proceeds argue gravely contend does, 
want vote, eat, sleep, marry 
cannot consistent else. protest 
logic want 
black woman slave, must necessarily want wife. 
need either. leave alone. 
respects certainly equal; natural right eat 
bread hands without asking leave one 
else, equal, equal others. 
 
Chief Justice Taney, opinion Dred Scott case, admits 
language Declaration broad enough include whole 
human Judge Douglas argue authors 
instrument intend include negroes, fact 
actually place equality whites. 
grave argument comes nothing all, fact 
once, ever afterward, actually place white people 
equality one another. argument 
Chief Justice senator, obvious violence 
plain, unmistakable language Declaration. 
 
think authors notable instrument intended include _all_ 
men, intend declare men equal 
mean say equal size, intellect, 
moral social defined tolerable 
respects consider men created 
inalienable rights, among life, 
liberty, pursuit happiness." said, 
meant. mean assert obvious 
actually enjoying equality, yet 
confer immediately upon them. fact, power confer 
meant simply declare right, 
enforcement might follow fast circumstances permit. 
 
meant set standard maxim free society, 
familiar revered looked to, constantly 
for, and, even though never perfectly constantly 
thereby constantly spreading 
influence, augmenting happiness value life people 
everywhere. assertion "all men created 
equal," practical use effecting separation Great 
placed Declaration, that, 
future use. authors meant as, thank God, proving 
itself, times might seek 
turn free people back hateful paths despotism. knew 
proneness prosperity 
fair land commence 
find left least one hard 
 
briefly expressed view meaning object 
part Declaration Independence declares men 
created equal. let us hear Judge Douglas's view 
subject, find printed report late speech. 
is: 
 
     "No man character, motives conduct 
     Declaration Independence except upon 
     hypothesis referred white race alone, 
     declared men created equal; 
     speaking British subjects continent 
     equal British subjects born residing Great 
     entitled inalienable rights, among 
     enumerated life, liberty, pursuit happiness. 
     Declaration adopted purpose justifying colonists 
     eyes civilized world withdrawing allegiance 
     British dissolving connection 
     
 
good friends, read carefully leisure hour, 
well upon it; see mere wreck ruin Judge Douglas makes 
glorious Declaration. says "they speaking British 
subjects continent equal British subjects born 
residing Great Why, according this, negroes 
white people outside Great Britain America spoken 
instrument. English, along white 
Americans, French, 
white people world gone along Judge's 
inferior 
 
thought Declaration promised something better 
condition British no, meant 
equal oppressed condition. According 
that, gave promise that, kicked king 
Great Britain, king 
own. 
 
thought Declaration contemplated improvement 
condition men, no, merely "was adopted 
purpose justifying colonists eyes 
civilized world withdrawing allegiance British 
dissolving connection Why, 
object effected eighty years ago, Declaration 
practical use left 
battle-field victory 
 
understand preparing to-morrow 
week. for? doings day reference present; 
quite half even descendants 
referred day. suppose even 
go far read Declaration. Suppose, read 
old-fashioned way, read Judge Douglas's 
run thus: "We told truths 
self-evident, British subjects continent 
years ago, created equal British subjects born 
residing Great 
 
... Dred Scott case affords strong test party 
Republicans dear 
Democracy. Dred Scott, wife two involved 
desired court held citizens, 
far least entitle hearing whether 
free not; also, fact law really 
free. Could way, chances black girls ever 
mixing blood white people would diminished 
least extent could without 
consent. Judge Douglas delighted decided 
slaves, human enough hearing, even free, 
thus left subject forced masters, 
liable become mothers mulattoes spite 
state case produces 
mixing blood nation. 
 
 
 
 
house divided cannot stand." Lincoln's Nomination 
United States Senate. Springfield, Illinois. June 17, 1858_ 
 
 
could first know are, whither tending, 
could better judge do, it. far 
fifth year since policy initiated avowed object 
confident promise putting end slavery agitation. 
operation policy, agitation ceased, 
constantly augmented. opinion cease crisis 
shall reached passed. "A house divided 
cannot stand." believe government cannot endure permanently, half 
slave half free. expect Union 
expect house expect cease 
divided. become one thing, other. Either 
opponents slavery arrest spread it, place 
public mind shall rest belief course 
ultimate extinction; advocates push forward till 
shall become alike lawful States, old well new, North 
well South. 
 
tendency latter condition? Let one 
carefully contemplate almost complete legal 
machinery, Nebraska doctrine 
Dred Scott decision. Let consider work machinery 
adapted do, well also let study 
history construction, can, rather fail, 
can, trace evidences design concert action among 
chief beginning. 
 
new year 1854 found slavery excluded half 
States State constitutions, national territory 
congressional prohibition. Four days later commenced struggle 
ended repealing congressional prohibition. opened 
national territory slavery, first point gained. 
 
far, Congress indorsement people, 
real apparent, indispensable save point already gained 
give chance more. 
 
necessity provided for, 
well might be, notable argument 
otherwise called right latter phrase, 
though expressive rightful basis government, 
attempted use it, amount this: 
one man choose enslave another, third man shall allowed 
object. argument incorporated Nebraska bill itself, 
language follows: "It true intent meaning 
act, legislate slavery Territory State, 
exclude leave people thereof perfectly free 
form regulate domestic institutions way, subject 
Constitution United States." opened 
loose favour right 
"But," said opposition members, "let us amend 
bill expressly declare people Territory may 
exclude slavery." "Not said friends measure, 
voted amendment. 
 
Nebraska bill passing Congress, 
involving question negro's freedom, reason owner 
voluntarily taken first free State 
Territory covered congressional prohibition, held 
slave long time each, passing United States 
Circuit Court District Missouri; Nebraska bill 
brought decision, month May, 1854. 
negro's name name decision 
finally rendered case. next presidential 
election, law case came to, Supreme Court 
United States; decision 
election. Still, election, Senator Trumbull, floor 
Senate, requested leading advocate Nebraska bill state 
whether people Territory constitutionally 
exclude slavery limits, latter "That 
question Supreme Court." 
 
election came. Mr. Buchanan elected, indorsement, 
was, second point gained. indorsement, 
however, fell short clear popular majority nearly four hundred 
thousand votes, so, perhaps, reliable 
satisfactory. outgoing President, last annual message, 
possible echoed back upon people weight 
authority Supreme Court met 
announce decision, ordered presidential 
inauguration came, still decision Court; incoming 
President inaugural address fervently people 
abide decision, whatever might be. Then, 
days, came decision. 
 
author Nebraska bill finds early occasion make 
speech capitol, indorsing Dred Scott decision, 
denouncing opposition it. new President, too, 
seizes early occasion letter indorse strongly 
construe decision, express astonishment 
different view ever 
 
length squabble springs President author 
Nebraska bill, mere question whether Lecompton 
constitution was, not, sense, made people 
Kansas; latter declares wants 
fair vote people, cares whether slavery voted 
understand declaration cares 
whether slavery voted voted up, intended 
apt definition policy would impress upon 
public principle declares suffered 
much, ready suffer end. well may cling 
principle. feeling, well may cling it. 
principle left original Nebraska doctrine. 
Dred Scott decision, "squatter sovereignty" squatted 
existence, like temporary like mould 
served one fell back loose 
carry election, kicked 
late joint struggle Republicans Lecompton 
constitution, involves nothing original Nebraska doctrine. 
struggle made right people make 
Republicans never differed. 
 
several points Dred Scott decision connection Senator 
Douglas's "care policy, constitute piece machinery 
present state third point gained. 
working points machinery 
 
negro slave, imported Africa, 
slave, ever citizen State, 
sense term used Constitution United States. 
point made order deprive negro, every possible 
event, benefit provision United States 
Constitution declares State shall 
entitled privileges immunities citizens several 
States." 
 
"subject Constitution United States," 
neither Congress territorial legislature exclude slavery 
United States Territory. point made order individual 
men may fill Territories slaves, without danger losing 
property, thus chances 
institution future. 
 
whether holding negro actual slavery free 
State makes free United States Courts 
decide, leave decided courts slave 
State negro may forced master. point made, 
pressed acquiesced while, 
apparently indorsed people election, sustain 
logical conclusion Dred Scott's master might lawfully 
Dred Scott free State Illinois, every master may 
lawfully do, one, one thousand slaves Illinois, 
free State. 
 
this, working it, Nebraska 
doctrine, left it, mould public opinion 
care whether slavery voted voted up. shows 
exactly are, also, whither 
 
throw additional light latter, go back, run 
mind string historical facts already stated. Several things 
appear less dark mysterious 
people left "perfectly free," "subject 
Constitution." Constitution it, 
could see. Plainly enough exactly fitted niche 
Dred Scott decision afterwards come in, declare 
perfect freedom people freedom all. 
amendment expressly declaring right people voted 
Plainly enough adoption would niche 
Dred Scott decision. Court decision held even 
individual opinion withheld till presidential 
Plainly enough speaking would 
perfectly free argument upon election 
outgoing President's 
delay incoming President's advance 
favour decision? things look like cautious 
horse, preparatory mounting him, 
dreaded may give fall. hasty 
decision President others? 
 
cannot absolutely know adaptations result 
see lot framed different portions 
know gotten different times places, 
different Franklin, James, instance 
Taney, see 
joined together, see exactly make frame house 
mill, exactly lengths 
proportions different pieces exactly adapted 
respective places, piece many few, omitting 
even single piece see place 
frame exactly fitted prepared yet bring piece 
case, find impossible believe Stephen 
Franklin Roger James understood one another 
beginning, worked upon common plan draft, drawn 
first blow struck. 
 
Nebraska bill people 
State well Territory left "perfectly free," "subject 
Constitution." mention State? legislating 
Territories, States. Certainly people 
State ought subject Constitution United 
States; mention merely territorial 
law? people Territory people State therein 
together, relation Constitution therein treated 
precisely opinion Court Chief 
Justice Taney, Dred Scott case, separate opinions 
concurring judges, expressly declare Constitution 
United States neither permits Congress territorial legislature 
exclude slavery United States Territory, omit 
declare whether Constitution permits State 
people State exclude it. mere 
quite sure McLean Curtis sought get 
opinion declaration unlimited power people State 
exclude slavery Chase Mace sought get 
declaration behalf people Territory, 
Nebraska ask, quite sure would 
voted one case other? nearest 
approach point declaring power State slavery 
made Judge approaches once, using precise 
idea, almost language too, Nebraska act. one occasion 
exact language cases power restrained 
Constitution United States, law State supreme 
subject slavery within cases 
power State restrained United States Constitution 
left open question, precisely question, 
restraint power Territories, left open Nebraska 
act. Put together, another nice little 
may, ere long, see filled another Supreme Court decision, 
declaring Constitution United States permit _a 
exclude slavery limits. may especially 
expected doctrine "care whether slavery voted 
voted up" shall gain upon public mind sufficiently give promise 
decision maintained made. 
 
decision slavery alike lawful 
States. Welcome decision probably coming, 
soon upon us, unless power present political 
dynasty shall met shall lie down, pleasantly 
people Missouri making 
State free, shall reality Supreme 
Court made Illinois slave State. meet overthrow power 
dynasty work would prevent 
consummation. do. best it? 
 
denounce us openly friends, yet 
us softly Senator Douglas instrument 
effect object. wish us 
fact little quarrel present head 
regularly voted us single point, upon 
never differed. remind us great 
man largest us small ones. Let 
"a living dog better dead Judge Douglas, 
dead lion, work least one. 
oppose advances slavery? don't care anything it. 
avowed mission nothing 
leading Douglas Democratic newspaper thinks Douglas's superior 
talent needed resist revival African 
Douglas believe effort revive trade 
said so. really think so? is, 
resist it? years prove sacred right white 
men take negro slaves new territories. possibly show 
less sacred right buy bought 
unquestionably bought cheaper Africa 
Virginia. done power reduce whole question 
slavery one mere right and, such, 
oppose foreign refuse trade 
property shall "perfectly free," unless protection 
home home probably ask 
protection, wholly without ground opposition. 
 
Senator Douglas know, man may rightfully wiser 
to-day may rightfully change 
finds wrong. we, reason, run ahead, infer 
make particular change, given 
safely base action upon vague 

 
Now, ever, wish misrepresent Judge Douglas's position, 
question motives, aught personally offensive 
him. ever, come together principle, 
cause may assistance great ability, hope 
But, clearly, 
pretend promise ever be. 
 
cause, then, must intrusted to, conducted by, 
whose hands free, whose hearts 
work, care result. Two years ago Republicans 
nation mustered thirteen hundred thousand strong. 
single impulse resistance common danger, every external 
circumstance us. even hostile 
elements, gathered four formed fought 
battle through, constant hot fire proud, 
enemy. brave 
enemy result 
doubtful. shall fail. stand firm, shall fail. Wise 
counsels may mistakes delay it; sooner later 
victory sure come. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Chicago Popular Sovereignty, 
Nebraska Bill, etc. July 10, 1858_ 
 
 
... Popular everlasting popular Let us 
moment inquire vast matter popular sovereignty. 
popular sovereignty? recollect early period history 
struggle, another name 
exactly popular sovereignty, squatter 
sovereignty. terms mean? terms mean 
used now? vast credit taken friend, Judge, regard 
support it, declares last years life 
been, future years life shall be, devoted 
matter popular sovereignty. it? Why, sovereignty 
squatter sovereignty? suppose, 
all, right people govern 
themselves, sovereign affairs, 
squatted country squatted 
territory belong them, sense State belongs 
people inhabit belonged nation; 
right govern called "squatter sovereignty." 
 
Now, wish become squatter sovereignty? 
become it? get anybody tell 
people Territory authority govern themselves, regard 
question slavery, form State 
constitution? thing all, although general running 
fire, although made every speech 
side, assuming policy given people Territory 
right govern upon question; yet point 
To-day year ago decided 
Supreme Court United States, insisted upon 
people Territory right exclude slavery 
Territory; one man chooses take slaves 
Territory, rest people right keep out. 
so, decision made, one points 
Judge approved, one approval says means 
keep say, never 
says favour it, sticks it, expects win 
battle decision, says thing 
squatter sovereignty, one man may take slaves 
Territory, men Territory may opposed it, 
yet reason Constitution cannot prohibit it. 
so, much left vast matter squatter sovereignty, 
like know? 
 
get back, get point right people make 
constitution. Kansas settled, example, 1854. 
Territory yet, without formed constitution, regular 
way, three years. time negro slavery could taken 
individuals, decision Supreme Court, 
Judge rest people cannot keep out; 
come make constitution may say 
slavery. there; obliged tolerate way, 
experience shows take 
negro slaves absolutely deprive owners them. experience 
shows so. space time runs beginning 
settlement Territory 
people make State portion time popular 
sovereignty given up. seal absolutely put upon 
court decision, Judge Douglas puts upon top that; yet 
appealing people give vast credit devotion 
popular sovereignty. 
 
Again, get question right people form 
State constitution please, form slavery without 
anything new confess don't know it. 
ever time anybody said people 
Territory form constitution? 
Judge Douglas fought several years life, pledge 
fight remaining years life for? Judge 
Douglas find anybody earth said anybody else form 
constitution enough purpose ask, 
whenever Republican said anything it? never said anything 
it, constantly spoken it; 
undertake examine platform speeches responsible men 
party, men, too, please, unable 
find one word anybody Republican ranks opposed 
popular sovereignty Judge Douglas thinks 
suppose Judge Douglas claim little 
idea people govern themselves; 
nobody ever thought thing brought forward. 
remember old Declaration Independence said 
"We hold truths self-evident, men created 
equal; endowed certain inalienable 
rights; among life, liberty, pursuit 
secure rights, governments instituted among 
men, powers consent 
origin popular sovereignty. Who, then, shall come 
day claim invented it? Lecompton constitution 
question, matter Lecompton 
constitution friend Judge Douglas claims vast 
agree opposing Lecompton constitution, far 
perceive, right. deny all; and, gentlemen, 
readily see could deny it, even wanted to. 
wish to, Republicans nation opposed it, 
would opposed much without Judge Douglas's aid 
it. taken ground long did. Why, 
reason urges constitution urged 
year before. printed speech hand. argument 
makes constitution adopted, people 
fairly represented allowed vote, pointed speech 
year ago, hold hand now, fair chance 
given people. 
 
... little matter popular sovereignty 
Lecompton constitution. Lecompton constitution, Judge tells 
us, defeat good thing, not. 
thinks defeat good thing, agree 
that. defeated it? [A voice: Yes, furnished 
himself; suppose controlled Democrats went 
him, furnished three votes, Republicans furnished 

 
defeat it. House Representatives 
friends furnished twenty votes, Republicans furnished 
ninety Now, work? [A voice: 
Why, yes, Douglas it? sure 
 
Let us, however, put proposition another way. Republicans could 
done without Judge Douglas. Could done without 
them? could come nearest without other? 
Ground taken Republicans long Douglas 
it. proposition opposition measure five one. 
[A voice: "Why don't come don't know 
talking about, friend; quite willing answer gentleman 
crowd asks intelligent question. 
 
Now, country ever found friends Judge 
Douglas's way acted upon main question, 
ever thought uttering word behalf Judge 
defy show printed resolution passed Democratic meeting. 
take upon defy man show printed resolution, large 
small, Democratic meeting favour Judge Trumbull, 
five one Republicans beat bill. Everything must 
everything, five one really 
thing, over, seem remember 
existence upon face earth. 
 
Gentlemen, fear shall become leave branch 
subject take hold another. take part Judge 
Douglas's speech respectfully attended me. 
 
Judge Douglas made two points upon recent speech Springfield. 
says issues campaign. first one 
points upon language speech delivered 
Springfield, believe quote correctly memory. said 
"we far fifth year since policy instituted 
avowed object confident promise putting end 
slavery operation policy, agitation 
ceased, constantly augmented. believe 
cease crisis shall reached passed. 'A house 
divided cannot believe government cannot 
endure permanently half slave half free. expect Union 
quoting expect 
house fall, expect cease divided. 
become one thing other. Either opponents slavery 
arrest spread it, place public mind 
shall rest belief course ultimate 
extinction, advocates push forward shall become 
alike lawful States, old well North well 
South." 
 
paragraph quoted 
hearing, ask attention all, Judge Douglas thinks 
discovers great political want attention particularly 
inferred it. says favour making 
States Union uniform internal 
domestic concerns favour making entirely 
draws inference language quoted you. 
says favour making war North upon South 
extinction slavery; also favour inviting (as 
expresses it) South war upon North purpose 
nationalizing slavery. Now, singular enough, carefully 
read passage over, say favour 
anything it. said expected would take place. made 
prediction may foolish one, 
even say desired slavery put course ultimate 
extinction. say now, need longer 
difficulty that. may written great speech. 
 
Gentlemen, Judge Douglas informed speech mine 
probably carefully admit was. master 
fine capable entering 
upon believe call it; 
believe language employed bears construction Judge 
Douglas puts upon it. don't care regard 
words. know leave crowd doubt, 
explain them, really meant use 

 
not, first place, unaware government endured 
eighty-two years, half slave half free. know that. tolerably 
well acquainted history country, know 
endured eighty-two years, half slave half free. 
meant allude believe endured, because, 
time, introduction Nebraska bill, 
public mind rest time belief slavery 
course ultimate extinction. gave us rest 
period eighty-two years; least, believe. 
always hated slavery, think, much 
old-line always hated it, always 
quiet new era introduction 
Nebraska bill began. always believed everybody it, 
course ultimate reason 
believe. 
 
adoption Constitution history led 
people believe so, belief framers 
Constitution itself. old men, time 
adoption Constitution, decree slavery go 
new Territory already declare within 
twenty years African slave-trade, slaves 
might cut might enumerate 
enough. clear 
framers Constitution intended expected ultimate 
extinction said 
speech Judge Douglas quoted say think 
opponents slavery resist spread it, place 
public mind shall rest belief course 
ultimate extinction, mean say place 
founders government originally placed it. 
 
said hundred times, inclination take 
back, believe right, ought inclination 
people free States, enter slave States 
interfere question slavery all. said always; 
Judge Douglas heard say it. said 
favour interfering slavery exists, know 
anything ever intended, and, believe, 
anything ever said. means ever used language 
could fairly construed however, believe never 
correct it. 
 
much, then, inference Judge Douglas 
favour setting sections war one another. know 
never meant thing, believe fair mind infer 
thing anything said. 
 
Now, relation inference favour general 
local institutions various 
said many times Judge Douglas's hearing man 
believed principle lies 
bottom ideas government beginning end. 
denied use term applies 
thing deny man ever gone ahead 
devotion principle, whatever may done efficiency 
advocating it. think said hearing, 
believe individual naturally entitled pleases 
fruit labour, far wise 
man's rights; community, State, 
right exactly pleases concerns within 
State interfere right State; 
general government upon principle right interfere 
anything general class things concern 
whole. said times; said 
believe right Illinois interfere 
cranberry laws Indiana, oyster laws Virginia, 
laws Maine. 
 
it, then, Judge Douglas hope see 
slavery put public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction, favour Illinois going 
interfering cranberry laws 
authorize draw suppose might one 
thing least enabled draw inference, would 
true many others; is, looks upon 
matter slavery exceedingly little matter 
keeping population whole nation state 
oppression world. looks upon 
exceedingly little thing, equal question 
cranberry laws something moral question it; 
something par question whether man shall 
land cattle plant little small 
thing could desire anything done 
bring ultimate extinction little thing, must 
favour bringing amalgamation little 
things Union. Now, there, presume, 
foundation Judge thinks 
happens vast portion American people 
look upon matter little thing. look upon 
vast moral prove writings 
gave us blessings liberty 
looked upon it, evil merely States 
agree Constitution 
assented to, States exists right interfere 
it, Constitution, duty 
inclination stick Constitution letter spirit 
beginning end. 
 
much, then, wish, State 
legislatures one consolidated government 
uniformity domestic regulations States; suppose 
raise corn must make grow 
too, must make things grow North grow South. 
suppose understands favour doing. Now, much 
must call so. Judge 
issue question establishing uniformity domestic 
regulations States. 
 
little Dred Scott decision. Another 
issues, says, made upon devotion 
Dred Scott decision opposition it. 
 
expressed heretofore, repeat, opposition Dred 
Scott decision; allowed state nature 
opposition, ask so. fairly 
implied term Judge Douglas used, 
resist it. wanted take Dred Scott 
master would interfering property, terrible 
difficulty Judge Douglas speaks of, interfering property, 
would thing that; 
refusing obey political Congress, 
vote come question whether slavery prohibited 
new Territory, spite Dred Scott decision, would vote 
should. 
 
would do. Judge Douglas said last night 
decision might advance opinion, might contrary 
decision made; made would abide 
reversed. let property abide 
decision, try reverse decision. try put 
Judge Douglas would object, says obey 
reversed. Somebody reverse decision, since 
made; mean reverse it, mean 
 
uses decisions two uses. First, 
decide upon question court. decide case 
Dred Scott slave. Nobody that. that, 
say everybody else persons standing Dred Scott stands 
is. is, say question comes upon 
another person decided again, unless court decides 
another way, unless court decision. Well, mean 
court decide way. one thing 
mean try do. 
 
sacredness Judge Douglas around decision 
degree sacredness never thrown around 
decision. never heard thing. Why, decisions apparently 
contrary decision, good lawyers thought contrary 
decision, made court before. 
first legal new 
wonder world; based upon falsehood main 
facts upon stands facts 
many decision made 
first instance decision made many 
ever held profession law, 
always needed confirmation lawyers regarded 
settled law; Judge Douglas hands must take 
extraordinary decision made extraordinary circumstances 
give vote Congress accordance it, yield it, 
obey every possible sense. Circumstances alter cases. 
gentlemen remember case Supreme Court 
twenty-five thirty years ago, deciding national bank 
ask somebody remember national bank 
declared truth, whether 
remembered not. bank charter ran out, 
granted Congress. laid General Jackson. 
urged upon him, denied constitutionality bank, 
Supreme Court decided 
General Jackson said Supreme Court right lay 
rule govern coordinate branch government, members 
sworn support member 
sworn support Constitution understood it. venture 
say heard Judge Douglas say approved 
General Jackson act. become 
Supreme 
 
fellow-citizens, getting back pass 
Judge Douglas makes threat upon 
cautious say warfare fall 
upon leaders Republican party. Almost every word 
every distinction makes significance. means 
Republicans count leaders 
makes fuss them, leaders making war upon. 
wants understood mass Republican party really 
friends. leaders something, 
require hands. clearly 
unquestionably light presents matter, want 
ask attention, addressing Republicans here, may 
ask questions you, Republican party, would 
placed sustained Judge Douglas present position 
claim, gentlemen, 
pretend would like go United States make 
say you, mighty 
issue nothing you, nothing mass people 
nation, whether Judge Douglas shall ever heard 
night. may trifle either us; connection 
mighty question, upon hang nation, 
perhaps, absolutely nothing. placed 
Judge Don't know apt is, exceedingly 
anxious is, times seize upon anything everything 
persuade something done yourselves? Why, 
tried persuade last night Illinois Legislature 
instructed introduce Nebraska bill. nobody 
Legislature ever thought it; still furiously 
standing instruction 
senators always introducing Nebraska tells 
Cincinnati tells Dred Scott 
decision; tells speech last night, substantially 
former cares slavery voted 
tells struggle Lecompton may come 
not, does, stands stood when, spite 
opposition, built Republican party. indorse him, 
tell care whether slavery voted down, 
close, try close, declaration, repeated 
day, week, month, year. think, position 
Judge Douglas stood opposing Lecompton constitution, 
right; know return, may 
know find him; not, may know look 
him, Cincinnati platform. Now, could ask 
Republican party, hard names Judge Douglas called 
by, ... declarations Black way, 
black got rubbed that, 
indorsed Republican votes, Plainly, stand 
ready waiting driven 
camp ready driven over, 
tied together driven over, every man rope around 
neck, held Judge Douglas. question. 
Republican men earnest done, think 
better it; think Republican party made 
who, far peaceably, oppose extension 
slavery, hope ultimate extinction. believe 
wrong new lands continent, keeping 
settlement free white labourers, want land 
bring families may 
make mistake, grow time come 
come back name, 
least upon principles party has. better, 
then, save work done 
maintain it, keep it. men choose serve you, go them; 
made organization upon principle, stand it; for, 
surely God you, inspired minds given 
sense propriety continues give hope, surely 
still cling ideas, last come back 
merely work again. 
 
once, course Judge 
Douglas's speech last night, reminded government made 
white believed made white men. Well, 
putting shape one wants deny it; Judge 
goes passion drawing inferences 
protest, ever, logic 
that, want negro woman slave, 
necessarily want wife. understanding is, need 
but, God made us leave one 
another alone, one another much good white men 
enough marry white women, enough black men marry 
black God's name let Judge 
us terrible take place mixture 
races; inferior race bears superior down. Why, Judge, 
let get together Territories, won't mix 
there. say least self-evident truth. 
 
Now, happens meet together every year, somewhere 
4th July, reason other. 4th July 
suppose, uses. indulge me, state 
suppose them. 
 
mighty thirty, thirty, millions 
people, inhabit part dry land 
whole earth. run memory back pages history 
eighty-two years, discover small 
people point numbers, vastly inferior now, 
vastly less extent country, vastly less everything deem 
desirable among men. look upon change exceedingly advantageous 
us posterity, fix upon something happened away 
back, way connected rise 
prosperity. find race men living day claim 
fathers iron men; fought 
principle contending for, understand 
did, followed degree prosperity 
enjoy come us. hold annual remind 
good done process 
done, it, historically connected it; 
go meetings better feel 
attached one other, firmly bound country 
every way better men, age race country 
live, done 
this, yet reached whole. something else 
connected it. have, besides blood 
us, perhaps half people descendants 
men; men come 
French, come Europe 
themselves, whose come settled here, 
finding equal things. look back 
history, trace connection days blood, 
find cannot carry back 
glorious make feel part us; 
look old Declaration Independence, find 
old men say "we hold truths self-evident, 
men created equal," feel moral 
sentiment taught day evidences relation men, 
father moral principle them, 
right claim though blood blood, flesh 
flesh, men wrote are. 
electric cord Declaration hearts 
patriotic men link 
patriotic hearts long love freedom exists minds 
men throughout world. 
 
Now, purpose things idea "don't 
care slavery voted voted sustaining Dred 
Scott decision; holding Declaration Independence 
mean anything Judge Douglas giving exposition 
Declaration Independence means, saying 
people America equal people England. According 
construction, Germans connected it. Now, ask 
things, indulged in, 
confirmed taught children repeated them, 
tend sentiment liberty country, 
government government 
arguments made, inferior race treated 
much allowance capable much 
done condition 
arguments kings made enslaving people 
ages world. find arguments favour 
always necks 
wanted it, people 
better argument 
Judge old says, "You work, 
enjoy fruits it." Turn whatever way 
come mouth king, excuse enslaving 
people country, mouth men one race 
reason enslaving men another old 
hold, course made 
purpose convincing public mind care 
this, stop negro. like 
old Declaration Independence, declares 
men equal, upon principle, making exceptions 
one man says mean negro, 
another say mean man? Declaration 
truth, let us get find it, tear 
out! it? true, let us tear 
out. [Cries Let us stick it, then; let us stand firmly 
it, then. 
 
may argued certain conditions make necessities 
impose upon us, extent necessity imposed 
upon man, must submit it. think condition 
found established government. 
slaves among us; could get Constitution unless permitted 
remain slavery; could secure good 
grasped but, necessity submitted much, 
destroy principle charter 
Let charter stand 
 
friend said poor hand quote 
try again, however. said one 
Lord, "Be ye perfect even Father heaven 
suppose, expect human 
creature could perfect Father said: "As 
Father heaven ye also set 
toward reaching standard attained 
highest degree moral say relation 
principle men created equal, let nearly reached 
can. cannot give freedom every creature, let us nothing 
impose slavery upon Let us, then, turn 
government back channel framers 
Constitution originally placed it. Let us stand firmly other. 
so, tending contrary direction, 
friend Judge Douglas 
tend make one universal slave nation. one 
runs direction, resist him. 
 
friends, detained long desired do, 
say, let us discard quibbling man 
man, race race race 
inferior, therefore must placed inferior position. Let 
us discard things, unite one people throughout 
land, shall stand declaring men 
created equal. 
 
friends, could not, without upon new 
would detain long, continue to-night. thank 
extensive audience furnished to-night. leave 
you, hoping lamp liberty burn bosoms 
shall longer doubt men created free 
equal. 
 
 
 
 
_From Speech Springfield, Illinois. July 17, 1858_ 
 
 
... still another disadvantage labour, 
ask attention. arises relative positions 
two persons stand State candidates 
Senate. Senator Douglas anxious 
politicians party, party years past, 
looking upon certainly, distant day, 
President United States. seen, round, 
fruitful face, cabinet 
appointments, foreign bursting 
wonderful ready laid hold greedy 
hands. upon picture 
long, cannot, little taken place 
party, bring give charming hope. 
anxiety rush him, sustain him, give 
beyond what, even days 
highest prosperity, could brought favour. 
contrary, nobody ever expected President. poor, 
face, nobody ever seen out. 
taken together, Republicans labour 
fight battle upon principle, upon principle 
alone. certain sense made behalf 
Republicans. made merely one 
wise preferable one 
perhaps hundred, Republican ranks. 
say, wish distinctly understood borne mind, 
fight battle without without 
external aids brought bear us. hope 
surrounded principle enough nerve 
task, leave nothing fairly done bring 
right result. appears two speeches heard deliver 
since arrival Illinois, gave special attention speech 
mine delivered sixteenth June. says carefully 
read speech. told us Chicago week ago last night, 
repeated Bloomington last says evidently 
prepared great care. freely admit prepared 
careful put anything speech matter 
fact, make inferences appear true 
fully made mistake willing 
drawn inference regard Judge Douglas 
one else, fully prepared modify 
soon planted upon truth truth 
only, far knew it, could brought know it. 
 
made speech kindly feelings toward Judge 
Douglas, manifested therein, gratified found 
carefully examined it, detected error fact, 
inference him, thought 
fit seizes upon doctrines supposes 
included speech, declares upon turn 
issues campaign. attempts 
speech. say wilfully fail 
quote attempt quoting passage 
believe quote accurately memory. shall make quotation 
now, comments upon it, already said, order 
Judge shall left entirely without excuse me. 
now, hope, last time. great caution, 
order repeats shall plain 
If, all, still shall 
compelled reconstruct course marked myself, 
draw upon humble resources new course, better 
suited real exigencies case. set campaign 
intention conducting strictly gentleman, 
substance least, outside latter shall 
never be, constitutes inside gentleman hope 
understand, less inclined others. 
purpose expectation canvass would conducted upon 
principle, fairness sides, shall fault 
purpose expectation shall given up. 
 
charges, substance, invite war 
propose local institutions different States shall become 
consolidated language speech 
expresses purpose bears 
said would enter one States 
disturb institution slavery. Judge Douglas said Bloomington 
used language able ingenious 
really protested entering 
slave States, nevertheless mean go banks Ohio 
throw Kentucky, disturb domestic 
institutions. 
 
... said understand Declaration mean 
men created equal respects. negroes 
equals suppose mean declare men 
equal equal right "life, liberty, 
pursuit happiness." Certainly negro equal 
perhaps many respects. Still, right put 
mouth bread hands equal 
every man, white pointing 
given you, cannot justified taking away little 
given him. ask negro is, like him, 
let alone. God gave little, little let 
 
... One point Springfield speech, Judge Douglas says 
read carefully. expressed belief existence 
conspiracy perpetuate nationalize slavery. profess 
know it, now. showed part Judge Douglas played 
string facts, constituting mind proof 
showed parts played others. 
 
charged people deceived carrying last 
presidential election, impression people 
Territories might exclude slavery known 
advance court decide neither 
Congress people could exclude slavery. charges 
distinctly made anything else speech. 
 
Judge Douglas carefully read speech. not, 
far know, contradicted two speeches 
heard certainly not. admission renew 
charge. charge party conspiracy 
sole purpose nationalizing slavery. 
 
 
 
 
_From Lincoln's Reply Douglas First Joint Debate Ottawa, 
Illinois. August 21, 1858_ 
 
 
man bears somewhat misrepresented, 
least, find myself; misrepresentation becomes 
gross apt amuse stating 
charge arrangement Judge 
 
Now, say upon subject is, think 
even Judge prove it, true. 
doubt "conscientious" saying it. resolutions 
took length time read, platform 
Republican party 1854, say never anything them, 
think Trumbull never had. Judge Douglas cannot show either 
us ever anything 
 
Now, story Judge Douglas tells Trumbull 
sell old Democratic party, Lincoln agreeing sell 
old Whig party, means knowing that; Judge Douglas 
cannot know substance 
 
man cannot prove negative, right claim 
man makes affirmative charge, must offer proof show 
truth says. certainly cannot introduce testimony show 
negative things, right claim man 
says knows thing, must show knows it. always 
right claim this; satisfactory may 
"conscientious" subject. 
 
... Anything argues idea perfect social 
political equality negro fantastic 
arrangement words, man prove 
horse. say here, upon subject, 
purpose, either directly indirectly, interfere 
institution slavery States exists. believe 
lawful right so, inclination so. 
purpose introduce political social equality white 
black races. physical difference two, which, 
judgment, probably ever forbid living together upon 
footing perfect equality; inasmuch becomes necessity 
must difference, I, well Judge Douglas, 
favour race belong superior position. 
never said anything hold, that, 
notwithstanding this, reason world negro 
entitled natural rights enumerated Declaration 
right life, liberty, pursuit 
happiness. hold much entitled white man. 
agree Judge Douglas, equal many respects, 
certainly perhaps moral intellectual 
right eat bread, without leave 
hand equal, equal Judge Douglas, 
equal living man. 
 
... used much time supposed, 
dwell little longer upon one two minor topics upon 
Judge read speech Springfield, 
say "a house divided cannot stand." 
Judge say don't know whether not. Judge 
seem attending now, would like know 
opinion house divided 
does, question veracity, me, 
Judge authority somewhat higher character. 
 
Now, friends, ask attention matter purpose 
saying something know Judge may readily enough 
agree maxim put forth true, 
may misapply it; Judge right urge 
application misapply it, right show 
misapply it. undertakes say 
think nation, far question slavery concerned, 
become one thing other, favour bringing 
dead uniformity various States, institutions, 
argues great variety local institutions 
States, springing differences soil, differences face 
country, climate, bonds union. make 
"a house divided make house 
produce one section country called wants 
another section, section supply wants 
first, matters bonds union, true bonds 
union. question slavery considered among 
institutions country? leave say, 
whether history government, institution slavery 
always failed bond union, and, contrary, 
discord element division house. ask 
consider whether long moral constitution men's minds 
shall continue same, generation assemblage 
shall sink grave, another race shall arise 
moral intellectual development institution 
standing position is, 
continue element 
 
so, right say that, regard question, 
Union house divided itself; Judge reminds 
often said institution slavery 
existed eighty years States, yet exist 
others, agree fact, account looking 
position fathers originally placed 
new Territories gone, legislating cut 
source slave-trade, thus putting 
seal legislation public mind rest 
belief course ultimate extinction. lately, 
charge nothing Judge's 
think acting placed institution 
new basis, looks perpetuity nationalization 
slavery. placed new basis, say, 
said, believe shall peace upon question, 
opponents slavery arrest spread it, place 
public mind shall rest belief course 
ultimate extinction; or, hand, advocates 
push forward shall become alike lawful States, 
old well new, North well South. Now, believe could 
arrest place Washington Jefferson 
Madison placed it, would course ultimate extinction, 
public mind would, eighty years past, believe 
course ultimate extinction. crisis would past, 
institution might let alone hundred live 
States exists, yet would going 
existence way best black white races. [A 
voice: "Then repudiate popular Well, then, let us 
talk popular sovereignty. popular sovereignty? 
right people slavery it, see fit, 
Territories? able man watch 
understanding popular sovereignty, applied 
question slavery, allow people Territory 
slavery want to, allow 
want it. mean vast people 
Territory United States, one would obliged 
slave want one; say that, 
understand Dred Scott decision, one man wants slaves, 
rest way keeping one man holding them. 
 
made speech Springfield, Judge 
really thinking things 
all. thought world 
anything bring war free slave States. 
thought world anything bring 
political social equality black white races. never 
occurred anything anything reduce 
dead uniformity local institutions various States. 
must say, fairness him, thinks 
something leads bad results, none better 
mean it. fatal country, 
influence producing it, whether intend not. 
true placing institution upon original basis 
upon fathers placed tendency set 
Northern Southern States war one another, 
tendency make people Vermont raise 
raise Louisiana, compel people 
Illinois cut Grand 
cut Maine, Judge 
says new principle started regard question. 
Judge claim working plan founders 
government? think says one 
saw evidence policy allow slavery south 
certain line, north saw 
part country stand upon policy, 
and, therefore, set studying subject upon original 
principles, upon original principles got Nebraska 
fighting upon 

 
brought forward anything fact, 
point out, even take back. 
point anything erroneous evidence, rather 
show comparison evidence reasoned 
call amiable, intelligent 
 
want ask attention portion Nebraska bill 
Judge Douglas "It true intent meaning 
act, legislate slavery Territory State, 
exclude therefrom, leave people thereof perfectly free 
form regulate domestic institutions way, subject 
Constitution United States." Thereupon Judge Douglas 
others began argue favour "popular right 
people slaves wanted them, exclude slavery 
want them. "But," said, substance, senator 
Ohio (Mr. Chase, "we suspect mean 
allow people exclude slavery wish to; 
mean it, accept amendment propose, expressly authorizing 
people exclude slavery." believe amendment 
me, offered, people Territory, 
proper representatives, might, saw fit, prohibit 
existence slavery therein. 
 
state fact, taken back mistake 
it, Judge Douglas acting voted 
amendment down. think voted real 
reason so. know reason was. looks us, 
since seen Dred Scott decision holding 
"under people cannot exclude say 
looks poor, simple, intelligent 
though niche left place put Dred Scott decision 
in, niche would adopting amendment. 
say again, reason, avail Judge 
much calmly point people 
reason voting amendment down, swelling 
may provoked call somebody 

 
Again, quotation Nebraska bill 
"it true intent meaning bill 
legislate slavery Territory State." always 
puzzled know business word 
Judge Douglas put there. knows put for. 
cannot say put for. law 
passing States, making provision States. 
placed for? seeing Dred Scott decision, 
holds people cannot exclude slavery Territory, 
another Dred Scott decision shall come, holding cannot exclude 
State, shall discover word originally put 
there, view something come due time; 
shall see half something. say again, 
different reason putting there, Judge Douglas, 
way, without calling anybody tell 
reason 
 
Now, friends, ... ask attention people assembled, 
elsewhere, course Judge Douglas pursuing every day 
bearing upon question making slavery national. going back 
taking speeches makes, speeches made 
yesterday day before, makes 
country, ask attention them. first place, 
necessary make institution war: danger 
people Kentucky shoulder ... march 
Illinois force blacks upon us. danger 
going there, making war upon them. necessary 
nationalization slavery? simply next Dred Scott 
decision. merely Supreme Court decide State 
Constitution exclude it, already decided 
Constitution neither Congress territorial 
legislature it. decided acquiesced in, whole 
thing done. true way, think, 
slavery made national, let us consider Judge Douglas 
every day end. first place, let us see 
influence public sentiment. like 
public sentiment everything. public sentiment 
nothing fail; without nothing succeed. Consequently 
public sentiment goes deeper statutes 
decisions. makes statutes decisions possible 
impossible executed. must borne mind, also 
additional fact Judge Douglas man vast influence, great 
enough many men profess believe anything 
find Judge Douglas believe it. Consider also 
attitude head large party 
claims majority voters country. 
 
man sticks decision forbids people Territory 
exclude slavery, says right 
give opinion 
decided Court, and, decided Court, is, 
are, bound take political action 
judges decision Court 
"Thus saith Lord." places ground alone, 
bear mind thus committing 
decision, firmly next one this. 
commit account merit 
decision, "Thus saith Lord." next decision much 
"Thus saith Lord." nothing 
divert turn away decision. nothing point 
great General Jackson, believe 
binding force decisions. nothing Jefferson 
believe. said often heard approve 
Jackson's course disregarding decision Supreme Court 
national bank says hear 
say so. denies accuracy say ought 
know better I, make question thing, though 
still seems heard say twenty times. tell 
him, though, claims stand Cincinnati platform, 
affirms Congress cannot charter national bank teeth 
old standing decision Congress charter bank. 
remind another piece Illinois history question 
respect judicial piece Illinois history 
belonging time large party Judge Douglas 
decision Supreme Court Illinois, 
decided Governor could remove secretary 
State, know Judge Douglas deny 
favour decision, mode adding five new 
Judges, vote four old ones. so, ended 
Judge's sitting bench one five new 
judges break four old ones. way precisely 
got title Judge. Now, Judge tells men 
appointed conditionally sit members Court 
upon subject, say, "You know, 
tried it!" says Court kind lose 
confidence men, 
say, "You know best, 

 
cannot shake Judge Douglas's teeth loose Dred Scott 
decision. Like animal (I mean 
hang got teeth may cut 
may tear away arm, still hold. may 
point Judge, say over, 
beginning political life present time, attacks 
upon judicial may cut limb limb public 
record, strive single Court, yet 
cannot divert it. last Dred Scott 
Henry Clay, ideal statesman, ... said 
class men would repress tendencies liberty ultimate 
emancipation, must, would this, go back era 
independence, muzzle cannon thunders annual 
joyous return; must blow moral lights around us; 
must penetrate human soul, eradicate love liberty; 
then, till then, could perpetuate slavery 
Judge Douglas is, example vast 
influence, thing community says 
negro nothing Declaration Independence. Henry Clay plainly 
understood contrary. Judge Douglas going back era 
Revolution, and, extent ability, cannon 
thunders annual joyous return. people, willing 
slavery, establish it, moral lights 
around us. says whether slavery voted 
voted sacred right is, 
judgment, human soul light reason 
love liberty American people. 
say, when, means Judge Douglas shall 
succeed bringing public sentiment exact accordance 
vast shall back sentiments; 
shall come repeat views avow principles, 
say says mighty needs 
second Dred Scott decision, advance, 
make slavery alike lawful States, old well new, 
North well South. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Second Joint Debate. Freeport, 
Illinois. August 27, 1858_ 
 
... plain truth this. introduction Nebraska policy, 
believed new era introduced history 
Republic, tended spread perpetuation slavery. 
opposition measure agree one another 
everything. people north end State stronger 
measures opposition southern central portions 
State, opposed Nebraska doctrine. 
one feeling one sentiment north end met 
passed resolutions. middle 
State south hold conventions pass 
resolutions, although general common view common 
sentiment. meetings Judge alluded to, 
resolutions read from, spread 
whole State. last met together 1856, parts 
State, agreed upon common platform. held extreme 
either yielded wholly yielding them, 
agreed yield sake 
opposition measures opposite party pushing forward 
time. met then, anything 
practical purposes. agreed upon platform party 
throughout entire State Illinois, bound 
party platform. say you, one expects 
case election, anything signified 
Republican platform answers to-day, tell 
person deceived. ask vote 
one supposes secret purposes pledges dare 
speak never elected office, trust may 
go falsehood upon notwithstanding 
hard opinions Judge Douglas chooses entertain me. 
 
 
 
 
_From Lincoln's Reply September 15, 1858_ 
 
 
Ladies Gentlemen, much principles Judge 
Douglas cordially approve, 
shall controversy him. far insisted 
States right exactly please 
domestic relations, including slavery, agree 
entirely him. places wrong spite tell him, though 
repeat again, insisting made difference 
upon subject. made great many speeches, 
utterly impossible 
find anything ever put print contrary say 
subject. hold constitutional obligations allow 
people States, without direct 
exactly please, deny inclination 
interfere them, even constitutional 
say placed 
spite insisted 
entertain view purpose regard matter. 
 
upon subject, make answers briefly 
certain propositions Judge Douglas says, "Why can't 
Union endure permanently half slave half said 
supposed could not, new audience, 
give briefly reasons entertaining opinion. 
Another form question is, "Why can't let stand 
fathers placed it?" exact difficulty us. say 
Judge Douglas friends changed position 
fathers originally placed it. 
 
say way fathers originally left slavery question, 
institution course ultimate extinction. say 
government first established, policy founders 
prohibit spread slavery new Territories United 
States existed. Judge Douglas friends 
broken policy, placed upon new basis, 
become national perpetual. asked desired anywhere 
placed back upon basis fathers 
government originally placed upon. doubt would 
become extinct time come, policy 
fathers restricting limits already 
new Territories. 
 
wish dwell branch subject great length 
time, allow repeat one thing stated before. 
man Senator Sumner floor Senate, 
complimented silver 
good many things one 
speeches declared government originally 
established, nobody expected institution slavery would last 
day. opinion one man, 
opinion never get Judge Douglas anybody favour 
slavery North all. sometimes get Southern 
man. said time framers government 
knowledge experience taught experience 
invention cotton gin taught us perpetuation 
slavery necessity. insisted therefore upon changed 
basis upon fathers government left 
basis perpetuation 
 
insist difference Judge Douglas 
Judge Douglas helping change along. insist upon 
government placed fathers originally placed it. 
 
... asks cannot get along 
attitude fathers placed it, better clear 
evidences changed basis; 
chiefly changing policy fathers. 
one read speech twenty-second March last, 
see makes open showing set 
fixing institution upon altogether different set 

 
Now, fellow-citizens, regard matter contract 
Judge Trumbull, long portion Judge 
Douglas's speech subject. wish simply say, said 
before, cannot know whether true not, 
know word truth it. told 
before. don't want harsh language indulged in, know 
deal persistent insisting story know 
utterly without truth. used fashion amongst men 
charge made, sort proof brought forward establish it, 
proof found exist, don't know 
meet kind argument. don't want fight Judge 
Douglas, way making argument 
mouth it. 
say, beginning end 
story bargain Judge Trumbull myself, 
word truth it.... 
 
compromise made, repeal old 
Missouri Compromise. left region United States territory half 
large present territory United States, north line 
slavery prohibited act Congress. 
compromise repeal one. affect propose 
repeal it. last became Judge Douglas's duty, thought 
(and find fault chairman Committee 
Territories, bring bill organization territorial 
one, two Territories north line. 
so, ended provision substantially 
repealing Missouri Compromise. Compromise 
1850 repealed it. ask could left 
compromise quiet agitation slavery 
question. making fuss it. acquiesced 
compromise measures 1850. never seriously disturbed 
Abolition agitation close part 
discussion part asking question again, Why, 
peace Missouri Compromise, could let 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
persuade us must variety different 
institutions States Union; variety necessarily 
proceeds variety soil, climate, face country, 
difference natural features States. agree 
that. matters ever produced difficulty amongst us? 
all. ever quarrel fact 
laws Louisiana designed regulate commerce springs 
production different class relative 
production State? produced 
all. Union. 
don't make house house divided itself. 
hold house sustain Union. 
 
element slavery? always 
quarrels difficulties it? cease 
quarrels it? Like causes produce like worth 
observe generally comparative peace upon slavery 
question, cause alarm 
excited effort spread new territory. Whenever 
limited present effort 
spread it, peace. trouble convulsion 
proceeded efforts spread territory. thus 
date Missouri Compromise. annexation 
territory acquired Mexican War; 
now. Whenever effort spread it, 
agitation Now, appeal audience 
political rational men, whether reason 
expect agitation regard subject cease 
causes tend agitation actively work? 
cause produced agitation 1820, Missouri 
Compromise produced agitation upon 
annexation Texas, results 
think nature man 
causes produced agitation one time 
effect 
 
result far observation slavery 
question reading history right 
hope trouble agitation come 
end, shall either placed back originally stood, 
fathers originally placed it, or, hand, 
shall entirely master view 
reason entertained it, Judge Douglas read 
Springfield speech. 
 
... Freeport answered several interrogatories 
propounded Judge Douglas Ottawa 
time propounded four interrogatories him, claiming right 
answer many him, would 
reserve future got ready. Judge, 
answering upon occasion, put suppose intends 
answers four interrogatories. first one 
me, words: 
 
     people Kansas shall means entirely 
     unobjectionable respects, adopt State constitution 
     ask admission Union it, 
     requisite number inhabitants according English 
     vote admit them? 
 
read Judge's answer newspaper, remember 
pronounced time, give answer equivalent 
answers considerable 
length, rather asking question, 
insisting Judge Trumbull done something ought say 
something finally, getting statements induce 
infer means understood, will, supposed case, 
vote admission Kansas. bring forward now, 
purpose saying that, chooses put different construction 
upon answer, may it. not, shall 
time forward assume vote admission Kansas 
disregard English bill. right remove 
misunderstanding may have. mention now, may hereafter 
assume true construction answer, 
choose correct me. 
 
second interrogatory propounded this: 
 
     people United States Territory 
     lawful way, wish citizen United States, 
     exclude slavery limits prior formation State 
     constitution? 
 
Judge Douglas answered lawfully exclude slavery 
Territory prior formation constitution. goes 
tell us done. understand him, holds 
done territorial legislature refusing make 
enactments protection slavery Territory, 
especially adopting unfriendly legislation it. sake 
clearness, state again: exclude slavery 
withholding assumes indispensable 
assistance way second, unfriendly 
legislation. rightly understand him, wish ask attention 
position. 
 
first place, Supreme Court United States decided 
congressional prohibition slavery Territories 
reached proposition conclusion 
former proposition Constitution United States 
expressly recognizes property slaves; 
constitutional provision person shall deprived property 
without due process law. Hence reach conclusion 
Constitution United States expressly recognizes property 
slaves, person deprived property without 
due process law, pass act Congress man owned 
slave one side line would deprived took 
side, property without due process 
law. understand decision Supreme Court. 
understand also Judge Douglas adheres firmly decision; 
difficulty is, possible power exclude 
slavery Territory unless violation decision? 
difficulty. 
 
Senate United States, 1856, Judge Trumbull speech, 
substantially directly, put interrogatory Judge 
Douglas, whether people Territory lawful power 
exclude slavery prior formation constitution? Judge Douglas 
answered considerable length, answer found 
date June 9, 1856. Judge said 
whether people could exclude slavery prior formation 
constitution not, question decided Supreme 
Court. put proposition, seen 
variety forms, running thing 
question Supreme Court. maintain 
says, Supreme Court decided question, 
people may yet exclude slavery means whatever, 
virtually say question Supreme Court. 
ground. appeal whether say question 
Supreme Supreme Court decided question? 
says people may exclude slavery, make 
question people? virtually shift ground say 
question court, people? 
simple plain naked one. seems 
difficulty deciding it. variety ways said 
question Supreme Court. stop 
tell us that, whatever Supreme Court people 
withholding necessary keep slavery out. 
make answer. submit now, whether new state 
case induced Judge sheer away original 
Would impression every man? 
 
hold proposition slavery cannot enter new country 
without police regulations historically false. true all. 
hold history country shows institution 
slavery originally planted upon continent without 
Judge thinks necessary actual 
establishment it. so, another 
came Dred Scott decision made upon case 
negro taken actually held slavery Minnesota Territory, 
claiming freedom act Congress prohibited 
held there. Judge pretend Dred Scott held 
without police least one matter record 
held slavery Territory, without 
police regulations, teeth congressional legislation 
supposed valid time. shows enough 
slavery plant new country, even unfriendly 
legislation. takes law, enforcement law keep 
out. history country upon subject. 
 
wish ask one question. understood 
Constitution United States guarantees property slaves 
Territories, right property, 
would United States courts, organized government 
Territory, apply remedy might necessary case? 
maxim held courts wrong without 
courts remedy whatever acknowledged treated 
wrong. 
 
Again: ask you, friends, elected members 
legislature, would first thing would 
entering upon Swear support Constitution 
United States. Suppose believe Judge Douglas does, 
Constitution United States guarantees right 
hold slaves 
clear oaths unless give legislation 
necessary enable enjoy understand 
supporting Constitution State United States? 
give constitutional helps rights established 
Constitution may practically you, swear 
support Constitution believe Constitution establishes 
right, clear oath without giving support 
Constitution if, knowing believing right established 
needs specific legislation, withhold 
violate disregard oath? conceive nothing 
world. nothing words 
may run refusing support 
right established Constitution. say hold 
still force Judge's doctrine "unfriendly 
could you, sworn support Constitution, 
believing guaranteed right hold slaves 
Territories, assist legislation intended defeat right? 
would violating view Constitution. so, 
so, long would take courts hold 
votes unconstitutional moment. 
 
Lastly, would ask, Congress obligation give 
legislative support right established United 
States Constitution? repeat question, Congress bound 
give legislative support right established 
United States Constitution? member Congress swears support 
Constitution United States, sees right established 
Constitution needs specific legislative protection, 
clear oath without giving Let ask many 
us, opposed slavery upon principle, give acquiescence 
fugitive-slave law? hold obligations 
pass law, abide Constitution 
makes provision owners slaves shall right 
reclaim them. gives right reclaim slaves; right is, 
Judge Douglas says, barren right, unless legislation 
enforce it. 
 
mere declaration, "No person held service labour one State, 
laws thereof, escaping another, shall, consequence 
law regulation therein, discharged service 
labour, shall delivered claim party 
service labour may powerless without specific legislation 
enforce it. Now, ground would member Congress 
opposed slavery abstract, vote fugitive law, would 
deem duty do? constitutional right 
needs legislation enforce it. And, although me, 
sworn support Constitution; and, 
cannot conceive support withhold right 
necessary legislation make practical. true 
regard fugitive-slave law, right fugitive slaves 
reclaimed better fixed Constitution right hold 
slaves Territories? decision exposition 
Constitution, Judge Douglas one right better 
other? wished refuse give legislative support slave 
property Territories, member Congress, could it, 
holding view Constitution establishes right. 
all, would deny decision properly 
Constitution. acknowledge Judge Douglas 
decision properly Constitution, cannot conceive 
would less man refuse Congress 
give protection property nature 
 
 
 
 
_From Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Charleston, Illinois. 
September 18, 1858_ 
 
 
Judge Douglas said able get 
answer question whether favour negro 
far know, Judge never asked question before. shall 
occasion ever ask again, tell frankly 
favour negro opinion is, 
different States power make negro citizen 
Constitution United States, choose. Dred Scott 
decision decides power. State Illinois 
power, opposed exercise it. 
say it. 
 
Judge Douglas told heard speeches north 
speeches south, ... different cast sentiment 
speeches made different points. charge upon Judge 
Douglas wilfully me, call upon every 
man take speeches read them, dare 
point difference speeches north south. 
here, perhaps ought say word, time, regard 
latter portion Judge's speech, sort 
reference said entertained belief 
government would half slave half free. 
said so, say without seemed good 
perhaps would require time set forth 
reasons let ask questions. ever 
peace slavery question? peace upon 
kept position ever 
peace upon it? important question. sure, 
stop allow Judge Douglas friends march 
present career plant institution nation, 
wherever else flag it, 
peace. let ask Judge Douglas going get 
people that? question forty 
years. cause agitation resulting Missouri 
Compromise; produced troubles annexation Texas, 
acquisition territory acquired Mexican War. Again, 
trouble Compromise 1850, 
settled "for great political parties declared 
national "for turned four 
years, Judge Douglas reopened it. 
 
likely come end? introduced Nebraska bill 
1854, put another end slavery agitation. promised 
would finish immediately, never made speech 
since, got quarrel President 
Lecompton constitution, declared 
end slavery agitation. one speech, think last 
winter, say didn't quite see end slavery 
agitation would come. tells us over, 
people Kansas voted Lecompton constitution. 
one attempts put end slavery 
Kansas Union? 
formed constitution likely come 
slavery agitation still open question 
Kansas sink to-day, leave great space 
earth's surface, vexed question would still among us. say, 
then, way putting end slavery agitation amongst 
us, put back upon basis fathers placed it; 
way keep new restrict ever 
old States exists. public mind rest 
belief course ultimate extinction. one 
way putting end slavery agitation. 
 
way us let Judge Douglas 
friends way, plant slavery 
speaking way slavery one 
common matters property, speak negroes 
horse 
 
 
 
 
_From Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Illinois. October 
7, 1858_ 
 
 
... Judge alluded Declaration Independence, 
insisted negroes included 
framers instrument suppose negroes 
meant asks you, possible believe Mr. 
Jefferson, penned immortal paper, could supposed 
applying language instrument negro race, yet held 
portion race slavery? Would freed 
them? remark upon part speech (and too, 
briefly, shall detain upon point 
great length believe entire records 
world, date Declaration Independence within 
three years ago, may searched vain one single affirmation 
one single man, negro included Declaration 
Independence; think may defy Judge Douglas show ever said 
so, Washington ever said so, President ever said so, 
member Congress ever said so, living man upon 
whole earth ever said so, necessities present policy 
Democratic party regard slavery invent 
remind Judge Douglas audience, 
Mr. Jefferson owner slaves, undoubtedly was, 
speaking subject, used strong language "he 
trembled country remembered God 
offer highest power Judge Douglas 
show he, life, ever uttered sentiment 

 
... want call Judge's attention attack made upon 
first one order fix extreme 
upon me, Judge Douglas read set resolutions declared 
passed Republican State Convention, October 1854, held 
Springfield, Illinois, declared taken part 
convention. turned although men calling 
anti-Nebraska State Convention sat Springfield time, 
yet neither take part it, pass resolutions 
resolutions Judge Douglas read. apparent become 
resolutions read passed Springfield 
all, State Convention taken part, seven 
days later Freeport ... Judge Douglas declared 
... promised ... went Springfield would 
investigate waited think sufficient time 
report 
 
... fraud, absolute forgery, committed, 
traced Whether 
narrowed way, one them, 
Judge Douglas's report would probably show. main object 
forgery time beat elect Harris Congress, 
object known exceedingly dear Judge Douglas 
time. 
 
... fraud apparently successful upon occasion, 
Harris Douglas since attempting put 
new uses. wife, whose drowned husband 
brought home body full said, asked 
done him, set 
Harris Douglas shown disposition take 
fraud gained election, set fraud 
again, discovered publicly 
fraud, find Judge Douglas surprise 
meanwhile three agreed 
man. 
 
 
 
 
Speeches. October 1858_ 
 
 
Suppose true negro inferior white gifts 
exact reverse justice white 
reason take negro part little 
given him? "Give Christian rule 
"Take rule slavery. 
 
sum seems this: 
universally right, yet universally wrong; better 
people slaves; and, cases, God 

 
Certainly contending God; still 
difficulty ascertaining applying particular 
cases. instance, suppose Rev. Dr. slave named 
question is, "Is God shall 
remain slave, set Almighty gives answer 
question, Bible, gives none 
admits squabble one thinks 
asking opinion it. last comes this, Dr. 
decide question; considers it, 
hands, bread 
burning sun. decides God wills 
continue slave, thereby comfortable position; 
decides God wills free, thereby walk 
throw 
Dr. actuated perfect ever 
considered favourable correct 
 
nation element domestic slavery. matter 
absolute certainty disturbing element. opinion 
great men expressed opinion upon it, 
dangerous element. keep controversy regard it. 
controversy necessarily springs difference opinion, 
learn reduce lowest 
difference opinion is, perhaps shall better prepared 
discussing different systems policy would propose 
regard disturbing element. 
 
suggest difference opinion, reduced lowest terms, 
difference men think slavery 
wrong think wrong. Republican party think 
think moral, social, political wrong. think 
wrong merely persons States 
exists, wrong tendency, say 
least, existence whole nation. think 
wrong, propose course policy shall deal 
wrong. 
 
deal wrong, far prevent 
growing deal run time 
may promise end due regard actual 
presence amongst us, difficulties getting rid 
satisfactory way, constitutional obligations thrown 
it. suppose reference actual existence 
nation, constitutional right 
disturb States exists, profess 
inclination disturb right it. 
go that: don't propose disturb where, one 
instance, think Constitution would permit us. think 
Constitution would permit us disturb District Columbia. 
Still propose that, unless terms 
don't suppose nation likely soon agree terms 
making emancipation gradual compensating unwilling owners. 
suppose constitutional right, restrain 
reference actual existence institution 
difficulties thrown it. also oppose evil far 
seeks spread itself. insist policy shall restrict 
present limits. don't suppose violate 
anything due actual presence institution, anything due 
constitutional guaranties thrown around it. 
 
oppose Dred Scott decision certain way, upon ought 
perhaps address words. propose Dred 
Scott decided slave court, we, 
decide free. propose that, one, 
one thousand, shall decided court slaves, 
violent way disturb rights property thus 
nevertheless oppose decision political rule, shall 
binding voter vote nobody thinks wrong, shall 
binding members Congress President favour 
measure actually concur principles 
decision. propose bound political rule 
way, think lays foundation merely 
enlarging spreading consider evil, lays 
foundation spreading evil States themselves. 
propose resisting reversed can, new 
judicial rule established upon subject. 
 
add this, man believe 
slavery wrong three aspects mentioned, 
one them, man ought leave us. While, 
hand, man Republican party impatient 
necessity springing actual presence, impatient 
constitutional guaranties thrown around it, would act 
disregard these, standing us. find 
place somewhere due far 
capable understanding them, things. This, gentlemen, 
well give it, plain statement principles 

 
say sentiment country contrary 
sentiment holds slavery wrong, therefore 
goes policy propose dealing wrong. 
policy Democratic policy, sentiment 
Democratic sentiment. doubt mind one 
vast audience really central idea Democratic 
party, relation subject, ask bear 
state things tending, think, prove proposition. 
 
first place, leading think may friend Judge 
Douglas honour calling present 
Democratic policy, never says wrong. high 
distinction, far know, never said slavery either 
right wrong. Almost everybody else says one other, 
Judge never does. man Democratic party thinks 
wrong, yet party, suggest first 
place leader don't talk does, never says 
wrong. 
 
second place, suggest examine policy 
proposed carried forward, find carefully excludes 
idea anything wrong it. examine 
arguments made it, find every one carefully 
excludes idea anything wrong slavery. 
 
Perhaps Democrat says much opposed slavery 
tell wrong this. wish examine 
course regard matter moment, see opinion 
changed little. say wrong; don't 
constantly object anybody else saying so? constantly argue 
right place oppose it? say must 
opposed free States, slavery there; must 
opposed slave States, there; must opposed 
politics, make must opposed 
pulpit, place 
oppose it? suitable place oppose it. plan 
country oppose evil continent, 
say coming. Frank Blair Gratz Brown tried get 
system gradual emancipation Missouri, election August, 
got you, Mr. Democrat, threw hat 

 
say again, regard arguments made, 
Judge Douglas says "don't care whether slavery voted voted 
down," whether means individual expression sentiment, 
sort statement views national policy, 
alike true say thus argue logically don't see 
anything wrong it; cannot say logically admits 
slavery wrong. cannot say would soon see wrong voted 
voted down. Judge Douglas says whoever whatever 
community wants slaves, right them, perfectly 
logical nothing wrong institution; admit 
wrong, cannot logically say anybody right 
wrong. says slave property horse property 
alike allowed go Territories, upon principles 
equality, reasoning truly difference 
property; one property, held 
wrong, equality right wrong; 
that, turn way can, arguments sustaining 
Democratic policy, policy itself, careful, 
studied exclusion idea anything wrong slavery. 
 
Let us understand this. not, here, trying prove 
right wrong. stating stand, 
trying show real difference us; say 
whenever get question distinctly get 
men believe slavery respects wrong, 
stand act us treating till 
then, think, way come end slavery 
agitation. 
 
 
 
 
Lincoln's Reply Judge Douglas Seventh Last Debate. 
Alton, Illinois. October 15, 1858_ 
 
 
... true difficulty agitation 
regard institution slavery springs 
mere ambition many times 
danger question? Go back day Missouri 
Compromise. Go back question, bottom 
lay slavery question. Go back time 
annexation Texas. Go back troubles led Compromise 
1850. find every time, single exception 
question, sprung endeavour spread 
institution. never party history country, 
probably never be, sufficient strength disturb 
general peace country. Parties may divided 
quarrel minor questions, yet extends beyond parties 
themselves. question make disturbance outside 
political enter churches rend 
divided great Methodist Church two parts, North 
raised constant disturbance every 
General Assembly disturbed 
Church city two years shaken 
great American Tract Society yet it, sure 
divide end? power, 
somehow operates minds men, exciting stirring 
every avenue society, politics, religion, 
relations work 
irresistible power fifty years shaken 
government agitated people, 
pretending exceedingly simple thing, ought 
talk it? get everybody else stop talking it, 
assure quit half done so. 
philosophy statesmanship assumes quiet 
disturbing element society, disturbed us 
half century, serious danger 
threatened say philosophy 
based assumption quit talking 
it, public mind cease agitated 
it? Yet policy North Douglas 
care nothing it! ask 
false false statesmanship undertakes 
build system policy upon basis nothing 
thing everybody care thing 
experience shown care great deal 
 
... Judge often course remarks 
exclusive right States decide whole thing 
themselves. agree controversy 
regard new Territories. agree States come 
States right power 
profess constantly inclination belief 
power government disturb it; yet driven constantly 
defend assumption upon rights 
States. insist upon is, new Territories shall 
kept free territorial condition ... 
 
... false issues, upon Judge Douglas tried force 

 
real issue one upon every 
sentiment part one class looks upon institution 
slavery wrong, another class look upon 
wrong. sentiment contemplates institution slavery 
country wrong sentiment Republican party. 
sentiment around actions, 
propositions look upon 
moral, social, political wrong; contemplate 
such, nevertheless due regard actual existence 
among us, difficulties getting rid satisfactory 
way, constitutional obligations thrown it. Yet, 
due regard these, desire policy regard 
looks creating danger. insist it, far 
may be, treated wrong; one methods treating 
wrong make provision shall grow also 
desire policy looks peaceful end slavery time, 
wrong. views entertain regard it, 
understand them; sentiments, arguments 
propositions brought within said, 
repeat it, man amongst us think 
institution slavery wrong one aspects 
ought us. 
man amongst us impatient wrong disregard 
actual presence among us, difficulty getting rid 
suddenly satisfactory way, disregard constitutional 
obligations thrown it, man 
platform. sympathy practical action. 
placed properly us. 
 
subject treating wrong limiting let 
say word. anything ever threatened existence Union 
save except institution slavery? 
hold dear amongst us? liberty prosperity. ever 
threatened liberty prosperity save except institution 
slavery? true, propose improve condition 
things enlarging spreading making 
may upon person, able 
cut lest death; surely way cure 
it, spread whole body. proper 
way treating regard wrong. see peaceful way 
dealing spread it, 
allowing go new countries already existed. 
peaceful old-fashioned way 
fathers set us example. 
 
hand, said sentiment treats 
wrong. Democratic sentiment day. 
mean say every man stands within range positively 
asserts right. class include positively 
assert right, who, like Judge Douglas, treat 
say either right wrong. two 
classes men fall within general class look 
upon wrong. among anybody supposes 
he, Democrat, consider "as much opposed slavery 
would like reason him. never treat 
wrong. thing consider wrong deal 
deal that? Perhaps say wrong, leader never 
does, quarrel anybody says wrong. Although 
pretend say yourself, find fit place deal 
wrong. must say anything free States, 
here. must say anything slave States, 
there. must say anything pulpit, 
religion, nothing it. must 
say anything politics, disturb 
security "my place talk 
wrong, although say wrong. But, finally, 
belief people slave States 
adopt system gradual emancipation slavery question, 
would favour it. would favour it! say 
getting right place, would glad see 
succeed. yourself. know Frank Blair 
Gratz Brown, St. Louis, undertook introduce 
system Missouri. fought could 
system gradual emancipation, pretend would glad 
see succeed. bring hard fight 
news came here, threw hats 
that; take argument made 
favour system proposed, carefully excludes 
idea anything wrong institution slavery. 
arguments sustain policy carefully exclude it. Even to-day, 
heard Judge Douglas quarrel me, uttered wish 
might sometime come end. Although Henry Clay could say 
wished every slave United States country 
ancestors, denounced pretend respect Henry Clay, 
uttering wish might peaceful way, come 
end. 
 
Democratic policy regard institution tolerate 
breath, slightest least degree wrong 
it. Try Judge Douglas's says "don't 
care whether voted voted 
care dealing expression whether intended 
expressive individual sentiments subject 
national policy desires 
 
man logically say see wrong it; 
man logically say don't care whether wrong voted voted 
man say see anything wrong 
wrong, cannot say people right 
wrong. says that, upon score equality, slaves 
allowed go new Territory like property. strictly 
logical difference 
insist one wrong right, use 
institute comparison right Democratic policy 
everywhere carefully excludes idea anything wrong 
it. 
 
real issue. issue continue 
country poor tongues Judge Douglas shall 
silent. eternal struggle two 
world. two principles 
stood face face beginning time, ever continue 
struggle. 
 
one common right humanity, divine right 
principle whatever shape itself. 
spirit says, "You toil work earn bread, 
I'll eat it." matter shape comes, whether mouth 
king, seeks people nation live 
fruit labour, one race men apology 
enslaving another 
Whenever issue distinctly made, matter 
thrown out, men fairly see real difference 
parties, controversy soon settled, done 
peaceably, too. war, violence. placed 
wisest best men world placed it. 
 
 
 
 
_From Speech Columbus, Ohio, Slave Trade, Popular 
Sovereignty, etc. September 16, 
 
 
... Republican party, understand principles policy, 
believes great danger institution slavery 
spread extended, ultimately made alike lawful 
States Union; prevent incidental 
ultimate consummation original chief purpose 
Republican organization. 
 
say Republican 
certainly true national House shall fall hands 
Republicans, attend matters national 
well this. chief real purpose 
Republican party eminently proposes nothing save 
except restore Government original tone regard 
element slavery, maintain it, looking 
change reference original framers 
Government expected looked forward to. 
 
chief danger purpose Republican party 
revival African slave-trade, passage 
Congressional ... danger 
threatens purpose insidious Douglas popular sovereignty. 
propose revive 
African slave-trade, pass make second Dred 
Scott decision, preparing us charge 
ultimate enemies shall ready come on, word 
command advance shall given. say popular 
broad distinction, understand it, 
article genuine popular sovereignty. 
 
believe genuine popular sovereignty. think definition 
genuine popular sovereignty abstract would this: 
man shall precisely pleases himself, 
things exclusively concern him. Applied governments, 
principle would be, general government shall things 
pertain it; local governments shall precisely 
please respect matters exclusively concern them. 
understand government United States 
live, based upon principle; misunderstood 
supposed war make upon principle. 
 
Now, Judge Douglas's popular sovereignty? is, principle, 
one man chooses make slave another man, 
neither man anybody else right object. Applied 
government, seeks apply it, this: If, new 
Territory people beginning enter purpose 
making homes, choose either exclude slavery 
limits establish there, however one may affect 
persons infinitely greater number persons 
afterward inhabit Territory, members 
families communities 
general head family States 
action may affect one these, power 
right interfere. Douglas popular sovereignty applied. 
 
... cannot express gratitude true view 
element discord among us, believe is, attracting 
attention. believe Governor Seward uttered 
sentiment done before, reflected upon 
subject, saw truth it. believe, 
Governor Seward uttered it, Mr. Pennsylvania, 
different language, since time, declared belief 
utter exists principles liberty 
slavery. see Now, speaking 
let say, know little him. never seen him, 
know scarcely anything man; say much 
him: Democracy brought 
notice, alone true, genuine ring 
 
... Judge Douglas ... proceeds assume, without proving it, 
slavery one little, trivial matters 
much consequence question would me, 
whether raise cattle plant 
moral question it, altogether matter 
dollars new Territory opened 
settlement, first man goes may plant thing 
which, like Canada soil, 
cannot millions men come 
one little things trivial nature 
effect upon anybody save men first plant upon 
thing way family 
communities composing States, way endangers general 
government. Judge Douglas altogether well-known fact 
never serious menace political existence 
except sprang thing, chooses regard 
upon par 
 
... ever, five years ago, hear anybody world saying 
negro share Declaration National Independence; 
mean negroes all; "all men" spoken of, 
negroes 
 
... suppose express belief Declaration 
Independence never mean negroes. call upon one say 
said five years ago. think now, think 
then, next thing strikes remark 
wrought you, significant change is, 
less changing negro, estimation, rank man 

 
change wrought minds important Public 
opinion country everything. nation like 
popular sovereignty squatter sovereignty already wrought 
change public mind extent 
 
... Now, opposed slavery honestly, ask note 
fact (the Judge like 
follow, on, soon 
prepared deal negro everywhere 
public sentiment already point, new 
turn direction 
constantly done insidious popular 
sovereignty. need one two turns further, 
ready things, 
receive support submit slave-trade, revived 
enforced 
new Dred Scott decision bring slavery heart 
free North. 
 
... ask attention fact degree 
popular moral lights around 
us; teaching negro longer man, 
Declaration nothing him; ranks crocodile 
man body soul matter dollars 
suggest portion Ohio Republicans, Democrats, 
present, serious consideration fact, 
going among steady process public 
opinion subject. this, friends, bid 
 
 
 
 
_From Speech Cincinnati, Ohio, "Black 
Relation Labour Capital, etc. September 17, 

 
 
... say, then, first place Kentuckians 
call, understand it, "Black think slavery 
wrong, morally desire 
spread United States, object 
gradually terminate whole Union. say myself, 
say you, Kentuckians, understand differ radically 
upon believe slavery good thing; 
slavery right; ought extended 
Union. Now, broad difference us, 
addressing you, Kentuckians, attempt 
you. would vain effort. enter upon it. 
propose try show ought nominate next 
presidency, Charleston, distinguished friend, Judge Douglas. 
that, real difference him; understand 
sincerely you, wisely 
yourselves. try demonstrate proposition. 
 
Kentucky many slave States 
trying establish slavery reference 
Bible. trying show slavery existed Bible times 
Divine Now, Douglas wiser you, 
upon subject. Douglas knows whenever establish 
slavery right Bible, occur slavery 
slavery white men without reference 
knows well may entertain idea Kentucky much 
please, never win Northern support upon it. 
makes wiser argument you. makes argument slavery 
black slavery man skin different 
colour right. thereby brings support 
Northern voters, could moment brought 
argument Bible right slavery. 
 
... declared 
negro white man, white man, 
questions negro negro. 
make declaration accidentally ... made great many 
times. 
 
first inference seems enslave negro, 
white man way other; whoever 
opposed negro way 
white man. necessary conflict 
white man negro, white man 
much Judge Douglas; say necessary conflict. 
say room enough us free, 
wrong white man negro free, 
positively wrongs mass white men negro 
mass white men really injured effects 
slave labour vicinity fields 
 
one thing say relation. 
give without opinion 
take take 
may beaten. surely beaten take him. We, 
Republicans others forming opposition country, intend "to 
stand patient firm, long run beat 
you, whether take not. know fairly beat 
you, beat together. know "you 
beat together, expect 
it. don't intend impatient it. mean 
deliberate calm possible be, firm 
resolved possible men be. say, beat 
you, perhaps want know you. 
 
tell you, far authorized speak opposition, 
mean you. mean treat you, near 
possibly can, Washington, Jefferson, Madison treated you. mean 
leave alone, way interfere institution; 
abide every compromise Constitution, and, word, 
coming back original proposition, treat you, far 
men (if may, according example 
noble Jefferson, Madison. mean 
remember good difference 
us difference circumstances. mean recognize 
bear mind good hearts bosoms 
people, claim have, treat accordingly. 
mean marry girls white ones, 
honour inform chance 
way. 
 
told mean do. want know, now, thing 
takes place, mean do? often hear intimated 
mean divide Union whenever Republican, anything like it, 
elected President United States. [A voice: "That "That 
so," one wonder [A voice: "He 
Douglas Well, then, want know going 
half it. going split Ohio through, 
push half going keep right alongside 
us outrageous going build wall way 
country ours, movable property 
can't come more, danger losing it? 
think better subject leaving us 
obligation whatever return specimens movable 
property come 
 
divided Union would right you, 
think, upon subject; cease obligation 
anything you, much better think be? 
make war upon us kill us all? Why, gentlemen, think 
gallant brave men fight bravely 
good cause, man man, people shown 
capable upon various man man, 
better are, many 
us. never make much hand whipping us. 
fewer numbers you, think could whip us; 
equal would likely drawn inferior numbers, 
make nothing attempting master 
 
Labour great source nearly all, all, human 
necessities difference opinion 
elements labour society. men assume 
necessary connection capital labour, connection 
draws within whole labour community. assume 
nobody works unless capital work. begin next 
consider best way. say two 
hire men labour 
buy men, drive it, slavery. 
assumed that, proceed discuss question whether 
labourers better condition slaves 
hired labourers, usually decide better 
condition slaves. 
 
first place, say whole thing mistake. 
certain relation capital labour, 
exist, rightfully exist, think true. men 
sober honest pursuit interests 
capital, 
allowed enjoy peace, also choose, 
it, use save actual labour, 
hire people labour right. so, 
wrong man find men 
land work upon, work in, 
working labourers, receiving capital it. 
Thus men capital hire others, establish 
relation capital labour relation 
make insist all, 
embrace labour country. 
 
plenty men slave States altogether good 
enough me, either President Vice-President, provided 
profess sympathy purpose, place 
ground men upon principle vote them. 
men character intelligence, talent 
one place upon right ground, 
occupying one place upon next Republican opposition 
ticket. go heartily him. unless place himself, 
think perfect nonsense attempt bring union upon 
basis; union made, elements 
success ticket. good old maxims 
Bible applicable, truly applicable, human 
this, things, may say us 
us; us, glad 
many good able noble men South place 
confer upon high honour election 
upon one end ticket. would soul good 
thing. would enable us teach inasmuch select 
one number carry principles, free 
charge mean 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter Fell. December 20, 
 
 
born February 12, Hardin County, Kentucky. parents 
born Virginia, 
families, perhaps say. mother, died tenth year, 
family name reside Adams, 
others Macon County, Illinois. Abraham 
Lincoln, County, Virginia, Kentucky 
year two later killed Indians, 
battle, open farm 
ancestors, went Virginia 
County, Pennsylvania. effort identify New England 
family name ended nothing definite similarity 
Christian names families, 
like. 
 
father, death father, six years age, 
grew literally without education. removed Kentucky 
County, Indiana, eighth year. reached new home 
time State came Union. wild region, 
many bears wild animals still grew up. 
schools, called, qualification ever 
required teacher beyond 
rule three. supposed understand Latin happened 
looked upon 
absolutely nothing excite ambition education. course, 
came age know much. Still, somehow, could read, write, 
rule three, all. 
school since. little advance upon store education 
picked time time pressure necessity. 
 
raised farm work, continued till 
twenty-one came Illinois, Macon County. got New Salem, 
time Sangamon, Menard County, remained year 
sort clerk 
 
came Black Hawk War; elected captain volunteers, 
success gave pleasure since. went 
campaign, ran legislature year 
time ever beaten people. 
next three succeeding elections elected 
legislature. candidate afterward. legislative 
period studied law, removed Springfield it. 
1846 elected lower House Congress. 
candidate 1849 1854, practised 
law ever before. Always Whig 
generally Whig electoral making active 
losing interest politics repeal Missouri Compromise 
aroused again. done since pretty well known. 
 
personal description thought desirable, may said 
am, height, six feet four flesh, weighing 
average one hundred eighty dark coarse 
black hair eyes. marks 
 
 
 
 
_From Address delivered Cooper New York. February 27, 

 
 
... Now, let guard little misunderstood. 
mean say bound follow whatever 
fathers did. so, would discard lights current 
reject progress, improvement. say is, 
would opinions policy fathers 
case, evidence argument clear, 
even great authority, fairly considered cannot 
surely case whereof declare 
understood question better 
 
man day sincerely believes proper division 
local Federal authority, part Constitution, forbids 
Federal Government control slavery Federal 
Territories, right say so, enforce position 
truthful evidence fair argument can. right 
others less access history, less leisure 
study it, false belief "our fathers framed 
government live" 
substituting falsehood deception truthful evidence fair 
argument. man day sincerely believes "our fathers 
framed government live" used applied principles, 
cases, ought led understand proper 
division local Federal authority, part 
Constitution, forbids Federal Government control slavery 
Federal Territories, right say so. should, 
time, responsibility declaring that, opinion, 
understands principles better themselves; 
especially responsibility asserting 
understood question well even better now. 
 
Let believe "our fathers framed 
government live understood question well, 
even better now," speak spoke, act 
acted upon it. Republicans ask, Republicans desire, 
relation slavery. fathers marked it, let 
evil extended, tolerated protected 
far actual presence among us makes 
protection necessity. Let guaranties 
fathers gave grudgingly, fully fairly maintained. 
Republicans this, far know believe, 
content. 
 
now, would suppose would 
address words Southern people. 
 
would say them: consider reasonable 
people; consider general qualities reason 
justice inferior people. Still, speak 
us Republicans, denounce us or, 
best, better grant hearing 
murderers, nothing like "Black 
one another, deems unconditional 
condemnation "Black first thing attended 
to. Indeed, condemnation us seems indispensable 
admitted 
permitted speak all. Now, prevailed upon 
pause consider whether quite us, even 
yourselves? Bring forward charges 
patient long enough hear us deny 
 
say sectional. deny it. makes issue; 
burden proof upon you. produce it? 
Why, party existence votes 
section. fact substantially true; prove 
issue? does, then, case should, without change principle, 
begin get votes section, thereby cease 
sectional. cannot escape yet, willing 
abide it? are, probably soon find 
ceased sectional, shall get votes section 
year. begin discover, truth plainly is, 
proof touch issue. fact get votes 
section fact making, ours. 
 
fault fact, fault primarily yours, 
remains show repel wrong principle 
practice. repel wrong principle practice, 
fault ours; brings ought 
discussion right wrong principle. 
principle, put practice, would wrong section benefit 
ours, object, principle, it, 
sectional, justly opposed denounced such. Meet us, then, 
question whether principle, put practice, would wrong 
section; meet us possible something may 
said side. accept No! really 
believe principle "our fathers framed government 
live" thought clearly right adopt it, 
indorse again, upon official oaths, fact 
clearly wrong demand condemnation without moment's 
consideration. 
 
delight faces warning sectional 
parties given Washington Farewell Address. Less eight 
years Washington gave warning had, President 
United States, approved signed act Congress enforcing 
prohibition slavery Northwestern Territory, act embodied 
policy government upon subject 
moment penned one year penned it, 
wrote considered prohibition wise measure, 
expressing connection hope time 
confederacy free States. 
 
Bearing mind, seeing sectionalism since arisen upon 
subject, warning weapon hands us, 
hands you? Could Washington speak, would cast 
blame sectionalism upon us, sustain policy, upon 
you, repudiate it? respect warning Washington, 
commend you, together example pointing right 
application it. 
 
say 
revolutionary, something sort. 
 
adherence old tried, 
new stick to, contend for, identical old policy 
point controversy adopted "our fathers framed 
government one accord 
upon old policy, insist upon substituting 
something new. 
 
True, disagree among substitute shall be. 
divided new propositions plans, unanimous 
rejecting denouncing old policy fathers. 
reviving foreign Congressional 
Territories; Congress forbidding 
Territories prohibit slavery within limits; 
maintaining slavery Territories 
"if one man would enslave another, 
third man called "popular 
never man among favour Federal prohibition slavery 
Federal Territories, according practice "our fathers 
framed government live." one various 
plans show precedent advocate century within 
government originated. 
 
Consider, then, whether claim yourselves, 
charge us, based clear 

 
Again, say made slavery question prominent 
formerly was. deny it. admit 
deny made so. we, you, discarded old 
policy fathers. still 
thence comes greater prominence question. Would 
question reduced former Go back old 
policy. again, 
would peace old times, policy 
old times. 
 
charge stir insurrections among slaves. deny it; 
Harper's John John Brown 
failed single Republican 
Harper's Ferry enterprise. member party guilty 
matter, know it, know it. know it, 
inexcusable designating man proving fact. 
know it, inexcusable asserting it, especially 
persisting assertion tried failed make 
proof. need told persisting charge one 
know true simply malicious 
 
admit Republican aided encouraged 
Harper's Ferry affair, still insist doctrines 
declarations necessarily lead results. believe it. 
know hold doctrine, make declaration, held 
made "our fathers framed government 
live." never dealt fairly us relation affair. 
occurred, important State elections near hand, 
evident belief that, charging blame upon us, 
could get advantage us elections. elections came, 
expectations quite fulfilled. Every Republican man knew 
that, least, charge 
much inclined cast vote favour. Republican 
doctrines declarations accompanied continual protest 
interference whatever slaves, 
slaves. Surely encourage True, do, 
common "our fathers framed government 
live," declare belief slavery wrong; slaves 
hear us declare even this. anything say do, slaves would 
scarcely know Republican party. believe would not, 
fact, generally know us 
hearing. political among yourselves, faction 
charges sympathy Black then, 
give point charge, Black simply 
insurrection, blood, among slaves. 
 
Slave insurrections common 
Republican party organized. induced Southampton 
insurrection, twenty-eight years ago, least three times 
many lives lost Harper's Ferry? scarcely stretch 
elastic fancy conclusion Southampton "got 
Black present state things United 
States, think general, even slave 
insurrection possible. indispensable concert action cannot 
attained. slaves means rapid 
incendiary black white, supply it. materials 
everywhere neither are, 
indispensable connecting 
 
Much said Southern people affection slaves 
masters part it, least, true. plot 
could scarcely devised communicated twenty 
individuals one them, save life favourite 
master mistress, would divulge it. slave 
revolution exception it, case occurring 
peculiar circumstances. Plot British history, 
though connected slaves, point. case, 
twenty admitted yet one them, 
anxiety save friend, betrayed plot friend, and, 
consequence, averted Occasional 
kitchen, open field, local 
extending score so, continue occur 
natural results slavery; general insurrection slaves, 
think, happen country long time. Whoever much fears, 
much hopes, event, alike disappointed. 
 
language Mr. Jefferson, uttered many years ago, "It still 
power direct process emancipation deportation 
peaceably, slow degrees evil wear 
places be, filled free white 
If, contrary, left force on, human 
nature must prospect held up." 
 
Mr. Jefferson mean say, I, power 
emancipation Federal Government. spoke Virginia; and, 
power emancipation, speak slaveholding States only. 
Federal Government, however, insist, power 
extension power insure 
slave insurrection shall never occur American soil 
free slavery. 
 
John Brown's effort slave insurrection. 
attempt white men get revolt among slaves, 
slaves refused fact, absurd 
slaves, ignorance, saw plainly enough could 
succeed. affair, philosophy, corresponds many 
related history, kings 
oppression people till 
fancies commissioned Heaven liberate them. 
attempt, ends little else execution. 
attempt Louis Napoleon, John Brown's attempt Harper's Ferry, 
were, philosophy, precisely same. cast 
blame Old England one case, New England other, 
two things. 
 
much would avail could, use John Brown, 
book, like, break Republican Human 
action modified extent, human nature cannot 
changed. judgment feeling slavery 
nation, cast least million half votes. cannot 
destroy judgment breaking 
political organization around it. scarcely 
disperse army formed order face 
heaviest could, much would gain forcing 
sentiment created peaceful channel 
would channel 
probably be? Would number John enlarged 

 
break Union rather submit denial 
constitutional rights. 
 
somewhat reckless sound; would 
fully justified, mere force numbers, 
deprive right plainly written Constitution. 
proposing thing. 
 
make declarations specific 
allusion assumed constitutional right take slaves 
Federal Territories, hold property. 
right specifically written Constitution. instrument 
literally silent right. We, contrary, deny 
right existence Constitution, even 
 
purpose, then, plainly stated, destroy 
government, unless allowed construe force Constitution 
please, points dispute us. 
rule ruin events. 
 
This, plainly stated, language. Perhaps say Supreme 
Court decided constitutional question favour. 
quite so. lawyer's distinction 
decision, court decided question sort way. 
court substantially said, constitutional right 
take slaves Federal Territories, hold 
property. say decision made sort way, mean 
made divided court, bare majority judges, 
quite agreeing one another reasons making it; 
made avowed supporters disagree one another 
meaning, mainly based upon mistaken 
statement statement opinion "the right 
property slave distinctly expressly affirmed 
Constitution." 
 
inspection Constitution show right property 
slave "distinctly expressly it. Bear 
mind, judges pledge judicial opinion right 
affirmed Constitution; pledge veracity 
"distinctly affirmed 
is, mingled anything is, words 
meaning that, without aid inference, 
meaning. 
 
pledged judicial opinion right 
affirmed instrument implication, would open others 
show neither word "slavery" found 
Constitution, word even, connection 
language alluding things slave slavery; wherever 
instrument slave alluded to, called 
wherever legal right relation alluded to, 
spoken labour may debt payable 
service labour. Also would open show, contemporaneous 
history, mode alluding slaves slavery, instead 
speaking them, employed purpose exclude 
Constitution idea could property man. 
 
show easy certain. 
 
obvious mistake judges shall brought 
notice, reasonable expect withdraw 
mistaken statement, reconsider conclusion based upon it? 
 
remembered "our fathers framed 
government men made 
constitutional question favour 
long ago; decided without division among making 
decision; without division among meaning 
made, and, far evidence left, without 
upon mistaken statement facts. 
 
circumstances, really feel justified 
break government unless court decision 
shall submitted conclusive final rule 
political abide election Republican 
supposed event, say, destroy Union; 
then, say, great crime destroyed upon 
cool. holds pistol 
teeth, shall kill you, 

 
sure, demanded own; 
clear right keep it; vote 
own; threat death me, extort money, 
threat destruction Union, extort vote, scarcely 
distinguished principle. 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
Wrong think slavery is, yet afford let alone 
is, much due necessity arising actual 
presence nation; we, votes prevent it, 
allow spread national Territories, overrun us 
free States? sense duty forbids this, let us 
stand duty Let us diverted none 
industriously 
middle 
ground right wrong, vain search man 
neither living man dead man; policy 
"don't question true men 
Union appeals true Union men yield disunionists, 
reversing Divine rule, calling 
righteous Washington, imploring 
men Washington said, Washington did. 
 
Neither let us duty false 
us, frightened menaces destruction government, 
ourselves. Let us faith right makes might, 
faith let us end dare duty understand 
it. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Farewell Address Springfield, Illinois. February 11, 1861_ 
 
 
Friends, one situation appreciate feeling 
place, kindness 
people, owe everything. lived quarter century, 
passed young old man. children born, 
one leave, knowing whether ever may 
return, task greater rested upon 
Washington. Without assistance Divine ever 
attended cannot succeed. assistance cannot fail. 
Trusting Him, go remain you, 
everywhere good, let us confidently hope yet well. 
care you, hope prayers commend 
me, bid affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
_A Letter Hon. Geo. accepting Nomination 
Presidency. May 23, 
 
 
accept nomination tendered Convention 
formally letter 
others, acting committee Convention purpose. 
 
declaration principles sentiments 
letter, meets shall care violate 
disregard part. 
 
Imploring assistance Divine Providence, due regard 
views feelings represented 
rights States Territories people nation; 
Constitution; perpetual union, 
harmony, prosperity happy co-operate 
practical success principles declared Convention. 
 
     obliged friend 
       A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Miss Grace Springfield, Illinois. October 19, 
 
 
dear little agreeable letter 15th received. 
regret necessity saying three 
one one seven years age. They, 
mother, constitute whole family. 
never worn any, think people would call piece silly 
affectation begin now? 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Legislature Indianapolis, Indiana. February 
12, 1861_ 
 
 
Fellow-citizens State Indiana, thank much 
magnificent still generous support given 
State political cause think true 
cause whole country whole world. 
 
Solomon says "there time keep men 
mouth certainty mean thing using 
word, perhaps well would keep silence. 
 
words much used days, 
often temper hot blood. Let us make sure, can, 
misunderstand meaning use them. Let us get 
exact definitions words, 
men themselves, certainly things would represent 
use words. Would 
marching army South Carolina, without consent 
people hostile intent towards them, certainly 
think would coercion also, South 
forced United States merely retake 
hold forts property, collect duties foreign 
even withhold places 
habitually would things invasion 
professed lovers Union, 
resolve resist coercion invasion, understand 
things these, part United States, would 
coercion invasion State? so, idea means preserve 
object affection would seem exceedingly thin 
little would much large 
view, Union family relation would 
seem regular marriage, sort arrangement 
maintained 
 
way, consists special sacredness State? speak 
position assigned State Union 
Constitution; that, position, 
however, State cannot carry Union it. speak 
assumed primary right State rule 
itself, ruin larger itself. State 
county given case equal extent territory, equal 
number inhabitants, what, matter principle, 
State better Would exchange 
exchange upon rightful principle may 
State, part nation soil 
population, break nation, larger 
arbitrary way? mysterious right 
play tyrant conferred district country, people, 
merely calling State? 
 
Fellow-citizens, asserting merely asking 
questions consider. allow bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Legislature Columbus, Ohio. February 13, 
1861_ 
 
 
true, said president Senate, 
great responsibility rests upon position votes 
American people called me. deeply sensible weighty 
responsibility. cannot know, know, without 
name, perhaps without reason name, 
fallen upon task rest even upon Father 
Country; feeling, cannot turn look support 
without impossible perform great task. 
turn then, look great American people, God 
never forsaken them. Allusion made interest felt 
relation policy new Administration. 
received degree credit kept silence, 
others, still think right. 
 
varying repeatedly shifting scenes present, 
without precedent could enable judge past, 
seemed fitting speaking upon difficulties 
country, gained view whole field, 
liberty modify change course policy future events may 
make change necessary. 
 
maintained silence want real anxiety. 
good thing anxiety, nothing 
going wrong. circumstance look out, 
nothing really hurts anybody. entertain different views upon 
political questions, nobody suffering anything. 
circumstance, may conclude want 
time, patience, reliance God never forsaken 
people. 
 
 
 
 
_From Remarks Pennsylvania. February 15, 1861_ 
 
... condition country extraordinary one, 
mind every patriot anxiety. intention give 
subject consideration possibly can, specially deciding 
regard it, speak, may nearly right 
possible. speak, hope may say nothing opposition 
spirit Constitution, contrary integrity Union, 
prove inimical liberties people peace 
whole country. furthermore, time 
speak great subject, hope may say nothing disappoint 
people generally throughout country, especially expectation 
based upon anything heretofore said. 
 
... great American people keep temper sides 
line, troubles come end, question 
country settled, surely 
difficulties like character originated 
government Let people sides keep 
cleared away due time, 
great nation continue heretofore. 
 
... often said tariff Pennsylvania. 
Assuming direct taxation adopted, tariff question 
must durable government itself. question 
national government 
family. circumstances require 
frequent modifications amount needed sources 
far little difference opinion among people. 
whether, far, duties shall adjusted 
favour home home market controversy One 
party insists much protection one class 
advantage another; party argues that, 
long run classes Chicago 
platform plank upon subject, general 
law incoming Administration. neither less 
gave people reason believe would gave us 
votes. plank read: 
 
     "That providing revenue support general 
     government duties upon imports, sound policy requires 
     adjustment encourage development 
     industrial interest whole country; commend 
     policy national secures working-men liberal 
     agriculture prices, mechanics 
     adequate reward labour, 
     enterprise, nation commercial prosperity 
     
 
... political education strongly free use 
means Executive control legislation 
country. rule, think better Congress originate 
well perfect measures without external therefore would 
rather recommend every gentleman knows member 
next Congress, take enlarged view, post 
contribute part adjustment 
tariff shall provide sufficient revenue, 
far possible, equal sections country 
classes people. 
 
 
 
 
_From Speech Senate New Jersey. February 21, 
1861_ 
 
 
... cannot remember place New Jersey holds early 
history. early Revolutionary struggle States among 
old thirteen country within 
limits old New Jersey. May pardoned if, upon occasion, 
mention away back earliest days 
able read, got hold small book, one 
younger members ever Life 
remember accounts given struggles 
liberties country, none fixed upon 
imagination deeply struggle New Jersey. 
crossing river, contest great 
endured fixed upon memory 
single Revolutionary know, 
early last longer others. 
recollect thinking then, boy even though was, must 
something common men struggled for. 
exceedingly anxious something even 
national independence; something held great promise 
people world time exceedingly 
anxious Union, Constitution, liberties 
people shall accordance original idea 
struggle made, shall happy indeed shall 
humble instrument hands Almighty, this, 
chosen people, object great struggle. 
 
 
 
 
Independence Hall, Philadelphia. February 22, 1861_ 
 
 
filled deep emotion finding standing place, 
collected together wisdom, patriotism, devotion 
principle, sprang institutions live. 
 
kindly suggested hands task 
restoring peace distracted country. say return, sir, 
political sentiments entertain drawn, far 
able draw them, sentiments originated 
given world hall. never feeling, 
politically, spring sentiments embodied 
Declaration Independence. 
 
often pondered dangers men 
assembled framed adopted Declaration. 
pondered endured officers soldiers 
army achieved independence. often inquired 
great principle idea kept Confederacy 
long together. mere matter separation colonies 
sentiment Declaration 
Independence gave liberty alone people country, 
hope world, future time. gave 
promise due time would lifted shoulders 
men, equal chance. 
sentiment embodied Declaration Independence. 
 
Now, friends, country saved can, 
consider one men world help 
save it. cannot saved upon principle, truly 
awful. country cannot saved without giving 
principle, say would rather 
spot surrender it. 
 
Now, view present aspect affairs, need 
bloodshed war. necessity it. favour 
course; may say advance bloodshed 
unless forced upon government. government use 
force unless force used it. 
 
friends, wholly speech. expect 
called say word came here. supposed merely 
something toward raising flag. may, therefore, said something 
said nothing willing live by, 
and, pleasure Almighty God, die by. 
 
 
 
 
Mayor Washington, D.C. February 27, 1861_ 
 
 
Mr. Mayor, thank you, municipal authorities 
city accompany you, first 
time life, since present phase politics presented 
country, said anything publicly within 
region country institution slavery exists, take 
occasion say think much 
existed still exists people section 
came people here, dependent upon misunderstanding one 
another. therefore avail opportunity assure you, Mr. 
Mayor, gentlemen present, now, never 
had, kindly feelings towards people 
section. never disposition 
treat respect otherwise 
purpose withhold benefits 
Constitution circumstances, would feel 
constrained withhold hope, word, 
become better say great 
shall like more. thank 
kindness reception. 
 
 
 
 
Inaugural Address. March 4, 1861_ 
 
 
Fellow-citizens United States, compliance custom old 
government itself, appear address briefly, 
take presence oath prescribed Constitution 
United States taken President "before enters 
execution office." 
 
consider necessary present discuss 
matters administration special anxiety 
excitement. 
 
Apprehension seems exist among people Southern States 
accession Republican administration property 
peace personal security never 
reasonable cause Indeed, ample 
evidence contrary existed open 
inspection. found nearly published speeches 
addresses you. quote one speeches 
declare "I purpose, directly indirectly, 
interfere institution slavery States exists. 
believe lawful right so, inclination 
so." nominated elected full knowledge 
made many similar declarations, never 
them. And, this, placed platform 
acceptance, law me, clear emphatic 
resolution 
 
     maintenance rights 
     States, especially right State order control 
     domestic institutions according judgment 
     exclusively, essential balance power 
     perfection endurance political fabric 
     denounce lawless invasion armed force soil 
     State Territory, matter among 
     
 
reiterate sentiments; and, so, press upon 
public attention conclusive evidence case 
property, peace, security section 
wise endangered incoming administration. add, 
too, protection which, consistently Constitution 
laws, given, cheerfully given States 
lawfully demanded, whatever cheerfully one section 
another. 
 
much controversy delivering fugitives 
service labour. clause read plainly written 
Constitution 
 
     "No person held service labour one State, laws 
     thereof, escaping another, shall consequence law 
     regulation therein discharged service labour, 
     shall delivered claim party service 
     labour may 
 
scarcely questioned provision intended 
made reclaiming call fugitive slaves; 
intention law. members Congress swear 
support whole provision much 
other. proposition, then, slaves whose cases come within 
terms clause "shall delivered up," oaths 
Now, would make effort good temper, could 
nearly equal unanimity frame pass law means 
keep good unanimous oath? 
 
difference opinion whether clause 
enforced national State authority; surely difference 
material one. slave surrendered, 
little consequence others authority 
done. one case content oath shall go 
merely controversy shall 

 
Again, law upon subject, ought safeguards 
liberty known civilized humane introduced, 
free man not, case, surrendered might 
well time provide law enforcement 
clause Constitution guarantees "the citizen 
State shall entitled privileges immunities 
citizens several 
 
take official oath to-day mental reservations, 
purpose construe Constitution laws 
choose specify particular acts Congress 
proper enforced, suggest much safer all, 
official private stations, conform abide 
acts stand unrepealed, violate them, trusting 
find held unconstitutional. 
 
years since first inauguration President 
National Constitution. period fifteen different 
greatly distinguished citizens have, succession, administered 
executive branch government conducted many 
perils, generally great success. Yet, scope 
precedent, enter upon task brief constitutional 
term four years great peculiar difficulty. disruption 
Federal Union, heretofore attempted. 
 
hold that, contemplation universal law Constitution, 
Union States perpetual. Perpetuity implied, 
expressed, fundamental law national governments. 
safe assert government proper ever provision 
organic law Continue execute express 
provisions National Constitution, Union endure 
impossible destroy except action 
provided instrument itself. 
 
Again, United States government proper, 
association States nature contract merely, it, 
contract, peaceably less parties made it? 
One party contract may violate it, speak; 
require lawfully rescind it? 
 
Descending general principles, find proposition 
legal contemplation Union perpetual confirmed history 
Union itself. Union much older Constitution. 
formed, fact, Articles Association 
matured continued Declaration Independence 
matured, faith thirteen States expressly 
engaged perpetual, Articles 
Confederation And, finally, 1787 one declared objects 
establishing Constitution "to form 
perfect Union." 
 
destruction Union one part 
States lawfully possible, Union less perfect 
Constitution, lost vital element 
 
follows views State upon mere motion 
lawfully get Union; resolves ordinances 
effect legally acts violence, within State 
States, authority United States, insurrectionary 
revolutionary, according circumstances. 
 
therefore consider that, view Constitution laws, 
Union extent ability shall take care, 
Constitution expressly upon me, laws 
Union faithfully executed States. deem 
simple duty part; shall perform far 
practicable, unless rightful masters, American people, shall 
withhold requisite means, authoritative manner direct 
contrary. trust regarded menace, 
declared purpose Union constitutionally defend 
maintain itself. 
 
needs bloodshed 
shall none, unless forced upon national authority. 
power confided used hold, occupy, possess 
property places belonging government, collect 
duties beyond may necessary objects, 
invasion, using force among people 
anywhere. hostility United States, interior 
locality, shall great universal prevent competent 
resident citizens holding Federal offices, 
attempt force obnoxious strangers among people object. 
strict legal right may exist government enforce 
exercise offices, attempt would 
nearly impracticable deem better forego 
time uses offices. 
 
unless continue furnished parts 
Union. far possible, people everywhere shall 
sense perfect security favourable calm thought 
reflection. course indicated followed unless current 
events experience shall show modification change proper, 
every case best discretion exercised 
according circumstances actually existing, view hope 
peaceful solution national troubles restoration 
fraternal sympathies 
 
persons one section another seek destroy 
Union events, glad pretext it, 
neither affirm such, need address word 
them. those, however, really love Union may speak? 
 
entering upon grave matter destruction 
national benefits, hopes, 
would wise ascertain precisely it? 
hazard desperate step possibility 
portion ills fly real existence? you, 
certain ills fly greater real ones 
fly risk commission fearful 
 
profess content Union constitutional rights 
maintained. true, then, right, plainly written 
Constitution, think not. Happily human mind 
constituted party reach this. 
Think, can, single instance plainly written 
provision Constitution ever denied. mere force 
numbers majority deprive minority clearly written 
constitutional right, might, moral point view, justify 
would right vital one. 
case. vital rights individuals 
plainly assured affirmations guaranties 
Constitution, controversies never arise 
concerning them. organic law ever framed provision 
specifically applicable every question may occur practical 
administration. document 
reasonable length express provisions possible 
questions. Shall fugitives labour surrendered national 
State authority? Constitution expressly say. Congress 
prohibit slavery Territories? Constitution expressly 
say. Congress protect slavery Territories? 
Constitution expressly say. 
 
questions class spring constitutional 
divide upon majorities 
minority acquiesce, majority must, government 
must cease. continuing government 
acquiescence one side other. 
 
minority case secede rather acquiesce, make 
precedent turn divide ruin them; minority 
secede whenever majority refuses 
controlled minority. instance, may portion 
new confederacy year two hence arbitrarily secede again, precisely 
portions present Union claim secede it? 
cherish disunion sentiments educated exact temper 
this. 
 
perfect identity interests among States compose 
new Union, produce harmony only, prevent renewed 
 
Plainly, central idea secession essence 
majority held restraint constitutional limitations, 
always changing easily deliberate changes popular opinions 
sentiments, true sovereign free people. Whoever 
does, necessity, fly anarchy despotism. Unanimity 
impossible; rule minority, permanent arrangement, 
wholly that, rejecting majority principle, anarchy 
despotism form left. 
 
forget position, assumed some, constitutional 
questions decided Supreme Court; deny 
decisions must case, upon parties suit, 
object suit, also entitled high 
respect consideration parallel cases departments 
government. obviously possible decision 
may erroneous given case, still evil effect following it, 
limited particular case, chance may 
overruled never become precedent cases, better 
borne could evils different practice. time, 
candid citizen must confess policy government, 
upon vital questions affecting whole people, irrevocably 
fixed decisions Supreme Court, instant made, 
ordinary parties personal actions, people 
ceased extent practically 
resigned government hands eminent 
view assault upon court 
duty may shrink decide cases properly brought 
them, fault others seek turn 
decisions political purposes. 
 
One section country believes slavery right, ought 
extended, believes wrong, ought 
extended. substantial dispute. fugitive-slave 
clause Constitution, law suppression 
foreign slave-trade, well enforced, perhaps, law 
ever community moral sense people imperfectly 
supports law itself. great body people abide dry 
legal obligation cases, break each. This, 
think, cannot perfectly would worse cases 
separation sections before. foreign 
slave-trade, imperfectly suppressed, would ultimately 
without restriction, one section, fugitive slaves, 
partially surrendered, would surrendered other. 
 
Physically speaking, cannot separate. cannot remove respective 
sections other, build impassable wall them. 
husband wife may go presence beyond 
reach other; different parts country cannot 
this. cannot remain face face, intercourse, either 
amicable hostile, must continue them. possible, then, 
make intercourse advantageous satisfactory 
separation before? aliens make treaties easier friends 
make laws? treaties faithfully enforced aliens 
laws among friends? Suppose go war, cannot fight always; 
when, much loss sides, gain either, 
cease fighting, identical old questions terms intercourse 
upon you. 
 
country, institutions, belongs people inhabit 
it. Whenever shall grow weary existing government, 
exercise constitutional right amending it, 
revolutionary right overthrow it. cannot ignorant 
fact many worthy patriotic citizens desirous 
National Constitution amended. make recommendation 
amendments, fully recognize rightful authority people 
whole subject, exercised either modes 
prescribed instrument itself; should, existing 
circumstances, favour rather oppose fair opportunity 
afforded people act upon it. venture add 
convention mode seems allows amendments 
originate people themselves, instead permitting 
take reject propositions originated others especially chosen 
purpose, might precisely would 
wish either accept understand proposed amendment 
amendment, however, passed 
Congress, effect Federal Government shall never 
interfere domestic institutions States, including 
persons held service. avoid 
said, depart purpose speak particular amendments 
far say that, holding provision implied 
constitutional law, objection made express 

 
chief magistrate derives authority people, 
conferred none upon fix terms separation 
States. people also 
Executive, such, nothing it. duty administer 
present government, came hands, transmit it, 
him, successor. 
 
patient confidence ultimate justice 
people? better equal hope 
present either party without faith 
right? Almighty Ruler Nations, eternal truth 
justice, side North, South, 
truth justice surely prevail judgment great 
tribunal American people. 
 
frame government live, people 
wisely given public servants little power 
have, equal wisdom, provided return little 
hands short people retain 
virtue vigilance, administration, extreme wickedness 
seriously injure government short space 
four years. 
 
countrymen, one all, think calmly well upon whole 
subject. Nothing valuable lost taking time. 
object hurry hot haste step would never 
take deliberately, object frustrated taking time; 
good object frustrated it. dissatisfied 
still old Constitution and, sensitive point, 
laws framing it; new administration 
immediate power, would, change either. 
admitted dissatisfied hold right side 
still single good reason precipitate action. 
Intelligence, patriotism, firm reliance 
never yet forsaken favoured land, still competent adjust 
best way present difficulty. 
 
hands, dissatisfied fellow-countrymen, mine, 
momentous issue civil war. government assail you. 
conflict without 
oath registered heaven destroy government, 
shall solemn one protect, defend it." 
 
loath close. enemies, friends. must 
enemies. Though passion may must break bonds 
affection. mystic chords memory, stretching every 
battle-field patriot grave every living heart 
broad land, yet swell chorus Union 
surely be, better angels nature. 
 
 
 
 
New York. February 18, 1861_ 
 
 
Ladies Gentlemen, speech make you, time 
speak in. appear may see you, may see 
me; willing admit, that, far ladies concerned, 
best bargain, though wish understood 
make acknowledgment concerning men. 
 
 
 
 
_From First Message Congress, Special Session. July 4, 
1861_ 
 
 
... thus seen assault upon reduction Fort Sumter 
sense matter part 
well knew garrison fort could possibility 
commit upon them. expressly 
giving bread brave men 
garrison would occasion attempted, unless 
themselves, resisting much, more. knew 
government desired keep garrison assail 
them, merely maintain visible thus preserve 
Union actual immediate 
hereinbefore stated, time, discussion, final 
assailed reduced fort precisely 
reverse drive visible authority Federal 
Union, thus force immediate 
 
object Executive well 
said inaugural address, "You conflict without 
took pains keep 
declaration good, also keep case free power 
ingenious world able misunderstand 
it.... 
 
affair Fort Sumter, surrounding circumstances, 
point reached. thereby government 
began conflict arms, without gun 
return fire, save fort sent 
years protection, still ready give 
protection whatever act, discarding else, 
forced upon country distinct issue, 
dissolution 
 
issue embraces fate United States. 
presents whole family man question whether 
constitutional republic government people 
cannot maintain territorial integrity 
domestic presents question whether 
individuals, numbers control administration according 
organic law case, upon made 
case arbitrarily without break 
government, thus practically put end free government 
upon earth. forces us "Is there, 
inherent fatal government, necessity, 
strong liberties people, weak maintain 

 
issue, choice left call war power 
government, resist force employed destruction 
force 
 
call made, response country 
unanimity spirit sanguine 
 
... people Virginia thus allowed giant insurrection 
make within government choice 
left deal finds it. less 
loyal citizens due form claimed protection. 
loyal citizens government bound recognize protect, 
Virginia. 
 
border States, fact, Middle 
favour policy call is, 
arming States prevent Union forces passing one way, 
disunion other, soil. would disunion 
speaking, would building 
impassable wall along line yet quite 
impassable one, would tie 
hands Union men, freely pass supplies among 
could open enemy. 
would take trouble hands secession, except 
proceeds external blockade. would 
things well 
give disunion without struggle own. recognizes 
fidelity Constitution, obligation maintain Union; 
many favoured doubtless loyal citizens, 
is, nevertheless, injurious effect. 
 
... forbearance government extraordinary 
long continued, lead foreign nations shape action 
supposed early destruction National Union 
this, discovery, gave Executive 
happy say sovereignty rights United States 
everywhere practically respected foreign powers, 
general sympathy country manifested throughout world. 
 
... recommended give legal means making 
contest short decisive one; place control 
government work, least four hundred thousand men, 
number men proper 
ages within regions where, willing 
sum less part money value owned 
men seem ready devote whole. 
 
... right result time, worth world 
ten times men ten times money. evidences reaching us 
country leaves doubt material work 
needs hand legislation give 
legal sanction, hand Executive give practical shape 
efficiency. One greatest government 
avoid receiving troops faster provide them. word, 
people save government, government 
part well. 
 
might seem first thought little difference whether 
present movement South called 
however, well understand difference. beginning 
knew could never raise treason respectable magnitude 
name violation law. knew people 
possessed much moral sense, much devotion law order, 
much pride reverence history government 
common country civilized patriotic people. 
knew could make advancement directly teeth 
strong noble Accordingly, commenced insidious 
public mind. invented ingenious sophism which, 
followed perfectly logical 
complete destruction Union. sophism 
State Union may consistently national 
Constitution, therefore lawfully withdraw 
Union without consent Union State. little 
disguise supposed right exercised 
cause, sole judges justice, thin 
merit notice. 
 
rebellion thus public 
mind section thirty years, length 
brought many good men take arms 
government day assemblage men enacted 
pretence taking State Union, could 
brought thing day before. 
 
sophism derives much, perhaps whole currency 
assumption sacred supremacy pertaining 
State Federal Union. States neither 
less power reserved Union 
Constitution, one ever State Union. 
original ones passed Union even cast 
British colonial new ones came Union 
directly condition excepting Texas. even Texas 
temporary independence never designated State. new ones 
took States coming Union, 
name first adopted old ones Declaration 
Independence. Therein declared "free 
independent even object plainly was, 
declare independence one another Union, directly 
contrary, mutual pledges mutual action before, 
time, afterward abundantly show. express faith 
original thirteen Articles 
Confederation two years later, Union shall perpetual, 
never States, either substance name, 
outside Union, whence 
asserting claim power lawfully destroy Union Much 
said States; word 
National Constitution, nor, believed, State 
constitutions. political sense 
Would far wrong define "a political community without 
political Tested this, one States, except Texas, 
ever sovereignty. even Texas gave character coming 
Union, act acknowledged Constitution 
United States, laws treaties United States made 
pursuance Constitution, supreme law 
land. States Union, 
legal break this, law 
revolution. Union, procured 
independence liberty. purchase, Union 
gave whatever independence liberty has. Union 
older States, and, fact, created 
States. Originally dependent colonies made Union, turn 
Union threw old dependence them, made States, 
are. one ever State constitution 
independent Union. course forgotten new 
States framed constitutions entered 
dependent upon preparatory coming 
Union. 
 
Unquestionably States powers rights reserved 
National Constitution; among these, surely, 
included conceivable powers, however mischievous 
but, most, known world time, 
governmental and, certainly, power destroy government 
never known merely 
administrative power. relative matter National power States 
rights, principle, principle 
Whatever concerns whole world confided 
General Government; whatever concerns 
State left exclusively State. 
original principle it.... position 
secession consistent lawful 
contended express law it; 
nothing ever implied law leads unjust absurd 
consequences. 
 
nation purchased money countries several 
States shall go without 
leave without nation paid large sums (in 
believe, nearly hundred relieve Florida 
shall without 
consent, without making nation debt 
money applied benefit so-called seceding States 
common creditors shall go 
remaining States pay Again, one State may 
may another; shall none left pay 
quite notify 
sage view borrowed recognize 
doctrine allowing seceders go peace, difficult see 
others choose go, extort terms upon 
promise remain. 
 
seceders insist Constitution admits 
assumed make national constitution own, which, 
necessity, either discarded retained right 
secession, insist exists ours. discarded it, 
thereby admit that, principle, ought ours. 
retained it, construction ours, show 
consistent must secede one another whenever shall 
find way settling debts, effecting 
selfish unjust object. principle one 
upon government stand. 
 
States save one assert power drive one 
Union, whole class politicians 
would deny power, denounce act greatest 
outrage upon State rights. suppose precisely act, 
instead called one called "the 
seceding others one," would exactly 
seceders claim do; indeed, make point one, 
minority, may rightfully others, 
majority, may rightfully 
 
may affirmed without free institutions 
enjoy developed powers improved condition whole 
people, beyond example world. striking 
large army government 
foot never known, without soldier 
taken place free this, 
many single regiments, whose members, one another, possess full 
practical knowledge 
whatever else, whether useful known world; 
scarcely one could selected 
President, cabinet, congress, perhaps court, abundantly 
competent administer government itself. say 
true also army late friends, adversaries 
is, much better reason government 
conferred benefits us 
broken up. Whoever section proposes abandon government, 
would well consider deference principle 
it; better likely get whether 
substitute give, intended give, much good 
people? subject. adversaries 
adopted declarations independence which, unlike good 
old one penned Jefferson, omit words, "all men created 
equal." Why? adopted temporary national constitution, 
preamble which, unlike good old one signed Washington, 
omit substitute 
sovereign independent States." Why? deliberate pressing 
view rights men authority people? 
 
essentially people's contest. side Union 
struggle maintaining world form substance 
government whose leading object condition 
lift artificial shoulders, clear paths 
laudable pursuit all, afford start fair 
chance race life. Yielding partial temporary 
necessity, leading object government 
existence 
 
happy believe plain people understand 
appreciate this. worthy note this, 
hour trial, large numbers army navy 
favoured offices resigned proved false 
hand them, one common soldier common 
known deserted flag. 
 
popular government often called experiment. Two points 
people already successful establishing 
successful administering it. One still successful 
maintenance formidable internal attempt overthrow it. 
demonstrate world fairly carry 
election also suppress rebellion; ballots rightful 
peaceful successors bullets; ballots fairly 
constitutionally decided, successful appeal back 
bullets; successful except ballots 
themselves, succeeding elections. great 
teaching men cannot take election, neither 
take war; teaching folly 
war. 
 
 
 
 
_From Message Congress Regular Session. December 3, 1861_ 
 
 
Fellow-citizens Senate House Representatives, midst 
unprecedented political cause great gratitude 
God unusual good health abundant 
 
surprised learn peculiar exigencies 
times, intercourse foreign nations attended 
profound chiefly turning upon domestic affairs. 
 
disloyal portion American people have, whole year, 
engaged attempt divide destroy Union. nation 
domestic division exposed 
one party, both, sure, sooner later, invoke 
foreign Nations thus tempted interfere always 
able resist counsels seeming expediency ungenerous 
ambition, although measures adopted influences seldom fail 
injurious unfortunate adopting them. 
 
disloyal citizens United States offered ruin 
country return aid comfort 
abroad, received less patronage encouragement 
probably expected. suppose, insurgents 
seemed assume, foreign nations case, discarding 
moral, social, treaty would act solely 
speedy restoration commerce, including especially 
acquisition cotton, nations appear yet seen 
way object directly clearly 
destruction preservation Union. could dare 
believe foreign nations actuated higher principle 
this, quite sure sound argument could made show 
reach aim readily easily aiding crush 
rebellion giving encouragement it. 
 
principal lever relied insurgents exciting foreign 
nations hostility us, already 
embarrassment commerce. nations, however, saw 
first Union made well foreign 
domestic commerce. scarcely failed perceive 
effort disunion produces existing difficulty; one 
strong nation promises durable peace 
valuable, reliable commerce nation broken 
hostile 
 
       *       *       *       *       * 
 
continues develop insurrection 
exclusively, war upon first principle popular 
rights people. Conclusive evidence found 
grave maturely considered public documents, well 
general tone insurgents. documents find 
existing right denial 
people right selection public officers, 
except boldly arguments 
prove large control people government source 
political evil. sometimes hinted at, 
possible refuge power people. 
 
present position, could scarcely justified omit 
raising warning voice approach returning despotism. 
 
needed fitting general argument made 
favour popular one point, 
others, ask brief 
attention. effort place capital equal footing with, 
above, labour, structure government. assumed 
labour available connection capital; nobody 
unless somebody else, owning capital, somehow, use 
it, induces labour. assumed, next considered whether 
best capital shall hire labourers, thus induce 
work consent, buy drive without 
consent. proceeded thus far, naturally concluded 
labourers either hired labourers, call slaves. 
further, assumed whoever hired fixed 
condition life. 
 
Now, relation capital labour assumed, 
thing free man fixed life 
condition hired assumptions false, 
inferences groundless. 
 
Labour prior independent capital. Capital fruit 
labour, could never existed labour first existed. 
Labour superior capital, deserves much higher 
consideration. Capital rights, worthy protection 
rights. denied is, probably always 
be, relation labour capital, producing mutual 
error assuming whole labour 
community exists within relation. men capital, 
avoid labour themselves, capital hire buy another 
labour them. large majority belong neither 
work others, others working them. 
Southern States, majority whole people, 
neither slaves 
majority neither Men 
sons, themselves, 
houses, shops, taking whole product themselves, 
asking capital one hand, hired labourers 
slaves other. forgotten considerable number 
persons mingle labour is, labour 
hands, also buy hire others labour them; 
mixed distinct class. principle stated 
disturbed existence mixed class. 
 
Again, already said, necessity 
thing free, hired fixed condition 
life. Many independent men, everywhere States, years back 
lives hired prudent, penniless beginner 
world wages while, saves surplus buy 
tools land himself, account another 
while, length another new beginner help him. 
generous prosperous system way all, 
gives hope all, consequent energy progress improvement 
condition all. men living worthy trusted 
toil none less inclined take touch aught 
honestly Let beware surrendering 
political power already possess, which, surrendered, 
surely used close door advancement 
they, fix new burdens upon them, till 
liberty shall lost. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter General McClellan. Washington. February 3, 1862_ 
 
 
dear Sir, distinct different plans movement 
Army 
Rappahannock across land railroad 
York River; mine move directly point railroad 
southwest 
 
give satisfactory answers following questions, 
shall gladly yield plan yours. 
 
plan involve greatly larger expenditure time 
money mine? 
 
Wherein victory certain plan mine? 
 
Wherein victory valuable plan mine? 
 
fact, would less valuable this, would 
break great line enemy's communications, mine 
 
case disaster, would retreat difficult 
plan mine? 
 
assisted Secretary War framing part despatch 
you, relating army corps, despatch course 
reached long will. 
 
wish say words privately subject. ordered 
army corps organization, unanimous opinion 
twelve generals selected assigned generals 
division, also unanimous opinion every 
could get opinion (and every modern military 
course judgment pretend 
understand subject. think indispensable know 
struggle received quarters cannot 
entirely looked upon merely effort one 
two degrade supposed 
word Sumner, commanders 
corps course three highest officers you, 
constantly told consultation communication 
consult communicate nobody General 
John Porter, perhaps General say complaints 
true just, events proper know 
existence. commanders corps orders 
anything? 
 
... strong strong enough, even 
set foot upon necks Sumner, 
practical serious question you. 
 
 
 
 
_Lincoln's Proclamation General Order setting 
Slaves free. May 19, 1862_ 
 
 
... General Hunter commander person authorized 
Government United States make proclamation declaring 
slaves State free, supposed proclamation 
question, whether genuine false, altogether void far 
respects sixth day March last, 
special Message, recommended Congress adoption joint 
resolution, substantially United 
States ought co-operate State may adopt gradual 
abolishment slavery, giving State earnest expression 
compensate public private, produced 
change 
 
resolution language quoted adopted large 
majorities branches Congress, stands 
solemn proposal nation States people 
immediately interested people 
States earnestly beseech 
make arguments yourselves. cannot, would, blind 
signs times. beg calm enlarged consideration 
them, may be, far personal partisan politics. 
proposal makes common cause common object, casting 
upon any. acts change 
contemplates would come gently heaven, 
anything. embrace it? much good 
done one effort past time providence God 
high privilege do. May vast future lament 
neglected it. 
 
 
 
 
Border States behalf Compensated Emancipation. 
July 12, 1862_ 
 
 
adjournment Congress, near, shall opportunity 
seeing several months. Believing border 
States hold power good equal number members, 
feel duty cannot justifiably make appeal 
you. 
 
speak emancipation once, decision 
emancipate Room South America colonization 
obtained numbers shall large 
enough company encouragement one another, freed people 
go. 
 
pressed difficulty yet threatens 
division among who, none strong. General Hunter 
honest man. was, hope still is, friend. valued none 
less agreeing general wish men 
everywhere could free. proclaimed men free within certain 
States, repudiated proclamation. expected good 
less harm measure could believe would follow. Yet 
it, gave dissatisfaction offence many whose 
support country cannot afford lose. end 
it. pressure direction still upon me, 
ask, relieve me, and, much more, 
relieve country, important point. 
 
Upon considerations attention 
message March last. leaving Capitol, consider discuss 
among yourselves. patriots statesmen, such, pray 
you, consider proposition, least commend 
consideration States people. would perpetuate popular 
government best people world, beseech 
wise omit this. common country great demanding 
views action bring speedy relief. 
form government saved world, beloved 
history cherished memories happy future 
fully assured rendered 
 
intend complaint assure that, opinion, 
voted resolution 
message last March, war would substantially 
plan therein proposed yet one swift means 
ending it. Let States rebellion see, definitely 
certainly, event States represent ever join 
proposed confederacy, cannot much longer maintain 
contest. cannot hope ultimately 
them, long show determination perpetuate 
institution within States. Beat elections, 
done, and, nothing still claim 
own. know lever power is. Break lever 
shake ever. 
 
treated kindness consideration, trust 
think touch exclusively own, 
when, sake whole country, ask, you, 
States, better take course Discarding 
maxims adapted times, looking 
stern facts case, better 
possible prefer constitutional relation 
States nation shall practically restored without disturbance 
institution; done, whole duty 
respect, Constitution oath office, would 
performed. done, trying accomplish 
war. incidents war cannot avoided. war continues 
long, must object sooner institution 
States mere 
mere incidents war. gone, 
nothing valuable lieu it. Much value gone 
much better people take step 
war secures substantial compensation 
sure wholly lost much better thus save 
money else sink ever much better 
can, lest war ere long render us unable 
it! much better nation 
sell buy without war could never been, 
sink thing sold price cutting 
one another's 
 
 
 
 
_From Letter Cuthbert July 28, 1862_ 
 
 
Now, think true remedy different suggested 
Mr. lie rough war, 
removing necessity war. people Louisiana wish 
protection person property, reach forth hands 
take it. Let good faith national authority, 
set State government conforming thereto Constitution. 
know it, protection army 
it. army withdrawn soon government 
dispense presence, people State then, upon 
old constitutional terms, govern 
simple easy. 
 
this, prefer hazard sake 
destroying government, consider whether 
probable surrender government save losing 
all. decline suggest, scarcely need ask 
do. 
 
would Would drop war is, 
would prosecute future charged 
Would deal blows rather Would 
give contest, leaving available means 
 
shall can; shall 
save government, sworn duty well 
personal shall nothing deal 
vast malicious 
 
 
 
 
_Letter August July 31, 1862_ 
 
 
Dear Sir, send Mr. extract letter written New 
Orleans 9th instant, shown me. give 
plainly man ability, probably 
note. says: "The time arrived Mr. Lincoln must take 
decisive course. Trying please satisfy 
policy matters importance 
time, ever, honest men love country rally 
support. North say officially wishes 
restoration Union 
 
so, seems, point writer thinks 
policy. read understand 
 
substance declaration desires inaugural, 
two regular messages Congress, many, all, 
minor documents issued Executive since 
 
Broken eggs cannot Louisiana nothing 
take place Union was, already broken 
sooner so, smaller amount 
past government cannot much longer play game 
all, enemies stake nothing. enemies must 
understand cannot experiment ten years trying destroy 
government, fail still come back Union 
expect ever Union was, 
join writer saying, "Now time." 
 
much better would writer gone this, 
protection army New Orleans, sat 
writing complaining letters 
 
 
 
 
Letter Horace Greeley. August 22, 1862_ 
 
 
read 19th instant, addressed 
York 
 
statements assumptions fact may know 
erroneous, them. 
 
inferences may believe 
drawn, argue them. 
 
impatient dictatorial tone, waive 
it, deference old friend whose heart always supposed 
right. 
 
policy say, meant 
leave one doubt. would save Union. would save 
shortest way Constitution. 
 
sooner national authority restored, nearer Union 
Union was. 
 
would save Union unless could 
time save slavery, agree them. 
 
would save Union unless could 
time destroy slavery, agree them. 
 
paramount object struggle save Union, 
either save destroy 
 
could save Union without freeing slave, would it; 
could save freeing slaves, would it; could 
save freeing leaving others alone, would also that. 
 
slavery coloured race, believe 
helps save Union; forbear 
believe would help save Union. 
 
shall less whenever shall believe hurts 
cause; shall whenever shall believe help 
cause. 
 
shall try correct errors shown shall 
adopt new views fast shall appear true views. 
 
stated purpose according views official duty, 
intend modification personal wish 
men everywhere could free. 
 
 
 
 
_From Reply Chicago Committee United Religious 
September 13, 1862_ 
 
 
subject presented memorial one upon thought 
much weeks past, may even say months. approached 
opposite opinions advice, religious men, 
equally certain represent Divine will. sure 
either one class mistaken belief, 
perhaps, respects, both. hope 
say, probable God would reveal others, 
point connected duty, might supposed would 
reveal directly me; for, unless deceived 
often am, earnest desire know Providence 
matter. learn is, it. not, 
however, days suppose granted 
expect direct must study plain, physical 
facts case, ascertain possible, learn appears 
wise right. 
 
subject good men instance, four 
gentlemen standing intelligence, New York, called 
delegation business connected war; two 
earnestly proclaim general emancipation, upon 
two attacked them. also know last 
session Congress decided majority anti-slavery men, yet 
could unite policy. true religious 
people. 
 
rebel soldiers great deal 
fear, troops, expecting God favour 
one soldiers taken prisoner told Senator 
days since met nothing discouraging evident 
sincerity among talk 
merits case. 
 
good would proclamation emancipation do, especially 
want issue document whole 
world see must necessarily like bull 
Would word free slaves, cannot even 
enforce Constitution rebel States? single court 
magistrate individual would influenced there? 
 
reason think would greater effect upon 
slaves late law Congress, approved, 
offers protection freedom slaves rebel masters come 
within Yet cannot learn law caused single 
slave come us. suppose could induced 
proclamation freedom throw upon us, 
them? feed care General 
Butler wrote days since issuing rations 
slaves rushed white troops 
command. eat, all; though true General Butler 
whites also thousand, nearly amounts 
there. now, pressure war call forces 
New Orleans defend point, prevent 
masters blacks slavery again? told 
whenever rebels take black prisoners, free slave, 
immediately took 
boat Tennessee River days ago. 
attacked it. instance, when, late 
battles near Bull Run, expedition went Washington 
flag bury dead bring wounded, 
rebels seized blacks went along help, sent 
slavery, Horace Greeley said paper "that government would 
probably nothing it." could do? 
 
Now, then, tell me, please, possible result good would 
follow issuing proclamation Understand, 
raise objections legal constitutional grounds, for, 
commander-in-chief army navy, time war suppose 
right take measures may best enemy; 
urge objections moral nature, view possible consequences 
insurrection massacre South. view matter 
practical decided according advantages 
may offer suppression rebellion. 
 
[The committee said emancipation would secure us sympathy 
world, slavery cause war. President 

 
admit slavery root rebellion, least 
ambition politicians may 
act, would without slavery 
instrument. also concede emancipation would help us 
Europe, convince something 
ambition. grant further, would help somewhat North, 
though much, fear, represent, imagine. 
Still, additional strength would added way 
then, would weaken rebels drawing 
labourers, great sure 
could much blacks. arm them, fear 
weeks arms would hands 
indeed, thus far, arms enough white troops. 
mention another thing, though meet 
fifty thousand Union armies 
border slave States. would serious matter if, consequence 
proclamation desire, go 
think many indeed, year ago, 
six months ago; many to-day yesterday. Every day increases 
Union feeling. also getting pride 
want beat Let say one thing think 
admit already important principle rally unite 
people, fact constitutional government 
fundamental idea, going deep anything. 
 
misunderstand mentioned 
indicate difficulties thus far prevented action 
way desire. decided proclamation 
liberty slaves, hold matter 
assure subject mind day night, 
other. Whatever shall appear God's will, do. trust 
freedom views, 
respect injured feelings. 
 
 
 
 
 
_From Annual Message Congress. December 1, 1862_ 
 
 
Since last annual another year health 
harvests passed; pleased Almighty bless 
us return peace, press on, guided best light 
gives us, trusting good time wise way, 
yet well. 
 
touching foreign affairs, taken place 
last year, herewith submitted, compliance 
request effect made House Representatives near 
close last session Congress. 
 
condition relations nations less gratifying 
usually former certainly 
satisfactory nation distracted are, might 
reasonably month June last, 
grounds expect maritime powers, which, beginning 
domestic difficulties, think, 
recognized insurgents would soon 
position, proved less injurious 
country. temporary afterward 
national arms, exaggerated disloyal citizens 
abroad, hitherto delayed act simple justice. 
 
Civil War, radically changed moment 
habits American people, necessarily disturbed 
social condition affected deeply prosperity 
nations carried commerce steadily 
increasing throughout period half century. has, 
time, excited political apprehensions produced 
profound agitation throughout civilized world. unusual 
agitation forborne taking part controversy 
foreign States, parties States. 
attempted acknowledged revolution. 
left every nation exclusive conduct management 
affairs. struggle been, course, contemplated foreign 
nations reference less merits supposed 
often exaggerated effects consequences resulting nations 
themselves. Nevertheless, complaint part government, even 
just, would certainly 
 
line, straight suitable national boundary, 
upon Trace east west upon line 
free slave country, shall find little 
one-third length rivers, easy 
populated, soon populated, upon 
nearly remaining length merely lines, 
people may walk back forth without consciousness 
presence. part line made difficult 
writing paper national boundary. 
fact separation, comes, gives up, part seceding 
section, fugitive-slave along constitutional 
obligations upon section seceded from, expect 
treaty stipulation would ever made take place. 
 
another difficulty. great interior region bounded east 
north British west Rocky 
Mountains, south line along culture corn 
cotton ... already ten millions people, 
fifty millions within fifty years, prevented 
political folly mistake. contains one-third 
country owned United one million 
square miles. half populous Massachusetts already is, 
would seventy-five millions people. glance 
map shows that, speaking, great body 
republic. parts marginal borders it, 
magnificent region sloping west Rocky Mountains Pacific 
also resources. 
production provisions, proceed 
them, great interior region naturally one 
important world. Ascertain statistics small 
proportion region has, yet, brought 
also large rapidly increasing amount 
products, shall overwhelmed magnitude prospect 
presented. yet region ocean 
anywhere. part one nation, people find, may ever 
find, way Europe New York, South America Africa 
New Orleans, San separate common 
country two nations, designed present rebellion, 
every man great interior region thereby cut one 
perhaps physical 
embarrassing trade regulations. 
 
true, wherever dividing boundary line may fixed. 
Place free slave country, place south 
Kentucky, north Ohio, still truth remains none south 
trade port place north it, except upon terms 
dictated government foreign them. outlets, east, west, 
south, indispensable well-being people 
vast interior region. three may 
best, proper question. better 
right belong people successors ever. True 
themselves, ask line separation shall be, 
rather shall line. marginal 
regions less interested communications 
great outside world. too, them, must access 
Egypt west, without paying crossing 
national boundary. 
 
national strife springs permanent part, 
land national possible 
would multiply mitigate evils among us. 
adaptations demands union abhors 
fact, would ere long force reunion, however much 
blood treasure separation might 
 
Fellow-citizens, cannot escape history. Congress 
Administration remembered spite ourselves. personal 
significance insignificance spare one another us. 
trial pass light us down, honour 
latest generation. say Union. world 
forget say this. know save Union. world 
knows know save it. 
 
We, even here, hold power bear responsibility. giving 
freedom slave, assure freedom alike 
give shall nobly save meanly lose 
last, best hope earth. means may succeed; could 
fail. way plain, peaceful, generous, way which, 
followed, world ever God must ever 
 
 
 
 
Proclamation. January 1, 1863_ 
 
 
Whereas, twenty-second day September, year Lord 
one thousand eight hundred sixty-two, proclamation issued 
President United States, among things, 
following, wit: 
 
"That first day January, year Lord one thousand 
eight hundred sixty-three, persons held slaves within 
State, designated part State, people whereof shall 
rebellion United States, shall then, thenceforward, 
ever free; Executive Government United States, 
including military naval authority thereof, recognize 
maintain freedom persons, act acts 
repress persons, them, efforts may make 
actual freedom. 
 
"That Executive will, first day January aforesaid, 
proclamation, designate States parts States, any, 
people thereof respectively shall rebellion 
United States; fact State, people thereof, shall 
day good faith represented Congress United 
States members chosen thereto elections wherein majority 
qualified voters State shall shall 
absence strong testimony deemed conclusive evidence 
State people thereof rebellion 
United States." 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
virtue power vested commander-in-chief army 
navy United States, time actual armed rebellion 
authority government United States, fit 
necessary war measure suppressing said rebellion, do, first 
day January, year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
sixty-three, accordance purpose do, publicly 
proclaimed full period one hundred days day first 
mentioned, order designate States parts States 
wherein people thereof, respectively, day rebellion 
United States, following, wit: 
 
Arkansas, Texas, Louisiana (except St. 
Jefferson, St. John, St. St. James, 
Assumption, St. Mary, St. Orleans, 
including city New Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, 
Georgia, South Carolina, North Carolina, Virginia (except 
forty-eight counties designated West Virginia, also counties 
Elizabeth City, York, Anne, 
Norfolk, including cities Norfolk 
excepted parts present left precisely 
proclamation issued. 
 
virtue power purpose aforesaid, order 
declare persons held slaves within said designated States 
parts States are, shall be, free; 
Executive Government United States, including military 
naval authorities thereof, recognize maintain freedom 
said persons. 
 
hereby enjoin upon people declared free abstain 
violence, unless necessary recommend 
that, cases labour faithfully 
reasonable 
 
declare make known persons suitable 
condition received armed service United States 
garrison forts, positions, stations, places, man 
vessels sorts said service. 
 
upon act, sincerely believed act justice, warranted 
Constitution upon military necessity, invoke considerate 
judgment mankind gracious favour Almighty God. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 

 
Done city Washington, first day January, year 
Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-three, 
independence United States America eighty-seventh. 
 
     ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
     President: 
       WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
         Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter General Grant. July 13, 1863_ 
 
 
dear General, remember ever met personally. 
write grateful acknowledgment almost inestimable 
service done country. wish say word further. 
first reached vicinity Vicksburg, thought 
finally troops across neck, run 
batteries thus go never 
faith, except general hope knew better I, 
Pass expedition like could succeed. got took 
Port Grand thought go 
river join General Banks, turned east 
Big Black, feared mistake. wish make personal 
acknowledgment right wrong. 
 
     truly, 
       A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter ---- Washington. July 31, 1863_ 
 
dear Sir, good deal complaint 
superior officers Department, 
removal strongly urged ground 
orders neglect Firmly am, 
patriotism motives, unwilling anything 
case may seem unnecessarily harsh variance feelings 
personal respect esteem always regarded you. 
consider services district valuable, sorry 
lose them. unnecessary state, however, 
differences opinion arise officers government, 
officer must obeyed. course recognize clearly 
importance hope conclude go 
present position regulations department. wish 
would write me. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Mrs. Lincoln. Washington. August 8, 1863_ 
 
 
dear Wife, well usual, particular trouble anyway. 
put money Treasury five per privilege 
withdrawing time upon thirty days' notice. suppose glad 
learn this. Tell dear Tad poor lost, Mrs. 
Cuthbert distress it. day left 
found resting little middle 
she's kept complaining 
destroyed flowers, till concluded bring 
White House. done, second day disappeared 
heard since. last know poor 
 
 
 
 
_Letter James H. Washington. August 17, 1863_ 
 
 
dear Sir, Months ago acknowledged receipt 
book accompanying kind beg pardon 
done so. 
 
one age seen little first 
presentation ever saw here, last winter 
Perhaps best compliment pay say, truly can, 
anxious see again. plays 
never others gone perhaps frequently 
Among latter 
especially think nothing 
equals wonderful. 
 
Unlike gentlemen profession, think 
commencing "Oh, offence commencing 
"To be." pardon small attempt 
like hear pronounce opening speech Richard III. 
soon visit Washington again? do, please call let 
make personal acquaintance. 
 
 
 
 
Secretary Stanton. Washington. November 11, 1863_ 
 
 
Dear Sir, personally wish Jacob New Jersey, appointed 
Colonel coloured regiment, regardless whether 
tell exact shade Julius hair. 
 
 
 
 
_The Letter James C. Conkling. August 26, 1863_ 
 
 
letter inviting attend mass meeting unconditional Union 
men, held capital Illinois third day 
September, received. would agreeable thus 
meet old friends home, cannot absent 
long visit would require. 
 
meeting maintain unconditional devotion 
Union; sure old political friends thank 
do, nation's gratitude noble men 
partisan malice partisan hope make false nation's 
life. 
 
dissatisfied me. would say: 
desire peace, blame it. 
attain it? three conceivable ways. First, suppress 
rebellion force arms. trying do. it? 
are, far agreed. it, second way 
give Union. this. it? are, 
say force, yet 
remains imaginable compromise. 
believe compromise embracing maintenance Union 
possible. learn leads directly opposite belief. strength 
rebellion military, army. army 
country people within range. offer terms made 
man men within opposition army, simply 
nothing present, man men power whatever 
enforce side compromise, one made them. 
 
Suppose South peace men 
North get together convention, frame proclaim compromise 
embracing restoration Union. way compromise 
used keep Lee's army Meade's army keep Lee's 
Pennsylvania, and, think, ultimately drive 
existence. paper compromise, Lee's 
army affect army. effort 
compromise waste time enemy would improve 
would all. compromise, must 
made either control rebel army, people 
first liberated army success 
army. Now, allow assure word intimation 
rebel army, men controlling it, relation 
peace compromise, ever come knowledge belief. 
charges insinuations contrary groundless. 
promise proposition shall hereafter come, 
shall rejected kept secret you. freely acknowledge 
servant people, according bond 
United States that, such, responsible 
them. 
 
plain. dissatisfied negro. Quite 
likely difference opinion upon 
subject. certainly wish men could free, suppose 
not. Yet neither adopted proposed measure 
consistent even views, provided Union. 
suggested compensated emancipation, replied, wished 
taxed buy negroes. asked taxed 
buy negroes, except way save greater taxation 
save Union exclusively means. 
 
dislike Emancipation Proclamation, perhaps would 
say unconstitutional. think differently. think 
Constitution commander-in-chief law war 
time war. slaves 
property. there, ever been, question that, law 
war, property, enemies friends, may taken 
needed whenever taking helps us hurts enemy? 
Armies world destroy property cannot use it, 
even destroy keep enemy. Civilized 
power help hurt enemy, 
except things regarded Among exceptions 
massacre male 
 
proclamation, law, either valid valid. 
valid, needs valid, cannot 
dead brought life. 
profess think retraction would operate Union. 
better retraction issue? 
year half trial suppress rebellion 
proclamation last one hundred days passed 
explicit notice coming, unless averted revolt 
returning war certainly 
us since issue proclamation before. know, 
fully one know opinions others, 
commanders armies field given us 
important successes, believe emancipation policy use 
coloured troops constitute heaviest blow yet dealt rebellion, 
least one important successes could 
achieved aid black soldiers. Among 
commanders holding views never 
called Republican party politics, 
hold purely military opinions. submit opinions 
entitled weight objections often 
emancipation arming blacks unwise military measures, 
adopted good faith. 
 
say fight free negroes. seem willing 
fight you; matter. Fight you, then, exclusively save 
Union. issued proclamation purpose aid saving 
Union. Whenever shall conquered resistance Union, 
shall urge continue fighting, apt time 
declare fight free negroes. 
 
thought struggle Union, whatever extent 
negroes cease helping enemy, extent 
enemy resistance you. think thought 
whatever negroes could got soldiers leaves much less 
white soldiers saving Union. appear otherwise 
you? negroes, like people, act upon 
anything us, nothing them? stake 
lives us, must prompted strongest even 
promise freedom. promise made, must 
 
signs look better. Father Waters goes 
Thanks great Northwest it. yet wholly them. Three 
hundred miles met New England, Jersey 
way right left. South, too, 
one, also hand. spot, part history 
black white. job great national one, 
let none bore part it. 
cleared great river may well proud, even all. 
hard say anything bravely well done 
Gettysburg, many fields lesser note. 
must Uncle forgotten. 
present. deep sea, broad bay, 
rapid river, also wherever 
ground little made Thanks 
great Republic, principle lives keeps 
man's vast all. 
 
Peace appear distant did. hope come soon, 
come come worth keeping future 
time. proved among freemen 
successful appeal ballot take 
appeal sure lose case pay cost. 
black men remember silent tongue, 
teeth, steady eye, bayonet, 
helped mankind great fear 
white ones unable forget heart 
speech hinder it. 
 
Still, let us final triumph. Let us 
quite Let us diligently apply means, never doubting 
God, good time, give us rightful result. 
 
 
 
 
Proclamation Day October 3, 1863_ 
 
 
year drawing toward close filled 
blessings fruitful fields healthful 
constantly enjoyed forget source 
come, others added, 
extraordinary nature cannot fail penetrate 
heart habitually providence 
Almighty God. 
 
midst civil war magnitude 
sometimes seemed foreign States invite 
peace preserved nations, order 
maintained, laws respected harmony 
prevailed everywhere, except theatre military 
theatre greatly contracted advancing armies 
Union. 
 
Needful wealth strength fields peaceful 
industry national defence arrested 
axe enlarged borders 
mines, well iron coal precious 
yielded even abundantly heretofore. Population 
steadily notwithstanding waste made 
camp, country, rejoicing 
consciousness augmented strength permitted 
expect continuance years large increase freedom. 
 
human counsel hath hath mortal hand worked 
great things. gracious gifts High God, who, 
dealing us anger sins, hath nevertheless 
remembered 
 
seemed fit proper 
gratefully acknowledged one heart one voice 
whole American people. do, therefore, 
fellow-citizens every part United States, also 
sea, foreign lands, set apart 
observe last Thursday November next day thanksgiving 
praise beneficent Father 
recommend offering justly due 
singular also, 
humble national commend 
tender care become widows, orphans, 
civil strife 
engaged, fervently implore interposition Almighty Hand 
wounds nation, restore it, soon may 
consistent Divine purposes, full enjoyment peace, 
harmony, union. 
 
 
 
 
National 
November 19, 1863_ 
 
 
seven years ago fathers brought forth upon 
continent new nation, conceived liberty, dedicated 
proposition men created equal. 
 
engaged great civil war, testing whether nation, 
nation conceived long endure. met 
great battle-field war. come portion 
field final gave lives 
nation might live. altogether fitting proper 
this. 
 
larger sense cannot cannot 
cannot ground. brave men, living dead, struggled 
here, consecrated far power add 
world little note long remember say here, 
never forget here. us, living, rather, 
dedicated unfinished work fought 
thus far nobly advanced. rather us dedicated 
great task remaining us; dead 
take increased devotion cause gave last full 
measure highly resolve dead shall 
died nation, God, shall new 
birth government people, people, 
people, shall perish earth. 
 
 
 
 
_From Annual Message Congress. December 8, 1863_ 
 
 
... Congress assembled year ago, war already lasted 
nearly twenty months, many land 
sea, varying results. rebellion pressed back 
reduced limits; yet tone public feeling opinion home 
abroad satisfactory. popular elections 
past indicated uneasiness among while, amid much 
cold kindest words coming Europe 
uttered accents pity blind surrender 
hopeless cause. commerce suffering greatly vessels 
built upon furnished foreign threatened 
additions quarter would sweep trade 
raise blockade. failed European 
governments anything hopeful upon subject. preliminary 
Emancipation Proclamation, issued September, running assigned 
period beginning new year. month later final 
proclamation came, including announcement coloured men 
suitable condition would received war service. policy 
emancipation employing black soldiers gave future new 
hope fear doubt contended uncertain 
conflict. According political system, matter civil 
administration, general government lawful power effect 
emancipation State, long time hoped 
rebellion could suppressed without military 
measure. deemed possible necessity 
might come that, should, crisis contest would 
presented. came, and, followed dark 
doubtful days. Eleven months passed, permitted take 
another rebel borders pressed still farther back, 
complete opening Mississippi, country 
rebellion divided distinct parts, practical 
communication them. Tennessee Arkansas 
substantially cleared insurgent control, influential citizens 
each, owners slaves advocates slavery beginning 
rebellion, declare openly emancipation respective 
States. States included Emancipation Proclamation, 
Maryland Missouri, neither three years ago would tolerate 
restraint upon extension slavery new Territories, 
dispute best mode removing within limits. 
 
slaves beginning rebellion, full one 
hundred thousand United States military service, 
one-half number actually bear arms thus giving 
double advantage taking much labour insurgent cause 
supplying places otherwise must filled many 
white men. far tested, difficult say good 
soldiers any. insurrection tendency violence 
cruelty marked measures emancipation arming blacks. 
measures much discussed foreign countries, 
contemporary discussion tone public sentiment 
much improved. home measures fully discussed, 
annual elections following 
highly encouraging whose official duty bear 
country great trial. Thus new 
crisis threatened divide friends Union passed. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Secretary Stanton. Washington. March 1, 1864_ 
 
 
dear Sir, poor name son army, 
offence sentenced serve long time without 
pay, little pay. like punishment 
withholding falls hard upon poor 
serving way several months, appeal 
poor mother, made direction allowed 
new term, condition others. comes, says 
cannot get acted upon. Please it. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Governor Michael Washington. March 13, 1864_ 
 
 
dear Sir, congratulate fixed name history 
first free-State governor Louisiana. 
convention, which, among things, probably define elective 
barely suggest private consideration, whether 
coloured people may let instance, 
intelligent, especially fought 
ranks. would probably help, trying time come, keep 
liberty within family freedom. 
suggestion, public, alone. 
 
 
 
 
Address Fair Sanitary March 18, 1864_ 
 
 
appear say word. extraordinary war 
engaged falls heavily upon classes people, heavily 
upon soldier. said, "all man hath 
give contribute substance, 
soldier puts life often yields country's 
cause. _The highest then, due 
 
extraordinary war extraordinary developments manifested 
themselves, seen former amongst 
manifestations nothing remarkable 
relief suffering soldiers chief agents 
women America. 
 
accustomed language never studied 
art paying must say, 
said orators since creation world praise 
women applied women America, would 
justice conduct war. close saying, God 
bless women 
 
 
 
 
_Letter Kentucky. April 4, 1864_ 
 
 
naturally slavery wrong, nothing wrong. 
cannot remember think feel, yet never 
understood Presidency conferred upon right 
act officially upon judgment feeling. oath 
would, best ability, protect, 
defend Constitution United States. could take 
office without taking oath. view might take 
oath get power, break oath using power. understood, 
too, ordinary civil administration oath even forbade 
practically indulge primary abstract judgment moral question 
slavery. publicly declared many times many ways. 
aver that, day, done official act mere 
deference abstract feeling judgment slavery. 
understand, however, oath preserve Constitution 
best ability imposed upon duty every 
indispensable means, 
Constitution organic law. possible lose nation 
yet preserve Constitution? general law, life limb must 
yet often limb must save life; life 
never wisely given save felt measures, otherwise 
unconstitutional, might become lawful becoming indispensable 
preservation Constitution preservation nation. 
Right wrong, assumed avow it. could feel 
that, best ability, even tried preserve 
Constitution, if, save slavery minor matter, permit 
wreck government, country, Constitution, together. When, 
early war, General Fremont attempted military emancipation, 
forbade it, think indispensable necessity. 
When, little later, General Cameron, Secretary War, suggested 
arming blacks, think 
indispensable necessity. When, still later, General Hunter attempted 
military emancipation, forbade it, yet think 
indispensable necessity come. When, March May July, 
1862, made earnest successive appeals border States 
favour compensated emancipation, believed indispensable necessity 
military emancipation arming blacks would come, unless 
averted measure. declined proposition, was, 
best judgment, driven alternative either surrendering 
Union, Constitution, laying strong hand upon 
coloured element. chose latter. choosing it, hoped 
greater gain entirely 
year trial shows loss foreign relations, 
none home popular sentiment, none white military 
loss anywhere. contrary, shows 
gain quite one hundred thirty thousand soldiers, seamen, 
palpable facts, which, facts, 
men, could without 
measure. 
 
let Union man complains measure, test 
writing one line rebellion force 
next, taking hundred thirty 
thousand men Union side, placing would 
measure cannot face case stated, 
cannot face truth. 
 
add word verbal conversation. telling 
attempt compliment claim 
controlled events, confess plainly events controlled me. 
Now, end three years' struggle, nation's condition 
either party, man, devised expected. God alone claim 
it. Whither tending seems plain. God wills removal 
great wrong, wills also North, well 
South, shall pay fairly wrong, impartial 
history find therein new cause justice 
goodness God. 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Sanitary Fair Baltimore. April 18, 1864_ 
 
 
... world never good definition word 
American people, now, much want one. declare 
liberty; using word, mean 
thing. some, word may mean man 
pleases product others, 
word may mean men please men 
product men's labour. two, different, 
incompatible things, called 
follows things is, respective parties, called 
two different incompatible 
 
shepherd drives wolf throat, 
sheep thanks shepherd wolf denounces 
act liberty, especially sheep 
black one. Plainly, sheep wolf agreed upon 
definition word precisely difference 
prevails to-day, among us human even North, 
love liberty. Hence behold process 
thousands daily passing bondage hailed 
advance liberty, others 
destruction liberty. Recently, seems, people 
Maryland something define liberty, thanks 
that, done, dictionary 
 
 
 
 
_Letter General Grant. April 30, 1864_ 
 
 
expecting see spring campaign wish 
express way entire satisfaction done 
time, far understand it. particulars plans 
neither know seek know. and, 
pleased this, wish restraints 
upon you. anxious great disaster capture 
men great numbers shall know points less 
likely escape attention would mine. 
anything wanting within power give, fail let 
know it. now, brave army cause, may God sustain 
you. 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Ohio August 22, 1864_ 
 
 
almost always feel happen say anything 
soldiers, impress upon them, brief remarks, importance 
success contest. merely to-day, 
time come, perpetuate children's children 
great free government enjoyed lives. beg 
remember this, merely sake, yours. 
temporarily, occupy White House. living witness 
one children may look come father's child has. 
order one may have, free government 
open field fair chance 
industry, enterprise, may equal 
privileges race life, desirable human 
struggle maintained, 
may lose one, two three 
years. nation worth fighting for, secure inestimable 

 
 
 
 
November 10, 1864_ 
 
 
long grave question whether government strong 
liberties people, strong enough maintain 
existence great point present rebellion 
brought Republic severe presidential election, 
occurring regular course rebellion, added little 

 
loyal people united put utmost strength 
rebellion, must fail divided partially 
political war among election necessity. 
cannot free government without rebellion 
could force us forego postpone national election, might 
fairly claim already conquered us. strife 
election human nature practically applied facts 
case. occurred case must ever occur similar cases. 
Human nature change. future great national trial, 
compared men this, shall weak strong, 
silly wise, bad good. Let us, therefore, study 
incidents philosophy learn wisdom from, none 
wrongs election, along incidental 
strife, done good too. demonstrated 
people's government sustain national election midst 
great civil war. Gold good place, living, brave, patriotic 
men better gold. 
 
rebellion election over, may 
common interest common effort save 
common country? part, shall strive 
avoid placing way. long here, 
willingly planted thorn man's deeply 
sensible high compliment duly grateful 
trust Almighty God directed countrymen right 
conclusion, think, good, adds nothing 
satisfaction man may disappointed pained 
result. 
 
May ask differed me, join 
spirit towards let close asking three 
hearty cheers brave soldiers seamen, gallant 
skilful commanders. 
 
 
 
 
_A Letter Mrs. November 21, 1864_ 
 
 
Dear shown War Department 
statement Adjutant-General Massachusetts 
mother five sons died gloriously field battle. 
feel weak fruitless must words mine 
attempt grief loss 
cannot refrain tendering consolation may found 
thanks Republic died pray 
heavenly Father may leave 
cherished memory loved lost, solemn 
pride must laid sacrifice upon 
freedom. 
 
     sincerely respectfully, 
       ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
_Letter General Grant. Washington. January 19, 
 
 
Please read answer letter though President, 
friend. son, twenty-second year, 
wishes see something war 
wish put ranks, yet give commission, 
already served long better better 
qualified hold. Could he, without embarrassment detriment 
service, go military family nominal I, 
public, furnishing necessary no, say 
without least anxious deeply 
interested shall yourself. 
 
 
 
 
_The Second Inaugural Address. March 4, 
 
 
Fellow-countrymen, second appearance take oath 
Presidential office, less occasion extended address 
first. statement, somewhat detail, 
course pursued, seemed fitting proper. Now, expiration 
four years, public declarations constantly 
called forth every point phase great contest still 
absorbs attention energies nation, little 
new could presented. progress arms, upon 
else chiefly depends, well known public myself; 
is, trust, reasonably satisfactory encouraging all. 
high hope future, prediction regard 
 
occasion corresponding four years ago, thoughts 
anxiously directed impending civil war. dreaded 
sought avert it. inaugural address delivered 
place, devoted altogether saving Union without war, 
insurgent agents city seeking destroy without 
dissolve Union, divide effects, 
parties deprecated war; one would make war rather 
let nation would accept war rather let 
war came. 
 
whole population coloured slaves, distributed 
generally Union, southern part it. 
slaves constituted peculiar powerful interest. knew 
interest was, somehow, cause war. 
extend interest object 
insurgents would rend Union, even war; government 
claimed right restrict territorial enlargement 
it.... 
 
malice toward charity all; firmness 
right, God gives us see us strive finish 
work bind nation's care 
shall borne battle, widow 
may achieve cherish lasting peace among ourselves, 
nations. 
 
 
 
 
_A Letter Thurlow Executive Mansion, Washington. March 15, 

 
 
Dear Mr. Every one Thank 
little speech recent inaugural address. expect 
latter wear well better 
believe immediately Men 
flattered shown difference purpose 
Almighty them. deny it, however, case, 
deny God world. truth 
thought needed told, and, whatever humiliation 
falls directly myself, thought others might afford 
tell it. 
 
     Truly yours, 
       A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
_From Address Indiana March 17, 
 
 
aspects great war already 
expressed views speaking writing. recent 
effort "Our sometimes called, employ 
slaves armies. great question been, "Will 
negro fight them?" ought know better we, doubtless 
know better may 
life heard many words meant pass 
show negro ought 
shall really fight keep slave, far better 
argument remain slave ever heard. He, 
perhaps, ought slave desires ardently enough fight 
it. Or, one four will, freedom fight keep 
three slavery, ought slave selfish 
always thought men free; 
slaves, first desire themselves, 
desire others. Whenever hear one 
arguing slavery, feel strong impulse see tried 
personally. 
 
 
 
 
_From Reply Lincoln's Last Public Address. April 11, 

 
 
Fellow-citizens, meet evening, sorrow gladness 
heart. evacuation Richmond surrender 
principal insurgent army, give hope speedy peace, 
joyous expression cannot 
however, blessings flow must forgotten. call 
national thanksgiving course 
duly must whose harder part give us cause 
rejoicing overlooked. must 
others. I, myself, near front, high pleasure 
much good news you; part honour 
plan execution mine. General Grant, skilful officers 
brave men, gallant navy stood ready, 
reach take active part. 
 
recent successes national 
large share thought 
first, pressed much closely upon attention. 
great difficulty. Unlike case war independent 
nations, organized organ us treat one man 
authority give rebellion man. simply must 
begin mould elements. 
small additional embarrassment we, loyal people, differ 
among manner, measure reconstruction. 
general rule abstain reading reports attacks upon 
myself, wishing provoked cannot properly 
offer answer. spite however, comes 
knowledge much supposed agency setting 
seeking sustain new State government Louisiana. 
 
done much as, than, public knows. 
annual message December 1863, accompanying 
proclamation, presented plan reconstruction, phrase goes, 
promised, adopted State, acceptable 
sustained executive government nation. distinctly stated 
plan might possibly 
also distinctly protested executive claimed right say 
whether members admitted seats Congress 
States. plan advance submitted Cabinet, 
approved every member it.... 
 
message 1863, plan mentioned, reached New 
Orleans, General Banks wrote confident people, 
military would reconstruct substantially 
plan. wrote try it. tried it, 
result known. agency getting 
Louisiana government. sustaining it, promise out, 
stated. bad promises better broken shall treat 
bad promise break it, whenever shall convinced 
keeping adverse public interest; yet 
shown letter subject, supposed 
able one, writer expresses regret mind 
seemed definitely fixed upon question whether seceded 
States, called, Union it. would perhaps add 
astonishment regret learn since found 
professed Union men answer question, 
purposely forborne public expression upon it.... 
 
agree seceded States, called, proper 
practical relation Union, sole object 
government, civil military, regard States, 
get proper practical relation. believe 
possible, fact without deciding even 
considering whether States ever Union, 
it. Finding safely home, would utterly 
immaterial whether ever abroad. Let us join 
acts necessary restoring proper practical relations 
States Union, ever indulge 
opinion whether acts brought States 
without Union, gave proper assistance, never 
it. amount speak, 
new Louisiana government would satisfactory 
contained forty thousand, thirty thousand, even twenty 
thousand, instead twelve thousand does. also 
unsatisfactory elective franchise given 
coloured man. would prefer conferred 
intelligent, serve cause soldiers. 
 
Still, question whether Louisiana government, 
stands, quite question is, 
wiser take help improve it, reject 
disperse it? Louisiana brought proper practical relation 
Union sooner sustaining discarding new State 
government? twelve thousand voters heretofore slave State 
Louisiana sworn allegiance Union, assumed rightful 
political power State, held elections, organized State 
government, adopted free-State constitution, giving benefit 
public schools equally black white, 
legislature confer elective franchise upon coloured man. 
legislature already voted ratify constitutional 
amendment recently passed Congress, abolishing slavery throughout 
nation. twelve thousand persons thus fully committed 
Union perpetual freedom 
things, nearly things, nation ask 
nation's recognition assistance make good 
 
reject them, utmost 
disperse them. We, effect, say white worthless 
neither help you, helped you. blacks, 
say: cup liberty, these, old masters, hold 
lips, dash you, leave chances 
scattered contents vague when, 
where, how. course, discouraging white 
black, tendency bring Louisiana proper, practical 
relations Union, far unable perceive it. If, 
contrary, recognize sustain new government 
Louisiana, converse made true. encourage 
hearts nerve arms twelve thousand adhere work, 
argue it, it, fight it, feed it, 
grow it, complete success. coloured man, too, 
seeing united him, inspired vigilance, energy, 
daring end. Grant desires elective 
attain sooner saving already advanced 
steps towards it, running backward them? 
 
... repeat question, Louisiana brought proper 
practical relation Union sooner sustaining discarding 
new State government? 
 
... said Louisiana apply generally 
States. yet great pertain State, 
important sudden changes occur State, withal new 
unprecedented whole case, exclusive inflexible 
plan safely prescribed details 
exclusive inflexible plan would surely become new 
Important principles may must inflexible. present 
situation, phrase goes, may duty make new 
announcement people South. shall 
fail act satisfied action proper. 
 
 
 
 
Appendix 
 
 
 
 
ANECDOTES 
 
 
LINCOLN'S RICHMOND DAY TAKEN 
 
Described time Writer 
 
gathered around President, ran ahead, 
little company, hung like dark cloud upon Men, 
women children joined came 
running breathless haste, shouting 
dancing men threw 
women waved hands, 
rendering praise God, 
heard past, 
children, friends sold given 
freedom, long years waiting permitted thus 
behold face great 
 
"I thank you, dear behold President 
exclamation woman stood upon humble home, 
eyes hands gave thanks aloud 
men. 
 
Another, jumping striking 
hands might, de Bless de Bless 
de could end 
 
air rang chorus voices. street became 
almost impassable account increasing till soldiers 
summoned clear 
 
walk long, President halted moment rest. "May de 
good Lord bless you, President said old negro, removing 
hat tears joy rolling cheeks. President 
removed hat, bowed bow 
forms, laws, 
mortal wound 
woman adjoining house it, turned 
scene 
 
 
     (The following nine anecdotes related Frank B. 
     who, executing picture first reading 
     cabinet council Emancipation Proclamation, 
     freedom Mr. Lincoln's private office saw much 
     President whose relations became 
     intimate 
 
 
"YOU DON'T WEAR ... PARDON 
 
distinguished citizen Ohio appointment President 
one evening six o'clock. entered White 
House, attention attracted young woman 
violently asked cause said 
ordered away servants waiting many hours 
see President brother, condemned 
death. story brother 
country several years. brother 
enlisted army, but, bad induced 
tried sentenced old story. 
poor girl obtained persons 
formerly known him, petition pardon, alone come 
Washington lay case President. 
always were, passed long hours two days 
trying vain get audience, length ordered away. 
 
feelings said come 
see President, know _he_ succeed. told 
her, however, follow upstairs, would see could 
done her. reaching door, Mr. Lincoln came out, 
meeting friend said "Are ahead time?" 
gentleman showed hand upon hour 
"Well," returned Mr. Lincoln, "I busy to-day 
time get Go in, sit back 

 
gentleman made young woman accompany office, and, 
seated, said her, "Now, good girl, want 
muster courage world. President comes 
back, sit shall get speak 
him, must force us, insist upon 
examination papers, telling case life 
death, admits instructions carried 
letter. Mr. Lincoln first somewhat surprised apparent 
young woman, appearance, 
ceased conversation friend, commenced examination 
document placed hands. Glancing face 
whose tears broken forth studied 
expression moment, eye fell upon 
Instantly face lighted up. "My poor said he, "you 
come governor, senator, member Congress, 
cause. seem honest don't wear 
pardon 
 
 
JOY GIVING PARDON 
 
One night left business ask 
son sentenced 
desertion. heard story usual patience, though 
anxious rest, 
generals complain discipline 
army pardons makes 
hard day's work, find good excuse 
saving man's life, go bed happy think joyous 
signing name make family 
happy smile face, signed 
name saved life. 
 
 
SIMPLICITY 
 
simplicity absence part Mr. 
Lincoln, well incident occurred 
occasion visit made Commodore Porter, Fortress 
Noticing banks river flowers, said: 
Tad (the name son, accompanied 
fond won't let couple 
men take boat go hour two, along banks 
river, gather Look 
endeavour imagine head European nation making similar 
request, humble way, one 
 
 
MAN PARDONED 
 
One day took couple friends New York upstairs, wished 
introduced President. hour business 
found alone, and, Soon 
one friends took occasion 
decidedly, President's Amnesty Proclamation, severely 
many friends Administration. Mr. approval 
touched Mr. Lincoln. said, great deal 
expression countenance shall never "When man sincerely 
gives satisfactory evidence 
same, safely exception 
 
 
SILENCE, WE'LL GET SAFE 
 
White House one day gentlemen present West, 
excited troubled commissions 
Administration. President heard replied: 
suppose property worth 
put hands carry across River 
would shake keep shouting him, 
stand little little 
little little little 
No, would hold breath well tongue, 
keep hands safe over. Government carrying 
immense hands. 
best can. Don't them. Keep silence, we'll get 
safe 
 
 
MAN SMALL CLAIM 
 
public one border counties 
Virginia, told President Union soldiers, passing 
helped hay, horse, hoped 
President would urge proper officer consider claim 
immediately. 
 
Mr. Lincoln said reminded old acquaintance his, 
used Illinois, 
sober man, best river. quite 
twenty-five years ago, take 
skilful always kept straight 
Finally steamer put on, made captain her. 
always used take wheel going One day 
boat along 
utmost vigilance exercised keep narrow 
boy pulled hailed "Say, 
wish would stop boat lost 

 
 
PRESIDENT'S SILENCE 
 
President speaking attack made 
Committee Conduct War certain alleged 
something worse, matter involved one 
fallen directly observation officer 
talking, possessed official evidence completely 
conclusions Committee. 
 
well me," officer, "to set matter 
right letter paper, stating facts actually 

 
"Oh, no," replied President, "at least, now. try 
read, much less answer, attacks made me, shop might 
well closed business. best know 
best can; mean keep end. 
end brings right, said won't amount 
anything. end brings wrong, ten angels 
right would make 
 
 

 
occasion telegram Cumberland Gap reached Mr. 
Lincoln heard direction 
remarked it." person present, 
position mind, could, see 
Mr. Lincoln it, expressed himself. 
"Why, see," responded President, "it reminds Mistress 
mine, large family. 
Occasionally one numerous would heard crying 
place, upon Mrs. Ward would one 
children isn't dead 
 
 
DEMOCRATIC BEARING 
 
evening left Washington incident occurred, 
perfectly character man. two days large painting 
upon completion, East Room, 
Late afternoon second day, 
drew usual front 
preparatory President's leaving 
spent carriage 
looked around him, wishing say farewell word, 
knowing Presently saw 
standing leading War 
Department, leaning iron arm thrown 
one foot stone supports it, evidently 
way War Department, 
man, giving him, account 
difficulty unable 
walked President's side. said little 
man, studying expression face 
trouble. finished, Mr. Lincoln said him, 
"Have blank man searched finding none, 
gentleman standing near, overheard question, came forward, 
said, "Here one, Mr. Several persons had, 
meantime, gathered Taking card Mr. Lincoln 
sat upon stone five six 
inches presenting almost appearance sitting 
upon itself, wrote order upon card proper 
official man's case." writing this, observed 
several persons passing smiling other, 
presume thought appearance Head 
Nation, who, however, seemed utterly either 
impropriety action, attracting attention. 
touching picture native goodness man, 
character, much disregard 

breach dignity, manner honest attempt 
secure justice citizen Republic, however humble 
may be. 
 
 
 
[Illustration: 
     
     GO 
     & THY GUIDE 
     THY NEED 
     GO THY 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME SIX 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
 
WRITINGS A. LINCOLN, Volume Six, 
 
 
 
 
1862 
 
 
 
 
RECOMMENDATION NAVAL OFFICERS 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 14, 1862. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
third section "Act promote efficiency 
approved 21st December, 1861, 
 
"That President United States advice 
consent Senate, shall authority detail retired 
list navy command squadrons single ships 
officers may believe good service requires 
thus placed officers may, upon recommendation 
President United States shall receive vote thanks 
Congress services gallantry action enemy, 
restored active list, 
 
conformity law, Captain David G. nominated 
Senate continuance flag-officer command squadron 
recently rendered important service Union 
successful operations lower Mississippi capture New 
 
Believing occasion could arise would fully correspond 
intention law pregnant happy influence 
example, cordially recommend Captain D. G. receive 
vote thanks Congress services gallantry displayed 
capture since 21st December, 1861, Forts Jackson St. city 
New Orleans, destruction various rebel 

 
 
 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
submit herewith list naval officers commanded vessels 
engaged recent brilliant operations squadron commanded 
Flag-officer led capture Forts Jackson St. 
city New Orleans, destruction rebel 
etc., April 1862. services gallantry occasions 
cordially recommend should, name, receive vote thanks 

 

 
     Captain 
     Captain Henry W. Morris. 
     Captain Thomas T. 
     Commander Henry H. Bell. 
     Commander Samuel 
     Commander Samuel 
     Commander Smith. 
     Commander Charles 
     Commander John De Camp 
     Commander James 
     Commander David D. 
     Commander Richard 
     Commander William B. 
     Lieutenant Commanding D. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Edward 
     Lieutenant Commanding George H. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Edward T. 
     Lieutenant Commanding M. 
     Lieutenant Commanding John 
     Lieutenant Commanding Charles H. B. 
     Lieutenant Commanding B. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Albert N. Smith. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Pierce 
     Lieutenant Commanding George M. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Smith. 
     Lieutenant Commanding John H. 
     Lieutenant Commanding Walter W. 
     Lieutenant Commanding K. 
     Acting Lieutenant Commanding E. 
     Acting Lieutenant Commanding Charles H. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 14, 1862 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, May 15, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, Virginia: 
 
long despatch yesterday received. answer fully 
soon. say despatches Secretary War 
promptly shown me. done shall could 
sustain you. Hoped opening James River putting 
Burnside communication, open road Richmond, you, 
effected something direction. still unwilling take 
force direct line Richmond here. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH 12TH INDIANA REGIMENT, MAY 1862 
 
SOLDIERS, TWELFTH INDIANA 
 
customary heretofore, hereafter, 
say something every regiment passing occurs 
frequently speeches ready occasions. 
paid mark respect chief appears 
say word two reply. colonel thought fit, 
account name, say satisfied 
manner performed part difficulties 
surrounded nation. kind expressions extremely 
hand assure nation indebted 
you, you, me. upon brave hearts strong 
arms people country reliance placed 
support free government free institutions. 
 
part brave army part have, 
Providence, performed great struggle, tender thanks 
especially regiment, subject good report. 
thanks nation follow you, may God's blessing rest upon 
forever. hope upon return homes 
find friends loved ones well bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 16, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
strength force actually you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM PROPOSED ADDITIONS INSTRUCTIONS DATE 
 
GENERAL McDOWELL, GENERAL INDORSEMENT 
 
May 17, 1862. retain separate command forces taken 
you; co-operating General McClellan obey 
orders, except judge, allow force 
disposed otherwise give greatest protection 
capital may possible distance. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
SECRETARY WAR: 
 
President shown me, suggested dangerous 
direct obey orders superior case, 
give instructions General McClellan end 
furnish General McDowell copy thereof would effect object 
desired President. desired say sketch 
instructions General McClellan herewith thought made addition 

 
Respectfully, M. C. M. 
 
 
 
 
MILITARY EMANCIPATION 
 
INDORSEMENT RELATING GENERAL DAVID ORDER MILITARY 
EMANCIPATION, 
 
MAY 17, 1862 
 
commanding general shall thing upon responsibility without 
me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 18, 1862. 
 
despatch President, asking 
received carefully considered. 
 
President willing capital 
believed that, even prudent, would require time 
effect junction army Rappahannock 
way Potomac York rivers land order, 
therefore, increase strength attack upon Richmond 
earliest moment, General McDowell ordered march upon city 
shortest route. ordered, keeping always position 
save capital possible operate put 
left wing communication right wing, instructed 
co-operate establish communication soon possible 
extending north Richmond. 
 
believed communication safely established either 
north south River. 
 
event, able prevent main body enemy's 
forces leaving Richmond falling overwhelming force upon 
General McDowell. move thirty-five forty thousand 
men. 
 
copy instructions General McDowell this. specific 
task assigned command provide danger 
capital nation. 
 
earnest call sent forward co-operate 
reduction Richmond, attempting this, 
city Washington; give order, either 
junction, put position cover 
city. communicate telegraph 
otherwise frequently may necessary efficient 
General McDowell position right, supplies must 
drawn West Point, instruct 
prepared supply route. 
 
President desires General McDowell retain command 
Department Rappahannock forces moves 
forward. 
 
order President:  EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN, Commanding Army Potomac, 
Richmond. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION GENERAL ORDER MILITARY EMANCIPATION, 
 
MAY 19, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas appears public 
proclamation Major general Hunter, words figures following, 
wit: 
 
Orders No. HEADQUARTERS DEPARTMENT SOUTH, HEAD, 
PORT ROYAL, S. C., May 9, 1862. 
 
"The three States Georgia, Florida, South Carolina, 
military department South, deliberately declared 
longer protection United States America, 
taken arms said United States, became military 
necessity declare martial law. accordingly done 
25th day April, 1862. Slavery martial law free country 
altogether persons three States: Georgia 
Florida, South held slaves therefore 
declared forever free. 
 
"By command Major-General D. W. SMITH, 
Assistant 
 
whereas producing excitement 
therefore, 
 
I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, proclaim declare 
Government United States, knowledge, information, 
belief intention part General Hunter issue 
yet information document 
further, neither General Hunter 
commander person authorized Government United 
States make proclamation declaring slaves State free; 
supposed proclamation question, whether genuine false, 
altogether void far respects declaration. 
 
make known whether competent me, 
commander-in-chief army navy, declare slaves 
State States free, whether, time, case, shall 
become necessity indispensable maintenance government 
exercise supposed power, questions responsibility 
reserve myself, cannot feel justified leaving 
decision commanders field. 
 
totally different questions police regulations 
armies 
 
sixth day March last, special message, recommended 
Congress adoption joint resolution, substantially 
follows: 
 
Resolved, United States ought co-operate State 
may adopt gradual abolishment slavery, giving State pecuniary 
aid, used State, discretion, compensate 
public private, produced change system. 
 
resolution language quoted adopted large 
majorities branches Congress, stands 
solemn proposal nation States people 
immediately interested people 
States earnestly beseech make 
arguments yourselves. cannot, would, blind signs 
times. beg calm enlarged consideration them, 
may be, far personal partisan politics. 
proposal makes common cause common object, casting 
upon any. acts change contemplates would come 
gently heaven, anything. 
embrace it? much good done, one effort, past 
time, providence God high privilege do. May 
vast future lament neglected it. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, nineteenth day May, year 
Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-two, independence 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. E. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 21, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
waited large committee present petition 
signed twenty-three senators representatives asking 
restore General wish this, yet 
wish understood you. Please answer once. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, May 22, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
long despatch yesterday received. 
control General McDowell forces therein 
McDowell reach land sooner could get aboard 
boats ready unless march shall 
case force resisting certainly 
Richmond. land reach five days 
whereas water would reach two judging 
past experience. single division reach ten days 
ordered it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
President United States. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 24, 1862. 4 PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN: 
 
consequence General critical position, compelled 
suspend General McDowell's movements join you. enemy making 
desperate push upon Harper's Ferry, trying throw General 
Fremont's force part General McDowell's 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN 
 
WASHINGTON May 24, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
left General McDowell's camp dark last evening. command 
there, worn cannot move Monday morning, 
line get troops places 
broken yesterday Front Royal, probable loss us one 
regiment infantry, two Companies cavalry, putting General Banks 

 
enemy's forces General Anderson opposing General McDowell's 
advance line supply retreat road Richmond. 
 
If, conjunction McDowell's movement Anderson, 
could send force right cut enemy's supplies 
Richmond, preserve railroad bridges across two 
enemy's prevent army 
opposed receiving accession numbers nearly 15,000 
men; succeed saving bridges secure line 
railroad supplies addition one have. 
almost well building Chickahominy 
McDowell Shields say can, positively will, move 
Monday morning. wish move cautiously 
 
command McDowell, you, precisely 
indicated long despatch us 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May, 1862. 2 P.M. 
 
GENERAL 
 
reports Jackson 20,000 moving Gap Little 
River toward says 
also informed large forces south him. know 
force 15,000 broke Saturday night front 
Fredericksburg went know Please inform us, possible, 
become force pursued Banks also 
information have. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL D. S. MILES. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 24, 1862. P.M. 
 
COLONEL Harper's Ferry, Virginia 
 
Could send Winchester would tell whether enemy 
north Banks, moving latest 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 24, 1862. 4 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, Franklin: 
 
authorized purchase horses, take wherever 
however get them. exposed condition General Banks makes 
immediate relief point paramount importance. therefore 
directed President move Jackson 
operate enemy way relieve Banks. movement 
must made immediately. acknowledge receipt order, 
specify hour received you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 24, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, Franklin, Virginia: 
 
Many thanks promptness answered 
execute order. upon 
execute it. Put utmost speed it. lose minute. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 24, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, near Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
Several despatches Assistant Secretary Scott one Governor 
asking reinforcements received. beg 
assured best can. mean cast blame tell 
commanders along line Richmond Corinth supposes 
confronted numbers superior own. 
pressure line upper Potomac, yesterday 
broken heavy loss us, General Banks put great 
yet may actually need men 
repair hand. dear General, feel 
justified rely much you. believe brave officers 
men get victory 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 24, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, 
 
General Fremont ordered telegraph move Franklin 
relieve General Banks, capture destroy Jackson's 
forces. laying aside present 
movement Richmond, put 20,000 men motion 
Shenandoah, moving line advance line Manassas 
Gap railroad. object capture forces Jackson 
either co-operation General Fremont, or, case want 
supplies transportation, 
believed force move sufficient accomplish 
object alone. information thus far received makes 
probable enemy operate actively General Banks, 
able count upon much assistance him, may even 
release him. Reports received moment Banks fighting 
eight miles 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McDOWELL. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., May 24, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL I. 
 
highly gratified obeying order. change 
painful possibly one. Everything 
depends upon vigor movement. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. W. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862 P.M. 
 
GENERAL White 
 
Please give us best present impression number 
enemy's forces north Strasburg Front forces still 
moving north gap Front Royal there? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 25, 1862. 2 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
enemy moving north sufficient force drive General Banks 
force cannot tell. also threatening 
Manassas Gap railroad, north 
precisely force cannot tell. think movement 
general one, would acting upon 
purpose desperate defense Richmond. think time near 
must either attack Richmond give job come 
defense Washington. Let hear 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER TAKING MILITARY POSSESSION 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862. 
 
Ordered: virtue authority vested act Congress, 
President takes military possession railroads United 
States date order, directs 
respective railroad officers servants, shall 
hold readiness transportation troops 
munitions war may ordered military 
exclusion business. 
 
order Secretary War. 
 
M. C. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY CHASE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862. 
 
SECRETARY CHASE, Virginia: 
 
appears Banks got safely Winchester last night, 
morning retreating Harper's justifies inference 
pressed numbers superior own. think 
improbable Jackson, Johnson gap 
made day yesterday Front Royal, making dash 
valuable honorable service General McDowell 
cut off. hope put possible energy speed 
effort. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862. 
 
GENERAL Harper's Ferry: 
 
Banks reaches better it? 
enemy cut thence Harper's Ferry? sent anything 
meet assist order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862. P.M. 
 
GENERAL Harper's Ferry: 
 
One good complete men appointments, 
way Baltimore. Eleven guns, different 
way here. Hope reach 
morning. men Harper's Ferry, rest 
vicinity sent 
cut 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 25, 1862. 
 
GENERAL Harper's Ferry: 
 
fear mistaken me. mean question correctness 
approve done. 
reported seemed small me, feared got Banks 
cut him. Please tell exact number 
hand. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 

 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., May 8.30 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch received. General Banks 
men, Shields taken swell column McDowell 
aid Richmond, rest force scattered various 
23d rebel force 10,000 fell upon one regiment 
two companies bridge Front Royal, destroying 
crossed Shenandoah, 24th pushed 
get north Banks, road Banks ran race them, 
beating Winchester yesterday evening. morning battle 
two forces, Banks beaten back full 
retreat toward probably broken total 
Manassas Gap railroad, reports Jackson 
near Front Royal, following 
understand, forces pursuing Banks, also another force 
10,000 near Orleans, following direction. here, 
here, prevent crossing 
Potomac Harper's Ferry above. 20,000 McDowell's 
force moving back vicinity Front Royal, General Fremont, 
Franklin, moving movements intended 
get enemy's 
 
One McDowell's brigades ordered Harper's 
rest force remains present 
sending regiments Baltimore spare 
Harper's Ferry, supplying places sort calling 
militia adjacent States. also eighteen cannon 
road Harper's Ferry, arm single one yet 
point. situation. 
 
McDowell's force beyond utterly 
Apprehension something like this, 
sustain you, always reason withholding McDowell's force 
you. Please understand this, best force 
have. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HISTORY CONSPIRACY REBELLION 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
MAY 16, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
insurrection yet existing United States 
overthrow Federal Constitution Union, 
prepared Winter 1860 1861, assumed open 
organization form treasonable provisional government 
18th day February, 1861. 12th day 
April, 1861, insurgents committed flagrant act civil war 
capture Fort Sumter, cut hope 
immediate Immediately afterward roads 
city capital put condition 
every direction stopped lines 
telegraph cut insurgents, military naval forces 
called government defense Washington 
prevented reaching city organized combined treasonable 
resistance State Maryland. adequate effective 
organization public defense. Congress indefinitely 
time convene them. became necessary choose 
whether, using existing means, processes 
Congress provided, let government fall 
ruin whether, powers conferred 
Constitution cases insurrection, would make effort save it, 
present age 
 
thereupon summoned constitutional heads 
departments, meet Sunday, 20th day April, 1861, 
office Navy Department, there, unanimous 
directed armed revenue proceed 
sea afford protection commercial especially 
California treasure ships way coast. also directed 
commandant navy-yard Boston purchase charter arm 
quickly possible five purposes public defense. 
directed commandant navy-yard Philadelphia purchase 
charter arm equal number purpose. directed 
commandant New York purchase charter arm equal number. 
directed Commander purchase charter arm put sea 
two Similar directions given Commodore 
view opening passages water capital. 
directed several officers take advice obtain aid 
efficient services, matter, Excellency Edwin D. Morgan, 
Governor New York, absence George D. Morgan, William M. 
R. M. H. directions 
especially empowered Secretary Navy act 
department crisis matters pertaining 
troops supplies public defense. 
 
several departments government time contained large 
number disloyal persons would impossible provide 
safely official agents performance duties 
thus confided citizens favorably known ability, 

 
several orders issued upon transmitted 
private pursued way seaboard 
inland across States Pennsylvania Ohio northern 
believe similar measures taken 
without authority law, government saved 
aware dollar public funds thus confided 
without authority law unofficial persons either lost 
although apprehensions occurred objections 
extraordinary proceedings, necessarily 
 
recall transactions attention directed 
resolution passed House Representatives 30th 
day last month, words: 
 
"Resolved, Simon Cameron, late Secretary War 
Alexander control large sums public money 
authority purchase military supplies without restriction, without 
requiring faithful performance 
duties, services competent public officers 
involving government vast number persons 
engaged business pertaining 
especially purchase arms future 
adopted policy highly injurious public service, deserves 
censure House." 
 
Congress see wanting equally 
justice leave censure expressed resolution rest 
exclusively chiefly upon Mr. Cameron. sentiment unanimously 
entertained heads department participated proceedings 
House Representatives due Mr. 
say although fully approved proceedings moved 
suggested himself, President, 
heads departments, least equally responsible 
whatever error, wrong, fault committed 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
General official report. saved army 
made safe retreat river, probably safe 
reports force 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 26, 1862. 1 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, Virginia: 
 
Despatches received sent you. 
remainder forces, except sufficient hold point 
move Manassas Junction 
commander department, here? ask 
questions. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
cut Also, impression 
works contend front 
get near enough throw shells 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
May P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
see expressly ordered march 
mean? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, May 27, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
President directs militia 
made three years, war. This, think, practically 
longer year. latest intelligence General Banks 
states saved nearly whole command small loss. 
 
force made, hoped capture 
enemy. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL J. C. FREMONT, 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, 
 
President directs halt await orders, unless 
hear enemy general direction 
case move upon him. Acknowledge receipt order, 
hour received. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1862. 
 
GENERAL McDOWELL, Manassas 
 
General McClellan P.M. yesterday telegraphed 
division fought driven enemy, General 
Hanover driving stand 
made railroad time messenger left. Two hours later 
telegraphed captured six cars 
Virginia sent communicate 
Nothing McClellan. 
 
Porter effects railroads near Hanover 
consider whether forces front Fredericksburg push 
join him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON. May 28, 1862. 4 P.M. 
 
GENERAL McDOWELL, Manassas 
 
say General report find enemy side 
Blue Neither I. Blue Ridge looking 
them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1862. P.M. 
 
GENERAL McDOWELL, Manassas 
 
think evidence Jackson still 
Assuming this, question Put 
speed can. told Fremont much, directed 
drive fast possible. way, suppose know Fremont 
got instead going 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN 
 
WASHINGTON May 28, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
glad General F. J. victory. Still, 
total enemy, puzzled know Richmond 
Fredericksburg railroad seized again, say 
railroads Richmond puzzled see how, 
lacking that, any, except scrap Richmond 
West Point. scrap Virginia Central Richmond Hanover 
Junction, without more, simply nothing. whole enemy 
Richmond, think cannot certainly known 
me. Harper's Ferry informs us large forces, supposed 
Jackson's forced advance General 
King telegraphs us Fredericksburg give certain 
information 15,000 left Hanover Junction Monday morning reinforce 
Jackson. painfully impressed importance struggle 
you, shall aid consistently view due 
regard points. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL JOHN C. FREMONT, 
 
order remain based supposition 
would find there. 
 
Upon subsequent information enemy still operating 
vicinity Winchester directed move 
enemy. 
 
President directs move enemy without 
delay. Please acknowledge receipt this, time received. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1862. 10 A.M. 
 
GENERAL R. B. McClellan's 
 
received. think cannot certainly known whether 
force fought General Porter recently confronted 
McDowell. Another item evidence bearing General Branch 
commanded Porter, General Anderson front 
McDowell. McDowell correspondence prisoners. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., May 29, 1862. 10.30 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
think shall able within three days tell certainly whether 
considerable force one moving 
Harper's Ferry vicinity. Take expected development 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BANKS, Williamsport, 
 
General McDowell's advance should, probably will, near 
Front Royal twelve General Fremont near 
Strasburg soon. Please watch enemy follow 
detain attempts mean General 
force well immediately you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL FREMONT 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1862. 12 M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, Virginia: 
 
General McDowell's advance, enemy, should, 
probably will, Front Royal twelve to-morrow. force, 
up, Please force or, 
route moving lead point, near Strasburg 
enemy may time. despatch received 
satisfactory. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, Manassas 
 
General Fremont's force should, probably will, near Strasburg 
twelve Try force, advance it, 
Front Royal soon. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1862. P.M. 
 
GENERAL R. B. 
 
despatch South Anna seized forces 
morning received. Understanding points Richmond 
Fredericksburg railroad, heartily congratulate country, 
thank General McClellan army 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 30, 1862. 10 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, Manassas 
 
somewhat apprehend Fremont's force, present condition, may 
quite strong enough case comes collision enemy. 
additional reason wish push forward column 
rapidly possible. Tell number force reaching Front Royal 
amount to. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 30, 1862. A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BANKS, 
 
Williamsport, Maryland, Harper's Ferry: 
 
enemy force 
Winchester, them, may come collision Fremont, 
case anxious force, Harper's 
Ferry, operate assist Fremont 
enemy engage McDowell. meaning despatch 
yesterday. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 30, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, 
 
despatch to-day received satisfactory. Fremont 
really division part it. 
despatch Fremont morning, telling is; 
says: 
 
men Winchester represent Jackson's force 
Generals 
 
high figures erroneous, course. know 
Corinth occupied us. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 30, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, Virginia: 
 
Yours, saying reach Strasburg vicinity 5 P.M. Saturday, 
received sent General McDowell, directed act view 
it. must time promised, possible. 
 
Corinth last night, occupied troops 
enemy gone south railroad 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT WASHINGTON CITY, May 30, P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, Va.: 
 
send despatch received Harper's Ferry: "The 
rebels line battle front lines. nine pieces 
artillery, position, cavalry. woods 
were, return threw large number shells 
lines moved last night take stronger 
position. expect great deal 
three 9 inch bearing directly enemy's 
enemy appeared morning intention 
drawing us on. shall act position strong 
one. took place afternoon lost one horse, 
enemy lost two men killed seven 
 

 
seems game you. sent copy General Fremont. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 31, 1862. PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
circle whose circumference shall pass Harper's Ferry, Front 
Royal, whose shall little 
Winchester, almost certainly within morning forces 
Jackson, Edward Johnson. Quite certainly within 
two days ago. part forces attacked Harper's Ferry 
dark last evening, still sight morning. Shields, 
McDowell's advance, Front Royal 11 A.M. yesterday, 
dozen prisoners taken week ago, enemy, two 
eleven property saved 

 
General Fremont, direction promises 
near Strasburg 5 P.M. to-day. General Banks Williamsport, 
old force new force Harper's Ferry, directed 
Shields Front Royal reports rumor still additional force 
enemy, supposed entered valley Virginia. 
last may may true. Corinth certainly hands 
General Halleck. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON 
 
GENERAL G. A. WASHINGTON, May 31, 
 
GENERAL 
 
President directs say nothing 
justify panic expects maintain 
position becomes soldier general. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., June 1, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
probably engaged enemy. suppose made attack. 
Stand well hold ground, yield inch 
inch good order. morning General department 
yours, giving command whole, sending General 
Port Monroe General Fort also send General Sigel 
report duty. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 3, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
continuous anxious Chickahominy 
close rear crossing line communication. Please look 
it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL I. McDOWELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 3, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McDOWELL, Front Royal, Virginia: 
 
Anxious know whether Shields head Jackson. Please tell 
Shields Jackson, respectively, time 
reaches you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 4, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, 
 
despatch to-day Secretary War received. Thanks good 
news 
 
anything parts Mississippi 
Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
[cipher.] 
 
WASHINGTON, June 4, 1862. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
really wish control question rebel 
prisoners far may do, please tell us 
so. answer made public. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., June 7, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch Chattanooga duly received sent 
General Halleck. received following answer him: 
 
Fort Pillow, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 8, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
changing one lines, give 
Kentucky Tennessee. movement upon Chattanooga think 
probable include combination force near Cumberland 
Gap General 
 
you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 9, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BANKS, 
 
arranging general plan valley Shenandoah, 
accordance move main force Shenandoah 
opposite Front Royal soon possible. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 9, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
Halt pursuing Jackson farther. Get force well 
hand stand movement enemy 
either back toward Strasburg toward Franklin, await orders, 
soon sent you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WASHINGTON, June 9, 1862. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, 
 
despatch seizing seventy rebels exchange like 
number Union men duly received. certainly 
proposition. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. WASHINGTON, June 12, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
credit, represent Jackson largely 
reinforced turning upon you. Get forces well hand keep us 
well frequently find really pressed 
superior force enemy, fall back cautiously toward Winchester, 
due time Banks position sustain you. 
fall back upon unless upon tolerably clear necessity. 
understand Jackson side Shenandoah you, 
hence cannot event press necessity precipitate 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Mount Jackson received. 
point use discretion, remembering object give 
protection western Virginia. Many thanks yourself, 
officers, men gallant battle last A. L. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
June 13, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: herewith 
transmit memorial addressed presented behalf State 
New York favor enlarging 
given leisure give subject careful 
examination, great importance obvious large 
amount valuable statistical information presented 
memorial greatly facilitate mature consideration 
subject, respectfully ask hands. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON; June 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
cannot afford keep force McDowell's engaged 
keeping Jackson south Strasburg Front fought Jackson 
alone him. substantial reinforcements long 
battle pending Richmond. Surely Banks supporting 
distance capable keeping returning 
Sigel sent forward you, McDowell (as put 
work, Jackson break Front Royal again. already 
right side Shenandoah it, wrong side 
attack you. orders already sent Banks place 
proper positions work assigned you. Jackson cannot move whole 
force either learn go 
cannot divide force, sending part you, 
weak either. Please directed 
order 8th despatch yesterday, neither 
Banks overwhelmed Jackson. proper 
smoke day night always 
notice enemy's know you, 
much 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. C. FREMONT 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., June 15, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter 12th Colonel received. 
answer principal part it, repeat substance order 
8th one two telegraphic despatches sent since. 
 
definite power sending 
compelled rather consider proper disposal forces 
could wish have. may able send 
believe more. alone beat Jackson 
last Sunday, argue stronger to-day, unless 
cannot 
could come Richmond, 
much likely go Richmond Richmond come him. 
Neither think Jackson's assigned 
accounts numbers reports 
thus constant keep three four times many troops 
away Richmond force amounts to. Thus helps friends 
Richmond three four times much there. game 
allow this. Accordingly, order directed 
halt rest force, get well hand, 
objects guard Jackson's returning route 
upper Potomac driven out, 
time give protection raid West Virginia. 
 
Already given discretion occupy Mount Jackson 
if, full consideration, think best. believe Jackson 
attack you, certainly cannot attack 
comes upon superior force, notify us, fall back 
Banks join due time. know 
whether Jackson move all, cannot safely put 
Banks Strasburg line, leave force Front 
Royal line upon late true 
policy place one one line 
positions unite actually find Jackson moving 
upon it. precisely doing. 
part speak, McDowell go 
assistance McClellan. arranged this, unwilling 
asked spoken 
Banks, force principal part 
force. 
 
General commands, purchase 
appointment officers, mentioned letter, 
consult Secretary War to-morrow. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. C. FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 16, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT, Mount Jackson, Virginia: 
 
despatch yesterday, supposed understanding 
would furnish corps men, asking 
received. ready come 
fair settlement accounts 
 
Early March last, assigned command Mountain 
Department, tell would give force could, 
hoped make reach time told 
within reasonable time would seize railroad east 
Knoxville, could. department force 
supposed exact number well known me. 
looking two three days, called distinctly told 
would add division force already 
department, would undertake job. division contained 
expense great dissatisfaction General McClellan 
took army gave you. promise literally 
fulfilled. given could, given 

 
yours. 23d May, largely two months afterward, 
Franklin, Va., within miles Knoxville, within 
miles part railroad east it, moving forward, 
telegraphing could move lack everything. Now, 
misunderstand me. say done could. 
presume met unexpected beg believe 
surely done best, I. power 
fill Corps demanding work 
asking stand cautiously get 
force order, give protection valley 
Shenandoah western Virginia. 
 
received orders, act upon them? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL C. SCHURZ. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 16, 1862 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL Mount Jackson, Virginia: 
 
long letter received. information give 
say fortunate Fremont Jackson 
superior force, would overwhelmed him. so, 
happened Fremont fairly fought 
account fight false 
General Fremont speak Jackson beaten Shields. 
accounts beat Shields. engagement Shields. 
meet drive back disaster advance till 
met additional brigade Jackson 
turned Shields half force 
nearer twenty miles it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 18, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
would interest value us know 
expedition toward East Tennessee judgment 
give us information safety. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 18, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
to-day, making probable Jackson reinforced 
10,000 Richmond, despatch General 
King saying arrived Richmond 
way met 10,000 15,000 passing latter place 
join Jackson. 
 
true, good equal 
force. could better things could know day 
attack Richmond, would glad informed, think 
inform safety. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, JUNE 19, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
last night received, thank you. 
 
large reinforcements going Richmond Jackson, proves one 
two either strong Richmond, mean 
defend place 
 
reflection, see reinforcements Richmond Jackson 
could reported 
sent 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, June 20, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
regard contemplated execution 
government information whatever, inquire advise 
you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, June 20, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
morning sent despatch General Sigel 
proposition Jackson reinforced Richmond. 
may reality, yet may 
determine knew true, could send 
case stands think safely can. 
Still, watch signs possible. 
 
regard contemplated execution 
government information whatever, inquire advise you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 1862 6 PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch yesterday P. received morning. 
would divert much time attention army 
immediate command, would glad views 
present state military affairs throughout whole country, say 
would glad give them. would rather letter 
telegraph, better chance numbers 
positions troops command Virginia 
elsewhere, even could accuracy, cannot, would 
rather transmit either telegraph letter, 
chances reaching enemy. would glad talk you, 
cannot leave camp, cannot well leave here. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 22, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BANKS, 
 
glad looking well west movement 
enemy direction. know anxiety point. 
 
quiet General McClellan's headquarters two o'clock to-day. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TREATY MEXICO 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 23, 1862. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
7th day December, 1861, submitted Senate project 
treaty United States Mexico proposed 
Mr. minister Mexico, respectfully requested 
advice Senate 
 
25th day February last resolution adopted Senate 

 
"That advisable treaty require 
United States assume portion principal interest 
debt Mexico, require concurrence European 
 
resolution duly communicated me, notice thereof 
immediately given Secretary State Mr. 
informed consider instructions upon subject 
referred modified resolution would govern course 
accordingly. despatch failed reach Mr. reason 
disturbed condition Mexico, recent date, Mr. 
without instructions, thus practically left without instructions, 
Mexico. 
 
view important events Occurring there, thought 
interests United States would promoted conclusion 
two treaties provide loan republic. 
therefore signed duly ratified 
Government Mexico, transmitted consideration. 
action Senate course conclusive acceptance 
treaties part. have, nevertheless, thought 
excellent minister Mexico Government 
republic lay treaties Senate, together 
correspondence occurred relation them. performing 
duty add importance subject thus submitted 
Senate, shall cheerfully receive 
consider highest respect advice Senate may 
think proper give upon subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
VETO CURRENCY BILL 
 
MESSAGE SENATE, JUNE 23, 1862. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
bill passed House Representatives Senate, 
entitled "An act repeal part act Congress 
circulation less five dollars 
District received consideration, 
return Senate, following 

 
1. bill proposes repeal existing legislation prohibiting 
circulation less five dollars within 
District Columbia, without permitting issuing bills 
banks legally authorized issue them. judgment, 
found present condition currency, make 
banks generally suspended specie 
legal sanction given circulation notes 
one class almost certainly extended, practical 
include classes, whether authorized 
view correct, currency District, 
act become law, certainly greatly 
serious injury honest trade honest labor. 
 
2. bill seems contemplate end cannot otherwise 
certainly attained. existing war 
peculiarly duty National Government secure people 
sound circulating medium. duty been, existing 
circumstances, satisfactorily performed, part least, authorizing 
issue United States notes, government dues 
except made legal tender debts, public private, 
except interest public debt. object bill submitted 
providing small note currency present 
fully accomplished authorizing issue, part 
new United States notes made necessary 
circumstances country, notes similar character, 
less five dollars. issue would answer 
beneficial purposes bill, would save considerable amount 
treasury interest, would greatly facilitate payments soldiers 
creditors small would people currency 
safe government. 
 
Entertaining objections bill, feel constrained 
withhold approval return consideration 
action Congress. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH JERSEY CITY, JUNE 24, 1862. 
 
animals looked seen 
might attempt tell 
went see General Scott. say visit West 
Point importance attached it; 
concerned matters understand quite well tell 
them. Now, remark nothing whatever 
making general country. Secretary 
War, know, holds pretty tight press, shall 
tell ought to; 'm afraid much, 
might draw tight me. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
three despatches yesterday relation affair, ending 
statement completely succeeded making point, 

 
later one P.M., suggesting probability 
overwhelmed two hundred thousand, talking 
responsibility pains much. give can, 
act presumption best 
have, continue, think, assume could 
give would. shall opportunity 
send reinforcements whenever possibly can. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. S. General thinks fall back would much better towards 
York River towards James. charge capital, 
please confer 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONSTITUTING ARMY VIRGINIA. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 26, 1862. 
 
Ordered: forces Fremont, Banks, 
McDowell, including troops Brigadier-General 
Washington, shall consolidated form one army, called Army 
Virginia. 
 
command Army Virginia specially assigned 
Major-General John Pope, commanding general. troops Mountain 
Department, heretofore command General Fremont, shall constitute 
First Army Corps, command General troops 
Shenandoah Department, General Banks, shall constitute 
Second Army Corps, commanded him; troops command 
General McDowell, except within city 
Washington, shall form Third Army Corps, command. 
 
3d. Army Virginia shall operate manner as, protecting 
western Virginia national capital danger shall 
manner attack overcome rebel forces Jackson 
enemy direction 
render effective aid relieve General McClellan capture 
Richmond. 
 
Army Potomac Army Virginia shall 
position communicate directly co-operate Richmond, 
chief command, operating together, shall like 
cases, Rules Articles War. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 28, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
enemy concentrated force Richmond render 
absolutely necessary, opinion President, immediately 
force forward nearest 
route way Baltimore Washington Richmond. believed 
route would way Columbus, Ohio 
River. force President directs done 
way enable hold ground interfere 
movement Chattanooga East Tennessee. condition 
forces detached sent 
left judgment. 
 
direction send forces immediately rendered imperative 
serious reverse suffered General McClellan Richmond yesterday, 
full extent yet known. 
 
acknowledge receipt despatch, stating day 
hour received, inform action be, 
may take measures aid river railroad 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAMS GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 28, 1862. 
 
GENERAL 
 
think better go, reinforcements 
General McClellan. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June, 28, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, 
 
intelligence General McClellan attacked large 
force compelled fall back toward James River. 
advised exact condition, President directs shall 
send reinforcements command James River 
safely without abandoning position. Let infantry 
said yesterday cavalry enough. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, 
 
Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, June 28, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Save army, events. send reinforcements fast can. 
course cannot reach to-day, next day. 
said ungenerous saying needed thought 
ungenerous assuming send fast 
could. feel army quite 
feel yourself. drawn battle, 
price pay enemy Washington. protected 
Washington, enemy concentrated you. Washington, 
would upon us troops could gotten you. 
Less week ago notified us reinforcements leaving 
Richmond come front us. nature case, neither 
government Please tell present 
condition aspect things. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, June 28, 1862 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD. 
 
DEAR view present condition war 
follows: 
 
evacuation Corinth delay flood Chickahominy 
enabled enemy concentrate much force Richmond 
McClellan successfully attack. fact soon 
substantial rebel force anywhere else. send force 
McClellan, enemy will, know it, send force 
Richmond take Washington. large part western army 
brought McClellan, let us Richmond, retake 
Tennessee, Kentucky, Missouri, etc. done hold 
West, open Mississippi, take Chattanooga East 
Tennessee without more. reasonable force every event 
kept Washington protection. let country give us 
hundred thousand new troops shortest possible time, which, added 
McClellan directly indirectly, take Richmond without endangering 
place hold, substantially end war. 
expect maintain contest successful, till 
term Congress country me; 
would publicly appeal country new force 
fear general panic would follow, hard 
thing understood really is. think new force all, 
nearly all, infantry, raised 
quickly. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., June 
 
GENERAL 
 
Communication McClellan White House cut off. Strain every nerve 
open communication James River, way can. 
Report me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM FLAG-OFFICER L. M. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., June 28, 1862. 
 
FLAG-OFFICER Fort Monroe: 
 
Enemy cut McClellan's communication White House, driving 
back point. gunboats 
near place. McClellan's main force Chickahominy 
James. Also communicate support 
there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C. June 28, 1862. 
 
 
GOVERNOR O. P. MORTON, Indianapolis, 
 
despatch to-day received. recollection either 
John R. M. named appointment 
tax law. latter particularly friend, 
sorry learn yours. appointment 
made purpose you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 29, P.M. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD, House, New York: 
 
much left. Baltimore American 
us. left White House 11 A.M. yesterday. fully 
force fight Friday fell 
back nearer McClellan's quarters little sooner Porter did, 
seeing whole it; stayed Richmond side Chickahominy 
night, left White House 5 A.M. Saturday. says Porter 
retired perfect order protection guns arranged 
purpose, orders 
forces, except left purpose go White House, safely 
Chickahominy morning, heavy 
firing Richmond side, begun 5 ceased A.M. Saturday. 
whole, think better point time. 
happened since still know not, communication 
General McClellan. despatch Colonel shows 
thinks McClellan fighting enemy Richmond to-day, 
to-morrow. means knowing upon Colonel 
opinion. Confirmed saving property. single 
came back White House field, number 
wounded reaching 11 A.M. Saturday large. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
President stated add one two points 
may satisfactory know. 
 
First. sick wounded safely removed 
 
Second. despatch Burnside shows White 
man left behind condition afford efficient support, probably 
so. 
 
Third. despatch Colonel conviction 
movement made General McClellan concentrate 
Richmond, successful latest point 
information. 
 
Fourth. Mr. says Friday night, twelve one 
o'clock, General McClellan telegraphed Commodore 
result movement satisfactory him. 
 
facts stated President, inference 
General McClellan probably Richmond within two days. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
McClellan things ordered, 
likely possible do. still mystery 
days woods staying 
communication would receive orders. 
another place North close war not. 
D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY SEWARD. WAR DEPARTMENT, June 30, 1862. 
 
HON. WM. H. SEWARD, New York: 
 
yet without communication General McClellan, absence 
news point anxiety. latest point 
effected everything exact accordance plan, 
announced us battle began, feel 
justified hope failed since. severe engagement 
getting part army side Chickahominy 
side, enemy lost certainly much did. 
dissatisfied this, loss enemies 
compensate loss friends. enemy cannot come White 
certainly now, probably abandoned whole 
line. New Kent 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL TROOPS. NEW YORK, June 30, 1862. 
 
GOVERNORS SEVERAL STATES: 
 
capture New Orleans, Norfolk, Corinth national forces 
enabled insurgents concentrate large force 
Richmond, place must take least possible fact, 
soon formidable insurgent force except Richmond. 
large army there, enemy us Potomac 
elsewhere. national authority, 
places must held, must keep respectable force front 
WASHINGTON. this, diminished strength army 
renders addition necessary order close 
struggle last three months energy 
success. Rather hazard misapprehension military 
condition alarm call troops proclamation, 
deemed best address form. accomplish object 
stated require without delay men, including recently 
called Secretary War. Thus reinforced gallant army 
enabled realize hopes expectations government 
people. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, June 30, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe: 
 
probable enemy abandoned line White 
House McClellan's could little object maintain 
it, nothing upon. Would better move 
see it? think telegraphic communication opened 
White House must 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAMS GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, JUNE 30, 1862. 3 P. M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, 
 
telegram date received. Chattanooga expedition 
must account given up. President regards 
movement East Tennessee one important movements 
war, occupation nearly important capture 
Richmond. pleased movement toward 
Chattanooga, directs force sent cannot 
without breaking operations point East Tennessee. 
Infantry cavalry artillery strong enough. 
first reports Richmond discouraging truth 
advantage side, General 
McClellan moved whole force line James River, 
supported must largely strengthened 
hence call you, glad answered 
Let know point river send 
forces, provide immediately 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, 
 
Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., June 30, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
Would glad artillery please 
send man endangers place deem important hold, 
forces give weaken delay expedition 
take hold railroad east 
East Tennessee, think fully important taking holding 
Richmond. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL 300,000 VOLUNTEERS, JULY 1, 1862. 
 
June 28, 1861. 
 
governors States Union, impressed 
belief citizens States respectively represent 
one accord hearty desire recent successes 
Federal arms may followed measures must insure speedy 
restoration Union, believing that, view present 
state important military movements progress, reduced 
condition effective forces field, resulting usual 
unavoidable casualties service, time arrived prompt 
vigorous measures adopted people support great 
interests committed charge, respectfully request, meets 
entire approval, call upon several States 
number men may required fill military 
field, add armies heretofore organized 
additional number men may, judgment, necessary 
garrison hold numerous cities military positions 
captured armies, speedily crush rebellion 
still exists several Southern States, thus practically restoring 
civilized world great good government. believe 
decisive moment near hand, end people United 
States desirous aid promptly furnishing reinforcements 
may deem needful sustain government. 
 
     JR., Governor Maine. 
     H. S. Governor New 
     Governor 
     WILLIAM A. Governor 
     E. D. MORGAN, Governor New York. 
     CHARLES S. Governor New Jersey. 
     A. G. CURTIN, Governor Pennsylvania. 
     A. W. Governor Maryland. 
     F. H. Governor Virginia. 
     BLAIR, Governor 
     J. B. President Military Board Kentucky. 
     ANDREW JOHNSON, Governor Tennessee. 
     H. R. Governor Missouri. 
     O. P. MORTON, Governor Indiana. 
     DAVID TODD, Governor Ohio. 
     ALEXANDER Governor 
     RICHARD YATES, Governor Illinois. 
     EDWARD Governor 
 
PRESIDENT 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 1, 1862 
 
concurring wisdom views expressed 
patriotic manner you, communication 
day June, decided call service additional force 
300,000 men. suggest recommend troops chiefly 
quota State would trust 
may enrolled without delay, bring unnecessary 
injurious civil war speedy satisfactory conclusion. order 
fixing quotas respective States issued War 
Department to-morrow. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING TAXES STATES, JULY 1, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas second section act Congress passed 
7th day June, A. D. 1862, entitled "An act collection direct 
taxes insurrectionary districts within United States, 
purposes," made duty President declare, 
first day July next following, proclamation, 
States parts States insurrection 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States America, hereby declare proclaim 
States South Carolina, Florida, Georgia, Alabama, Louisiana, Texas, 
Mississippi, Arkansas, Tennessee, North Carolina, State 
Virginia except following Ohio, 
Taylor, Tyler, 
Harrison, Jackson, 
Lewis, Mason, Clay, 
Logan, Webster, 
insurrection rebellion, reason thereof 
civil authority United States provisions 
"Act provide increased revenue imports, pay interest 
public debt, purposes," approved August 5, 1861, 
peaceably taxes legally upon real 
estate act last aforesaid lying within States parts 
States aforesaid, together penalty per said 
shall upon tracts lots same, severally 
till paid. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  F. W. SEWARD, Acting Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS, JULY 1, 1862. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES 
 
cordially recommend Captain Andrew H. United 
States Navy, receive vote thanks Congress eminent services 
Organizing western gallantry 
Fort Henry, Fort Island Number various places, 
whilst command naval forces, embracing period nearly ten 
months. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C. July 1, 1862 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, JULY P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
impossible reinforce present emergency. 
million men, could get time. men 
strong enough face enemy, must find 
place security, rest, Maintain ground 
can, save army events, even fall back Fort 
still strength enough country, bring 
out. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., July 2, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch Tuesday morning induces hope army 
rest. hope allow reason moment. ask 
50,000 men promptly sent you, surely labor gross 
mistake fact. Recently sent papers showing disposal forces 
made last spring defense WASHINGTON, return 
plan. find included WASHINGTON 75,000 men. Now, 
please assured men enough fill plan 
Fremont's valley, McDowell's 
you, WASHINGTON, taken together, 
added mentioned, not, outside 
army, 75,000 men east Thus idea sending 
considerable force, promptly, simply absurd. If, 
frequent mention responsibility, impression 
blame can, please relieved 
impression. beg like manner ask 
me. think strong enough take 
Richmond now, ask try now. Save army, 
material strengthen offensive 
fast can. governors eighteen States offer new 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C. July 2, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
several despatches yesterday Secretary War 
received. say, repeat, would exceedingly glad 
reinforcements you. Still send man judgment 
endanger point deem important hold, force 
give weaken delay Chattanooga 
 
Please tell could make flying visit consultation 
without endangering Service department. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, July 2, 1862. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
herewith return honorable body, 
act entitled "An act provide additional medical officers 
volunteer without approval. 
 
reason approved act title 
passed Congress passage one first mentioned 
express purpose errors same, 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CIRCULAR LETTER 
 
(Private Confidential.) 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 3, A.M. 
 
GOVERNOR Maine want half 
300,000 new troops could now. 50,000 additional 
troops now, believe could substantially close war two 
weeks. time everything, get 50,000 new men month, 
shall lost 20,000 old ones month, gained 
difference old new troops still me. 
fewer Time everything. 
Please act view this. enemy given Corinth, 
wonderful thereby enabled check us time Richmond. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT WASHINGTON, D.C., JULY 3, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
yesterday received. satisfied yourself, 
officers, men done best could. accounts say better 
fighting never done. Ten thousand thanks it. 
 
28th sent General Burnside order send force 
could spare you. learned requested go 
upon said order intended 
wish conflict views. 
 
hope help soon. Today ordered General 
Hunter send last General Halleck 
thinks cannot send reinforcements without endangering 
gained. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., July 4, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
understand position stated letter General 
reinforce enable resume offensive within 
month, even six impossible. addition arrived 
arriving Potomac 10,000 men, 
10,000 hope Burnside soon, 
Hunter little later, see send another man within 
month. circumstances defensive present must 
care. Save army first, are, can; secondly, 
You, ground, must judge 
attempt, means effecting it. give 
opinion aid gunboats reinforcements mentioned 
hold present long as, 
keep James River open you. tolerably 
confident keep James River open, better remove soon 
possible. remember expressed apprehension 
danger communication cut river you, yet 
suppose escaped attention. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
time feel able take 
restrained so. A.L. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 4, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
know much would oblige us if, without abandoning 
positions plans, could promptly send us even 10,000 
not? part Corinth army certainly fighting McClellan 
front Richmond. Prisoners hands late Corinth 
army. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, July 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe: 
 
Send forward despatch Colonel also. order 
General McClellan's General Burnside same, course wish 
executed promptly possible. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 5, 1862. 9 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN: 
 
thousand thanks relief two despatches 12 1 P.M. 
yesterday gave me. assured heroism skill 
officers men is, forever be, 
 
hold present position, shall enemy yet. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., July 6, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi. 
 
DEAR Governor William Rhode 
Governor third time, United 
States. 
 
know object visit you. cheerful consent go, 
direction. wishes get part force, one 
both, come here. already know exceedingly glad 
if, judgment, could without endangering positions 
operations repeat 
said "Do come send man if, judgment, 
endanger point deem important hold, endangers 
Chattanooga 
 
Still, please give friend, Governor full fair hearing. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM INTERVIEW PRESIDENT GENERAL McCLELLAN 
 
OFFICERS VISIT ARMY POTOMAC 
VIRGINIA. 
 
July 9, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT: amount force now? 
 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN: can't much, certainly 
 
corps commanders] whole amount 
corps now. 
 
     GENERAL SUMNER: 
     GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: 15,000 duty. 
     GENERAL KEYES: 
     GENERAL PORTER: 20,000 fit duty. 
     GENERAL FRANKLIN: 
 
PRESIDENT: likely condition health 

 
GENERAL McCLELLAN: Better since landing Fortress 

 
PRESIDENT corps commanders] present 
present prospective condition 
 
GENERAL SUMNER: good part Western Virginia. 
 
GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: Excellent health, present health 
 
GENERAL KEYES: little think camp getting worse. 
 
GENERAL PORTER: good. 
 
GENERAL FRANKLIN: good. 
 
PRESIDENT: enemy now? 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN: four five miles us 
think nearly whole Jackson, 

 
PRESIDENT: corps commanders] condition 
believe enemy now? 
 
GENERAL SUMNER: think retired 
much especially best troops, late actions, 
superiority arms. 
 
GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: Don't think force vicinity. 
 
GENERAL KEYES: Think withdrawn, think preparing go 
WASHINGTON. 
 
GENERAL PORTER: Believe mainly near Richmond. feels dare 
attack us here. 
 
GENERAL FRANKLIN: learn withdrawn front think 

 
PRESIDENT: corps commanders] aggregate 
wounded, missing attack till now? 
 
     GENERAL SUMNER:   
     GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: large 
     GENERAL KEYES: Less 
     GENERAL PORTER:    
     GENERAL FRANKLIN: 
 
PRESIDENT: desired could remove army 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN: would delicate difficult matter. 
 
PRESIDENT: corps commanders] desired get 
army away, could safely 
 
GENERAL SUMNER: think could, think give cause 
do. 
 
GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: Perhaps could, think would ruinous 
country. 
 
GENERAL KEYES: think could done quickly. 
 
GENERAL PORTER: army ruin country. 
 
GENERAL FRANKLIN: think could, 
Rappahannock true line. 
 
PRESIDENT: corps commanders] army secure present 

 
    GENERAL SUMNER: Perfectly so, judgment. 
    GENERAL HEINTZELMAN: think safe. 
    GENERAL KEYES: help General B. hold position. 
    GENERAL PORTER: Perfectly so. only, ready begin 
                    moving forward. 
    GENERAL FRANKLIN: Unless river closed is. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER MAKING HALLECK GENERAL-IN-CHIEF. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 
 
Ordered, Major-General Henry W. Halleck assigned command 
whole land forces United States, 
repair capital soon safety positions 
operations within department charge. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING SOUTHWEST BRANCH PACIFIC RAILROAD. 
 
Whereas, judgment President, public safety require 
railroad line called known Southwest Branch 
Pacific Railroad State Missouri extended, 
completed direction Springfield, 
said State, necessary successful economical 
conduct war maintenance authority 
government 
 
Therefore, virtue act Congress entitled "An act 
authorize President United States certain cases take 
possession railroad telegraph lines, purposes," 
approved January 31, 1862, ordered, portion said 
railroad line reaches extended, 
made available military uses 
government, speedily may be. And, inasmuch upon part 
said line stream called Little considerable 
portion necessary work already done railroad 
company, road extent may completed comparatively 
small cost, ordered said line across 
Little first soon possible. 
 
Secretary War charged execution order. 
facilitate speedy execution work, 
discretion, take possession control whole part 
said railroad line, whole part rolling 
offices, shops, 
may judge necessary convenient early completion road 

 
Done city WASHINGTON, July 11, 1862. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, C., July 11, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
recommend thanks Congress given following officers 
United States 
 
Captain James L. conduct battle Port 
Royal distinguished services coast United States 
enemy. 
 
Captain Charles Henry Davis, distinguished services conflict 
enemy Fort Pillow, successful operations 
points waters Mississippi River. 
 
Commander John A. distinguished services line 
profession, improvements efficient labors 
branch service. 
 
Commander Stephen C. distinguished services waters 
North Carolina, particularly capture chief 
command naval forces. 
 
Commander David D. Porter, distinguished services conception 
preparation means used capture forts 
New Orleans, highly conduct management 
Forts Jackson St. 
 
Captain H. retired list, distinguished 
services capture Forts 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. WAR DEPARTMENT, July 11, 1862. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours yesterday received. not, good friend, 
perceive ask simply put command 
suppose desire this. wish control 
must know may 
not, not, full conference General 
Telegraph him, meet place agree upon. 
telegraph meet confer fully you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. WAR DEPARTMENT, July 11, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, 
 
Governor Johnson, Nashville, great trouble anxiety 
raid Kentucky. governor true valuable 
us Tennessee. please get communication him, 
full conference leave here? 
telegraphed subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
APPEAL FAVOR COMPENSATED EMANCIPATION. 
 
July 12, 1862. 
 
adjournment Congress near, shall 
opportunity seeing several months. Believing 
border States hold power good equal number 
members, feel duty cannot justifiably waive make 
appeal you. intend complaint assure 
that, opinion, voted resolution 
message last March, war would 
substantially plan therein proposed yet one 
swift means ending it. Let States rebellion 
see definitely certainly event States 
represent ever join proposed confederacy, cannot much 
longer maintain contest. cannot hope 
ultimately long show determination 
perpetuate institution within States. Beat elections, 
done, and, nothing still claim 
own. know lever power is. Break 
lever shake forever. 
treated kindness consideration trust 
think touch exclusively own, 
when, sake whole country, ask, you, States, 
better take course Discarding maxims 
adapted times, looking 
stern facts case, better possible 
prefer constitutional relation States nation shall 
practically restored without disturbance institution; 
done, whole duty respect, Constitution 
oath office, would performed. done, 
trying accomplish war. incidents war cannot 
avoided. war continues long, must object sooner 
institution States mere 
mere incidents war. gone, 
nothing valuable lieu it. Much value 
gone much better people take step 
war secures substantial compensation 
sure wholly lost much better 
thus save money else sink forever much better 
can, lest war ere long render us unable 
it! much better nation 
sell buy without war could never been, 
sink thing sold price cutting 
one another's speak emancipation once, 
decision emancipate Room South America 
colonization obtained numbers 
shall large enough company encouragement one another, 
freed people go. 
 
pressed difficulty yet threatens 
division among who, none strong. instance 
known you. General Hunter honest man. was, hope still 
is, friend. valued none less agreeing 
general wish men everywhere could free. proclaimed men 
free within certain States, repudiated proclamation. expected 
good less harm measure could believe would 
follow. Yet, it, gave 
many whose support country cannot afford lose. 
end it. pressure direction still upon me, 
ask relieve me, and, much 
more, relieve country important point. 
 
Upon considerations, attention 
message March last. leaving Capital, consider discuss 
among yourselves. patriots statesmen, pray 
consider and, least, commend 
consideration States people. would perpetuate popular 
government best people world, beseech 
nowise omit this. common country great demanding 
views action bring speedy relief. 
form government saved world; beloved history 
cherished memories happy future fully assured 
rendered you, others, 
privilege given assure happiness swell 
link names forever. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 13, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
DEAR SIR:--I told men gone army 
day made 
leaving accounted for. believe cover 
wounded, missing battles 
leaving 50,000 left otherwise. 
died, leaving army still alive it. believe 
half two-thirds fit duty to-day. 
perfect knowledge right, 
men you, could go Richmond next three days. 
got you, prevented getting away 
numbers 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 13, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
Kentucky. Please look it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 13, 1862. 
 
GENERAL J. T. BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
several despatches received. call General Halleck. 
Telegraph once. telegraphed trouble. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 13, 1862. 
 
GENERAL J. T. BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
cannot venture order troops General Buell. know 
condition in. maybe attacked himself. must call General 
Halleck, commands, whose business understand care 
whole field cannot telegraph him, send messenger him. 
dispatch moment come Halleck 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ACT COMPENSATED EMANCIPATION 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
July 4, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
Herewith draft bill compensate State may 
abolish slavery within limits, passage which, substantially 
presented, respectfully earnestly 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
enacted Senate House Representatives United 
States America Congress whenever President 
United States shall satisfied State shall lawfully 
abolished slavery within State, either immediately 
shall duty President, assisted 
Secretary Treasury, prepare deliver State amount 
six per cent. bonds United States equal 
aggregate value ------ dollars per head slaves within 
State, reported census whole amount one 
State delivered abolishment equal 
annual gradual, interest begin running 
bond time before. 
 
State, received 
bonds, shall time afterwards law tolerate slavery 
within limits, contrary act abolishment upon 
bonds shall received, said bonds received said State shall 
hands may be, State 
shall refund United States interest may paid 
bonds. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 14, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Corinth, Mississippi: 
 
here. due regard 
leave behind. reach here? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, July 14, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
General force News, ready move, short 
notice, one way other, ordered. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SOLOMON 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 15, 1862. 
 
HON. SOLOMON President pro Senate. 
 
inform Senate shall obliged 
postpone adjournment least one day beyond time 
understand fixed it. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
[The message addressed Hon. A. Grow Speaker 
House 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. July 17, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
omitted long inform March last Mr. 
New York, presented United 
States ocean steamer many esteemed finest 
ship world. ever since still valuable 
service government. patriotic act making 
magnificent valuable present country recommend 
suitable acknowledgment made. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. July 17, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
Considering bill "An act suppress insurrection, punish 
treason rebellion, seize confiscate property rebels, 
purposes," joint resolution said act 
substantially one, approved signed both. 
 
informed passage resolution prepared 
draft message stating objections bill becoming law, copy 
draft herewith transmitted. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
herewith return honorable body, bill 
act entitled "An act suppress treason rebellion, seize 
confiscate property rebels, purposes," together 
objections becoming law. 
 
much bill perceive objection. wholly 
neither person property loyal citizen, 
particulars proper. first second sections 
provide conviction punishment persons shall guilty 
treason persons shall set engage 
rebellion insurrection authority United 
States laws thereof, shall give aid comfort thereto, 
shall engage give aid comfort existing rebellion 
fair construction persons within sections 
punished without regular trials duly constituted courts, 
forms substantial provisions law 
Constitution applicable several cases. perceive 
especially persons would within general 
power also special provision pardon amnesty 
contained act. 
 
also provided slaves persons convicted 
sections shall free. think unfortunate form expression 
rather substantial objection this. startling say 
Congress free slave within State, yet said 
slave first transferred nation 
Congress liberated difficulty would 
real case. General Government 
slave least justly property, 
government government, 
far thus forfeited slaves, 
question Congress regard is, "Shall made free 
sold new perceive objection Congress deciding 
advance shall free. high honor Kentucky, 
informed, owner slaves sold none, 
liberated all. hope true States. Indeed, 
believe physically possible General Government 
return persons actual slavery. believe 
would physical resistance could neither turned aside 
argument driven away force. view objection 
feature bill. Another matter involved two sections, 
running parts act, noticed 
 
perceive objection third fourth sections. 
 
far wish notice fifth sixth sections, may 
considered together. enforcement sections would 
injustice persons embraced within them, clear. 
make war compelled pay cost it, 
obviously called question. give governmental protection 
property persons abandoned it, gone 
overthrow government, absurd, considered mere light 
justice. severest justice may always best policy. 
principle seizing property persons 
embraced within sections certainly 
justly discriminating application would difficult and, 
great extent, impossible. would wise place power 
somewhere, persons may know something 
lose persisting something gain 
 
[A man without hope dangerous nothing 
 
sure whether power section 
Without special act Congress, think military 
military phrase, "they within enemy's 
should, manner, seize use whatever real 
personal property may necessary convenient 
time way, evidence do. 
 
said regard slaves, first 
second sections, applicable difference 
provision made whole act determining whether particular 
individual slave fall within classes defined 
section. free upon certain conditions whether 
conditions pertain mode ascertaining 
provided. could easily 
 
tenth section make objection. oath therein required seems 
proper, remainder section substantially identical 
law already 
 
eleventh section simply assumes confer power upon 
Without law, hesitation go far 
direction indicated may time deem ready 
say think proper military commanders 
laborers, many persons African descent used advantage. 
 
twelfth sections something better 
fourteenth entirely proper, parts 
act shall stand. 
 
chiefly object pervades parts act, 
distinctly appears first, second, seventh, eighth sections. 
sum provisions results title 
forever. 
 
causes treason amounting 
full crime, declares forfeiture extending beyond lives 
guilty whereas Constitution United States declares 
"no treason shall work blood forfeiture 
except life person True, 
formal case; still, think greater punishment 
cannot constitutionally different form, 

 
great respect constrained say think feature act 
unconstitutional. would difficult modify it. 
 
may remark provision Constitution, put language 
borrowed Great Britain, applies country, 
understand, real landed 
 
Again, act property treason 
without conviction supposed personal hearing given 
may touch property lying within 
cannot give personal notice owner absent 
endeavoring destroy government, certainly satisfactory. 
Still, owner may thus think reasonable time 
provided parties appear personal 
Similar provisions uncommon connection proceedings 
 
reasons stated, return bill House 
originated. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., July 21, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Monday. hope able tell Thursday 
done Burnside. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER REGARD ALIENS 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, OFFICE, 
 
WASHINGTON, July 21, 1862. 
 
following order received President United 
States: 
 
made President ministers 
various foreign powers United States subjects 
powers present insurrection obliged required 
military authorities take oath general qualified allegiance 
government. duty aliens residing United 
States submit obey laws respect authority 
government. proceeding conduct inconsistent 
obligation authority may rightfully 
subjected military restraints may necessary. 
cannot required take oath allegiance government, 
duty owe 
obligations heretofore taken therefore 
Military commanders abstain imposing similar obligations 
future, lieu thereof adopt restraints 
character indicated shall find necessary, convenient, 
effectual public safety. directed whenever 
order shall made affecting personal liberty reports 
causes thereof shall made War Department 
consideration Department State. 
 
order Secretary War: 
 
L. THOMAS, 
 
 
 
 
ORDER AUTHORIZING EMPLOYMENT 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, July 22, 1862. 
 
Ordered: 
 
1. military commanders within States Virginia, South Carolina, 
Georgia, Florida, Alabama, Mississippi, Louisiana, Texas, Arkansas 
manner seize use property, real may 
necessary convenient several commands supplies 
military property may destroyed 
proper military objects, none shall destroyed 
 
2. military naval commanders shall employ laborers within 
said States many persons African descent 
used military naval purposes, giving reasonable 
wages labor. 
 
3. property persons African descent accounts shall 
kept sufficiently accurate detail show amounts 
property persons shall come, basis 
upon compensation made proper several 
departments government shall attend perform 
appropriate parts toward execution orders. 
 
order President: EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
WARNING REBEL 
 
PROCLAMATION, JULY 25, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
pursuance sixth section act Congress entitled "An act 
suppress insurrection punish treason rebellion, seize 
confiscate property rebels, purposes," approved July 
17, 1862, act joint resolution thereof 
herewith published, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby proclaim warn persons within contemplation 
said sixth section cease in, 
existing rebellion rebellion Government 
United States return proper allegiance United 
States, pain within said 
sixth section provided. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, day July, A.D. 1862, 
independence United States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
HOLD HAND WHILST ENEMY 
 
JOHNSON. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 26, 1862. 
 
HON. JOHNSON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 16th 
 
ready say apply friends due enemies. 
wisdom sincerity friends would hold 
hands enemies me. appeal professed friends 
struggle one thing. remember 
telling me, day Baltimore mob April, 1861, would 
crush Union feeling Maryland attempt bringing troops 
Maryland soil Washington. brought troops 
yet Union feeling enough left elect Legislature 
next turn elected excellent Union United States 
patient willing forgive Christian 
terms also give ample time Still, 
must save government, possible. cannot do, course, 
do; may well understood, all, shall 
surrender game leaving available card 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CUTHBERT 
 
(Private.) 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., July 28, 1862. 
 
 
CUTHBERT Esq., New Orleans, Louisiana. 
 
SIR:--The copy letter addressed Mr. Thomas J. Durant 
shown me. writer appears able, 
entirely sincere man. first part letter devoted 
effort show secession ordinance Louisiana adopted 
majority people. probably true, 
fact may found allow 
ordinance go assert stand 
allow 
hold popular meetings convention express 
enforce true sentiment State? 
then, United States army 
present protect them? dead government 
whole struggle class men nothing 
government, nothing themselves, except demanding government 
shall strike open enemies, lest struck 
 
Mr. Durant complains various ways relation master slave 
disturbed presence army, considers particularly 
this, part, done cover act Congress, 
constitutional guaranties suspended plea military 
necessity. truth is, done omitted slaves 
done omitted military necessity. military 
necessity men get neither sufficient 
numbers amounts keep drive lines slaves coming 
them. Mr. Durant cannot ignorant pressure direction, 
efforts hold within till shall 
time help themselves. 
 
speak police regulations 
Mr. Durant experience shows one 
wrong, let set right. think perceive freedom 
trade Mr. Durant urges would relieve friends 
enemies pressure blockade. would serve 
enemy enemy able serve himself. 
say believe serve enemy purpose, Mr. 
conscious purpose national patriotic 
ones. Still, class men who, choice sides 
contest, anxious quiet comfort 
fall victorious side end 
without loss themselves, advice mode conducting 
contest would precisely is. speaks 
thinks upon Union men. even thinks 
injurious Union cause restrained trade 
passage without taking sides. touch neither 
merely carried dry 
throughout safely landed right side up. even 
go lest sacred passengers receive 
accidental course rebellion never suppressed 
Louisiana professed Union men neither help 
permit government without Now, think true 
remedy different suggested Mr. 
lie rough war, removing necessity 
war. people Louisiana wish protection person 
property reach forth hands take it. Let good 
faith national authority, set State government 
conforming thereto Constitution. know 
protection army it. army withdrawn 
soon State government dispense 
people State then, upon old constitutional terms, govern 
simple easy. 
 
prefer hazard sake 
destroying consider whether 
probable surrender government save losing all. 
decline suggest, scarcely need ask do. 
would Would drop war would 
prosecute future charged rose 
Would deal blows rather Would 
give contest, leaving available means 
shall can, shall can, 
save government, sworn duty well personal 
shall nothing deal vast 
malicious 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LOYAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., 
 
July 28, 1862. 
 
GOVERNORS LOYAL STATES: 
 
would great service us know, fully 
tell, progress made making recruiting old regiments 
State. Also day first regiments move you, 
second, third, on. information important 
us making Please give promptly accurately 
call. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
BROKEN EGGS CANNOT 
 
EXTRACT LETTER AUGUST 
 
July 31, 1862. 
 
Broken eggs cannot Louisiana nothing 
take place Union was, already broken 
sooner so, smaller amount 
past government cannot much longer play game 
all, enemies stake nothing. enemies must 
understand cannot experiment ten years trying destroy 
government, fail, still come back Union 
expect ever Union was, join 
writer saying, "Now time." 
 
much better would writer gone this, 
protection army New Orleans, sat 
writing complaining letters 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COUNT 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
August 4, 1863. 
 
COUNT A. DE 
 
DEAR acceptable letter, dated de 
18th July, 1862, received. moral effect 
worst affair Richmond, run course 
stand, shall soon rising again, hope. 
believe true that, men material, enemy suffered 
series certain less able 
bear it. 
 
us every soldier man character, must treated 
consideration customary Europe. Hence great army, 
causes could prevailed there, rapidly, 
bringing necessity new call earlier 
shall easily obtain new however. alarmed shall 
learn shall resorted draft part this. seems 
strange even me, true, government pressed 
course popular Thousands wish personally 
enter service nevertheless anxious pay send 
provided assurance unwilling persons, 
compelled Besides this, volunteers 
mostly choose enter newly forming regiments, drafted men 
sent fill old ones, wherein man man quite 

 
ask, "Why North great armies often found 
numbers face face armies 
painfully know fact, military man, not, would 
better answer question. fact know 
suppose cause continuance lies mainly facts 
enemy holds interior lines, 
operate people convey information enemy, 
operates convey none us. 
 
received volume letter honor 
addressing me, please accept sincere thanks. 
much America ability much 
loved us devotion liberal principles 

 
quite right importance us, bearing upon 
Europe, achieve military successes, true 
us home well abroad. Yet seems unreasonable series 
successes, extending half year, clearing 
100,000 square miles country, help us little, single 
hurt us much. let us 
 
happy know course 
judgment propriety policy say acted upon 
best without help 
God shall continue so. 
 
Please assured highest respect 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH WAR MEETING, WASHINGTON, AUGUST 6, 1862 
 
FELLOW believe precedent appearing 
occasion, also true precedent 
yourselves, offer justification 
that, upon examination, found nothing Constitution 
it. I, however, impression that; younger 
gentlemen entertain better better address 
understanding could, therefore propose detain 
moment longer. little inclined occasion say 
anything unless hope produce good it. thing think 
likely better said one else matter 
heard persons blamed 
attempt quarrel General 
McClellan Secretary War Now, occupy position enables 
believe two gentlemen nearly deep 
quarrel presuming friends. General McClellan's 
attitude nature cannot 
wish hope Secretary War 
precisely situation. military commanders field 
cannot successful, Secretary War, myself, 
time master both, cannot know General 
McClellan wishes successful, know wish 
Secretary War him, together 
wish it. Sometimes dispute many men General 
McClellan had, would say 
large number, would Secretary War insist 
General McClellan small number. basis is, 
always wide difference, occasion perhaps wider 
one, grand total McClellan's rolls men actually 
fit would talk grand total 
paper, would Secretary War talk 
present fit duty. General McClellan sometimes asked things 
Secretary War give him. General McClellan 
blame asking wanted needed, Secretary War 
blame giving none give. say here, 
far know, Secretary War withheld one thing 
time power give him. him. believe 
brave able man, stand here, justice requires 
do, take upon charged Secretary War 
withholding him. talked longer expected do, 
avail privilege saying more. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR August 12, 1862. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C. 
 
GOVERNOR Boston, Mass.: 
 
despatch saying "I can't get regiments can't 
get quick work V. S. officer 
received. Please say gentlemen work quickly 
make quick work them. name 
long take pay couple never need 
arrival regiments to-day. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. August 12, 1862. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C. 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
important regiments arrive once. lack 
us? Answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. August 12, 1862. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Would completion railroad distance farther 
direction Springfield, Mo., military advantage you? Please 
answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS COLONIZATION COLORED MEN. 
 
WASHINGTON, Thursday, August 14, 1862. 
 
afternoon President United States gave audience 
committee colored men White House. introduced 
Rev. J. Commissioner E. M. Thomas, chairman, 
remarked invitation hear Executive 
say them. 
 
seated, President, preliminary 
informed sum money 
Congress, placed purpose aiding 
country, people, portion them, 
African thereby making duty, long time 
favor cause. why, asked, 
people race leave 
country? is, perhaps, first question proper consideration. 
different races. us difference 
exists almost two races. Whether right 
wrong need physical difference great 
disadvantage us both, think. race suffer many 
them, living among us, suffer presence. 
word, suffer side. admitted, affords reason, 
least, free men, suppose. 
 
[A 
 
Perhaps long free, lives. race 
judgment, greatest wrong inflicted people. 
even cease slaves, yet far removed 
placed equality white race. cut many 
advantages race men 
enjoy equality best free, broad continent 
single man race made equal single man ours. Go 
treated best, still upon you. 
propose discuss this, present fact, 
cannot alter would. fact 
think feel alike, you. look condition. Owing 
existence two races continent, need 
effects upon white men, growing institution slavery. 
 
believe general evil effects white race. See present 
country engaged men cutting one another's 
knowing far consider 
know race among us could war, 
although many men engaged either side care one way 
other. Nevertheless repeat, without institution slavery 
colored race basis, war could existence. 
better us both, therefore, know free 
men among you, who, even could better condition, 
much inclined go country who, slaves, could 
obtain freedom condition. suppose one principal 
difficulties way colonization free colored man 
cannot see comfort would advanced it. may believe 
live WASHINGTON, elsewhere United States, 
remainder life, perhaps so, 
foreign Country; hence may come conclusion 
nothing idea going foreign country. 
 
(I speak unkind sense) extremely selfish view 
case. ought something help fortunate 
yourselves. part people, harsh 
may be, free colored people remain us. Now, 
could give start white people, would open wide door 
many made free. deal free 
beginning, whose slavery, poor 
material start with. intelligent colored men, me, 
would move matter, much might 
 
exceedingly important men beginning capable 
thinking white men, 
much encourage you. sake race 
sacrifice something present comfort purpose 
grand respect white people. 
thought throughout life something done 
condition subject hard world. 
difficult make man miserable feels worthy 
claims kindred great God made him. American 
Revolutionary war sacrifices made men engaged it, 
future. General WASHINGTON endured greater physical 
remained British subject, yet happy 
man engaged race, something 
children none own. 
 
colony existence long time. certain 
sense success. old President Liberia, 
first time ever saw him. says within 
colony three four hundred thousand people, 
old States, Rhode Island Delaware, 
States, less larger ones. 
American colonists Something less 
sent country. Many original 
settlers yet, like people 
question is, colored people persuaded go 
anywhere, there? 
 
One reason would rather 
remain within reach country know 
much may toward race. strike 
greatest reason love them. still attached 
them, events. 
 
place thinking colony Central America. 
nearer us much one fourth far Liberia, 
within seven days' run Unlike Liberia, great line 
country excellent one 
people, great natural resources especially 
similarity climate native soil, thus 
suited physical condition. particular place view 
great Atlantic Sea Pacific 
Ocean, particular place advantages 
sides finest world. Again, 
evidence rich certain amount coal valuable 
country. attach much importance coal is, afford 
opportunity inhabitants immediate employment till get 
ready settle permanently take colonists 
good bad 
nothing cultivate make something 
started get daily bread soon reach there, 
great advantage. Coal land best thing know 
commence enterprise. talked upon 
subject, told intended gentlemen 
interest country, including mistaken 
lives know well blacks, look 
Unless among intellect, everybody 
trade makes something. meet things 
everywhere. persons advantage them, 
question whether cannot made advantage you. 
intelligent, know success much depend external 
help Much, therefore, depends upon yourselves. 
think see means available 
shall, get sufficient number engaged, provision made 
shall engage enterprise, 
spend money intrusted me. sure 
succeed. government may lose cannot succeed unless 
think care succeed. political affairs 
Central America quite satisfactory condition 
contending true 
agreed alike subject want it, 
generous here. 
 
colored race objection would endeavor 
made best assurance 
best. 
 
practical thing want ascertain whether get number 
able-bodied men, wives children, willing go 
present evidence encouragement protection. Could get hundred 
tolerably intelligent men, wives children, able 
speak? could find 
twenty-five able-bodied men, mixture women 
things family could make successful 
want let know whether done not. 
practical part wish see you. subjects 
great importance, worthy month's study, instead speech 
delivered hour. ask you, then, consider 
pertaining merely, race 
present time, one things, successfully good 
confined present 
 
  "From age age lay 
   millions yet be, 
   Till far roll away 
   
 
merely given substance President's 
 
chairman delegation briefly replied would hold 
short time give answer. 
 
President said: Take full hurry all. 
 
delegation 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER CAMP CHASE, OHIO. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 14, 1862. 
 
OFFICER charge Confederate prisoners Camp Chase, Ohio: 
 
believed Dr. J. J. prisoner charge, 
tell wife allow telegraph her. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HIRAM 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 16, 1862. 
 
HON. HIRAM New York: 
 
Mrs. L. benefit 
send pay, good select send 
worth good worth good 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NOTE 
 
Secretary Treasury Commissioner Internal Revenue 
please see Mr. one best men is, and, 
difference, one would like better me. 
 
August 18, 1862 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM S. B. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON August 18, 1862 
 
S. B. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
appointed must 
without 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
please send President. JOHN HAY 
 
 
 
 
Mrs. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 21, 1862. 
 
Mrs. Lexington, Ky.: 
 
despatch Mrs. L. received yesterday. well. Owing 
early strong friendship you, would gladly oblige you, 
cannot absolutely it. General Hon. James one 
both, discretion see fit give 
authority so. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, August 
 
GENERAL BURNSIDE GENERAL 
 
news arrival 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
G. P. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 21, 1862. 
 
F. Va.: 
 
telegram regard received. 
certainly case difficulty, cannot remain, cannot 
conceive authority can. Remain long safely 
provide well poor institution. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HORACE GREELEY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 22, 1862. 
 
HON. HORACE GREELEY. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I read addressed 
New York statements assumptions 
fact may know erroneous, 
them. inferences may believe 
drawn, argue them. 
impatient dictatorial tone, waive deference old 
friend, whose heart always supposed right. 
 
policy say, meant 
leave one doubt. 
 
would save Union. would save shortest way 
Constitution. sooner national authority restored, 
nearer Union be, "the Union was." 
would save Union unless could time save slavery, 
agree them. would save Union 
unless could time destroy slavery, agree 
them. paramount object struggle save Union, 
either save destroy slavery. could save Union without 
freeing slave, would it; could save freeing 
slaves, would it; could freeing 
leaving others alone, would also that. slavery 
colored race, believe helps save Union; 
forbear believe would help save 
Union. shall less whenever shall believe hurts 
cause, shall whenever shall believe 
help cause. shall try correct errors shown 
shall adopt new views fast shall appear true views. 
stated purpose according view official duty, 
intend modification expressed personal wish men, 
everywhere, could free. 
 
Yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., August 8 A.M. 
 
HON. R. YATES, Springfield, Ill.: 
 
pained hear reject service officer sent 
assist organizing getting troops. Pennsylvania Indiana 
accepted officers twice many 
new troops field States together. Illinois 
got forward many troops Indiana, Cumberland Gap would soon 
relieved present Please ruin us 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, August 27, 1862 
 
GOVERNOR St. Paul, 
 
received. Attend draft cannot proceed, 
course Necessity knows law. government cannot 
extend time. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, August 27, 1862 4 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, Alexandria, Virginia: 
 
news 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
August 27, 1862 4.30 p.m. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Virginia: 
 
hear anything 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
August 28, 1862. P. M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Virginia: 
 
news General 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
August 28, 1862. p. m. 
 
COLONEL Alexandria, Virginia: 
 
received. learn rebel forces Manassas 
large commanded several best 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 29, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Virginia: 
 
Colonel mean sound firing 
heard direction Warrenton, stated, direction 

 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, August 29, 1862. p.m. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN 
 
news direction Manassas 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, August 29, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: to-day received. think first 
wit, "to concentrate available forces open 
communication right one, wish control. 
leave General Halleck, aided 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 30, 1862. A.M. 
 
COLONEL Alexandria, Virginia: 
 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, August 30, 1862. P.M. COLONEL Alexandria, 
Virginia 
 
Please send latest news. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BANKS. 
 
August 30, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BANKS, Manassas Junction, Virginia: 
 
Please tell news. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, August 31, 1862. 
 
GENERAL BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
force, numbers it, General 
engagement near Richmond 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., September 3, 1862. 
 
Ordered, Major-General Halleck, immediately 
proceed possible organize army, 
active operations, material within coming within 
control, independent forces may deem necessary defense 
Washington active army shall take field. 
 
order President: 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
Copy delivered Major-General Halleck, September 3, 1862, 10 p.m. 
 
E. D. General. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. G. WRIGHT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 7, 1862. 
 
GENERAL WRIGHT, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
know certainty General Bragg May 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 7, 1862. 
 
GENERAL BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
General know subject? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. E. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C. 
 
September 7, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Harper's Ferry? know anything it? certain 
information Bragg valley 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B, McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 8, 1862. 5 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, 
 
look now? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. C. BUELL. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, September 8, 1862. P.M. 
 
GENERAL 
 
degree certainty command, 
valley Shenandoah, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 9, 1862. 
 
THOMAS WEBSTER, Philadelphia: 
 
despatch received, referred General Halleck, must control 
questions presented. surprised anxiety, 
think danger. half troops Philadelphia, 
enemy could take it, would fear leave half 
whole here, dares leave 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, September 10, 1862. AM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, 
 
look now? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN. September 11, 1862. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., 
 
 
 
EXCELLENCY ANDREW G. CURTIN, Governor Pennsylvania, Harrisburg, 
Pennsylvania. 
 
SIR:--The application made general authority 
call militia State Pennsylvania received careful 
consideration. anxious desire far possible, 
means power Federal Government protect State 
Pennsylvania invasion rebel since, 
judgment, militia State required, called upon 
you, organize home defense protection, sanction call 
made, receive service pay 
United States extent 
arms belonging General Government 
needed troops called national armies, 
arms furnished quota militia furnished draft 
nine months' men, heretofore ordered. arms may supplied 
militia call, these, 
probably sufficient purpose contemplated call. 
authorized provide may required, according 
regulations United States service, which, upon turned 
United States Department, paid 
regulation prices, rates allowed department 
Railroad transportation also paid for, 
cases. general officers supplied exigencies 
service permit. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 11, 1862 
 
HON. ANDREW G. 
 
Please tell latest news toward 
enemy's movement direction. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL C. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, SEPTEMBER 11, 1862. 6 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Porter, Sigel sent you, 
would sweep everything side river, new 
troops distributed among them, understand. Porter reports 
strong, addition new troops. 
ordered join quickly possible. sending 
hope others follow Porter soon, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., SEPTEMBER 12, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, 
 
look now? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON D.C., SEPTEMBER 12, 1862 
 
HON. ANDREW G. CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
despatch asking troops sent 
Pennsylvania received. Please consider exceed 
troops, properly called, side 
them, many new regiments, close rear 
enemy supposed invading Pennsylvania. Start half 
Harrisburg, enemy turn upon beat remaining half, 
reach part going there, beat 
best possible security Pennsylvania putting 
strongest force possible rear enemy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. G. WRIGHT. 
 
MILITARY TELEGRAPH, WASHINGTON, September 12, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL WRIGHT, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
appealed Louisville withdrawing troops 
place. cannot pretend judge propriety 
doing, would much oblige furnishing rational answer 
make governor others 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 12, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
despatch last evening received. enemy dread 
near you? General 
possible respect you, must think General military 
opinion better. much responsible Louisville 
General Halleck telegraphed subject 
yesterday, telegraph now; us control 
ground would confusion would utterly 
understand Buell be, doing? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C, September 12, 1862. 
 
HON. ALEXANDER HENRY, Philadelphia: 
 
to-day received. General Halleck made best provision 
generals Pennsylvania. Please offended assure 
confident belief Philadelphia danger. Governor 
telegraphed me: "I Jackson crossing 
Potomac Williamsport, probably whole rebel army 
drawn events, Philadelphia miles 
could reached rebel army ten days, 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., September 12, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Governor telegraphs me: 
 
"I Jackson crossing Potomac Williamsport, 
probably whole rebel army 
 
Receiving nothing Harper's Ferry Martinsburg to-day, positive 
information line idea 
enemy crossing Potomac. Please let get without 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
    D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
REPLY REQUEST PRESIDENT ISSUE PROCLAMATION EMANCIPATION. 
 
COMMITTEE RELIGIOUS CHICAGO, 
 
 
 
September 
 
subject presented memorial one upon thought 
much weeks past, may even say months. approached 
opposite opinions advice, religious men, 
equally certain represent Divine will. sure either 
one class mistaken belief, perhaps 
respects both. hope say 
probable God would reveal others, point 
connected duty, might supposed would reveal directly 
me; for, unless deceived often am, 
earnest desire know Providence matter. 
learn it! not, however, days 
suppose granted expect 
direct must study plain physical facts case, 
ascertain possible, learn appears wise right. 
 
subject good men instance, 
day, four gentlemen standing intelligence New York 
called delegation business connected war; 
leaving two earnestly proclaim general 
emancipation, upon two attacked them. 
know also last session Congress decided majority 
antislavery men, yet could unite policy. 
true religious people. Why, rebel soldiers 
great deal fear, troops, expecting 
God favor one soldiers taken 
prisoner told Senator days since met nothing 
discouraging evident sincerity among 
talk merits case. 
 
good would proclamation emancipation do, especially 
want issue document whole 
world see must necessarily like bull 
Would word free slaves, cannot even 
enforce Constitution rebel States? single court, 
magistrate individual would influenced there? 
reason think would greater effect upon 
slaves late law Congress, approved, offers 
protection freedom slaves rebel masters come within 
Yet cannot learn law caused single slave come 
us. suppose could induced proclamation freedom 
throw upon us, them? 
feed care General Butler wrote days 
since issuing rations slaves rushed 
white troops command. eat, 
all; though true General Butler whites also 
nearly amounts there. If, now, pressure 
war call forces New Orleans defend 
point, prevent masters blacks 
slavery again? told whenever rebels take black 
prisoners, free slave, immediately off. 
took boat Tennessee River 
days ago. attacked it! 
instance, when, late battles near Bull Run, expedition 
went Washington flag bury dead bring 
wounded, rebels seized blacks went along help, 
sent slavery, Horace Greeley said paper 
government would probably nothing it. could do? 
 
Now, then, tell me, please, possible result good would 
follow issuing proclamation Understand, 
raise objections legal constitutional for, 
commander-in-chief army navy, time war suppose 
right take measure may best enemy; 
urge objections moral nature, view possible consequences 
insurrection massacre South. view matter practical 
war measure, decided according advantages 
may offer suppression rebellion. 
 
admit slavery root rebellion, least 
ambition politicians may act, 
would without slavery instrument. 
also concede emancipation would help us Europe, convince 
something ambition. grant, further, 
would help somewhat North, though much, fear, 
represent imagine. Still, additional strength would 
added way war, then, would weaken 
rebels drawing laborers, great 
sure could much blacks. arm 
them, fear weeks arms would hands 
and, indeed, thus far arms enough 
white troops. mention another thing, though meet 
fifty thousand Union armies 
border slave States. would serious matter if, consequence 
proclamation desire, go 
think many, indeed, year ago, 
six months many to-day yesterday. Every day increases 
Union feeling. also getting pride want 
beat Let say one thing think admit 
already important principle rally unite people, 
fact constitutional government fundamental 
idea going deep anything. 
 
misunderstand mentioned 
indicate difficulties thus far prevented action 
way desire. decided proclamation 
liberty slaves, hold matter 
assure subject mind, day night, 
other. Whatever shall appear God's will, do. trust 
freedom views 
respect injured feelings. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. G. WRIGHT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 14, 1862. 
 
GENERAL WRIGHT, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
Thanks despatch. pursue retreating enemy, 
relieve Cumberland 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, 
 
September 15, 1862. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch to-day received. God bless you, you. Destroy 
rebel army possible. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. K. DUBOIS. WASHINGTON, D.C., 
 
September 15, 1862. 3 P.M. 
 
HON. K. Springfield, 
 
consider safe say General McClellan gained great 
victory great rebel army Maryland, 
pursuing flying 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
catch them! D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN, 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., September 16, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, 
 
hear General McClellan's nothing 
to-day. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 17, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR O. P. MORTON, Indianapolis, 
 
received despatch regard recommendations General 
Wright. received despatch him, least 
remember. refer General consideration. 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 20, 1862. 
 
GENERAL Springfield, 
 
many regiments Illinois, ready service want 
many arms ready 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRELIMINARY EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION, SEPTEMBER 22, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States America 
Commander-in-Chief Army Navy thereof, hereby proclaim 
declare hereafter, heretofore, war 
object practically restoring constitutional relation 
United States States people thereof 
States relation may suspended 
 
purpose, upon next meeting Congress, 
recommend adoption practical measure tendering pecuniary aid 
free acceptance slave States, called, 
people whereof may rebellion United States, 
States may voluntarily adopted, thereafter may 
voluntarily immediate gradual abolishment slavery within 
respective limits; effort persons 
African descent consent upon continent elsewhere, 
previously obtained consent governments existing there, 

 
1st day January, A.D. 1863, persons held slaves 
within State designated part State people whereof 
shall rebellion United States shall then, 
thenceforward, forever free; executive government 
United States, including military naval authority thereof, 
recognize maintain freedom persons act 
acts repress persons, them, efforts may make 
actual freedom. 
 
 
Executive 1st day January aforesaid, 
proclamation, designate States parts States, any, 
people thereof, respectively, shall rebellion 
United States; fact State people thereof shall 
day good faith represented Congress United States 
members chosen thereto elections wherein majority qualified 
voters State shall participated shall, absence 
strong testimony, deemed conclusive evidence 
State people thereof rebellion United 
States. 
 
attention hereby called act Congress entitled "An act 
make additional article approved March 13, 1862, act 
words figure following: 
 
"Be enacted Senate House Representatives United 
States America Congress assembled, hereafter following 
shall additional article war government 
Army United States shall obeyed observed such. 
 
officers persons military naval service 
United States prohibited employing forces 
respective commands purpose returning fugitives service 
labor may escaped person, service labor 
claimed due, officer shall found guilty 
court-martial violating article shall dismissed 
service. 
 
2. act shall take effect 

 
Also ninth tenth sections act entitled "An act 
suppress insurrection, punish treason rebellion, seize 
confiscate property rebels, purposes," approved July 
17, 1862, sections words figures following: 
 
 
9. slaves persons shall 
hereafter engaged rebellion Government United 
States, shall way give aid comfort thereto, escaping 
persons taking refuge within lines army, 
slaves captured persons deserted coming 
control Government United States, slaves 
persons found within place occupied rebel forces 
afterwards occupied forces United States, shall deemed 
war shall forever free 
held slaves. 
 
9. slave escaping State, 
Territory, District Columbia State shall 
delivered way liberty, except 
crime, offence laws, unless person claiming 
said fugitive shall first make oath person labor 
service fugitive alleged due lawful owner, 
borne arms United States present rebellion, 
way given aid comfort person engaged 
military naval service United States shall, pretense 
whatever, assume decide validity claim person 
service labor person, surrender person 
pain dismissed 
 
hereby enjoin upon order persons engaged military 
naval service United States 
within respective spheres service, act sections 

 
Executive due time recommend citizens 
United States shall remained loyal thereto throughout 
rebellion shall restoration constitutional relation 
United States respective States people, 
relation shall suspended compensated 
losses acts United States, including loss slaves. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done City Washington, twenty-second day September, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-two, 
independence United States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SUSPENDING WRIT HABEAS CORPUS, 
 
SEPTEMBER 24, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas become necessary call service volunteers, 
also portions militia States draft, order 
suppress insurrection existing United States, disloyal 
persons restrained ordinary processes law 
measure, giving aid comfort various 
ways 
 
Now, therefore, ordered 
 
First. existing insurrection, necessary measure 
suppressing same, rebels insurgents, 
within United States, persons discouraging volunteer 
resisting militia guilty disloyal practice 
affording aid comfort rebels authority 
United States, shall subject martial law, liable trial 
punishment military 
 
Second. writ habeas corpus suspended respect 
persons arrested, now, hereafter rebellion shall 
be, fort camp, military prison 
place military authority sentence 
court-martial military 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city WASHINGTON, twenty-fourth day A.D. 
eighteen hundred sixty-two, independence United 
States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY SERENADE, SEPTEMBER 24, 1862. 
 
appear little acknowledge 
pay me, thank it. distinctly informed 
occasion appear honor, though 
suppose proclamation. did, 
full heavy solemn sense 
responsibility. trust God made mistake. shall 
make attempt occasion sustain done said 
country world pass judgment and, 
take action upon it. 
 
say upon subject. position 
difficulties. Yet scarcely great difficulties 
upon battle-field endeavoring purchase blood 
lives future happiness prosperity country. Let us 
never forget them. fourteenth days present 
month battles successfully 
yet know Let us sure that, giving 
praise certain individuals, injustice others. ask 
you, conclusion remarks, give three hearty cheers 
good brave officers men fought successful 

 
 
 
 
RECORD MAJOR JOHN J. KEY 
 
MILITARY SERVICE UNITED STATES. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
September 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR JOHN J. 
 
informed that, answer question, "Why rebel army 
immediately battle near propounded 
Major C. Judge etc., said: "That 
object is, neither army shall get much advantage 
other; shall kept field till 
make compromise save slavery." 
 
shall happy will, within twenty-four hours 
receipt this, prove Major Turner not, either 
literally substance, make answer stated. 
 
delivered Major Key a.m. September 
 
11 o'clock A.M., September 27, 1862, Major Key Major Turner 
appeared me. Major Turner says: 
 
"As remember it, conversation 
battle Major reply 
rebels 
way Union could preserved, come together 
slavery 
 
Major Turner says frequently heard Major Key 
converse regard present never heard utter 
sentiment maintenance Union. never 
uttered anything he, Major would call particular 
conversation detailed private one. 
 
           
 
view, wholly gentleman holding military 
commission United States utter sentiments Major Key 
within proved done. Therefore, let Major John J. Key forthwith 
dismissed military service United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
September 28, 1862. 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
DEAR SIR: kind letter 25th received. known 
that, hope something proclamation, expectations 
sanguine friends. time effect 
come; effect 
six days old, and, newspapers 
distinguished individuals vain man could wish, 
troops come forward slowly ever. This, looked 
face, satisfactory. fewer troops 
field end six days 
among old addition new. North 
proclamation sufficiently breath alone 

 
wish could write thank less 
kindness letter. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
McCLELLAN'S October 3, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
General rebel army, sent prisoners 
flag terms prevent fighting 
Indians, evidently seeking commit us right 
prisoners way. inclination send prisoners back 
definite notice recognize given prisoners 
rebels extending beyond prohibition fighting them, 
though wish opinion upon it, based upon general law 
wish avoid violations law bad faith. Answer 
quickly possible, thing, done all, done once. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS ARMY POTOMAC MARYLAND, 
 
OCTOBER, 4, 1862. 
 
surrounded soldiers little farther citizens 
good City Nevertheless say, five 
minutes ago, proper make speeches present 
position. return thanks soldiers good services 
energy shown, endured, 
blood shed Union ours; also return 
soldiers, good citizens 
good men, women, children land ours, devotion 
glorious cause; say malice heart towards 
done otherwise. May children children's children, 
thousand continue enjoy benefits conferred upon 
us united country, cause yet rejoice glorious 
institutions, us WASHINGTON Now, 
friends, soldiers citizens, say 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HALLECK 
 
GENERAL G. B. WASHINGTON, D. C., October 6, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
instructed telegraph follows: President directs 
cross Potomac give battle enemy, drive south. 
army must move now, roads good. cross river 
enemy Washington, cover latter 
reinforced thirty thousand men. move valley 
Shenandoah, twelve fifteen thousand sent you. 
President interior line Washington enemy, 
order it. desirous army move soon 
possible. immediately report line 
intend cross river; also point reinforcements 
necessary plan operations positively 
determined on, orders given building bridges 
directed add Secretary War 
General-in-chief fully concur President directions. 
 
H. W. HALLECK, General-in-Chief. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 7, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN, Army Potomac: 
 
wish see family wish oblige you. might left 
certainly so, Mrs. M. could meet 
Washington. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. H. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 8, 1862. 
 
THOMAS H. CLAY, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
cannot reflected seriously ask shall order 
General command Kentucky favor 
Cumberland precedent established would evidently break 
whole army. old troops, pursuit done 
hard marching and, fact, include marching 
fighting, scarcely old troops east west mountains 
done hard service. sincerely wish war easier 
business is; admit 
command, understand, depends 
question whether enemy get Ohio River another place. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., October 8, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
congratulate concerned recent battles 
sum especially regret death General 
anxious know condition General 
intimate personal friend. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 4 P.M. 
 
GENERAL BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
Please send news General Buell to-day. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. T. BOYLE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 12, 1862. P.M. 
 
GENERAL BOYLE, Louisville, Kentucky: 
 
anxious hear General army. heard nothing 
since day yesterday. anything? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., October 12, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, Saint Louis, Missouri: 
 
Would completion railroad distance 
direction Springfield, Mo., military advantage you? Please 
answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 13, 1862. 
 
DEAR remember speaking called 
assume 
cannot enemy constantly doing? claim 
least equal act upon 
 
understand, telegraphed General Halleck cannot 
army Winchester unless railroad Harper's Ferry 
point put working order. enemy army 
Winchester, distance nearly twice great railroad 
transportation would do, without railroad last 
wagons twice far 
would Harper's certainly 
half well provided wagons are. certainly 
pleased advantage railroad Harper's 
remainder autumn give you, 
and, fact, question time, cannot must 

 
Again, one standard maxims war, know, "to operate 
upon enemy's communications much possible, without 
seem act applies you, cannot apply 
favor. Change positions enemy, think would 
break communication Richmond within next twenty-four 
dread going Pennsylvania. full force, 
gives communications nothing 
follow ruin him; less full force, fall 
upon beat left behind 
 
Exclusive water line, nearer Richmond enemy 
is, route must take. reach 
him, unless admit equal 
route 
roads good his. 
 
know desired, order, cross Potomac 
instead Shenandoah Blue idea was, 
would menace enemy's communications, would seize 
would permit. move would follow 
holding prevent seizing 
communications, move toward Richmond, would press closely him, 
fight favorable opportunity present, least try 
beat Richmond inside say never 
shall never succeed. makes stand Winchester, moving neither 
north south, would fight there, idea cannot 
beat bears coming us, never 
bear going him. proposition simple truth, 
important lost sight moment. coming us 
us advantage 
operate merely drive away. must beat somewhere fail 
finally, it, all, easier near us far away. 
cannot beat enemy is, never can, within 
Richmond. 
 
indeed, enemy let back Richmond took another two 
years thousands dead 
was. still think evidence overwhelming 
was, either secretly South, or, 
politician different Presidency 
United 
 
idea going Richmond inside track, 
facility supplying side away enemy 
were, different wheel extending toward 
whether move directly inside 
Blue Ridge line, see, 
carries Hay see 
railroads, finally Potomac, meet 
points WASHINGTON; same, lines little, 
press Blue Ridge part way. 
 
Blue Ridge understand following 
distances Harper's Ferry, wit: 5 
Manassas, 
think preferable take route nearest enemy, 
make important move without knowledge, 
keep forces together dread you. 
would enable attack great part 
way would practically enemy WASHINGTON 
Richmond, enabling us spare greatest number troops 
here. length running Richmond ahead enables 
move way, so, turn attack think 
engaged long point reached. easy 
troops march well enemy, say 
cannot it. letter sense order. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., October 16, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR Virginia: 
 
despatch to-day received. sorry offended you. 
appointed thought, written recommendation, 
also testimony although know 
preferred different man. examine to-morrow whether mistaken 
this. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE ORDER ESTABLISHING PROVISIONAL COURT LOUISIANA. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, 
 
October 20, 1862. 
 
insurrection time prevailed several 
States Union, including Louisiana, temporarily 
swept away civil institutions State, including 
judiciary judicial authorities Union, 
become necessary hold State military Occupation, 
necessary shall judicial tribunal 
existing capable administering justice, therefore thought 
proper hereby provisional court, 
shall court record, State Louisiana; 
hereby appoint Charles New York, provisional judge 
hold said court, authority determine 
civil including causes law, revenue, 
particularly powers jurisdiction belong 
district circuit courts United States, conforming 
proceedings far possible course proceedings practice 
customary courts United States Louisiana, 
judgment final hereby authorize 
said judge make establish rules regulations 
may necessary exercise 
said judge appoint marshal, clerk 
said court, shall perform functions marshal, 
clerk according proceedings practice mentioned 
rules regulations may made established said judge. 
appointments continue pleasure President, 
extending beyond military occupation city New Orleans 
restoration civil authority city State 
Louisiana. officers shall paid, fund 
War Department, compensation follows: 
 
judge rate per 
including fees, rate per marshal, including 
fees, rate per including 
fees, rate per certified 
Secretary War. copy order, certified Secretary 
War delivered judge, shall deemed held 
sufficient 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
President United States. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
October 21, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL U. S. GRANT: 
 
bearer this, Thomas R. Smith, citizen Tennessee, goes 
State seeking people thereof desire avoid 
unsatisfactory prospect them, peace upon 
old terms, Constitution United States, manifest 
desire elections members Congress United States 
perhaps Legislature, State officers, United 
States senator friendly object. 
 
shall glad aid him, others acting 
object, much possible. available ways give 
people show express wishes elections. 
 
Follow law, forms law, far convenient, events get 
expression largest number people possible. see 
action connect affect proclamation September 
course men elected gentlemen character, willing 
swear support Constitution old, known 
reasonable suspicion 
 
respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 21, 1862. 
 
GENERAL Upper 
 
health now? wish R. P. 
restored 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN'S TIRED HORSES 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, October 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
read despatch 
pardon asking horses army done since 
battle anything? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, October 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Yours, reply mine horses, received. course know 
facts better still two considerations cavalry 
ours, certainly done marked service 
everywhere since. Secondly, movement army 
relief cavalry, enemy concentrate instead 
learn 
despatch General Halleck begin crossing river 
morning. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL DIX. 
 
(Private confidential.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON October 26, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe, Virginia: 
 
despatch Mr. Stanton, enclosed copy, 
handed him. would dangerous begin 
making specific applications proclamation. 
 
obvious therein intended give time 
Also, seen left liberty exempt parts States. 
Without saying more, shall glad Congressional district 
will, good faith, despatch 
 
Could give facts prompted 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 27, 1862, 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
yesterday received. certainly intend injustice any, 
done deeply regret it. told, 
five total army, period 
sent army every fresh horse possibly could, amounting 
whole cavalry horses much move, 
presents almost prospect future, 
may forced something despatch. 
recruited rested then, could ever be? suppose river 
glad believe 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 27, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch 3 P.M. to-day, regard filling old regiments 
drafted men, received, request therein shall complied 
far 
 
ask distinct answer question, purpose 
go action men drafted States 
incorporated old 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 29, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatches night last, yesterday, last night 
received. much pleased movement army. get 
entirely across river let know. know enemy? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 30, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, 
 
means seen despatch 27th order 
moment. learn, knew nothing before, 
history order follows: 
 
General McClellan telegraphed asking General Halleck 
order made, General Halleck went Secretary War it, stating 
approval plan. Secretary assented General Halleck wrote 
order. military question, Secretary supposed 
General understood better 
 
wish could see Governor Curtin. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 31, 1862. 
 
ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Louisville, Ky.: 
 
29th received. shall take General Halleck, 
already know inconvenient take General command 
is. glad hear speak Tennessee. 
sincerely hope Rosecrans may find possible something her. 
David son M. C. State, father's final 
asks situation. know him? Could 
service Tennessee capacity could send him? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
November 1, 1862. 
 
MAY Captain company, 
time keeping guard 
company agreeable me, deemed proper 
guard remain, none would satisfactory Captain 
company. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN 
 
MAKING 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, November 5, 1862. 
 
direction President, ordered Major-General McClellan 
relieved command Army Potomac, 
Major-General Burnside take command army. Also 
Major-General Hunter take command corps said army 
commanded General Burnside. Major-General John Porter 
relieved command corps commands said army, 
Major-General Hooker take command said 
 
general-in-chief discretion, issue order 
substantially soon may deem proper. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM M. F. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, November 5, 1862. 
 
HON. M. F. New York: 
 
re-elected. wish see Please 
answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 
 
COL. W. W. Fort Henry, Tennessee: 
 
yesterday received. Governor Johnson, Mr. others 
looking thing telegraphed about. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. POPE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 10, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL POPE, St. Paul, 
 
despatch giving names Indians condemned death 
received. Please forward soon possible full complete record 
record fully indicate 
guilty influential please careful statement 
made points forwarded me. Send mail. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COMMODORE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 11, 1862. 
 
COMMODORE 
 
DEAR introduce Major-General Banks. command 
considerable land force operating South, shall glad 
co-Operate give assistance 
consistently orders Navy Department. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING BLOCKADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 12, 1862. 
 
Ordered, issued Treasury Department 
vessels merchandise bound port Norfolk, military 
necessities department, certified military commandant 
Fort Monroe, shall allowed enter said 
 
vessels domestic produce Norfolk, permitted 
military commandant Fort Monroe military purposes 
command, shall permit allowed pass said port 
port United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING CONFISCATION ACT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, November 13, 1862. 
 
Ordered, President United States, Attorney-General 
charged direction proceedings 
act Congress 17th July, 1862, entitled "An act 
suppress insurrection, punish treason rebellion, seize 
confiscate property rebels, purposes," far 
may concern condemnation 
property, effects rebels mentioned provided 
sixth, seventh sections said act Congress. 
Attorney-General authorized required give 
United States instructions 
directions may find needful convenient touching 
and, moreover, authorize 
whenever may reasonable ground 
fear resistance discharge respective 
duties call upon military officer command 
forces United States give aid, protection, 
support may necessary enable safely 
discharge respective commanding officers 
required promptly obey call, render necessary service 
far may power consistently duties. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  EDWARD Attorney-General 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, November 14, 1862. 
 
ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Tennessee: 
 
despatch returning troops western Virginia 
Tennessee, received, General Halleck it. 
says order already made troops already 
soon move, Tennessee. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL ORDER RESPECTING OBSERVANCE DAY 
 
ARMY NAVY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 15, 1862. 
 
 
President, Commander-in-Chief Army Navy, desires 
observance officers men 
military naval service. importance man beast 
prescribed rest, sacred rights Christian soldiers 
becoming deference best sentiment Christian people, 
due regard divine demand Sunday labor army 
navy reduced measure strict necessity. 
 
discipline character national forces suffer 
cause defend day name 
"At time public adopting words 
Washington may find enough service God 
country without abandoning vice 
first general order issued Father Country 
Declaration Independence spirit institutions 
founded ever 
 
"The General hopes every officer man endeavor 
live act becomes Christian soldier defending rights 
liberties country." 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BLAIR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 
 
HON. F. P. 
 
brother says ordered join General 
suppose ordered means 
form part expedition moves river; 
General see General Halleck whether 
additional force mention go you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., November 18, 1861. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe: 
 
Please give best opinion number enemy 
Richmond also 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 21, 1862. 
 
HON. G. F. 
 
DEAR bearer this, apprehension 
Federal officers citizens Louisiana may set candidates 
Congress State. view could possible object 
election. particularly need members Congress 
enable us get along legislation here. want 
conclusive evidence respectable citizens Louisiana willing 
members Congress swear support Constitution, 
respectable citizens willing vote 
send them. send parcel Northern men representatives, 
elected, would understood (and perhaps really point 
bayonet, would member 
Congress here, would vote admitting man seat. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
ORDER PROHIBITING ARMS MUNITIONS WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
November 21, 1862. 
 
Ordered, arms, ammunition, munitions war cleared 
allowed exported United States orders. 
arms, ammunition, munitions war issued heretofore 
Treasury Department articles passed 
without United States, articles stopped. Secretary 
War hold possession arms, etc., recently seized order 
Point, bound 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TACTICS GENERALS 
 
GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 22, 1862. 
 
DEAR GENERAL last week left high hope 
assurance would expedition end 
week, early this. end this, 
overwhelmed sight made 
which, cannot filled got within hour short 
two months. enclose copy hope 
never seen it. dear General, 
been, far, almost 
final ruin articles 
upon necessary animals make 
use, could get vessels 
together two weeks carry whole, say nothing twenty 
thousand men; and, vessels, could put 
aboard two weeks more. And, all, going 
use them. parted ideas mind. 
know not, could expected soon 
said. must get back something like plan then, 
expedition failure start. must 
Congress would better anywhere, especially 
going, thousand wagons nothing 
feed animals draw them, taking least two 
thousand men care wagons otherwise might 
two thousand good soldiers. Now, dear General, think 
letter; simple publication 
would ruin you. 
 
truly friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CARL SCHURZ. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 24, 1862. 
 
GENERAL CARL SCHURZ. 
 
DEAR received read letter 
lost late elections administration 
failing war must flatter 
justly blame it. certainly know 
war fails administration blamed 
it, whether deserve not. ought blamed could 
better. think could therefore blame 
think could therefore blame me. 
understand willing accept help men 
Republicans, provided it." Agreed. want others. 
judge hearts, must 
discard judgment take yours, must also take others 
time reject advised 
none left, Republicans others even yourself. 
dear sir, men think 
performing part think performing mine. 
certainly dissatisfied Buell 
relieved great fears find successors 
would sorry add seen little 
since relieve 
 
see clearly prospect rapid fear 
shall last find difficulty case rather 
particular wish one certainly 
me; must say need success need 
sympathy, seen much greater evidence getting 
success denounced 
contrary. seem field two classes 
much alike done failed do. 
faith blood, Baker 
Republicans, men could do; 
none 
Republicans, least bitterly repeatedly 
denounced secession perform 
task cases 
 
answer question, "Has publicly stated 
newspapers, apparently proved fact, commencement 
war enemy continually supplied information 
confidential important officer Adjutant-General 
must say "No," far knowledge add 
give tangible evidence upon subject, thank 
come city so. 
 
truly friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, November 25, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Virginia: 
 
boat dark 
evening, could you, without meet pass hour two 
me? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ATTORNEY-GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
November 29, 1862. 
 
HON. 
 
DEAR things question 
Governor Gamble War Department, whether peculiar force 
organized former Missouri State troops United States 
troops. Now, either immaterial mischievous question. 
First, desired settled name force 
called by, Secondly, desired 
fixing name, get position 
draw practical Instead settling one 
dispute deciding question, merely furnish 
eggs new believe force strictly either 
States mixed character. 
therefore think practical question 
decide question directly, indirectly deciding general 
supposed include it, also including great deal more. 
Without dispute Governor Gamble officers force, 
vacancies question practically dispute 
is: Governor Gamble make vacancy removing officer accepting 
Now, proper question shall 
settled, perceive either Governor Gamble government 
care way settled. 
seems it. seems 
might either way without injury offer 
Secretary War let Governor Gamble make (the 
ratify making them, ought satisfactory. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WASHINGTON, November 30, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, Saint Louis, Missouri: 
 
Frank Blair wants Twenty seventh, 
Twenty-fourth Ninth Tenth Cavalry go 
river. understand decide whether shall 
so, also consistent public service, 
oblige good deal letting them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTING INDIANS 
 
LETTER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 1, 1862. 
 

 
hundred Indians sentenced death Minnesota 
military commission, execution action. wish 
legal opinion whether conclude execute part them, 
must designate which, could leave 
officer 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS, DECEMBER 1, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE 
last annual assembling another year health harvests 
passed; pleased Almighty bless us 
return peace, press on, guided best light gives 
us, trusting good time wise way yet well. 
 
correspondence touching foreign affairs taken place 
last year herewith submitted, compliance request 
effect, made House Representatives near close 
last session Congress. 
 
condition relations nations less gratifying 
usually former certainly 
satisfactory nation distracted might 
reasonably month June last 
grounds expect maritime powers which, beginning 
domestic difficulties, think, 
recognized insurgents would soon 
position, proved less injurious 
country. temporary afterward 
national arms, exaggerated disloyal citizens 
abroad, hitherto delayed act simple justice. 
 
civil war, radically changed, moment, 
habits American people, necessarily disturbed 
social condition, affected deeply prosperity, 
nations carried commerce steadily 
increasing throughout period half century. has, 
time, excited political apprehensions produced 
profound agitation throughout civilized world. unusual 
agitation forborne taking part controversy 
foreign states, parties states. 
attempted acknowledged revolution, left 
every nation exclusive conduct management affairs. 
struggle been, course, contemplated foreign nations 
reference less merits supposed often 
exaggerated effects consequences resulting nations 
themselves, nevertheless, complaint part government, even 
just, would certainly 
 
treaty Great Britain suppression slave trade 
put operation good prospect complete success. 
occasion special pleasure acknowledge execution 
part Majesty's government marked jealous 
respect authority United States rights 
moral loyal citizens. 
 
convention Hanover abolition state dues 
carried full effect act Congress purpose. 
 
blockade miles could established 
enforced season great commercial activity like 
present without committing occasional mistakes 
injuries upon foreign nations subjects. 
 
civil war occurring country foreigners reside carry 
trade treaty stipulations necessarily fruitful complaints 
violation neutral rights. tend excite 
possibly produce mutual 
nations common interest preserving peace 
clear cases far possible heard 
complaints presented friendly powers. 
still, however, large augmenting number doubtful cases 
upon government unable agree governments whose 
protection demanded are, moreover, many cases 
United States citizens suffer wrongs naval 
military authorities foreign nations governments 
states prepared proposed 
foreign states thus interested mutual conventions examine adjust 
proposition made especially Great 
Britain, France, Spain, case 
kindly received, yet formally adopted. 
 
deem duty recommend appropriation behalf owners 
Admiral P. vessel May, 1861, 
prevented commander blockading force Charleston 
leaving port cargo, notwithstanding similar privilege 
shortly granted English directed 
Secretary State cause papers case communicated 
proper 
 
Applications made many free Americans African 
descent favor view colonization 
contemplated recent acts Congress, parties, home 
interested motives, others upon patriotic 
considerations, still others influenced 
suggested similar measures, while, hand, 
several Spanish American protested 
sending colonies respective territories. 
circumstances declined move colony state without 
first obtaining consent government, agreement 
part receive protect rights 
time offered several states situated within 
colonies there, them, subject 
advice consent Senate, favor voluntary emigration 
persons class respective territories, upon conditions 
shall equal, just, yet 
countries colonists African descent could go 
certainty received adopted regret 
say persons contemplating colonization seem willing 
countries others, willing think 
interest believe, however, opinion among 
respect ere long augmented 
considerable countries United States. 
 
new commercial treaty United States 
carried execution. 
 
commercial consular treaty negotiated, subject 
consent, Liberia, similar negotiation pending 
Republic considerable improvement national 
commerce expected result measures. 
 
relations Great Britain, France, Spain, Russia, 

European states remain favorable relations also 
continue maintained China, 
 
last year change previous 
relations independent states continent, 
friendly sentiments heretofore existed believed 
entertained whose safety progress 
intimately connected own. statement especially applies 
Mexico, Nicaragua, Costa Peru, 
 
commission convention Republic New Granada 
closed session without passed upon claims 
submitted it. proposition pending revive 
convention, may able complete justice. joint 
commission United States Republic Costa 
completed labors submitted report. 
 
favored project connecting United States Europe 
Atlantic telegraph, similar project extend telegraph 
San connect Pacific telegraph line 
extended across Russian Empire. 
 
Territories United States, unimportant exceptions, 
remained civil war; exhibiting 
evidence prosperity justifies expectation 
soon condition organized States constitutionally 
admitted Federal Union. 
 
immense mineral resources Territories ought 
developed rapidly possible. Every step direction would 
tendency improve revenues government 
burdens people. worthy serious consideration whether 
extraordinary measures promote end cannot adopted. 
means suggests likely effective scientific 
mineral regions Territories view 
publication results home foreign 
cannot fail 
 
condition finances win claim consideration. 
vast expenditures incident military naval operations 
required suppression rebellion hitherto met 
certainty unusual similar circumstances, 
public credit fully maintained. continuance war, 
however, increased disbursements made necessary augmented 
forces field demand best reflections best modes 
providing necessary revenue without injury business 
least possible burdens upon labor. 
 
suspension specie payments banks soon commencement 
last session made large issues United States notes 
way could payment troops satisfaction 
demands well provided for. judicious 
legislation Congress, securing notes 
loans internal duties making legal tender debts, 
made universal currency, satisfied, partially 
least, time, want uniform circulating 
saving thereby people immense sums 

 
return specie however, earliest period compatible 
due regard interests concerned ever kept view. 
value currency always reduce 
lowest possible point always 
leading purpose wise legislation. prompt certain 
generally acknowledged best 
them; extremely doubtful whether 
circulation United States notes payable sufficiently large 
wants people permanently, safely 
maintained. 
 
there, then, mode necessary provision 
public wants made great advantages safe uniform 
currency 
 
know none promises certain results time 
unobjectionable organization banking 
general act Congress, well guarded provisions. 
government might furnish circulating notes, 
security United States bonds treasury. notes, 
prepared supervision proper officers, uniform 
appearance security always would 
protect labor evils currency facilitate 
commerce cheap safe 
 
moderate interest bonds would compensate 
United States preparation distribution notes 
general supervision system, would burden 
part public debt employed public credit, 
moreover, would greatly improved negotiation new loans 
greatly steady market demand government bonds 
adoption proposed system would 
 
additional recommendation measure, considerable 
judgment, would far possible existing 
interests opportunity offered existing institutions 
act, substituting secured uniform national 
circulation local various secured 
issued them. 
 
receipts treasury sources, including loans 
balance preceding year, fiscal year ending 30th 
June, 1862, sum derived 
direct public lands, 
miscellaneous sources, loans 
forms, balance 
last year. 
 
disbursements period 
executive, judicial purposes, foreign intercourse, 
miscellaneous expenses, including loans, 
post-office collection revenue, like charges, 
expenses Interior Department, 
War Department, Navy Department, 
interest public debt, 
payment public debt, including temporary loan 
making aggregate 
leaving balance treasury 1st day July, 1862, 

 
observed sum expended 
redemption public debt, included also 
loans made, may properly receipts expenditures, 
leaving actual receipts year 
expenditures 
 
information subject finances found 
report Secretary Treasury, whose statements views 
invite candid considerate attention. 
 
reports Secretaries War Navy herewith 
transmitted. though scarcely brief 
numerous extensive transactions operations 
conducted could give summary 
upon principle would admit much shorter 
reports themselves. therefore content laying reports 
asking attention them. 
 
gives pleasure report decided improvement financial 
condition Post-Office Department compared several preceding 
years. receipts fiscal year 1861 amounted 
embraced revenue States Union three 
quarters year. Notwithstanding cessation revenue 
so-called seceded States last fiscal year, increase 
correspondence loyal States sufficient produce 
revenue year less 
derived States Union previous 
year. expenditures show still favorable result. amount 
expended 1861 last year amount 
reduced showing decrease 
expenditures compared preceding year, 
compared fiscal year 1860. deficiency department 
previous year last fiscal year 
reduced favorable results part owing 
cessation mail service insurrectionary States part 
careful review expenditures department interest 
efficiency postal service, believed, 
also much improved. Postmaster-General also opened 
correspondence Department State foreign governments 
proposing convention postal representatives purpose 
rates foreign postage foreign 
proposition, equally important adopted citizens 
commercial interests country, favorably entertained 
agreed governments received. 
 
ask attention Congress suggestions 
Postmaster-General report respecting legislation 
required, opinion, benefit postal service. 
 
Secretary Interior reports follows regard public 

 
"The public lands ceased source 1st 
July, 1861, 30th September, 1862, entire cash receipts 
sale lands sum much less expenses 
land system period. homestead law, take 
effect 1st January next, offers settlers 
sales cash cannot expected extent sufficient meet 
expenses General Land Office cost surveying bringing 
land 
 
sum stated arising sales 
public lands sum derived source reported 
Treasury Department understand, fact 
periods time, though apparently really 
beginning point, Treasury report including considerable sum 
previously reported Interior, sufficiently large 
greatly sum derived three months reported 
upon Interior Treasury. 
 
Indian tribes upon past year manifested 
spirit several points engaged open 
hostilities white settlements vicinity. tribes 
occupying Indian country south Kansas allegiance 
United States entered treaties insurgents. 
remained loyal United States driven country. 
chief visited city purpose restoring 
former relations United States. 
constrained superior force enter treaties 
insurgents, United States neglected furnish protection 
treaty stipulations required. 
 
month August last Indians Minnesota attacked 
settlements vicinity extreme 
men, women, children. attack wholly 
therefore means defense provided. 
estimated less persons killed Indians, 
large amount property induced 
definitely known, may need 
stated. Information received Indian Bureau different 
sources time hostilities commenced simultaneous 
attack made upon white settlements tribes 
Mississippi River Rocky State Minnesota 
suffered great injury Indian war. large portion 
territory severe loss sustained 
destruction property. people State manifest much 
anxiety removal tribes beyond limits State 
future Commissioner Indian Affairs 
furnish full submit especial consideration 
whether Indian system shall Many wise good men 
impressed belief profitably done. 
 
submit statement proceedings commissioners, shows 
progress made enterprise constructing Pacific 
Railroad. suggests earliest completion road, also 
favorable action Congress upon pending 
enlarging capacities great New York Illinois, 
vital rapidly increasing importance whole nation, 
especially vast interior region noticed 
greater length. purpose prepared laid 
early day interesting valuable statistical information upon 
subject. military commercial importance enlarging Illinois 
Michigan Canal improving Illinois River presented 
report Colonel Webster Secretary War, transmitted 
Congress. respectfully ask attention it. 
 
carry provisions act Congress 15th May 
last, caused Department Agriculture United States 
organized. 
 
Commissioner informs within period months 
department established extensive system correspondence 
home abroad, promises effect highly 
beneficial results development correct knowledge recent 
improvements agriculture, introduction new products, 
collection agricultural statistics different States. 
 
Also, soon prepared largely 
already published liberally 
much valuable information anticipation elaborate report, 
due time furnished, embracing valuable 
science progress 
 
creation department immediate benefit 
large class valuable citizens, trust 
liberal basis upon organized meet 
realize distant day 
sanguine friends become fruitful source 
advantage people. 
 
22d day September last proclamation issued 
Executive, copy herewith 
 
accordance purpose expressed second paragraph 
paper, respectfully recall attention may called 

 
nation may said consist territory, people, 
laws. territory part certain 
"One generation away another generation earth 
first importance duly consider 
estimate ever enduring part. portion earth's surface 
owned inhabited people United States well 
adapted home one national family, well 
adapted two more. vast extent variety climate 
productions advantage age one people, whatever 
might former ages. intelligence 
brought advantageous combination one united people. 
 
inaugural address briefly pointed total 
disunion remedy differences people 
two sections. language cannot which, 
therefore, beg 
 
"One section country believes slavery right ought 
extended, believes wrong ought 
extended. substantial dispute. fugitive-slave clause 
Constitution laws suppression foreign slave 
trade well enforced, perhaps, law ever 
community moral Sense people imperfectly supports law 
itself. great body people abide dry legal obligation 
cases, break each. This, think, cannot 
perfectly would worse cases separation 
sections before. foreign slave trade, imperfectly 
suppressed, would ultimately revived without restriction one 
section, fugitive slaves, partially surrendered, would 
surrendered other. 
 
speaking, separate. remove 
respective sections build impassable wall 
them. husband wife may go presence 
beyond reach other, different parts country 
cannot this. cannot remain face face, intercourse, 
either amicable hostile, must continue them. possible, 
then, make intercourse advantageous satisfactory 
separation before? aliens make treaties easier friends 
make laws? treaties faithfully enforced aliens 
laws among friends? Suppose go war, cannot fight 
always; when, much loss sides gain either, 
cease fighting, identical old questions, terms intercourse, 
upon you." 
 
line, straight suitable national boundary 
upon Trace through, east west, upon line 
free slave country, shall find little 
one third length rivers, easy populated, 
soon populated, upon nearly 
remaining length merely lines, people may walk 
back forth without consciousness presence. part 
line made difficult pass writing 
paper national boundary. fact separation, 
comes, gives part seceding section fugitive-slave 
clause along constitutional obligations upon section 
seceded from, expect treaty stipulation would ever 
made take place. 
 
another difficulty. great interior region bounded east 
north British west Rocky 
Mountains, south line along culture corn 
cotton includes part Virginia, part Tennessee, 
Kentucky, Ohio, Indiana, Michigan, Wisconsin, Illinois, Missouri, 
Kansas, Iowa, Minnesota, Territories Nebraska, part 
Colorado, already people, 
within fifty years prevented political folly mistake. 
contains one third country owned United 
square miles. half populous 
Massachusetts already is, would people. 
glance map shows that, speaking, great 
body Republic. parts marginal borders it, 
magnificent region sloping west Rocky Mountains Pacific 
deepest also resources. 
production provisions, proceed 
great interior region naturally one important 
world. Ascertain statistics small proportion region 
yet brought also large rapidly 
increasing amount products, shall overwhelmed 
magnitude prospect presented. yet region 
ocean anywhere. part one nation, people 
find, may forever find, way Europe New York, South 
America Africa New Orleans, San 
separate common country two nations, designed present 
rebellion, every man great interior region thereby cut 
one outlets, perhaps physical 
embarrassing trade regulations. 
 
true, wherever dividing boundary line may fixed. Place 
free slave country, place south Kentucky 
north Ohio, still truth remains none south 
trade port place north it, none north trade 
port place south it, except upon terms dictated government 
foreign them. outlets, east, west, south, indispensable 
well-being people inhabit vast 
interior region. three may best proper question. 
better either, right belong people 
successors forever. True themselves, ask 
line separation shall be, rather shall 
line. 
 
marginal regions less interested communications 
great outside world. They, too, them, 
must access Egypt West without paying 
crossing national boundary. 
 
national strife springs permanent part; land 
national possible 
would multiply mitigate evils among us. 
adaptations demands union abhors fact, 
would ere long force reunion, however much blood treasure 
separation might cost. 
 
strife pertains passing generations 
without convulsion hushed forever passing one 
generation. 
 
view recommend adoption following resolution 
articles amendatory Constitution United States: 
 
Resolved Senate House Representatives United States 
America, Congress assembled, Houses 
following articles proposed Legislatures (or 
several States amendments Constitution 
United States, articles, ratified three 
fourths said Legislatures (or valid part 
parts said Constitution, 
 
State wherein slavery exists shall abolish 
therein time times 1st day January, A.D. 
shall receive compensation United States follows, wit: 
 
President United States shall deliver every State bonds 
United States bearing interest rate -- per cent. per 
amount equal aggregate sum ------ slave 
shown therein Eighth Census United States, said 
bonds delivered State one parcel 
completion accordingly shall 
gradual one time within State; interest shall begin run 
upon bond proper time delivery 
State received bonds aforesaid afterwards 
slavery therein shall refund United States bonds 
received, value thereof, interest paid 
 
slaves shall enjoyed actual freedom chances 
war time end rebellion shall forever 
free; owners shall disloyal shall 
compensated rates provided States adopting 
abolishment slavery, way slave shall twice 
accounted for. 
 
may appropriate money otherwise provide colonizing 
free colored persons consent place places without 
United States. 
 
beg discuss proposed articles length. 
Without slavery rebellion could never without slavery 
could 
 
Among friends Union great sentiment 
policy regard slavery African race amongst us. 
would perpetuate slavery; would abolish suddenly without 
would abolish gradually 
would remove freed people us, would retain us; 
yet minor 
waste much strength struggles among ourselves. mutual concession 
act together. would compromise, would 
compromise among friends enemies Union. 
articles intended plan mutual 
plan shall adopted, assumed emancipation follow, 
least several States. 
 
first article, main points are, first, 
secondly, length time 
and, thirdly, 
 
emancipation unsatisfactory advocates perpetual 
slavery, length time greatly mitigate 
time races evils sudden 
fact, necessity 
whose habitual course thought disturbed measure 
passed away consummation. never see it. 
Another class hail prospect emancipation, 
length time. feel gives little 
living slaves. really gives much. saves 
must largely attend immediate emancipation 
localities numbers great, gives 
assurance posterity shall free forever. plan leaves 
State choosing act abolish slavery end 
century, degrees extending 
whole part period, two States 
proceed also provides generally 
mode making it. This, would must mitigate 
dissatisfaction favor perpetual slavery, especially 
receive Doubtless 
pay receive object. Yet measure 
certain sense liberation slaves destruction 
acquired descent purchase, 
property. less true often said 
people South responsible original introduction 
property people 
remembered unhesitatingly use cotton sugar share 
dealing them, may quite safe say South 
responsible North If, then, 
common object property 
done common 
 
less money, money easily paid, preserve 
benefits Union means war alone, 
also economical it? Let us consider it, then. Let us ascertain 
sum expended war Since compensated emancipation 
proposed last March, consider whether measure 
promptly accepted even slave States sum would 
done close war otherwise done. so, 
measure would save money, view would prudent 
economical measure. Certainly easy pay something 
pay nothing, easier pay large sum pay 
larger one. easier pay sum able 
pay war requires large requires 
once. aggregate sum necessary compensated emancipation 
course would large. would require ready bonds 
even faster emancipation might not, 
probably would not, close end years. 
time shall probably hundred millions people share 
instead thirty-one millions now. so, 
increase population may expected continue long time 
period rapidly before, territory 
become full. state ratio 
increase maintained, average, first 
national 1860, 
population may continue ratio far 
beyond abundant room, broad national 
ample territory limited British 
certainly population could stated. Instead 
receiving foreign born now, compelled send part 
native born away. condition. 
square miles. Europe population persons 
square may country time average 
less waste surface mountains, rivers, 
inferior Europe natural 
If, then, time populous Europe, 
may be, judge past present; 
be, ever, depends much whether maintain 

 
          [a page 
 
figures show country may populous Europe 
point say territory, 
persons square capacity contain 
 
reach this, too, relinquish chance 
folly evils disunion long war springing 
great element national discord among us. cannot 
exactly much one huge example secession, breeding 
lesser ones would population, 
prosperity, one doubt extent would great 

 
proposed emancipation would war, perpetuate peace, 
insure increase population, wealth 
country. pay emancipation would cost, 
together debt, easier pay debt 
without it. allowed old national debt run six per 
cent. per simple interest, end revolutionary 
struggle to-day, without paying anything either principal 
interest, man us would owe less upon debt man 
owed upon then; increase men 
whole period greater six per run faster 
interest upon debt. Thus time alone relieves nation, long 
population increases faster interest 
debt. 
 
fact would excuse payment justly due, 
shows great importance time great 
advantage policy shall pay number 
different policy would pay now, 
number word, shows dollar much 
harder pay war dollar emancipation 
proposed plan. latter cost blood, precious life. 
saving both. 
 
second article, think would impracticable return 
bondage class persons therein them, 
doubtless, property sense belong loyal owners, hence 
Provision made article compensating such. 
 
third article relates future freed people. 
merely authorizes Congress aid colonizing may 
consent. ought regarded objectionable one hand 
other, comes nothing unless mutual 
consent people American voters 
representatives Congress. 
 
cannot make better known already strongly favor 
yet wish say objection urged 
free colored persons remaining country largely 
sometimes 
 
insisted presence would injure white labor 
white laborers. ever could proper time mere catch 
arguments time surely now. times like present men 
utter nothing would willingly responsible 
time true, then, colored people 
white labor free remaining 
stay old places, white 
leave old places, leave open white laborers. 
neither less it. Emancipation, even without 
would probably wages white labor, 
surely would reduce them. Thus customary amount labor would 
still performed. freed people would surely 
old proportion it, probably time would less, 
leaving increased part white laborers, bringing labor 
greater consequently enhancing wages it. 
even limited extent, enhanced wages white labor 
certain. Labor like 
demand increase price it. Reduce 
supply black labor colonizing black laborer 
country, precisely much increase demand wages 
white labor. 
 
dreaded freed people forth cover 
whole land. already liberation make 
Equally distributed among whites whole 
country, would one colored seven whites. Could 
one way greatly disturb many communities 
one free colored person seven without 
apparent consciousness evil it. District Columbia 
States Maryland condition. 
District one free colored six yet 
frequent petitions Congress believe never presented 
presence free colored persons one 
emancipation South send free people People color seldom 
run unless something run from. Heretofore colored people 
extent fled North bondage, now, perhaps, 
bondage gradual emancipation deportation 
adopted, neither from. old masters give 
wages least new laborers 
turn gladly give labor wages till new homes 
found congenial people blood 
race. proposition trusted mutual interests 
event, cannot North decide whether receive 
them? 
 
Again, practice proves theory case, 
colored people abolishment 
slavery District last 
 
said proportion free colored persons whites 
District census 1860, reference 
persons called made free act Congress 
abolishing slavery here. 
 
plan consisting articles 
restoration national authority would accepted without 

 
war proceedings proclamation September 22, 
1862, stayed recommendation plan. 
doubt not, would bring restoration, thereby stay both. 
 
notwithstanding plan, recommendation Congress provide 
law compensating State may adopt emancipation 
plan shall acted upon hereby earnestly would 
advance part plan, arguments apply both. 
 
plan recommended means, exclusion of, additional 
to, others restoring preserving national authority 
throughout Union. subject presented exclusively 
economical plan would, secure peace 
speedily maintain permanently done force alone, 
would cost, considering amounts manner payment 
times would easier paid additional cost 
war rely solely upon force. much, much, would 
cost blood all. 
 
plan proposed permanent constitutional law. cannot become 
without concurrence of, first, two Congress, 
afterwards three fourths States. requisite three fourths 
States necessarily include seven slave States. 
give assurance severally adopting 
emancipation distant day upon new constitutional terms. 
assurance would end struggle save Union forever. 
 
forget gravity paper addressed 
Congress nation chief magistrate nation, 
forget many 
experience conduct public affairs. Yet trust 
view great responsibility resting upon perceive want 
respect undue earnestness may seem 
 
then, plan propose, adopted, would 
war, thus lessen expenditure money 
doubted would restore national authority national 
prosperity perpetuate doubted 
secure good 
people respond united earnest appeal us? we, they, 
means certainly speedily assure vital 
succeed concert. "Can us imagine better?" 
"Can better?" Object possible, still 
question recurs, "Can better?" quiet past 
inadequate present. occasion piled high 
difficulty, must rise occasion. case new, 
must think anew act anew. must ourselves, 
shall save country. 
 
Fellow-citizens, escape history. Congress 
administration remembered spite ourselves. personal 
significance insignificance spare one another us. 
trial pass light us honor 
latest generation. say Union. world forget 
say this. know save Union. world knows 
know save it. We, even here, hold power bear 
responsibility. giving freedom slave assure freedom 
alike give shall nobly 
save meanly lose last, best hope earth. means may succeed; 
could fail. way plain, peaceful, generous, way 
followed world forever God must forever 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 3, 1862. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
3d November, 1861, collision took place coast 
United States war steamer San French 
et resulting serious latter. obligation 
Government make could questioned 
injury resulted fault part San view 
ascertain this, subject referred commission United 
States French naval officers New York, naval officer 
conclusion arrived collision 
occasioned failure San reverse 
became necessary ascertain amount 
due injured party. United States 
consequently instructed confer France 
point, determined sum 
equitable allowance circumstances. 
 
recommend appropriation sum benefit owners 
et 
 
copy letter Mr. United 
States Secretary State subject herewith 
transmitted. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM H. J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 7, 1862. 
 
Hon. H. J. Times Office, New York: 
 
November 25 reached yesterday. Thank it. shall 
consider remember 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM B. G. BROWN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON December 7, 1862. 
 
HON. B. GRATZ BROWN, Saint Louis, Missouri: 
 
3d received yesterday. already done 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 8, 1862. GOVERNOR ANDREW JOHNSON, 
Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
Jesse H. asking authority raise regiment 
Would advise authority given him? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. December 8, 1862. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
conformity law July 16, 1862, cordially 
Commander John L. United States Navy, receive vote 
thanks Congress eminent skill gallantry exhibited 
late remarkable battle United States ironclad steamer 
command, rebel ironclad steamer 
March last. 
 
thanks Congress services occasion referred 
tendered resolution approved July 11, 1862, recommendation 
specially made order comply requirements ninth 
section act July 16, 1862, following words, 

 
"That line officer navy marine corps may advanced one 
grade upon recommendation President name receives 
thanks Congress highly distinguished conduct conflict 
enemy extraordinary heroism line 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 10, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Please order, proceeding order made 
General Schofield, day August last, 
collecting Southern sum 
five hundred thousand dollars, etc., meantime make 
send statement facts pertinent question, together 
opinion upon it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. K. DUBOIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 10, 1862. 
 
Hon. J. K. DuBois. 
 
DEAR summer 1859, Mr. visited Springfield, 
Illinois, relation bonds promised 
that, upon certain conditions, would ask members Legislature 
give full fair hearing case. remember, 
time exactly conditions were, whether 
completely case harm 
full fair hearing, sincerely wish may given him. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
December 11, 1862. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
compliance resolution December 5, 1862, requesting 
President "to furnish Senate information possession 
touching late Indian State Minnesota, also 
evidence possession upon principal 
head men tried condemned honor 
state receipt said resolution, transmitted 
Secretary Interior, accompanied note, copy 
herewith marked A, response received, 
department, letter Commissioner Indian Affairs, copy 
herewith marked B. 
 
state eighth day November last received long 
telegraphic despatch Major-General Pope, St. Paul, Minnesota, 
simply announcing names persons sentenced 
immediately telegraphed records cases 
forwarded me, however, reach two 
three days present meeting Congress. Meantime received, 
telegraphic despatches otherwise, appeals behalf 
appeals execution, expressions opinion 
proper policy regard Indians generally 
none which, understand, falls within scope 
arrival 
sufficient opportunity examine them, received joint letter 
one senators two representatives Minnesota, 
contains statements fact found records 
reason herewith transmit copy, marked C. also, 
reason, printed memorial citizens St. Paul, 
addressed me, forwarded letter 
 
Anxious act much encourage another 
one hand, much severity real cruelty 
other, caused careful examination records trials made, 
view first ordering execution proved guilty 
violating Contrary two class 
found. directed examination 
proven participated distinguished 
class numbered included 
two convicted female One number strongly 
commission tried them, ten 
years imprisonment ordered thirty-nine executed 
Friday 19th instant. order Monday, 
8th instant, messenger General copy order 
herewith marked D. 
 
abstract evidence forty herewith marked 
E. 
 
avoid immense amount lay Senate 
original records received me. 
 
full complete response resolution 
power make. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
December 12, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
possession three valuable formerly property 
General David E. place disposal Congress. 
forwarded New Orleans Major-General Benjamin F. 
Butler. shall Congress disposed reward 
compliment military service, think General Butler entitled 
first consideration. copy General's letter accompanying 
herewith transmitted. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON DECEMBER 12, 1862. 
 
HON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter accompanying note 
date, received yesterday. important paragraph letter, 
consider, words: 
 
"On 25th November last advised authority deemed 
likely well informed, well reliable 
Southern States would send representatives next Congress, provided 
full general amnesty permit so. guarantee 
terms asked amnesty referred to." 
 
strongly suspect information prove 
nevertheless, thank me. Understanding 
phrase paragraph Southern States would send 
representatives next substantially 
"the people Southern States would cease resistance, would 
submit to, maintain national authority within 
limits States, Constitution United States," say 
case war would cease part United States; 
within reasonable time "a full general 
necessary end, would 
 
think would proper communicate this, formally 
people Southern States. belief 
already know it; choose, ever, communicate 
think proper suspend military 
operations try experiment 
 
nevertheless receive great pleasure exact information 
have, also may way 
information might valuable 1st January 
afterwards. 
 
nothing letter shall dread see 
history, is, perhaps, better present existence 
become public. therefore request regard 
confidential. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 14, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
friend Dr. William Ill., call YOU, 
please give facilities consistently recovering 
remains matters connected 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. H. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 16, 1862. 
 
GEN. H. H. Saint Paul, 
 
suggest, let fixed Friday 19th instant 
postponed to, done on, Friday instant. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. (Private.) please send carefully 
A. L. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 16, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, Saint Louis, Missouri: 
 
N. W. Jackson, Mo., half brother Henry 
writes colonel driven home Jackson. 
please look case restore old man home 
public interest 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., December 16, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, 
 
despatch General received. Please ascertain 
General Sigel old corps whether preferable 
telegraph result, act immediately. shall 
governed 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 17, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Could civil authority Missouri lieu 
military extent, advantage 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 17, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE 
 
George says 
regiment place would like put in? 
it? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 18, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR Saint Louis, MO.: 
 
represented enrolled militia alone would maintain 
law order counties State north Missouri 
River. forces might removed south river, 
State. Please post give opinion upon 
subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 19, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Hon. W. A. Hall, member Congress here, tells me, Governor Gamble 
telegraphs me; quiet maintained counties north 
Missouri River enrolled Confer Governor Gamble 
telegraph me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 19, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Come, course, judgment safe so. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARIES SEWARD CHASE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 20, 1862. 
 
HON. WILLIAM H. SEWARD HON. P. CHASE. 
 
respectively tendered 
Secretary State Secretary Treasury United States. 
circumstances may render course personally 
desirable you; anxious consideration 
deliberate judgment public interest admit it. 
therefore request resume duties 
departments 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., December 20, 1862. 
 
GOVERNOR Boston, Mass.: 
 
Neither Secretary War know anything except tell us 
official mention. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 20, 1862. 
 
HON. T. J. 
 
DEAR letter 8th Hon. William 
shown me. scarcely pleasure would give 
oblige you, nothing operating upon us everywhere 
positively grant leaves absence 
cases sufficient procure regular 
 
would know extent evil 
scarcely half men paying spot service 
anywhere. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ARMY POTOMAC 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
December 22, 1862. 
 
ARMY POTOMAC: 
 
read general's report battle 
Although successful, attempt error, 
failure courage you, open field, 
maintained contest consummate skill 
success crossed river face 
enemy, show possess qualities great army, 
yet give victory cause country popular 
government. 
 
dead, 
severely wounded, congratulate number 
comparatively 
 
tender you, officers soldiers, thanks nation. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER 
 
MISS FANNY 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December, 23, 1862. 
 
DEAR deep regret learn death kind 
brave father, especially affecting young heart 
beyond common cases. sad world sorrow 
comes all, young comes agony 
takes 
 
older learned ever expect it. anxious afford 
present distress, perfect relief possible, 
except time. cannot realize ever feel better. 
so? yet mistake. sure happy again. 
know this, certainly true, make less miserable 
now. experience enough know say, need 
believe feel better once. memory dear father, instead 
yet sweet feeling heart, 
sort known before. 
 
Please present kind regards afflicted mother. 
 
sincere friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 26, 1862 
 
HONORABLE SECRETARY WAR. 
 
Ohio regiments one Illinois regiment captured 
Columbus, Ohio. brings 
Ohio regiments substantially strongly impressed 
belief Illinois regiment better sent Illinois, 
recruited put good condition time 
exchanged service. 
satisfied, receive treatment anything 
withheld way 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 27, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Let order regard Dr. family suspended 
hear me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, December 27, 1862. 
 
EXCELLENCY GOVERNOR 
 
wish leave country north Missouri care 
enrolled militia except upon judgment 
General Curtis. yet Confer him, shall 
glad act 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., December 30, 1862. PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
good reason saying must make general movement 
army without letting know. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 31, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
hear word Congressional election 
Time clearly up. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM H. J. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, December 31, 1862. 
 
HON. H. J. 
 
proclamation cannot telegraphed day 
to-morrow. 
 
JNO. G. 
 
Horace 
 
 
 
 
 
1863 
 
 
 
 
EMANCIPATION PROCLAMATION, JANUARY 1, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas 22d day September, A.D. 1862, proclamation issued 
President United States, among things, 
following, wit: 
 
"That 1st day January, 1863, persons held slaves 
within State designated part State people whereof 
shall rebellion United States shall then, 
thenceforward, forever free; executive government 
United States, including military naval authority thereof, 
recognize maintain freedom persons act 
acts repress persons, them, efforts may make 
actual freedom. 
 
"That executive 1st day January aforesaid, 
proclamation, designate States parts States, any, 
people thereof, respectively, shall rebellion 
United States; fact State people thereof shall 
day good faith represented Congress United States 
members chosen thereto elections wherein majority qualified 
voters States shall participated shall, absence 
strong testimony, deemed conclusive evidence 
State people thereof rebellion United 
States." 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
virtue power vested Commander-in-Chief Army 
Navy United States time actual armed rebellion 
authority government United States, fit necessary 
war measure suppressing said rebellion, do, 1st day 
January, A. D. 1863, accordance purpose do, publicly 
proclaimed full period one hundred days first day 
mentioned, order designate States parts States 
wherein people thereof, respectively, day rebellion 
United States following, wit: 
 
Arkansas, Texas, Louisiana (except St. 
Jefferson, St. John, St. St. James, 
Assumption, St. Mary, St. Orleans, 
including city New Mississippi, Alabama, Florida, 
Georgia, South Carolina, North Carolina, Virginia (except 
forty-eight counties designated West Virginia, also counties 
Elizabeth City, York, Anne, 
Norfolk, including cities Norfolk 
excepted parts present left precisely proclamation 
issued. 
 
virtue power purpose aforesaid, order 
declare persons held slaves within said designated States 
parts States are, shall be, free; 
Executive Government United States, including military 
naval authorities thereof, recognize maintain freedom said 
persons. 
 
hereby enjoin upon people declared free abstain 
violence, unless necessary recommend 
that, cases labor faithfully reasonable 

 
declare make known persons suitable 
condition received armed service United States 
garrison forts, positions, stations, places, man vessels 
sorts said service. 
 
upon act, sincerely believed act justice, warranted 
Constitution upon military necessity, invoke considerate 
judgment mankind gracious favor Almighty God. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, first day January, A.D. 1863, 
independence United States America eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON January 1, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
DEAR Burnside wishes cross Rappahannock 
army, grand division commanders oppose movement. 
difficulty help, fail precisely 
point sought assistance know General 
plan is, wish go ground, examine 
far practicable, confer officers, getting judgment, 
ascertaining word, gather elements 
forming judgment own, tell General Burnside 
approve approve plan. military skill 
useless this. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 

 
January 1, 1863 Withdrawn, considered harsh General Halleck. 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS 
 
WASHINGTON, January 2, 1863 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
submit Congress expediency extending departments 
government authority conferred President eighth 
section act 8th May, appoint person 
temporarily discharge duties Secretary State, Secretary 
Treasury, Secretary War, case death, absence 
seat government, either officers. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON JANUARY 2, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours December hand Mr. Strong 
received. day telegraphed suspending order relation 
Dr. he, Mr. appeared 
left copy order mentioned. doctor also showed 
Copy oath said taken, indeed 
strong also verbally assured constantly 
church President government, always done 
present war. looking order, 
see matter prayer, states it, 
violation oath charged nor, fact, anything 
specific alleged him. charges 
rebel wife rebel relations, sympathies rebels, 
rebel Now, talking him, tell 
frankly believe rebels, question 
remains whether man, unquestioned good moral character, 
taken oath has, cannot even charged violating 
it, charged specific act can, 
safety government, upon suspicion secret 
agree must left you, 
if, all, think public good requires 
suspension order withdrawn, 
time suspension counted him. 
promised this. must add United States Government 
must not, order, undertake run 
individual church becomes dangerous public 
interest, must let churches, such, take care 
themselves. United States appoint 
agents 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. committee composed Messrs. (Mr. 
presented letter memorial sundry 
citizens. whole subject embraced exercise best judgment, 
sole view public interest, interfere without 
hearing you. 
 
A. January 3, 1863. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 4, 1863. 
 
HON. Secretary Navy. 
 
DEAR many persons come well recommended loyalty 
service Union cause, rebel oppression 
State Virginia, make application authority permission 
remove families property protection within Union 
lines, means armed gunboats Potomac River 
Bay, hereby requested hear consider 
grant assistance class persons judgment 
merits may render proper, may case consistent 
perfect complete efficiency naval service military 
expediency. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL S. L CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 5, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I good deal trouble Missouri matters, 
sit write particularly it. One class 
friends believe greater severity another greater 
regard usual cases, 
questions other's one hand, insisted 
Governor most, better spring 
wish political influence stand 
him. hand, urged 
made private 
pecuniary interest public good. morning told, 
gentleman doubt believes says, one 
case different persons paid compared 
found paid true, inference 
collecting agents odd true 
instance, nothing necessity justify 
making maintaining system liable Doubtless 
necessity making system Missouri exist, whether 
continues maintenance practical 
important question. days ago Governor Gamble telegraphed me, asking 
outside St. Louis County might suspended, 
already within it, morning members 
Congress Missouri one laid paper asking 
thing. Now, belief Governor Gamble honest true man, 
less could confer together 
Missouri questions great advantage 
knows something not; acting together 
could double stock pertinent information. May hope 
attempt this? could safely (or could 
safely without whatever agree upon. absolutely 
reason 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. forgot say Hon. James S. member Congress 
one Missouri districts, wishes that, upon personal 
responsibility, Rev. John M. Columbia, Missouri; James L. 
County, Missouri; James L. Stephens, also 
County, Missouri, may allowed return respective 
Major leaves strong papers neighbors 
men, says knows true men. also says many 
constituents thinks rightly thinks 
three allowed return. Please look case, oblige 
Major consistently can. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
sent Governor 
 
 
 
 
RUSSELL A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 5, 1863. 
 
GOOD Honorable Senator placed hands 
letter 27th December, read pleasure 

 
encouraging know efforts 
made making restoration righteous peace 
country, upheld sustained good wishes prayers 
God's people. one deeply aware without 
favor highest wisdom 
efforts would avail nothing shadow 
 
conscious desire country's welfare 
will, plan upon may ask 
seems one subject upon good 
men may agree, imploring gracious favor God 
Nations upon struggles people making preservation 
precious civil religious liberty. 
 
truly friend; 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 5. 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, Tenn.: despatch 
announcing retreat enemy reached here. God bless 
you! Please tender all, accept yourself, nation's 
gratitude 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., January 7, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL DIX, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Richmond papers 6th say nothing Vicksburg, anything, 
what? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON January 7, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
DEAR think forming reserve cavalry corps of, say, 
Army Might corps constituted 
cavalry corps, could pick 
there? 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM B. G. BROWN. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., January 7, 1863. P.M. 
 
HON. B. GRATZ BROWN, Jefferson City, Mo.: 
 
to-day received. administration takes part 
friends Missouri, I, least, consider one; 
never intimation 
inclined interfere. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CORRESPONDENCE GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE, JANUARY 8, 1863. 
 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY POTOMAC January 5, 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Since return army become ever convinced 
general officers command almost unanimously opposed 
another crossing river; still opinion 
crossing attempted, accordingly issued orders 
engineers artillery prepare it. much hazard it, 
always majority military cannot begin 
movement without giving notice it, particularly know 
little effect may upon movements distant 
armies. 
 
influence telegram day still upon me, 
impressed idea many parts problem 
influence known me. 
 
order relieve embarrassment case, 
resignation commission major-general volunteers, 
accepted movement accordance views 
military 
 
taken liberty write personally upon subject, 
necessary, learned General Halleck, 
approve general plan, written Warrenton, could commence 
think quite necessary know 
important movement make, particularly 
made opposition views nearly general officers, 
receipt despatch opinion 
visited you. 
 
conversation New Year's morning led express 
opinions afterward felt duty place paper, 
express verbally gentleman speaking, 
presence, handing letter. disposed 
then, saw, retain letter, took back, return 
record wish it. 
 
beg leave say resignation sent spirit 
but, said, simply relieve 
embarrassment changing commanders lack confidence may 
rendered necessary. 
 
bearer bring answer, glad hear 
telegraph 
 
honor be, respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
A. E. BURNSIDE, 
 
Commanding Army Potomac. 
 
 
 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY, WASHINGTON, January 7, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, etc., 
 
communication 5th delivered 
12 M. to-day. 
 
communications since took command 
Army Potomac advised forward movement across 
interview urged cross 
Fredericksburg rather fall 
place; left understood least 
considerable part army would cross 
represented President. modification plan 
proposed telegraphed received approval. 
attempt Fredericksburg abandoned, advised renew 
attempt point, either whole part, turn 
enemy's works, wings 
words, keep enemy occupied till favorable opportunity offered 
strike decisive blow. particularly advised use cavalry 
light artillery upon communications, attempt cut 
supplies engage advantage. 
 
urged first object was, 
Richmond, defeat Lee's army, threatened 
Washington line upper Potomac. recur things 
simply remind general views expressed, 
still hold. 
 
circumstances case, however, somewhat changed since 
early part chances extended line operations 
now, account advanced much less then. 
chances still favor meet defeat enemy 
effect crossing position meet 
enemy favorable even equal terms. therefore still advise 
movement him. character movement, however, must depend 
upon circumstances may change day almost hour. 
enemy concentrate forces place selected 
make try another place. Again, circumstances 
time may render attempt cross entire 
army case, theory suggests that, enemy 
point, advantages gained crossing smaller 
forces points cut lines, destroy communication, 
capture etc. great object occupy 
enemy prevent making large distant 
injure least injury yourself. 
best accomplished general crossing detached real 
take course; actual general 
points, adopt course. seem many reasons 
crossing point attempted. keep 
large army admit, 
decide upon time, place, character crossing 
may advise attempt made, early 
possible. 
 
respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
H. W. HALLECK, General-in-Chief. 
 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
January 8, 1863. 
 
GENERAL 
 
understand General Halleck sent letter 
copy. approve letter. want concurrence 
opinion general officers, see 
understand government country driving 
you. yet see could profit changing command 
Army did, wish accepting 
resignation 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 8, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON, Nashville Tenn.: 
 
dispatch yesterday Nashville says body Captain Todd, 
Sixth Kentucky, brought to-day. 
 
Please tell Christian name, whether 
service enemy. shall also glad impression 
effect late operations 
prospects Tennessee. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 10, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL CURTIS, St. Louis, MO.: 
 
understand considerable trouble slaves Missouri. 
Please best keep peace question two three 
time hope something toward settling question 
Missouri. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 10, 1863 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON, Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
received. presume remains Captain hands 
family friends, wish give order subject; 
wish opinion effects late battles 
upon prospects Tennessee. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INSTRUCTION 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, January 12, 1863. 
 
instructed proceedings 
court-martial case Major-General Porter, report 
fully upon legal questions may arisen them, upon 
bearing testimony reference charges 
exhibited upon 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. JANUARY 14, 1863. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: Secretary State submitted 
resolution House Representatives 5th instant, 
delivered him, following words: 
 
"Resolved, Secretary State requested communicate 
House, not, judgment, incompatible public interest, 
Minister New Granada presented 
actual government country; also reasons 
recognized United States diplomatic 
representative government country; also, 
had, any, General 
representative government New Granada since went 

 
12th day December, 1846, treaty peace, 
concluded United States America Republic 
New still force. 7th day December, 1847, 
General duly received 
envoy extraordinary minister that, 
republic. 30th day August, 1849, 
received government charge republic. 
5th day December, consular convention concluded 
republic United States, treaty signed behalf 
Republic Granada treaty still 
force. 27th April, de 
received charge Republic New 
20th June, General received 
envoy extraordinary minister duly accredited 
Republic New ever since remained, 
representative republic near Government 
United States. 10th September, claims convention 
concluded United States Republic 
convention still force, part executed. May, 1858, 
constitution republic nation assumed 
political title "The fact 
formally announced Government, without change 
representative here. Previously 4th day March, 1861, 
revolutionary war Republic New thus 
recognized treated United States, broke New 
assuming set new government name 
States war various sometimes 
sometimes revolutionary 
revolutionary organization hitherto simply military 
power, constitution government 
yet established New Granada place organized 
constitution 1858. minister United States 
Confederacy, appointed 29th day May, 1861, 
view occupation capital revolutionary party 
civil war, present either 
government Confederacy provisional military 
government, conduct affairs customary 
cases, report progress events await instructions 
Government. received 
sufficiently conclusive determine recognize 
revolutionary government. General here, full authority 
Government New long recognized 
United States, received representative 
revolutionary government, yet 
proceeding would act recognition. 
 
Official communications various incidental occasional 
questions General minister envoy 
extraordinary Confederacy, character. 
measure proceeding resulted communications, 
communication present would not, judgment, 
compatible public interest. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 15, 1863. 
 
SECRETARY WAR: 
 
Please see Mr. wants assist raising colored troops 
Missouri. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRINTING MONEY 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
January 17, 1863. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
signed joint resolution provide immediate payment 
army navy United States, passed House 
Representatives 14th Senate 15th instant. 
 
joint resolution simple authority, however, 
existing circumstances, direction, Secretary Treasury 
make additional issue United States notes, 
much money needed, payment army navy. 
 
approval given order every possible facility may afforded 
prompt discharge pay due soldiers 

 
giving approval, however, think duty express 
sincere regret found necessary authorize large 
additional issue United States notes, circulation 
suspended banks together become already 
increase beyond real thereby augmenting cost living 
injury labor, cost supplies injury 
whole country. 
 
seems plain continued issues United States notes without 
check issues suspended banks, without adequate provision 
raising money loans issues keep 
within due limits, must soon produce 
matter appears important feel bound avail 
occasion ask special attention Congress it. 
 
Congress power regulate currency country hardly 
admit doubt, judicious measure prevent 
currency, taxation bank circulation 
otherwise, needed seems equally clear. Independently general 
consideration, would unjust people large exempt banks 
enjoying special privilege circulation proportion 
public 
 
order raise money way loans easily 
clearly necessary give every possible support public 
end uniform currency, loans, 
ordinary public dues well private dues may paid, 
almost quite indispensable. currency furnished 
banking organized general act Congress, 
suggested message beginning present session. 
securing circulation pledge United States bonds, 
therein would still facilitate loans, increasing 
present causing future demand bonds. 
 
view actual financial embarrassments government, 
greater embarrassment sure come necessary means relief 
feel perform duty simple 
announcement approval joint resolution, proposes relief 
increased without expressing earnest desire 
measures substance referred may receive 
early sanction Congress. measures, opinion, 
payment certainly army navy, 
honest creditors government, satisfactory provision made 
future demands treasury. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WORKING-MEN ENGLAND. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January, 1863. 
 
WORKING-MEN 
 
honor acknowledge receipt address resolutions 
sent eve new year. came, 4th 
March, 1861, free constitutional election 
Government United States, country found 
civil war. Whatever might cause, 
one duty, paramount others, me, namely, maintain 
preserve Constitution integrity Federal 
Republic. purpose perform duty key 
measures administration 
hereafter frame government official oath, 
could depart purpose would. always 
power governments restrict scope moral results 
follow may deem necessary public 
safety time time 
 
understood well duty rests solely 
American people; time aware 
favor foreign nations might material influence 
enlarging struggle disloyal men 
country engaged. fair examination history served authorize 
belief past actions influences United States 
generally regarded beneficial toward mankind. have, 
therefore, reckoned upon forbearance nations. 
kindly especially expect 
justice good faith practised United States, 
would encounter hostile influence part Great 
pleasant duty acknowledge demonstration given 
desire spirit peace toward country may 
prevail councils respected esteemed 
country kindred nation 
home side 
 
know deeply sufferings 
Europe, called endure crisis. 
often represented attempt overthrow 
government, built upon foundation human rights, 
substitute one rest exclusively basis human 
slavery, likely obtain favor Europe. action 
disloyal citizens, working-men Europe subjected 
severe purpose forcing sanction 
circumstance, cannot regard decisive upon 
question instance Christian heroism 
surpassed age country. indeed energetic 
assurance inherent power truth ultimate 
universal triumph justice, humanity, freedom. doubt 
sentiments, expressed sustained great nation; 
and, hand, hesitation 
excite reciprocal feelings 
friendship among American people. 
 
hail sentiment, therefore, 
whatever else may whatever may country 
own, peace friendship exist two nations 
be, shall desire make them, perpetual. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 21, 1863. 
 
GENTLEMEN SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
submit herewith consideration joint resolutions 
authorities city Washington, adopted September 7, 
1862, memorial date October 28, 1862, 
relating urging construction certain railroads 
upon city Washington. 
 
presenting memorial joint resolutions you, 
prepared say subject one great practical 
importance, hope receive attention Congress. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PORTER 
 
INDORSEMENT PROCEEDINGS SENTENCE 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY, WASHINGTON, 
 
January 13, 1863. 
 
compliance Article War, whole proceedings 
transmitted Secretary War, laid President 
United States. 
 
H. W. HALLECK, 
 
General-in-Chief. 
 
January 21, 1863. 
 
 
foregoing proceedings, sentence foregoing case 
Major-General Porter approved 
ordered said Porter be, hereby is, 
dismissed service United States major-general 
volunteers, colonel brigadier-general regular 
service United States, forever holding 
office trust profit Government United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL HALLECK GENERAL U. S. GRANT. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY, WASHINGTON 
 
January 21, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GRANT, 
 
President directed much Arkansas may 
desire control temporarily attached department. 
give control banks river. 
 
operations Mississippi must rely confidently 
upon direct co-operation General Banks lower 
possible may able pass reduce Port 
They, however, everything power form junction 
able effect this, 
least occupy portion enemy's forces, prevent 
hope, however, still better 
able join you. 
 
may proper give explanation 
order department. President 
objection which, suppose, 
object terms entire 
religious class, fighting ranks, President 
deemed necessary revoke it. 
 
respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
H. W. HALLECK, General-in-Chief. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 23, 1863 
 
GENERAL 
 
see moment come. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE MAKING 
 
Orders 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, OFFICE, WASHINGTON, D.C. JANUARY 25, 
1863. 
 
I. President United States 
 
Major-General A. E. Burnside, request, relieved 
command Army Potomac. 
 
Major-General E. V. Sumner, request, relieved 
duty Army Potomac. 
 
3d. Major-General W. B. Franklin relieved duty Army 
Potomac. 
 
Major-General J. Hooker assigned command Army 
Potomac. 
 
II. officers relieved report person 
adjutant-general army. 
 
order Secretary War: D. Assistant Adjutant-General 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., January 26, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
placed head Army Potomac. 
course done upon appear sufficient reasons, 
yet think best know things 
regard quite satisfied you. believe 
brave soldier, course like. also believe 
mix politics profession, right. 
confidence yourself, valuable indispensable 
within reasonable good 
rather think General command 
army taken counsel ambition much 
could, great wrong country 
honorable brother heard, way 
believe it, recently saying army 
government needed course this, spite 
it, given command. generals gain 
successes set ask military success, 
risk government support 
utmost ability, neither less done 
commanders. much fear spirit 
aided army, commander 
withholding confidence him, turn upon you. shall assist 
far put down. Neither Napoleon, 
alive again, could get good army spirit 
prevails it. beware Beware 
energy vigilance go forward give us 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, January 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
conformity law July 16, 1862, cordially recommend 
Commander David D. Porter, United States Navy, acting 
commanding Mississippi receive vote thanks Congress 
skill displayed attack post Arkansas, 
surrendered combined military naval forces 10th 
instant. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUTLER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 28, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BUTLER, Mass.: 
 
Please come immediately. Telegraph time 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 29, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL DIx, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Richmond papers anything 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
THURLOW 
 
WASHINGTON, January 29, 1863. 
 
HON. THURLOW 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your Albany Evening journal 
brings good deal mean? 
 
Truly Yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, 
 
January 30, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
any, gone Roads within last 
two 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., January 31, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe, Va.: battle 
news Richmond papers 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., January 31, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
take jurisdiction pass question. Exercise 
discretion whether Judge shall pass. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WORKING-MEN LONDON, ENGLAND. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, February 1, 1863. 
 
WORKING-MEN 
 
received New Year's address sent me, 
sincere appreciation humane sentiments 

 
sentiments enduring support free 
institutions England, sure also constitute 
reliable basis free institutions throughout world. 
 
resources, powers American people 
great, consequently succeeded equally great 
seems devolved upon test whether 
government established principles human freedom 
maintained effort build one upon exclusive foundation 
human rejoice new evidences 
proceedings furnish exhibiting justly 
estimated true friends freedom humanity foreign 
countries. 
 
Accept best wishes individual welfare 
happiness whole British people. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. [Cipher.] WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., 
 
February 4, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
hear difficulty streets Baltimore yesterday. 
amount it? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., February 12, 1863. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
4th September, 1862, Commander George Henry United 
States Navy, officer command naval force 
harbor Mobile, guilty inexcusable neglect permitting 
armed steamer open daylight run blockade. omission 
perform whole duty occasion, injury thereby 
inflicted service country, name stricken 
list naval officers dismissed service. 
 
Since earnest application made restoration 
former position senators naval officers, ground 
fault error judgment, example case 
already effect preventing repetition similar 
 
therefore application consideration 
previous fair record, hereby nominate George Henry 
commander navy 16th July, 1862, take rank 
active list next Commander Edward fill vacancy 
occasioned death Commander J. M. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., February 12, 1863. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
24th August, 1861, Commander Roger States Navy, 
dismissed service misapprehension regard 
loyalty Government, circumstance several oaths 
transmitted Navy Department failed receive 
recognition them. upon assurance 
oath failed reach readiness execute it, 
original position 4th September 
day, 4th September, ordered command war 
22d order revoked ordered duty 
Mississippi 23d January, 1862, detached 
since remained board act 
16th July, 1862, recommend 
 
last commission, issued Senate, 
end succeeding session, 17th July, 1862, 
date, nominated Senate, ceased commander 
navy. 
 
correct omission nominate officer Senate last 
session, nominate Commander Roger commander 
navy 14th September, take relative position 
list commanders recommended 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, Tenn.: 
 
despatch received. called 
Secretary Navy, Secretary War, General-in-Chief together, 
submitted them, promise best case. 
cannot take hands without producing confusion. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SIMON CAMERON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 13, 1863. 
 
HON. SIMON CAMERON, Harrisburg, Pa.: General Clay suppose 
matter spoke definitely settled now. Please 
answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ALEXANDER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 22, 1863. 
 
REV. ALEXANDER DEAR SIR:--Your note, you, General 
Superintendent United States Christian Commission, invite 
meeting held day hall House 
Representatives city, received. 
 
While, reasons deem sufficient, must decline 
cannot withhold approval meeting worthy objects. 
 
Whatever shall be, sincerely God's name, devised good 
soldiers seamen hard spheres duty, scarcely fail 
whatever shall tend turn thoughts 
incident 
great national trouble ours, fix vast 
long enduring consequences, result 
struggle, especially strengthen reliance Supreme 
final triumph right, cannot well us all. 
 
birthday Washington Christian year, 
suggesting together highest interests life 
come, meeting proposed. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. K. DUBOIS. 
 

 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C. February 
 
HON. J. K. Springfield, Ill.: General Rosecrans respectfully urges 
appointment William P. say you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
detriment service obliged 
Henry A. Company I, Pennsylvania Volunteers, 
come remain four five days. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SENATE, FEBRUARY 28, 1863 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas objects interest United States require Senate 
12 o'clock 4th March next receive 
act upon communications may made part 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
considered duty issue proclamation, declaring 
extraordinary occasion requires Senate United States 
convene business Capitol, city 
Washington, 4th day March next, 12 o'clock 
day, shall time entitled act members 
body hereby required take notice. 
 
Given hand seal United States, Washington, 
twenty eighth day February A.D. 1863, independence 
United States America, eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
 Secretary o f State. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
WASHINGTON, March, 
 
Mr. M. question 
pains place Colonel friend 
grows Colonel longer alive defend him. 
presume, however, shall rest it. 
disposed say, selection send me." 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 9, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR DAVID Columbus, Ohio: 
 
think advice others would valuable selection 
Ohio. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SOLDIERS REGIMENTS, MARCH 10, 1863 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
Proclamation 
 
pursuance section act Congress entitled 
"An act enrolling calling national forces, 
purposes," approved 3d day March, 1863, I, Abraham Lincoln, 
President Commander-in-Chief Army Navy United 
States, hereby order command soldiers enlisted drafted 
service United States absent regiments 
without leave shall forthwith return respective regiments. 
 
hereby declare proclaim soldiers absent 
respective regiments without leave shall, first 
day April, 1863, report designated 
general orders War Department No. may 
restored respective regiments without except 
forfeiture pay 
return within time specified shall arrested deserters 
punished law 
 
Whereas disloyal persons sundry places 
procured soldiers desert absent 
regiments, thereby strength armies 
war, giving aid comfort enemy, gallant 
faithful soldiers remaining ranks increased 

 
therefore call upon patriotic faithful citizens oppose 
resist dangerous treasonable aid 
restoring regiments soldiers absent without leave, 
assist execution act Congress "for enrolling calling 
national forces, purposes," support 
proper authorities prosecution punishment 
said act suppressing insurrection rebellion. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand. Done city 
Washington, tenth day March, A.D. 1863, independence 
United States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 13, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
General wishes assigned General General 
also desires it. would like oblige would 
injure service army, you. say you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
WASHINGTON, Match 15, 1863. 
 
glad note saying despatches able, 
leave there. 
glad agree, long public interest seem require 

 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. O. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 16, 1863. 
 
HON. J. O. MORTON, Ill.: William proposed 
provost-marshal district. think it? understand 
good man. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GRANT'S EXCLUSION NEWSPAPER 
 
SENTENCE T. W. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 20, 1863. 
 
MAY appears satisfaction Thomas 
W. New York sentence 
court-martial excluded military department command 
Major-General Grant, also General president 
court-martial rendered sentence, Major-General 
command corps department, many respectable 
persons, opinion Mr. offense technical rather 
wilfully wrong, sentence now, therefore, 
said sentence hereby far revoked allow Mr. return 
General Grant's remain General Grant shall give 
express leave department General Grant 
shall refuse 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
BENJAMIN 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 
 
Mr. BENJAMIN Lexington, Ky.: 
 
Show may concern authority allowing Mrs. 
remain house, long choose responsible 
may do. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 25, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, Tenn.: 
 
General Davis General received. 
General case particular, simply one great many 
recommended nominated would number 
allowed law. General nominated rejected 
Senate think proper without 
change circumstances performance additional service, 
expressed change purpose part least senators 
opposed him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. A. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 25, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
news you? 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
QUESTION RAISING NEGRO TROOPS 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON March 26, 1863. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I told least thought raising negro 
military force. opinion country needs specific thing 
much man ability position go work. 
speak position, mean eminent citizen slave State 
colored population great available 
yet force restoring Union. bare sight 
fifty thousand armed black soldiers upon banks 
Mississippi would end rebellion doubts 
present sight take hold 
thinking it, please dismiss thought. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION APPOINTING NATIONAL 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
March 30, 1863. 
 
Whereas Senate United States, recognizing supreme 
authority government Almighty God affairs men 
nations, resolution requested President designate 
set apart day national prayer 
 
whereas duty nations well men 
dependence upon power God; confess 
humble sorrow, yet assured hope genuine 
lead mercy recognize 
truth, announced Holy proven history, 
nations blessed whose God 
 
know divine law nations, like individuals, 
subjected world, may 
justly fear awful civil war 
land may punishment inflicted upon us sins, 
needful end national whole people? 
bounties 
preserved, many years, peace prosperity. grown 
numbers, wealth, power nation ever 
forgotten God. forgotten gracious hand preserved us 
peace, strengthened us; 
hearts, blessings 
produced superior wisdom virtue own. Intoxicated 
success, become feel 
necessity preserving proud pray God 
made 
 
us, then, humble offended Power, 
confess national sins, pray 
 
Now, therefore, compliance request, fully concurring 
views, Senate, proclamation designate 
set apart Thursday, 30th day April, 1863, day national 
hereby request people 
abstain day ordinary unite 
several places public worship respective homes 
keeping day holy Lord, devoted humble discharge 
religious duties proper solemn occasion. done 
sincerity truth, let us rest hope, authorized 
divine united cry nation heard 
answered blessings less pardon national 
sins, restoration divided suffering country 
former happy condition peace. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, thirtieth day March, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-three, 
independence United States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
  Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
LICENSE COMMERCIAL INTERCOURSE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 31, 1863. 
 
Whereas act Congress approved July 13, 1861, entitled "An act 
provide collection duties imports, purposes," 
commercial intercourse inhabitants States 
proclamation declared insurrection United 
States citizens rest United States prohibited 
long condition hostility continue, except 
shall licensed permitted President conducted 
carried pursuance rules regulations prescribed 
Secretary and: 
 
Whereas appears partial restoration intercourse 
inhabitants sundry places sections heretofore declared 
insurrection pursuance said act citizens rest 
United States favorably affect public 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
exercising authority discretion confided said act 
Congress, hereby license permit commercial intercourse 
citizens loyal States inhabitants insurrectionary 
States cases restrictions described expressed 
regulations prescribed Secretary Treasury bearing 
even date regulations may 
hereafter, approval, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL D. HUNTER. 
 
(Private.) EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C April 1, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I glad see accounts colored force 
Jacksonville, see enemy driving 
expected. important enemy force shall 
take shape grow South, precisely 
proportion important us Hence utmost caution 
vigilance necessary part. enemy make extra efforts 
destroy them, preserve increase them. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION COMMERCIAL INTERCOURSE, APRIL 2, 1863 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, pursuance act Congress approved July 13, 1861, 
did, proclamation dated August 16, 1861, declare inhabitants 
States Georgia, South Carolina, Virginia, North Carolina, 
Tennessee, Alabama, Louisiana, Texas, Arkansas, Mississippi, Florida 
(except inhabitants part Virginia lying west 
Mountains, parts State 
States hereinbefore named might maintain legal adhesion Union 
Constitution might time time occupied controlled 
forces United States engaged said 
state insurrection United States, 
commercial intercourse inhabitants 
thereof, exceptions aforesaid, citizens States 
parts United States unlawful would remain 
unlawful insurrection cease suppressed, 
goods coming said 
States, exceptions aforesaid, parts United 
States without license permission President, 
Secretary Treasury, proceeding said States, 
exceptions aforesaid, land water, together vessel 
conveying said States, exceptions 
aforesaid, would forfeited United States, and: 
 
Whereas experience shown exceptions made said 
proclamation embarrass due enforcement said act July 13, 1861, 
proper regulation commercial intercourse authorized said 
act loyal citizens said States: 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby revoke said exceptions, declare inhabitants 
States Georgia, South Carolina, North Carolina, Tennessee, Alabama, 
Louisiana, Texas, Arkansas, Mississippi, Florida, Virginia (except 
forty-eight counties Virginia designated West Virginia, except 
also ports New Orleans, Key Port Royal, North 
state insurrection United States, 
commercial intercourse licensed conducted provided 
said act said States inhabitants thereof, 
exceptions aforesaid, citizens States parts 
United States unlawful remain unlawful 
insurrection shall cease suppressed notice thereof 
duly given cotton, 
products, goods coming 
said States, exceptions aforesaid, parts 
United States, proceeding said States, 
exceptions aforesaid, without license permission President, 
Secretary Treasury, together vessel 
conveying same, forfeited United States. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, second day April, A.D. 1863, 
independence United States America eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:   WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
   Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 3, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
plan pass Saturday night go 
camp Sunday morning, remain till Tuesday morning, 
return. party probably exceed six persons 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
OPINION HARBOR DEFENSE. 
 
April 4, 1863. 
 
general subject respectfully refer 
Secretaries War Navy conference 
single idea harbor defense. steam built 
sacrifice nearly capacity carrying speed 
strength, able split vessel hollow enough 
carry supplies distance. course, could 
carry supplies considerable distance, 
business would guard particular harbor 
door. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY NAVY. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY POTOMAC, April 9, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY 
 
Richmond Whig 8th telegraphic despatches Charleston, 
following 
 
"All thoughts upon Official intelligence 
made public early yesterday morning enemy's 
attempted cross bar failed, later day 
announced gunboats succeeded crossing 
lay forts quietly 
attack. intelligence looked eager anxiety. 
made secret vast preparation attack Charleston, 
may well anticipate desperate conflict. last hour trial 
come Charleston, hour deliverance 
one believes possible. heart 
whole country toward city intense 
yet hopes amounting confidence. Charleston knows expected 
her, due relation 
cause. there, 
he, too, knows expected disappoint 
Charleston 
taken 
 
rebel reported calling today 
taken rebel think 
entirely 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM OFFICER COMMAND 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 
 
OFFICER COMMAND Nashville, soldier name 
John R. cavalry sentence death, 
court-martial military commission, 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
necessary let execution till heard again. 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
     Lincoln sent many telegrams similar form 
     one order avoid repetition editor 
     omitted without especial interest.  Hardly 
     day went people White House 
     mercy sentenced soldier.  mother one day, 
     Lincoln sentence execution 
     son. "Well, don't think bit 
     said Mr. D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON D.C., April 12, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
letter hand General received, 
to. thing dispense would ready 
to-morrow. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM ADMIRAL S. P. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 13, 1863 
 
ADMIRAL 
 
Hold position inside bar near or, shall 
left it, return it, hold orders. allow 
enemy new batteries Morris begun 
it, drive out. herein order renew general attack. 
depend discretion order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL D. HUNTER ADMIRAL S. F. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 1863. 
 
GENERAL HUNTER ADMIRAL 
 
intended clear apparent inconsistency recent 
order continue operations Charleston former one 
remove another point certain censure upon you, 
either you, intended. still hope cordial judicious 
co-operation take batteries Morris Island 
Island Fort Sumter. whether not, wish 
demonstration kept time, collateral important 
object. wish attempt real one, though desperate one, 
affords considerable chance success. 
demonstration only, must become public, whole effect 
lost. Charleston, leave orders 
here. course intended force leave 
exposed Head near points charge. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. receives first, please send copy 
immediately. A.L. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., April 15, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
P.M. hour ago received letter morning, 
moments later despatch evening. latter gives 
considerable course calculated 
upon. General S. moving rapidly enough make expedition come 
anything. three days, two unusually 
fair three without enemy, yet 
twenty-five miles started. reach point 
still sixty go, another river (the 
enemy. many days take 
it? know better done, greatly fear 
another failure Write 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COLONIZATION ARRANGEMENTS 
 
AGREEMENT 
 
APRIL 16, 1863. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA, 
 
PRESENTS SHALL COME, 
 

 
Know ye that, whereas paper bearing date day December last, 
purporting agreement United States one 
persons African 
Republic signed behalf party 
first part; whereas said instrument since remained 
consequence seal United States 
whereas moved considerations 
deemed sufficient withhold authority said 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, hereby authorize Secretary State 
signature instrument 
 
Done Washington, sixteenth day April, A.D. 1863. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
WEST VIRGINIA, APRIL 20, 1863. 
 
PROCLAMATION ADMITTING WEST VIRGINIA UNION, 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas act Congress approved 31st day December last 
State West Virginia declared one United States 
America, admitted Union equal footing 
original States respects whatever, upon condition certain 
changes duly made proposed constitution State; 

 
Whereas proof compliance condition, required 
second section act aforesaid, submitted me: 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, pursuance act Congress aforesaid, 
declare proclaim said act shall take effect force 
sixty days date 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, twentieth day April, A.D. 1863, 
independence United States eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, APRIL 23, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, Tenn.: 
 
despatch 21st received. really cannot say 
heard complaint you. heard complaint police corps 
Nashville, name mentioned connection it, far 
remember. may inference connected it, 
attention never drawn light. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., April 27, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
look now? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, April 28, 1863. 
 
HON. A. O. CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
think people Pennsylvania uneasy 
Doubtless small force enemy 
northern part Virginia, principle, purpose 
divert us another believe nothing more. think 
adequate force close them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM W. A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 29, 1863. 
 
HON. W. A. 
 
trouble provost-marshal first district. 
Please procure HON. Mr. come see me, come 
agreement telegraph result. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR CURTIN, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MAY 1, 1863 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
whole force Baltimore else reach 
already sent enemy you. worst thing 
enemy could would weaken 
therefore safe believe it; best thing 
could would get us scared bring part 
force away, trying do. 
telegraph morning calling 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MAY 2, 1863 
 
GOVERNOR CURTIN, Harrisburg, 
 
General Halleck tells despatch General Schenck 
morning, forces enemy 
menacing Pennsylvania fight run hope 
less anxious duty Pennsylvania yourself, really 
yet see justification trouble expense 
calling shall keep try duty. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN P. forces exactly enemy 
Pennsylvania. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., May 3, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Chief 
 
President thanks hopes keep 
advised rapidly information reaches you. 
 
EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
GENERALS LOST 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., May 3, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
General 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 4, 1863. P M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
news enemy 
so? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 4, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
friend General Sigel claims owe letter. 
remember please write once. here. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 6, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
General contents Richmond papers 
General despatch full going Captain navy. 
substance General Lee's despatch 3d claiming 
beaten retreating across 
distinctly stating two divisions fought 
Saturday, General 
Jackson severely wounded, Generals A. P. Hill slightly 
Richmond papers also stated, upon authority 
mentioned, cavalry Hanover 
points, destroying several good deal 
property, railroad bridges within five miles Richmond. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 6, 1863. P.M. 
 
telegraphed contents Richmond papers showing 
cavalry failed, received General 11 A.M. 
yesterday. This, great yesterday last night securing 
right think puts new face upon case; must 
judge. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL R. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., May 6, 1863 
 
COLONEL 
 
News gone General Hooker may change plans. Act view 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
HEADQUARTERS ARMY POTOMAC, May 7, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The recent movement army ended without effecting 
object, perhaps, important enemy's 
next? possible, would glad another 
movement early enough give us benefit fact enemy's 
communication neither reason 
wish anything done early movement would 
also help bad moral effect certain, 
said considerably already mind plan 
wholly partially have, prosecute without interference 
me. not, please inform me, I, 
may be, try assist formation plan army. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ALIENS 
 
PROCLAMATION CONCERNING 
 
MAY 8, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas Congress United States, last session, enacted 
law entitled "An act enrolling calling national forces 
purposes," approved 3d day March last; 
 
Whereas said act exists United 
States insurrection rebellion authority thereof, 
is, Constitution United States, duty 
government suppress insurrection rebellion, guarantee 
State republican form government, preserve public 

 
Whereas high purposes military force 
raise support persons Ought willingly 
 
Whereas service honorable 
rendered maintenance Constitution Union, 
consequent preservation free government; 
 
Whereas, reasons thus enacted said statute 
able-bodied male citizens United States, persons 
foreign birth shall declared oath intention become 
citizens pursuance laws thereof, ages 
twenty years certain exceptions necessary 
declared constitute national forces, shall 
liable perform military duty service United States 
called President purpose; 
 
Whereas claimed behalf persons foreign birth within 
ages specified said act, heretofore declared oath 
become citizens pursuance laws 
United States, exercised right suffrage 
political franchise laws United States, 
States thereof, absolutely concluded 
aforesaid declaration intention purpose become 
citizens, that, contrary, persons treaties 
law nations retain right purpose forego 
privileges residence within United States 
obligations imposed aforesaid act 
 
Now, therefore, avoid concerning 
persons concerned perform service required 
give full effect, hereby order proclaim plea 
received allowed exempt obligations 
imposed aforesaid act Congress person foreign birth 
shall declared oath intention become citizen 
United States laws thereof, shall found within 
United States time continuance present 
insurrection rebellion, expiration period 
days date shall 
plea allowed favor person so, 
aforesaid, declared intention become citizen United 
States, shall exercised time right 
political within United States, laws 
thereof, laws several States. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. Done city Washington, 
eighth day May, year Lord one thousand eight hundred 
sixty-three, independence United States 
eighty-seventh. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C. May 8, 1863. 4 P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
news capture forces Grand large 
important thing. General exchanged prisoner 
Richmond, talked morning. cavalry 
cut roads vicinity. says sound pair legs 
Richmond, men, known it, could safely 
gone burned everything brought captured 
men. says came City Point army 
three miles long moving toward Richmond. 
 
captured despatch General Lee, says loss 
fearful last battle you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. A. DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
important Hooker know exactly done 
railroads points Fredericksburg Richmond. yet 
word whether North South 
them, four 
is, one road readily perceive 
information suppose Davis tell. Please 
ascertain fully done, present condition, near 
can, advise once. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 9, 1863 
 
believe Mr. L. good man, two things need 
 
Mr. rival relative Mr. L. 
 
hear nobody calling Mr. R. Mr. L. However, 
let us watch. 
 
A. L. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, MAY 11, 1863 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I concluded relieve General Curtis. see 
way avoid worst consequences there. think General 
Schofield successor, wish take matter 
successor hands General Halleck. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, May 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Richmond papers anything Grand Gulf 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, May 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
distance stopped last Thursday 
line works ranged glass upon me? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR SEYMOUR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 12, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR SEYMOUR, Albany, 
 
Dr. Mr. here, say, 
War Department, permission go Army Potomac. 
appeal me, saying wish go. suppose 
excluded rule experience induced department deem 
still shall leave go, say desire it. 
Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. G. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON May 
 
Dr. A. G. HENRY, New York: 
 
Governor Chase's feelings hurt action Smith 
removed, Governor Chase wishes name successor, asks day 
two make 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D.C. May 14, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
DEAR wrote impression possibly 
early movement could get advantage supposed facts 
enemy's communications disturbed somewhat 
position. idea passed away, enemy 
communications, positions, actually 
received appear probable 
gain anything early attempt cross 
therefore shall complain time 
keep enemy bay mischief menaces 
occasional cavalry practicable, put army good 
condition again. Still, clear judgment renew 
attack mean restrain you. Bearing upon last 
point, must tell painful 
corps division commanders giving entire 
confidence. would true, therefore, 
first all, ascertain real facts beyond possibility doubt. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
QUARRELS 
 
TELEGRAM H. T. BLOW OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 15, 1863. 
 
HON. H. T. BLOW, C. D. OTHERS, St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
despatch to-day received. painful 
Missouri cannot settle quarrel among 
yourselves. beyond endurance months 
sides. Neither side pays least respect appeals 
reason. compelled take hold case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM JAMES 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, May 16, 1863. 
 
HON. JAMES Louisville, Ky.: 
 
despatch to-day received. personally know nothing Colonel 
months ago represented 
mischievous influence Saint Louis, reason 
unwilling force continuance judgment 
friends oblige you, may come 
remain Louisville upon taking oath pledge 
good 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, May 16, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The commander Department St. Louis ordered 
several persons south military lines, order 
me. Yet special request HON. James 
consented one number, Samuel remaining 
Louisville, upon condition taking oath allegiance 
Mr. word honor good 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDERS SENDING C. L. VALLANDIGHAM BEYOND MILITARY LINES. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
UNITED STATES MILITARY TELEGRAPH, May 10, 1863. telegraph 
Washington, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Commanding Department Ohio. 
 
SIR:--The President directs without delay send C. L. Vallandigham 
secure guard Headquarters General Rosecrans, put 
beyond military case return within lines, 
arrested kept close custody term specified 

 
order President:  E. R. S. Assistant 
 
 
 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 20, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL A. B. BURNSIDE, Commanding Department Ohio, Cincinnati, 
O. 
 
despatch three o'clock afternoon Secretary War 
received shown President. thinks best disposition 
made Vallandigham put beyond lines, directed 
order transmitted last evening, directs execute 
order sending forward secure guard without delay 
General Rosecrans. 
 
order President:  R. S. Brigadier-General 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 20, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
yesterday regard Colonel received. anxious 
shall misunderstand me. case intended censure 
question Colonel case meant 
suggest possibly might mistaken point 
could frequently make mistakes many things 
compelled 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 21, 1863. PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
certain reasons thought best Rev. Dr. come 
here. 
 
Present respects him, ask write fully subject 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. A. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 22, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Tenn.: 
 
news Richmond newspapers 20th including 
despatch General Johnston himself, 15th 
little confusion beat 
near Edwards Station, end nine fight, driving 
Big Black cutting driving south 
twenty-five miles Jackson. Johnston telegraphed 
this, except camp 
Lexington, Another despatch Grant moving 
Johnston 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., May 24, 
 
O.: 
 
Late last night Fuller telegraphed you, say, "the Stars 
Vicksburg victory know 
said, say without knowing it? despatch 
afternoon doubt upon it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON. May 25, 1863. 
 
COLONEL Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
despatch Green Adams shown me. General Rosecrans 
knows better know charge Fifth 
Cavalry. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., May 26, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
despatch Campbell, others received postponement 
ordered consider telegraph 
days. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 27, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Let execution William B. suspended till 
order me, holding safe custody receiving 
notify me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
execution Warren hereby suspended 
order me, held safe custody 
receiving notify me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, May 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, Tenn.: 
 
anything 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON May 27, 1863. 
 
GENERAL JOHN M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
DEAR relieved General Curtis assigned 
command Department Missouri, think may 
advantage state it. relieve General Curtis 
full conviction done wrong commission 
conviction mind Union 
men Missouri, vast majority 
whole people, entered quarrel among 
Curtis, perhaps choice, head one 
faction Governor Gamble other. months labor 
difficulty, seemed grow worse worse, felt 
duty break could remove Governor 
remove General Curtis. position, 
wish nothing merely General Curtis Governor 
Gamble it, exercise judgment, right 
public interest. Let military measures strong enough repel 
keep peace, strong unnecessarily 
people. difficult much greater 
honor perform well. shall 
abuse you, probably right. Beware assailed 
one other. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 27, P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
Richmond papers so, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 28, 1863. 
 
HON. Albany, 
 
letter others dated 19th inclosing 
resolutions public meeting held Albany received 
night last. shall give resolutions consideration ask, 
shall try find time make 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 28, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Murfreesborough, 
 
would push anxious 
short keep Bragg getting help 
Johnston Grant. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR ANDREW JOHNSON, Louisville, Ky.: 
 
General Burnside frequently informed lately division 
General cannot sorry tell this, 
true, cannot 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. K. OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, May 29, 1863. 
 
MESSRS. JESSE K. O. M. JOHN WILLIAMS, JACOB JOHN 
GEORGE R. WILLIAM YATES, S. M. CHARLES W. MATHENY, 
WILLIAM F. FRANCIS B. A. 
JAMES CAMPBELL. 
 
among upon two 
serve 
Springfield, Illinois, send names, appoint them. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WASHINGTON, May 29, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
despatch to-day received. shall wish 
let know. Cabinet necessity 
instance, perhaps doubting real 
necessity it; but, done, seeing 
it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 1, 1863. 
 
COLONEL Fort Monroe: 
 
Brown, captured Vicksburg, 
detained Richmond. Please ascertain get 
can. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 2, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
said army, sentence 
shot Friday 5th instant please send 
record case once. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 2, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GRANT, Vicksburg, 
 
communication General coming toward 
going farther anything hinder 
coming directly water 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER. [Cipher.] EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
June 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
Let execution sentences cases 
till orders me, remaining close custody 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., June 4, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
news send Richmond 3d must greatly 
wholly Thursday mentioned 
despatches directly Vicksburg 29th, 
and, speak speak assault 
general fighting whatever, fact speak almost 
exclude idea since Monday 
Neither mention demand made Grant 
upon speak troops good 
health, condition, spirits. say Banks Port 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 4, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I received additional which, 
former ones, induce believe revoke suspend order 
suspending Chicago Times; concur opinion, please 
done. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C. JUNE 5, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
to-day received hour ago. much professional military 
skill requisite answer turned task 
General Halleck. promises perform utmost care. 
one idea think worth suggesting you, is, case 
find Lee coming north would 
means cross south it. leave rear force 
fall upon it, would fight 
so, man man, worst 
point, main force would way getting advantage 
one word, would take risk 
river like jumped half liable 
torn front rear without fair chance one way 
other. 
 
Lee would come side river would keep side 
fight him, act according might estimate 
strength relatively own. mere 
desire controlled judgment General 
Halleck. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., June 6, 1863. 
 
Mrs. ELIZABETH J. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
John ready enter naval is, telegraph 
full name. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX, 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., June 6, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
noticing news send Richmond Dispatch morning 
see one latest despatches says nothing 
reliable Vicksburg since despatch 
Sunday others almost every day preceding since 
show show 
general fighting since 21st nothing Port 
later 29th things looked reasonably well us. 
thought might interest you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe: 
 
despatches Vicksburg 3d. general 
fighting well. Nothing new Port 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C. JUNE 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Fort Monroe: 
 
substance news sent fighting Port 27th 
three four days, supposed also, 
said morning, "No news Port knew General 
Sherman wounded, hoped dangerously despatch 
still nothing Richmond newspaper story 
Smith crossing Banks losing arm. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. P. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 9, 1863. 
 
HON. JOHN P. N. 
 
believe upon recommendation B. B. 
appointed attorney Nevada Territory. pressed remove 
ground attend office, fact pass much time 
Territory. wish say anything subject? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 9, 1863. 
 
MRS. LINCOLN, Philadelphia, Pa.: 
 
Think better put pistol away. ugly dream 
him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C. June 9, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
told incendiary shells arsenal made fit 
gun you. true would like 
shells sent you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., June 10, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
long despatch to-day received. left me, would 
go south Rappahannock upon Lee's moving north it. 
Richmond invested to-day would able take twenty days; 
meanwhile communications, army, would 
think Lee's army, Richmond, true objective point. 
comes towards upper Potomac, follow inside 
track, lines his. Fight him, too, 
opportunity stay is, him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 
 
MRS. LINCOLN, Philadelphia: 
 
three despatches received. well glad know 
so. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, JUNE 12, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
show trial incendiary shells Saturday night, 
try join 5 P.M. day Answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 12, 1863. 
 
HON. OTHERS. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter May 19, inclosing resolutions public 
meeting held Albany, New York, 16th month, 
received several days ago. 
 
resolutions, understand them, two 
expression purpose sustain cause 
Union, secure peace support 
administration every constitutional lawful measure suppress 
rebellion; and, secondly, declaration censure upon administration 
supposed unconstitutional action, making military 
two propositions third 
gentlemen composing meeting resolved part 
maintain common government country, despite folly 
may administration. position 
eminently thank meeting, congratulate 
nation it. purpose same; meeting 
common object, difference, except choice 
means measures effecting object. 
 
ought close paper, would close it, 
apprehension injurious consequences merely personal 
might follow cast upon 
what, view duty, could resolutions promise 
support every constitutional lawful measure suppress 
rebellion; knowingly shall knowingly 
other. meeting, resolutions, assert argue 
certain military proceedings following them, 
ultimately responsible, unconstitutional. think not. 
resolutions quote Constitution definition 
also limiting safeguards guarantees therein provided 
citizen trial held answer capital 
otherwise infamous criminal right 
speedy public trial impartial jury. proceed 
resolve "that safeguards rights citizen 
arbitrary power intended especially 
protection times civil And, apparently demonstrate 
proposition, resolutions "They secured substantially 
English people years civil war, 
adopted Constitution close Would 
demonstration better could truly said 
safeguards adopted applied civil 
Revolution, instead one close 
other? civil war, Civil war, 
times, when, cases rebellion invasion, 
public safety may resolutions proceed 
tell us safeguards "have stood test seventy-six years 
trial republican system, circumstances show that, 
constitute foundation free government, 
elements enduring one denies 
stood test beginning present rebellion, 
except certain New Orleans hereafter 
mentioned; one question stand test 
much longer rebellion provisions 
Constitution application case hand, 
arrests complained made is, 
treason defined Constitution, upon conviction 
punishment yet made hold persons answer 
capital otherwise infamous proceedings 
following, constitutional legal sense, 
arrests made totally different grounds, proceedings 
following accorded grounds Let us consider 
real case apply parts 
Constitution plainly made cases. 
 
Prior State 
lawful right secede national Union, would 
expedient exercise right whenever doctrine 
fail elect president elected 
contrary accordingly, far legally 
possible, taken seven States Union, seized many 
United States forts, fired upon United States 
and, course, done official 
act whatever. rebellion thus begun soon ran present civil 
war; and, certain respects, began terms 
parties. insurgents preparing thirty years, 
government taken steps resist them. former 
carefully considered means could turned account. 
undoubtedly reliance 
effort destroy Union, Constitution law, together, 
government would, great degree, restrained 
Constitution law arresting 
invaded departments government nearly communities 
people. material, cover 
hoped keep foot 
amongst us efficient corps 
cause thousand ways. knew 
times Constitution 
might also knew friends 
would make question suspend it; meanwhile 
others might remain large help cause. if, 
happened, Executive suspend writ without ruinous waste 
time, instances arresting innocent persons might occur, 
always likely occur could raised 
regard this, might least service insurgent 
cause. needed keen discover part 
enemies soon open hostilities machinery fairly 
put motion. Yet, thoroughly reverence guaranteed 
rights individuals, slow adopt strong measures 
degrees forced regard within exceptions 
Constitution, indispensable public safety. Nothing better 
known history courts justice utterly 
cases. Civil courts organized chiefly trials 
most, individuals acting 
quiet times, charges crimes well defined law. Even 
times peace frequently grow 
numerous powerful ordinary courts justice. 
numbers ever borne insurgent 
even many loyal States? Again, jury 
frequently least one member ready hang 
hang yet again, one man 
induces one soldier Union cause 
much Union soldier battle. Yet 
may conducted defined crime 
civil court would take 
 
 
case called resolutions 
fact, clear, gigantic case rebellion; provision 
Constitution "the privilege writ habeas corpus 
shall suspended unless when, cases rebellion invasion, 
public safety may require it," provision specially applies 
present case. provision plainly understanding 
made Constitution ordinary courts justice 
inadequate purpose that, 
cases, men may held custody courts, acting ordinary 
would Habeas corpus discharge men 
proved guilty defined crime, suspension allowed 
Constitution purpose men may arrested held 
proved guilty defined crime, cases rebellion 
invasion, public safety may require it." 
 
precisely present case rebellion wherein public 
safety require arrests process courts 
arrests cases rebellion proceed altogether upon 
basis. former directed small percentage ordinary 
continuous crime, latter directed sudden 
extensive government, which, most, 
succeed fail great length time. latter case arrests 
made much done probably would 
done. latter less 
cases purposes men much easily 
understood cases ordinary crime. man stands 
says nothing peril government discussed, cannot 
misunderstood. sure help enemy; much 
country 
little value constitutional provision quoted 
rendered arrests shall never made defined crimes shall 
committed, may notable General 
John C. General Robert E. Lee, General Joseph E. Johnston, 
General John B. General William B. General Simon B. 
Commodore Franklin Buchanan, occupying highest 
places rebel war service, within power 
government since rebellion began, nearly well known 
now. Unquestionably seized 
insurgent cause would much one 
committed crime defined law. Every one them, arrested, 
would discharged habeas corpus writ allowed 
view similar cases, think time unlikely 
come shall blamed made arrests rather 

 
third resolution meeting indicate opinion military 
arrests may constitutional localities rebellion actually 
exists, arrests unconstitutional localities 
rebellion insurrection actually exist. insist 
arrests shall made lines necessary military 
occupation scenes however, 
Constitution makes distinction, unable believe 
constitutional concede class 
arrests complained constitutional when, cases 
rebellion invasion, public safety may require them; insist 
constitutional wherever public safety 
require them, well places may prevent 
rebellion may already 
well may restrain mischievous interference raising 
supplying armies suppress rebellion rebellion may 
actually be; well may restrain men 
army would prevent equally 
constitutional places public safety 
dangers rebellion Take particular 
case mentioned meeting. asserted substance Mr. 
Vallandigham was, military commander, seized tried "for 
reason words addressed public meeting criticism course 
administration, condemnation military orders 
Now, mistake this, assertion 
truth, whole truth, reason arrest, 
concede arrest wrong. arrest, understand, 
made different reason. Mr. Vallandigham hostility 
war part Union; arrest made 
effect, prevent raising troops, 
encourage army, leave rebellion without 
adequate military force suppress it. arrested 
political prospects administration personal 
interests commanding general, army, 
upon existence vigor life nation 
upon military, thus gave military constitutional 
jurisdiction lay hands upon him. Mr. Vallandigham 
military power country, arrest made mistake 
fact, would glad correct reasonably satisfactory 
evidence. 
 
understand meeting whose resolutions considering favor 
suppressing rebellion military armies. Long experience 
shown armies cannot maintained unless desertion shall 
punished severe penalty death. case law 
Constitution sanction, Must shoot 
boy touch hair induced 
none less injurious effected getting 
father, brother, friend public meeting, working 
upon feelings till persuaded write soldier boy 
fighting bad cause, wicked administration 
government, weak arrest punish shall think 
that, case, silence save boy 
constitutional, withal great 
 
wrong question constitutional power, error lies 
believing certain proceedings constitutional when, cases 
rebellion invasion, public safety requires them, would 
constitutional when, absence rebellion invasion, public 
safety require them: words, Constitution 
application respects cases rebellion 
invasion involving public safety times profound peace 
public Constitution makes distinction, 
persuaded government constitutionally take 
strong measures time rebellion, shown 
could lawfully taken times peace, 
persuaded particular good medicine sick man 
shown good food well one. able 
appreciate danger meeting, American 
people means military arrests rebellion lose 
right public discussion, liberty speech press, law 
evidence, trial habeas corpus throughout indefinite 
peaceful future trust lies them, able 
believe man could contract strong appetite 
temporary upon remainder 
healthful life. 
 
giving resolutions earnest consideration request 
me, cannot overlook fact meeting speak 
I, full respect known intelligence, fairly 
prepared resolutions, 
permitted suppose occurred accident, way 
preferred designate rather 
time national peril would preferred 
meet upon level one step higher party platform, 
sure elevated position could better battle 
country love possibly lower ones 
where, force habit, prejudices past, selfish 
hopes future, sure much ingenuity 
strength finding fault blows other. since 
denied yet thankful country's sake 
Democrats done so. whose judgment Mr. 
Vallandigham arrested tried Democrat, old party 
me, judge rejected constitutional view 
expressed resolutions, refusing discharge Mr. Vallandigham 
habeas corpus Democrat better days these, received 
judicial hands President Jackson. still 
Democrats nobly lives 
blood learned many approve course 
taken Mr. heard single one 
it. cannot assert none such. name 
President Jackson instance pertinent history. 
battle New Orleans, fact treaty peace 
concluded well known city, official knowledge 
arrived, General Jackson still maintained martial military 
law. could said war over, 
martial law, existed first, grew Among 
things, Mr. published newspaper 
General Jackson arrested him. lawyer name procured 
United States Judge Hall order writ habeas corpus release Mr. 
General Jackson arrested lawyer judge. Mr. 
ventured say part matter "it dirty 
General Jackson arrested him. officer undertook serve 
writ habeas corpus, General Jackson took him, sent 
away copy. Holding judge custody days, general 
sent beyond limits set liberty 
order remain till ratification peace regularly 
British left southern coast. day 
two ratification treaty peace regularly 
judge others fully days more, 
judge called General Jackson court 
arrested others General paid 
matter rested nearly thirty years, Congress 
principal interest. late Senator Douglas, House 
Representatives, took leading part 
constitutional question much prepared say 
journals would show voted measure. 
 
may Constitution now; 
secondly, case invasion, case 
rebellion; and, thirdly, permanent right people public 
discussion, liberty speech press, trial 
law evidence, habeas corpus suffered detriment whatever 
conduct General Jackson, subsequent approval 
American Congress. 
 
yet, let say that, discretion, know whether 
would ordered arrest Mr. cannot shift 
responsibility myself, hold that, general rule, 
commander field better judge necessity 
particular case. course must practice general 
power matter. 
 
One resolutions expresses opinion meeting arbitrary 
arrests effect divide 
united suppressing rebellion, specifically called 
discharge Mr. regard as, least, fair appeal 
expediency exercising constitutional power think 
exists. response appeal say, gave pain 
learned Mr. Vallandigham arrested is, pained 
seemed necessity arresting 
afford great pleasure discharge soon 
means believe public safety suffer it. 
 
say that, war appears me, opinion 
action, great confusion first, take shape fall 
regular necessity strong dealing 
gradually every reason desire cease 
far least regard opinions 
wishes who, like meeting Albany, declare purpose 
sustain government every constitutional lawful measure 
suppress rebellion. Still, must continue much may seem 
required public safety. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, June 14, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
SIR:--Your note morning received. co-operate 
revenue direction navy arresting rebel 
American commerce transportation 
rebels engaged therein. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 14, 1863. 
 
GENERAL TYLER, Milroy invested cannot fall back 
Harper's Ferry? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE GENERAL 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 14, 1863. 
 
GENERAL TYLER, 
 
despatch me? leave 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, June 14, 1863. P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Harper's Ferry: 
 
forces Winchester Martinsburg making effort get 
you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., June 14, P.M., 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
far make here, enemy surrounded 
Winchester, Tyler could hold days, 
could help them? head Lee's army Martinsburg 
tail Fredericksburg 
animal must could break him? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. C. SCHENCK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 14, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
Get General Milroy Winchester Harper's Ferry, possible. 
up" already past 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President, United States. 
 
 
 
 
NEEDS NEW CARRIAGE 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 15, 1863. 
 
MRS. LINCOLN, Philadelphia, Pa.: 
 
Tolerably well. much yet, last got new 
carriage perhaps shall soon. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL 100,000 MILITIA SERVE SIX MONTHS, JUNE 15, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
Whereas armed insurrectionary combinations existing several 
States threatening make States Maryland, 
West Virginia, Pennsylvania, Ohio, requiring immediately additional 
military force service United States: 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
Commander-in-Chief Army Navy thereof militia 
several States called actual service, hereby call 
service United States 100,000 militia States following, 
namely: 
 
State Maryland, State Pennsylvania, 
State Ohio, State West Virginia, 
mustered service United States forthwith 
serve period six months date muster 
said service, unless sooner mustered infantry, 
artillery, cavalry, proportions made known 
War Department, Department also designate several 
places militia organized according rules 
regulations volunteer service orders may hereafter 
issued. States aforesaid respectively credited 
act militia services entered proclamation. 
testimony 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM P. OTHERS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 10, 1863 
 
OTHERS, New York: 
 
Governor New York promises send us troops, wishes 
assistance General Fremont General one both, 
it. wish would confusion us set 
work independently him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 16, 1863. 
 
GENERAL T. FRANCIS New York: 
 
despatch received. Shall glad raise Irish 
troops done consent concert Governor Seymour. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 16, 1863. 
 
MRS. LINCOLN, Philadelphia: 
 
matter choice whether come home. 
reason not, exist went away. 
bearing question coming home, think raid 
Pennsylvania amounts anything all. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 16, 1863. 
 
COL. WILLIAM S. New York 
 
despatch asking whether accept "the Loyal Brigade 
received. never heard brigade name know 
is; yet, presuming New York, say gladly accept 
it, tendered consent approbation Governor 
State. Otherwise not. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 16, P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
remove misunderstanding, place strict military 
relation General Halleck commander one armies 
general-in-chief armies. intended 
seems differently understood shall direct give 
orders obey them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT WASHINGTON D. C., June 17, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
Mr. Eckert, superintendent telegraph office, 
sent send everything comes office. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM JOSHUA 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 17, 1863. 
 
JOSHUA Esq., U. S. Frankfort, Ky.: 
 
Mr. record asking discharged 
suit San Francisco, one Unless record 
shown made think successfully defended 
Please examine case carefully and, shall opinion 
cannot dismiss relieve trouble 
it. Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
June 18, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR D. Columbus, O.: 
 
received. deeply regret 
aught Mr. contrary, like yourself, say 
him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 18, 1863. 
 
GENERAL A. C. 
 
Thanks offer Fifteenth think 
Washington danger. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
B. B. OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 19, 1863. 
 
MESSRS. B. B. JOHNSON, THOMAS 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter, follows, received Considered. 
 
"The committee appointed State 
Louisiana, respectfully represent seek 
General Government full recognition rights State 
existed previous passage act secession, upon 
principle existence State constitution 
legal act could way deprive 
advantages conferred constitution. constitution 
State wishes return full enjoyment 
rights privileges exercised States Federal 
Constitution. view desired object, 
request Excellency will, commander-in-chief 
army United States, direct Military Governor Louisiana 
order election, conformity constitution laws 
State, first Monday November next, State Federal 
officers. 
 
"With high consideration honor subscribe 
ourselves, 
 
"Your obedient servants, 
 
     E. 
     JOHNSON. 
     
 
Since receiving letter, reliable information reached 
respectable portion Louisiana people desire amend State 
constitution, contemplate holding State convention object. 
fact alone, seems me, sufficient reason General 
Government give seek existing State 
constitution. may add that, perceive 
could facilitate military operations Louisiana, really apprehend 
might used embarrass them. 
 
election held next November, abundant time without 
order proclamation now. people Louisiana shall 
lack opportunity fair election Federal State 
officers want anything within power give them. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON 
 
June 22, 1863. 
 
GENERAL JOHN M. SCHOFIELD. DEAR SIR:--Your despatch, asking 
substance whether, case Missouri shall adopt gradual emancipation, 
General Government protect slave owners species property 
short time shall permitted State exist within 
it, received. Desirous emancipation shall adopted 
Missouri, believing gradual made better 
immediate black white, except military necessity changes 
case, impulse say protection would given. 
cannot know exactly shape act emancipation may take. 
period final end comparatively short, 
act prevent persons sold period 
lasting slavery, whole would wish pledge 
General Government affirmative support even temporary slavery 
beyond fairly claimed Constitution. suppose, 
however, desired, desired military 
force United States, Missouri, used 
temporarily reserved legal rights slaves 
progress emancipation. would desire also. earnestly 
urged slave States adopt ought be, is, 
object overthrow may good 
faith end. therefore authorized act spirit 
letter conjunction may appear military 
necessities department. Although letter become public 
time, intended made now. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. HOOKER. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 22, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
says: "I heard little firing A.M. 
seems stopped now. 
direction yesterday, farther off." 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 23, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR: 
 
remember Hon. W. D. others engaged raising 
trying raise colored regiments Philadelphia. bearer 
this, M. friend Judge appears 
letter latter. private 
disappointed reasonable expectation one smaller offices. 
wants lieutenant one colored regiments. Judge 
say writing wishes him, willing 
discharged present position, 
approve, indorse let carry letter 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MAJOR VAN 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 23, 1863. 
 
MAJOR VAN New York: 
 
idea news despatch General Banks 
General 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, June 24, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Harrisburg, Pa.: 
 
reports enemy moving any, 
what? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL DIX. 
 
WASHINGTON, June 24, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Dix, Va.: 
 
despatch General Grant Don't think Smith 
took Bend since, allowing time get news Johnston 
Richmond. absolutely impossible. Also 
news Banks think. run away then, 
thought it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 25, 1863. 
 
GENERAL Va.: 
 
Colonel New Jersey Volunteers, mustered 
out, says man hands conviction desertion, 
formerly belonged named regiment, whose name 
F. believe. Colonel others appeal 
him. Please telegraph condition case, 
executed send record trial 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Va.: 
 
William Company A, Pennsylvania, one men 
executed last 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HOOKER. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 27, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HOOKER: 
 
come newspapers, believe it, wished 
entirely sure falsehood. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 28, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
nothing going Kentucky subject 
telegraph, except anything done beyond this, 
take care understand case better do. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR BOYLE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 28, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR J. T. BOYLE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
nothing going Kentucky subject 
telegraph, except anything done beyond this, 
take care understand case better do. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., June 28, 1863. 
 
MAJOR GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Every place Naval school subject appointment full, 
one promise half year's 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DEMOCRATIC PARTY CRITICISM 
 
M. OTHERS. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., June 
 
MESSRS. M. DAVID A. et 
 
resolutions Ohio Democratic State convention, 
present me, together introductory closing remarks, 
position argument mainly resolutions 
Democratic meeting Albany, New York, refer response 
latter meeting points 
 
response evidently used preparing remarks, desire 
used single reading 
remarks, discovered one matter, suppose 
took paper. say: "The unable 
agree opinion expressed Constitution 
different time insurrection invasion time 
peace public 
 
paper show expressed 
opinion suppose. expressed opinion Constitution 
different application cases rebellion invasion, involving 
public safety, times profound peace 
public opinion adhere to, simply because, 
Constitution itself, things may done one case may 
done other. 
 
dislike waste word merely personal point, must 
respectfully assure find fault 
ever seek evidence prove assumption 
discussions people policy Mexican 
 
 
say: Constitution upon power 
Congress suspend writ habeas corpus, yet 
guarantees personal liberty would remain Doubtless, 
clause Constitution, called, think, 
upon power Congress, guarantees would 
remain same; question guarantees would stand 
clause Constitution, stand 
clause remaining it, case rebellion invasion involving 
public safety. liberty could indulged 
letter spirit, really think constitutional argument would 
you. 
 
general view question stated Albany 
hence state now. add that, seems me, 
benefit writ habeas corpus great means 
guarantees personal liberty made available 
last view fact Mr. 
case question, advice able 
lawyers, saw else go habeas 
Constitution benefit writ habeas corpus may 
suspended when, case rebellion invasion, public safety may 
require it. 
 
ask, substance, whether really claim may 
guaranteed rights individuals, plea public 
safety may choose say public safety requires it. 
question, calculated represent 
struggling arbitrary personal either simply 
question shall decide, affirmation nobody shall decide, 
public safety require cases rebellion 
 
Constitution contemplates question likely occur 
decision, expressly declare decide it. 
necessary implication, rebellion invasion comes, decision 
made time time; think man time, 
people have, Constitution, made commander-in-chief 
army navy, man holds power bears responsibility 
making it. uses power people probably 
justify him; it, hands dealt 
modes reserved Constitution. 
 
earnestness insist persons only, times 
rebellion, lawfully dealt accordance rules 
criminal trials times peace, induces add 
word said point Albany 
 
claim men may, choose, embarrass whose duty 
combat giant rebellion, dealt turn 
rebellion. Constitution view. 
military arrests made, including 
Mr. different principle others, 
stay 
proceedings keep hence, like proceedings 
cases like reasons, accompanied 
trials single case punishment 
whatever, beyond purely incidental original 
sentence imprisonment Mr. case prevent injury 
military service only, modification made 
less disagreeable mode securing 
 
unable perceive insult Ohio case Mr. 
Quite surely nothing sort intended. wholly unaware 
Mr. Vallandigham was, time arrest, candidate 
Democratic nomination governor informed reading 
resolutions convention. grateful State Ohio 
many things, especially brave soldiers officers given 
present national trial armies Union. 
 
claim, understand, according position 
Albany Mr. Vallandigham because, 
claim, military service discouraging 
encouraging had, 
turned civil authorities recent 
acts Congress. certainly know Mr. Vallandigham 
specifically direct language advised 
favor desertion resistance 
 
know armed instances, resist 
arrest deserters began several months ago; recently like 
appeared resistance enrolment preparatory 
quite number occurred 
met military force, led bloodshed 
death. now, sense responsibility weighty 
enduring merely solemnly declare belief 
military, including murder, 
due course Mr. Vallandigham engaged greater 
degree cause; due personally 
greater degree one man. 
 
things known all, course known Mr. 
Perhaps would wrong say originated 
special friends perfect knowledge them, 
frequently constantly made speeches Congress popular 
shown that, things staring 
face ever uttered word rebuke counsel them, 
fact greatly favor me, one yet 
totally known whole burden speeches 
stir men prosecution war, 
midst resistance known instance 
counsel resistance, next impossible repel 
inference directly favor it. 
 
eyes, convention represent 
nominated Mr. Vallandigham governor Ohio, 
declared purpose sustain national Union 
constitutional means. course common reserve 
decide constitutional and, unlike Albany 
meeting, omit state intimate opinion army 
constitutional means saving Union rebellion, even 
intimate conscious existing rebellion progress 
avowed object destroying Union. time 
governor, whose behalf known 
world declare use army suppress 
rebellion. therefore, desertion, resistance 
draft, like, teaches desert 
escape draft believe purpose protect them, 
hope become strong enough so. 
 
short personal intercourse you, gentlemen committee, 
cannot say think desire effect follow 
assure friends enemies Union look upon 
light. substantial hope, consequence real strength 
enemy. false hope, one would willingly 
make way exceedingly easy. 
 
send letter order you, majority 
you, may, choose, indorse names upon one return 
thus indorsed understanding signing thereby 
committed following propositions nothing 
 
1. rebellion United States, object 
tendency destroy National Union; that, 
opinion, army navy constitutional means suppressing 
rebellion; 
 
2. one anything which, judgment, 
tend hinder favor lessen 
efficiency army navy engaged effort suppress 
rebellion; 
 
3. will, sphere, 
officers, soldiers, seamen army navy, engaged 
effort suppress rebellion, paid, otherwise well 
provided 
 
understanding upon receiving letter 
names thus cause published, publication 
shall be, within itself, order relation Mr. 
escape observation consent release 
Mr. Vallandigham upon terms embracing pledge 
others do. 
present speak himself, authorize others speak him; 
expect returning would put 
practically position friends. 
chiefly thereby prevail influential gentlemen Ohio 
define position immense value 
compensating consequences mistake allowing Mr. 
Vallandigham return; that, whole, public safety 
suffered it. Still, regard Mr. Vallandigham others, 
must hereafter, heretofore, much public safety may seem 
require. 
 
honor respectfully yours, etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 30, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
despatch yesterday received. really think attitude 
enemy's army Pennsylvania presents us best opportunity 
since war began. think see New Jersey. beg 
assured one position know well 
difficulties General 
McClellan command, aside upon him. 
 
Please accept sincere thanks done 
get troops forward. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM A. K. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, June 30, 1863. 
 
A. K. Philadelphia: 
 
gain anything opening one stop gain 
anything one merely open another, probably larger 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL WASHINGTON CITY, June 30, 1863. 
P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Harrisburg, Pa.: 
 
judge absence news enemy crossing pressing 
Please tell know 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL D. HUNTER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, June 30, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER. 
 
DEAR received letter 25th June. 
 
assure you, may feel authorized recent 
change commanders Department South made 
reasons convey upon known energy, 
causes seemed sufficient, 
degree incompatible respect esteem always 
held man 
 
cannot, giving consent publication whose details know 
nothing, assume responsibility whatever may write. 
matter sense military propriety must 
regulations service rule 
 
truly friend, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., July 3, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, Ohio: 
 
Private Twentieth Kentucky Infantry, 
said sentenced shot desertion to-day. so, 
execution see record. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SON 
 
TELEGRAM ROBERT T, LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 
 
ROBERT T. LINCOLN, Esq., Mass.: 
 
Don't mother slightly hurt fall. 
 
A.L. 
 
Please send once. 
 
 
 
 
ANNOUNCEMENT NEWS 
 
WASHINGTON, 
 
July 4, 10.30 A.M. 
 
President country news Army 
Potomac, 10 P.M. cover army 
highest honor, promise great success cause Union, 
claim many gallant 
especially desires day whose will, 
ours, ever done everywhere remembered 
profoundest 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL FRENCH. WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., 
July 5, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FRENCH, Md.: 
 
see despatch destruction Cannot enemy 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CONTINUED FAILURE PURSUE ENEMY 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
HOME, WASHINGTON, JULY 6 P.M., 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
left telegraph office good deal know 
like Orders, No. 
Since that, see despatch General French, saying 
enemy crossing wounded river without saying 
stop it, even thought ought 
stopped. Still later, another despatch General 
direction General Meade, General French, stating main army 
halted believed rebels "on 
road towards beyond move 
ascertained rebels intend Cumberland 
 
things appear connected purpose cover 
Baltimore Washington get enemy across river 
without appear connected 
purpose prevent crossing destroy him. fear former 
purpose acted upon latter 
 
satisfied latter purpose 
pursued, content. satisfied, please look it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SERENADE, 
 
JULY 7, 1863. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I glad indeed see yet 
say thank sincerely thank 
Almighty God occasion called. long ago 
years since, Fourth July, first time 
history world, nation, representatives, assembled 
declared self-evident truth "that men created equal." 
birthday United States America. Since Fourth 
July several peculiar two men 
distinguished framing support Declaration Thomas 
Jefferson John Adams, one penned it, 
sustained forcibly two 
signed elected Presidents United States. Precisely 
fifty years put hands paper, pleased 
Almighty God take stage action. indeed 
extraordinary remarkable event history. Another President, five 
years after, called stage existence day 
month last Fourth July passed, 
gigantic rebellion, bottom effort 
overthrow principle men created equal, 
surrender powerful position army day. 
so, succession battles Pennsylvania, near us, 
three days, rapidly fought might called one great 
battle, first, second, third month 
fourth opposed Declaration men 
created equal, run. 
 
Gentlemen, glorious occasion speech, 
prepared make one worthy occasion. would like speak 
terms praise due many brave officers soldiers 
fought cause Union liberties country 
beginning war. trying occasions, success, 
want success. dislike mention name one single 
officer, lest might wrong might Recent events 
bring glorious names, particularly prominent 
mention. said much, take 
 
 
 
 
SURRENDER VICKSBURG GENERAL GRANT 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HALLECK GENERAL G. C. MEADE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., July 7, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
received President following note, 
respectfully 
 
"We certain information Vicksburg surrendered General Grant 
Fourth July. General Meade complete work, 
gloriously far, substantial destruction 
Lee's army, rebellion over. 
 
truly, 
 

 
H. W. HALLECK. General-in-Chief. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HALLECK GENERAL G. C. MEADE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., July 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Md.: 
 
reliable information enemy crossing 
opportunity attack divided forces lost. 
President urgent anxious army move 
forced 
 
H. W. HALLECK, General-in-Chief 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL THOMAS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, July 8, P.M. 
 
GENERAL THOMAS, Harrisburg, Pa.: 
 
despatch morning Secretary War me. 
forces speak imaginable service cannot go 
forward little Lee passing Potomac 
faster forces mention passing Forces beyond 
joined regiments still Harrisburg, united 
force join Pierce somewhere, whole move 
Cumberland Valley, opinion quite likely 
capture part Lee's army. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NEWS GRANT'S CAPTURE VICKSBURG 
 
TELEGRAM E. D. SMITH. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., July 8, 1863. 
 
E. SMITH, New York: 
 
kind despatch behalf self friends gratefully received. 
Capture Vicksburg confirmed despatch General Grant himself. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM F. F. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., July 8, 1863. 
 
HON. F. F. San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
doubt General Meade, commanding Army 
Potomac, beat Lee Gettysburg, end three days' battle, 
latter crossing Potomac 
stream poor means closely pressed 
Meade. also despatches rendering entirely certain 
Vicksburg surrendered General Grant glorious old 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM L. P. F. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D.C., July 9, 1863. 
 
HON. HON. F. F. San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
Consult together great difficulty 
delivering possession. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. K. DUBOIS. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., July 9 A.M. 
 
HON. J. K. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
certain that, three days' fighting Gettysburg, Lee withdrew 
made Potomac, found river 
prevent still side, near 
Williamsport, preparing defend himself; Meade close upon 
him, preparing attack him, heavy occurred nearly 
day yesterday. 
 
satisfied happened north Potomac 
far, anxious hopeful come. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
     Lee allowed escape war 
     went another two years. D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, July 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
many rebel prisoners captured within Maryland Pennsylvania 
reached Baltimore within month 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 13, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GRANT: 
 
DEAR remember ever met personally. 
write grateful acknowledgment almost inestimable 
service done Country. write say word further. 
first reached vicinity Vicksburg, thought 
finally troops across neck, run batteries 
thus go never faith except general 
hope knew better I, Pass expedition 
like could succeed. dropped below, took Port Grand 
thought go river join 
General turned east Big Black, 
feared mistake. wish make personal acknowledgment 
right wrong. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, July 13, 1863. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD. St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
regret learn arrest Democrat fear loses 
middle position desired learned 
two letters wrote Democrat published, 
care little publication letter written. Please 
spare trouble likely 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SON WRITE PARENTS 
 
TELEGRAM R. T. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON D.C., July 14, 1863. 
 
ROBERT T. LINCOLN: New York, Fifth Avenue 
 
hear you? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INTIMATION ARMISTICE 
 
JAMES R. GILMORE GOVERNOR NORTH CAROLINA, 
 
PRESIDENT'S 
 
PRESIDENT'S ROOM, WHITE HOUSE, WASHINGTON, 
 
July 1864. 
 
 
EXCELLENCY B. 
 
DEAR former business Mr. Boston, 
forwarded letter recently received brother, 
Edward says 
interview expressed anxiety peace 
compatible regard slavery already dead, 
establishment Confederacy 
influence bring would admit South 
terms perfect equality North. 
 
receipt letter lost time laying President 
United States, expressed great gratification hearing 
sentiments you, one influential honored 
Southern desires say fully 
anxiety restoration peace States 
States basis abolition 
fighting full every Confederate citizen 
rights common country. points 
President authorizes say glad 
receive man, body men, authority 
control armies United States 
Congress found liberal collateral points may come 
settlement. 
 
views collateral points may naturally arise, President 
desires say communicate 
suggest personal interview Mr. Edward recommends 
letter brother. case please forward me, 
Mr. official Governor North Carolina, enter 
leave State, remain safety 
which, suppose, conducted entire 
assume official character. high consideration, 
am, 
 
Sincerely yours, 
 
JAMES R. 
 
 [Indorsement.] 
 
letter written presence, read me, 
entire approval. A.L. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION THANKSGIVING, JULY 15, 1863 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
pleased Almighty God prayers 
afflicted people, army navy United 
States victories land sea signal effective 
furnish reasonable grounds augmented confidence Union 
States maintained, Constitution preserved, 
peace prosperity permanently restored. victories 
accorded without sacrifices life, health, liberty, 
brave, loyal, patriotic citizens. Domestic affliction 
every part country follows train fearful 
meet right recognize confess presence 
Almighty Father, power hand equally 
triumphs 
 
Now, therefore, known set apart Thursday, 6th day 
August next, observed day national thanksgiving, 
prayer, invite people United States assemble 
occasion customary places worship, and, forms 
approved render due Divine 
Majesty wonderful things done nation's 
invoke influence Holy Spirit anger 
produced long sustained cruel rebellion, change 
hearts insurgents, guide counsels Government 
wisdom adequate great national visit tender 
care consolation throughout length breadth land 
who, battles, 
been, brought suffer mind, body, finally 
lead whole nation paths submission 
Divine back perfect enjoyment union fraternal 
peace. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, fifteenth day July, year 
Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-three, 
independence United States America eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
By, President  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
  Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM L. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, July 15, 1863. 
 
HON. L San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
Many persons telegraphing California, peace 
State suspend military enforcement writ possession 
case, single one urges contrary. 
know would like oblige you, seems duty 
case way. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SIMON CAMERON. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, JULY 15, 1863. 
 
HON. SIMON CAMERON, Harrisburg, Pa.: 
 
despatch yesterday received. Lee already across river 
sent it. would give much relieved impression 
Meade, Smith, since battle Gettysburg, 
get Lee river without another Please tell me, 
know, one corps commander fighting 
council war Sunday night. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. O. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., JULY 15, 1863. 
 
J. O. St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
effect political position arrest relieved 
made purpose. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 1863. 
 
HON. S. H. 
 
DEAR asked General 
removed, with, military operations. asked 
he, Governor, allowed commission officers troops raised 
Kansas, governors loyal States do; think right 
this. 
 
asked General shall take persons charged civil 
crimes hands courts turn 
think right also. asked General 
department extended include Kansas; 
determined whether right not. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., July 18, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR O. P. MORTON, 
 
remember case John O. Brown, convicted 
conduct sentenced desire it? 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON 
 
July 20, 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY Governor New Jersey. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 15th received, considered 
Secretary War myself. pained informed morning 
Provost-Marshal-General New Jersey behind twelve thousand, 
draft. time ascertain rules 
made out; shall glad shall, means, 
prove also tells eight thousand 
quota New Jersey first Secretary War 
says first draft State would made time 
event. every man obtained otherwise draft much, 
may hope push forward volunteer 
regiments fast possible. 
 
delicate matter postpone draft one State, 
argument furnishes others postponement also. could 
reason one case would good presented cases, 
could act upon it. 
 
thank you, therefore, inform me, can, day, 
promise ready mustered United 
States service eight thousand men. 
 
make reliable promise (I mean one rely 
sort, great value, day 

 
beg assured wish avoid difficulties dread much 
yourself. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON D.C. JULY 20, 1863 
 
MAJOR GENERAL JOHN M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
DEAR received read letter 14th 
July. 
 
think suggestion make, proceedings 
Mr. proper one. admit apparent 
impropriety publication letter mentioned, without consent 
yours, still case evil could result, 
entirely willing 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. M. SCHOFIELD 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C. JULY 22, 1863 
 
MAJOR GENERAL SCHOFIELD, St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
following despatch placed hands. Please look 
subject it. 
 
LEXINGTON, Mo., JULY 21, 1863 HON. C. Orders 
sheriff arresting slaves rebels inside lines, returning 
great numbers. it? Answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL BLAIR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
JULY 24, 1863. 
 
HON. POSTMASTER-GENERAL 
 
little mine went two cases 
sought whose fallen 
battles war. cases occurring day brought 
reflect attentively done, fairly due 
us herein patronage toward men who, fighting 
battles, bear chief burden serving country. conclusion 
that, claims equal, better 
right especially applicable soldier, 
deceased family. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY NAVY. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 25, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY NAVY. 
 
matters come notice, considered me, 
induce believe public interest 
add general instructions given naval commanders 
relation contraband trade propositions substantially follows, 
wit: 
 
First. avoid reality, far possible appearance, 
using neutral port watch neutral vessels 
seize 
 
made practiced port 
Thomas, practice, exists, must cease. 
 
Second. case detain captured neutral 
vessel subject neutral power board vessel, 
prisoners war otherwise, except small number necessary 
witnesses prize court. 
 
practice forbidden also charged exist, which, 
true, must cease. 
 
dear sir, intended 
performance arduous responsible duties 
department, which, take pleasure hands 
conducted success. Yet, almost 
necessity brought angry collision subjects foreign 
states, representatives states come 
immediate contact purpose keeping peace, spite 
point ultimate heavy responsibility 
upon me. 
 
propose strict accordance international law, 
therefore good, 
contribute sustain considerable portion present British 
places, who, sure replaced 
others us. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
LETTER GOVERNOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
July 25, 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY GOVERNOR 
 
SIR:--Yours 21st received, taken time considered 
discussed subject Secretary War Provost-Marshal 
General, order, possible, make favorable answer 
finally find able do. 
 
vital point us special stipulation 
governor one State, would trouble many, 
all, States; idea wrote you, still is, 
get point time could reason 
ready proceed, might enable raise quota 
State, whole, large part, without draft. points 
time fix much farther might got 
along way indicated possibly thirty, days. 
stands, best say every volunteer present us 
within thirty days date, fit ready mustered 
United States service, usual terms, shall pro 
quota draft. quota state eight thousand 
seven hundred draft New Jersey, 
made additional draft, common 
States, shall may add get well 
draft, entertain strong hope 
one may never needed. expression hope, however, must 
construed 
 
conducting draft find would require 
waste labor already done, additional amount it, 
loss time, make it, fear, 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. writing above, getting additional information, 
enabled say draft may made 
enrolment made, process amount 
practically 
generally extent A.L. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. G. MEADE. (Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 27, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
thrown General Hooker therefore would like know 
whether would agreeable you, things considered, 
take corps you, willing so. Write 
perfect freedom, assurance subject 
embarrassment making letter contents known one. 
wish know wishes decide whether break subject 
him. breadth feelings, 
judgment public service, idea gratifying me. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. B. BURNSIDE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, July 27, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cincinnati, O.: 
 
Let explain. General Grant's first despatch fall 
Vicksburg, said, among things, would send Ninth Corps 
you. Thinking would pleasant you, asked Secretary War 
telegraph news. reasons never mentioned us General 
Grant, though seen outside 
took part expedition Jackson. General Grant 
writer 
doubt changed purpose regard Ninth Corps 
sufficient reason, forgotten notify us it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, July 29, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
Seeing General Meade's despatch yesterday causes fear 
supposes Government demanding bring 
general engagement Lee soon possible. claiming 
thing him. fact, judgment it; judgment, 
course, yield contrary. could 
safely engage Lee Williamsport, seems absurd suppose 
safely engage now, scarcely two 
force Williamsport, must Lee 
True, desired General Meade pursue Lee across 
Potomac, proved true, would thereby clear 
Baltimore Ohio Railroad, get advantages 
past, unwilling get 
general engagement impression pressing him, 
shall glad inform him, unless judgment 
it. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
H. W. HALLECK, General-in-Chief. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 29, 1863 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
renew effort organize force go western 

 
Please consult general-in-chief subject. 
 
Governor New Jersey shall furnish new regiments, might 
put Please think it. 
 
believe local object 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 30, 1863. 
 
duty every government give protection citizens, 
whatever class, color, condition, especially duly 
organized soldiers public service. law nations 
customs war, carried civilized powers, permit 
distinction color treatment prisoners war public 
enemies. sell enslave captured person, account color 
offense laws war, 
crime civilization age. 
 
Government United States give protection 
enemy shall sell enslave one 
color, offense shall punished upon enemy's 
prisoners possession. 
 
therefore ordered every soldier United States killed 
violation laws war, rebel soldier shall 
every one enemy sold slavery, rebel soldier 
shall placed hard labor public works, continued 
labor shall receive treatment due 
prisoner war. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL S. A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, July 31, 1863. 
 
DEAR GENERAL 
 
letter Mr. duly received. learn 
resignation reached War Department. also learn active 
command assigned General Grant. Secretary War 
General Halleck partial you, know also am. 
wish reconsider question would 
wish retain greatly wish interest, 
decision may least one. 
 
understand Senator Arkansas, thinks 
offering resume place Senate. course Senate, 
I, would decide whether admit reject him. Still feel great 
interest question. may presented one 
greatest national may otherwise presented 
temporary personal consequence him. 
 
Emancipation Proclamation applies Arkansas. think valid 
law, held courts. think shall retract 
repudiate it. shall actual freedom believe 
never slaves again. rest, believe plan 
substantially gradual emancipation would better white 
Missouri plan recently adopted, object 
account time ending institution; sorry 
beginning postponed seven years, leaving 
time repeal whole thing. begin 
once, giving least vested interest freedom 
could taken away. Senator could come something 
sort Arkansas, I, least, take great interest 
case; believe single individual scarcely done world 
great service. See can, read him; charge 
make public present. Write again. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
ALBANY, August 1, 1863. 2 P.M. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES: 
 
ask draft suspended State send 
communication 
 
SEYMOUR. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR SEYMOUR 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., August 1, 1863. 4 P.M. 
 
EXCELLENCY GOVERNOR SEYMOUR, Albany, 
 
day may expect communication reach me? anxious 
part except city 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 3, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL (or whoever may command military 
department headquarters Fort Monroe, 
 
Dr. Wright, trial Norfolk, shall send 
trial let execution 
done upon order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL N. P. BANKS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 
 
DEAR GENERAL 
 
well know would glad Louisiana do, 
quite different thing assume direction matter. would 
glad make new constitution, recognizing emancipation 
proclamation, adopting emancipation parts State 
proclamation it, think 
would objectionable adopt practical system 
two races could gradually live old relation 
other, come better prepared new. Education 
young blacks included plan. all, power 
element may sufficient period, 
simplicity may better. 
 
antislavery man, motive desire emancipation 
proslavery men even strong enough reason 
thus place Union, thus 
perpetually scenes 

 
Governor informed Mr. Durant taking 
view election constitutional convention Louisiana. 
This, me, appears proper. convention ask views, 
could present little else say you. think thing 
pushed forward, that, possible, mature work may reach 
meeting Congress. 
 
part, think shall not, event, retract 
emancipation nor, executive, ever return slavery 
person free terms proclamation, 
acts Congress. 
 
Louisiana shall send members Congress, admission seats 
know, upon respective Houses, upon 
President. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 7, 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY SEYMOUR, Governor New York: 
 
communication instant received attentively 
considered. 
 
cannot consent suspend draft New York, request, 
because, among reasons, time important. 
 
figures presume correct, twelve districts 
represented fall two classes eight four 
quotas draft two classes certainly 
difference average one 
class other. Assuming districts equal one 
another entire population, required plan 
made, require attention. Much it, however, 
suppose accounted fact many persons fit 
soldiers city country recently 
arrived parts United States Europe either 
included census 1860, voted 1862. Still, making 
due allowance this, yet unwilling stand upon entirely 
sufficient explanation great 
 
shall direct draft proceed districts, 
however, first four wit, Second, 
Fourth, Sixth, average quota 
class. four districts, also 
shall carefully and, please, 
agents may witness every step deficiency 
may appear new enrolment supplied special draft 
object, allowing due credit volunteers may obtained 
districts respectively points, 
far consistent practical due credits shall 
given volunteers, Excellency shall notified time 
fixed commencing draft district. 
 
object abide decision United States Supreme Court, 
judges thereof, constitutionality draft law. 
fact, willing facilitate obtaining it. cannot 
consent lose time contending 
enemy who, understand, drives every able-bodied man 
reach ranks, much drives 
time argument produces 
army soon turn upon victorious soldiers already 
field, shall sustained be. 
produces army side first 
waste time volunteer system, already deemed 
Congress, fact, far exhausted 
time obtain court decision whether law 
constitutional, requires part service 
go aid already it; still time 
determine absolute certainty get go 
precisely legal proportion go. purpose 
action constitutional, yet performing 
important duty maintaining 
free principles common country. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL U.S. GRANT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, August 9, 1863. 
 
DEAR GENERAL GRANT: 
 
see despatch quite strongly toward 
expedition would appear also, 
view recent events Mexico greatly impressed 
importance national authority western Texas 
soon possible. making order, leave, 
present least, general-in-chief. 
 
word upon another General Thomas gone 
Mississippi Valley, view raising colored troops. 
reason doubt reasonably upon 
subject. believe applied 
soon close contest. works enemy 
us. fully ripe river 
Now, think least one hundred thousand ought 
rapidly organized along white troops serve 
elsewhere. Mr. understands believing Emancipation 
Proclamation helped military operations. glad 
so. 
 
receive short letter dated 13th 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 10, 1863. 
 
DEAR GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
1st received two days ago. think must inferred 
General Halleck intended, dissatisfaction mine 
you. sure you, reasonable man, would wounded 
could heard words seen thoughts regard 
you. kind feeling confidence you. 
seen despatches General 
them. Grant invested Vicksburg anxious lest Johnston 
overwhelm appeared certain 
part force gone going Johnston, seem 
exactly proper time attack Bragg force 
left. kindness let say seems yet. Finding 
despatches General Halleck judgment different, 
anxious Grant, I, one occasion, told General Halleck 
thought direct decide immediately attack 
Bragg stand defensive send part force Grant. 
replied already directed Soon after, despatches 
Grant anxiety him, proportion anxiety 
movement yours. afterward, however, saw despatch 
arguing right time attack Bragg before, 
would after, fall Vicksburg, impressed 
think stated Secretary War General Halleck. 
seemed proposition could better fight Bragg 
Johnston liberty return assist could 
could return 
 
Since Grant entirely relieved fall Vicksburg, 
Johnston also seemed chance 
considerably pressing 
directly True, anxious East Tennessee 
occupied us; see appreciate difficulties mention. 
question occurs, thing done all? preparation advance 
all? supplies fast get 
animals to-day battle 
yet furnished since entire present 
ask questions force. 
 
casting blame upon you; rather think 
great get East Tennessee; important 
question is, stay there? make order leave 
General Halleck yourself. 
 
assured think kindness 
confidence, watching evil eye. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, August 
 
EXCELLENCY SEYMOUR, Governor New York: 
 
report, 
received to-day. 
 
Asking remember consider time important, 
general cause country soldiers field, 
beg remind request, 1st 
6th receive communication dated 3d. view 
great length, known time apparent care taken 
doubt contained full case 
desired present it. contained figures twelve districts, 
omitting suppose, found nothing 
complain them. answered accordingly. laid 
principle purpose proceed 
draft, time employing means avoid great 
wrong. communication received to-day send figures 
twenty-eight districts, including twelve sent before, still 
omitting three, suppose yet received. 
looking fuller list twenty-eight districts, find 
quotas sixteen while, 
rest, six six Applying principle 
new facts, Fifth Seventh districts must added four 
quotas already reduced first 
four others added 
correct case quotas Second, Fourth, 
Sixth, Seventh, Eighth districts fixed first draft. 
Provost-Marshal-General informs drawing already 
completed 

Thirtieth others, except three 
drawing made upon quotas fixed. first draft, 
Second, Fourth, Sixth, Seventh, 

enrolled purpose manner stated letter 7th 
principle applied districts 
shall come in. part former letter repudiated 
reason this, cause. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL J. A. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 12, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
DEAR friend William G. presented kind 
letter regard yourself, addressed friends Yates, 
Dubois. 
 
doubt whether present position painful 
myself. Grateful patriotic stand early taken 
struggle nation, done whatever appeared 
practicable advance public interest together. charges, 
view trial, preferred one; 
suppose be. is, far heard, General 
Grant's statement reasons you. even 
seen sought case, appears me, 
could nothing without harm. General Grant 
conspicuous important 
interfere thus breach could evil 
effect. Better leave law case placed it. 
force back upon General Grant would forcing cannot 
give new command, forces except already 
commanders. 
 
constantly pressed think, without 
thinking all, give commands respectively Fremont, McClellan, 
Butler, Curtis, Hunter, perhaps others, when, else 
way, commands give them. case; 
which, said, pains less you. belief 
permanent estimate general field fixed 
field, that, 
these, right needs fear. 
 
friend ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, AUGUST 16, 1863. 
 
GOVERNOR SEYMOUR, New York: 
 
despatch morning received, fear 
perfectly understand it. 
 
view principle every soldier obtained voluntarily leaves 
one less obtained draft. difficulty applying 
principle Looking time, heretofore, unwilling 
give drafted man now, even much less mere 
chance, getting volunteer Again, draft 
district, would make trouble take drafted man put 
volunteer shall determined drafted man 
privilege thus going out, exclusion others? 
even draft district quota must 
draft must postponed indefinitely every time volunteer offered 
officers must stop reconstruct least fear 
might difficulty; but, events, let credits volunteers 
given last moment produce confusion delay. 
principle giving credits volunteers shall applied 
districts seems fair proper, though know far present 
statistics cause fair credit 
given one time, given soon thereafter 
purpose fair, yet lose time. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
J. H. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON August 17, 1863. 
 
JAMES H. Esq. 
 
DEAR ago acknowledged receipt 
book accompanying kind beg pardon 
done so. 
 
one age seen little first 
presentation ever saw here, last winter 
Perhaps best compliment pay say, truly can, 
anxious see again. plays never read, 
others gone perhaps frequently 
Among latter Richard Henry 
especially think nothing equals wonderful. 
 
Unlike gentlemen profession, think 
commencing "Oh, offense commencing "To 
be." pardon small attempt like 
hear pronounce opening speech Richard III. soon 
visit Washington again? do, please call let make 
personal acquaintance. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
F. F. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 17, 1863. 
 
HON. P. F. San Francisco, Cal.: 
 
seems considerable misunderstanding recent movement 
take possession mine. reference 
mine 
 
regard mines miners generally, change policy 
Government decided on, even thought of, far know. 
 
mine peculiar this: claimed 
legal owners Mexican grant, went court 
claim. case found way Supreme Court United States, 
last term, court, claim 
decided utterly Thereupon considered duty 
Government Secretary Interior, 
take possession Attorney-General 
carefully made writ signed it. obtained 
although suppose General Halleck thought been, 
simply thought possession 
taken military order, knew order passed 
hands general-in-chief. 
 
writ suspended, upon urgent California, 
simply keep peace. never direct indirect reference 
mine, place, person, except mine persons 
connected it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 21, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Warrenton, Va.: 
 
late moment appealed behalf William Thompson 
Company K, Third Maryland Volunteers, Twelfth Army Corps, said 
sentence shot to-day 
represented young, symptoms Please 
postpone execution till order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 22, 1863. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Please send record case 
Bell, convicted murder military telegraphed 
General Strong it, answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 24, 1863. 
 
MRS. ELIZABETH J. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
mail papers to-day appointing Naval 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
CRITICS EMANCIPATION 
 
J. C. CONKLING. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 26, 1863. 
 
HON. JAMES C. CONKLING. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter inviting attend mass meeting 
unconditional Union men, held capital Illinois, 
3d day September, received. would agreeable 
thus meet old friends home, cannot 
absent long visit would require. 
 
meeting maintain unconditional devotion 
Union, sure old political friends thank 
do, nation's gratitude noble men 
partisan malice partisan hope make false nation's life. 
 
dissatisfied me. would say: 
desire peace, blame it. 
obtain it? three conceivable 
 
suppress rebellion force arms. trying do. 
it? are, far agreed. it, 
second way give Union. this. it? 
say force yet 
remains imaginable compromise. 
 
believe compromise embracing maintenance 
Union possible. learn leads directly opposite 
belief. strength rebellion military, army. army 
country people within range. offer 
terms made man men within opposition 
army, simply nothing present; man men 
power whatever enforce side compromise, one made 
them. 
 
Suppose South peace men North 
get together convention, frame proclaim compromise embracing 
restoration Union. way compromise used 
keep Lee's army Meade's army keep Lee's army 
Pennsylvania, and, think, ultimately drive existence. 
paper compromise Lee's army 
agreed affect army. effort compromise 
would waste time, enemy would improve 
would all. 
 
compromise, must made either control 
rebel army, people, first liberated 
army success army. allow assure 
word intimation rebel army, men 
controlling it, relation peace compromise, ever come 
knowledge belief. charges insinuations contrary 
groundless. promise proposition 
shall hereafter come, shall rejected kept secret you. 
freely acknowledge servant people, according 
bond service, United States Constitution, that, such, 
responsible them. 
 
But, dissatisfied negro. Quite 
likely difference opinion upon 
subject. certainly wish men could free, you, 
suppose, not. Yet, neither adopted proposed measure 
consistent even view, provided 
Union. suggested compensated replied 
wished taxed buy negroes. asked taxed 
buy negroes, except way save greater taxation 
save Union exclusively means. 
 
dislike Emancipation Proclamation, perhaps would 
say unconstitutional. think differently. think 
Constitution commander-in-chief law war 
time war. said, much, is, slaves 
property. there, ever been, question law 
war, property, enemies friends, may taken 
needed whenever helps us hurts enemy? Armies, 
world over, destroy property cannot use it, even 
destroy keep enemy. Civilized 
power help hurt enemy, except things 
regarded Among exceptions massacre 
male 
 
proclamation, law, either valid valid. 
valid needs valid cannot 
dead brought life. profess 
think retraction would operate favorably Union, better 
retraction issue? year 
half trial suppress rebellion proclamation 
last one hundred days passed explicit notice 
coming, unless averted revolt returning 
war certainly favorably us since 
issue proclamation before. 
 
know, fully one know opinions others, 
commanders armies field, given us 
important believe emancipation policy use 
colored troops constitute heaviest blows yet dealt rebellion, 
least one important successes could 
achieved aid black soldiers. 
 
Among commanders hold views never 
called Party 
hold purely military opinions. submit 
opinions entitled weight objections often urged 
emancipation arming blacks unwise military measures, 
adopted good faith. 
 
say fight free negroes. seem willing 
fight you; matter. Fight you, then, exclusively, save 
Union. issued proclamation purpose aid saving 
Union. Whenever shall conquered resistance Union, 
shall urge continue fighting, apt time 
declare fight free negroes. thought 
struggle Union, whatever extent negroes cease 
helping enemy, extent enemy resistance 
you. think thought whatever negroes 
got soldiers, leaves much less white soldiers 
saving Union. appear otherwise you? negroes, like 
people, act upon anything us 
nothing them? stake lives us must 
prompted strongest even promise freedom. 
made, must 
 
signs look better. Father Waters goes 
Thanks great Northwest it; yet wholly them. Three 
hundred miles met New England, Jersey, 
way right left. South, too, colors 
one, also helping hand. spot, part history 
black white. job great national one, let 
none bore honorable part 
cleared great river may well proud, even all. 
hard say anything bravely well done 
Gettysburg, many fields less note. 
must Uncle forgotten. 
present; deep sea, broad bay, rapid 
river, also wherever ground 
little made Thanks all. 
great principle lives keeps man's 
vast all. 
 
Peace appear distant did. hope come soon, 
come come worth keeping future 
time. proved among freemen 
successful appeal ballot take 
appeal sure lose case pay cost. 
black men remember silent tongue, 
teeth, steady eye, bayonet, helped mankind 
great fear white ones 
unable forget heart speech 
hinder it. 
 
Still, let us final triumph. Let us 
quite Let us diligently apply means, never doubting 
God, good time, give us rightful result. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JAMES CONKLING. 
 
(Private.) 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, D. C., August 
 
HON. JAMES CONKLING. 
 
DEAR cannot leave now. Herewith letter 
one best public one 
slowly. God bless you, good Union men. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 26, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR correspondence Governor Seymour 
relation draft, said him, substantially, credits 
shall given volunteers latest moment, drawing 
district, done without producing confusion delay. 
order this, let officers New York elsewhere 
at, instructed whenever muster service number 
volunteers, make return War Department, 
telegraph mail, date number 
Congressional enrolment district districts, 
giving numbers district. Keep returns 
diligently give full credit 
possible, last day draft begins district. 
 
Again, informed Governor Seymour shall notified 
time draft commence district State. 
equally proper States. order carry out, propose 
soon day commencing draft district 
definitely governor State, including district, 
notified thereof, telegraph mail, form follows: 
 
     
 
     1863. 
 
Governor 
     
 
notified draft commence 
---- district, ------ 
 ------ day 
1863, ------ A.M. said day. 
 
Please acknowledge receipt telegraph mail. 
               
               
 
notice may given Provost-Marshal-General here, 
States, perhaps district 

 
Whenever shall far proceeded New York make 
specially promised practicable, wish also go 
forward, wish Governor Seymour notified it; choose, 
place agents see work fairly done. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR SEYMOUR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 1863. 
 
EXCELLENCY SEYMOUR, 
 
Governor New York: 
 
received 
 
midst pressing duties unable answer 
meantime access yours, 
addressed communication relation Secretary War, 
copy communication herewith enclose you. 
 
Independently this, addressed letter subject 
Secretary War, copy also enclose you. Secretary 
sent letter Provost-Marshal General, direction 
adopt follow course therein pointed out. will, course, 
conflicting view 
such. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. mean say Provost-Marshal-General find 
practicable give credits that. 
contrary, shall glad it; take risk 
ordering it. A. L. 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 27, 1863 8.30 P. M. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD, St. 
 
received despatch follows, two influential 
citizens Kansas, whose names severe blow received 
naturally enough makes even without 
cause Please utmost give future security 
punish 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. G. MEADE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 27, 1863 9 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Warrenton, Va.: 
 
appealed without 
giving ground whatever. understand flagrant 
cases, deem punishment indispensable 
service. mistaken this, please let know 
appeal denied. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM F. C. SHERMAN J. S. 
 
WASHINGTON, August 27, 1863. 
 
F. C. SHERMAN, Mayor, J. S. Chicago, Ill.: 
 
relation draft, received. seems 
Government overwhelmed undertakes conduct 
matters authorities cities counties. must 
conducted governors States, will, course, represent 
cities counties. Meanwhile need uneasy 
hear here. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, August 28, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FOSTER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Please can, Senator Mr. Mr. 
them, record Dr. case, 
ready hear them. shall got notice them, please 
let know. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., August 28, 1863. 
 
GENERAL Rappahannock Station, Va.: 
 
regret cannot present witness presentation sword 
gallant Pennsylvania Reserve Corps one worthy receive 
General Meade. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM L. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., August 29, 1863. 
 
HON. L. San Francisco, Cal.: rights 
Government satisfied, events 
consider. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C. August 29, 1863. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, N. 
 
quite well. Fort Sumter certainly utterly useless 
enemy, believed here, entirely certain, 
Sumter Fort occupied forces. also certain 
General Gilmore thrown shot city 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. C. CONKLING. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
August 31, 1863. 
 
HON. JAMES C. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
letter insert sentence ending 
issue Emancipation Proclamation next, commencing 
"You say fight, follows signature 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
"I know fully one know opinions others 
commanders armies field, given us 
important successes, believe emancipation policy use 
colored troops constitute heaviest blow yet dealt rebellion, 
least one important successes could 
achieved was, aid black soldiers. Among 
commanders holding views never 
called Republican party politics, 
hold purely military opinions. submit opinions 
entitled weight often 
emancipation arming blacks unwise military measures 
adopted good 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, August 31, 1863. 
 
DEAR GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
22d received yesterday. wrote before, 
now, engage argument military 
questions. informed impressed General Halleck 
dissatisfied you, could deny 
without him. therefore concluded tell 
plain truth, satisfied matter would thus appear much smaller 
would seen mere repeat appreciation 
never forget whilst remember anything, 
end last year beginning this, gave us 
which, defeat nation 
could hardly lived over. Neither forget check 
gave dangerous sentiment spreading 
North. 
 
Yours, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
August 31, 1863 
 
improbable recent great outrage 
Lawrence, Kansas, may extend 
Missouri unless averted judicious action. shall 
obliged general-in-chief make suggestions General 
Schofield upon subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POLITICAL NEWSPAPER 
 
TELEGRAM J. C. CONKLING. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 3, 1863. 
 
HON. JAMES C. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
morning find letter 
Eastern papers, telegraphed Chicago. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CONCERNING COMMERCIAL REGULATIONS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 4, 1863. 
 
Ordered, executive order dated November 21, 1862, prohibiting 
exportation United States arms, ammunition, munitions 
war, departments were, order 
Secretary War dated May 13, 1863, directed prohibit purchase 
exportation United States, horses 
within respective commands, take appropriate 
use United States horses, live stock designed 
far modified arms heretofore imported 
United States may place original 
live stock raised State Territory bounded 
Pacific Ocean may exported from, port State Territory. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. September 5, 1863. 
 
HON. JOSEPH Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
seen despatch Secretary War, 
also send despatch Major 3d showing 
notice order, stating people it, 
victory Government fear, already 
collected money. proceeded since, shall 
hold contrary, dollar shall 
order shall appear act case 
accepted right spirit. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON. D. C. September 6, 1863. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, 
 
well news except General Burnside Knoxville, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, September 6, 1863. 6 P.M. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR, Pa.: 
 
Burnside Knoxville, drove enemy across river 
enemy destroying bridge there; captured 
one two little wounded none 
news consequence. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM F. C. SHERMAN J. S. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 7, 1863. 
 
August received. suppose intended Congress 
government execute act question without dependence 
upon government, State, city, county. is, however, within 
range practical convenience confer governments 
States, quite beyond range correspondence 
subject counties instances, 
Governor Seymour, Mayor 
Governor Curtin, Mayor 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 8, 1863. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Nashville, Tenn.: 
 
Despatch yesterday received. shall try find paper 
mention carefully consider it. meantime let urge 
utmost get every man can, black white, arms 
earliest moment, guard roads, allowing 
better soldiers go forward Rosecrans. course mean 
act co-operation independently of, military 
authorities. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 9, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Warrenton, Va.: 
 
would generous thing give General leave absence 
ten fifteen days, without injury 
service, please it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 10, 1863. 
 
GENERAL Army Potomac: 
 
Yesterday instance Mr. Blair, senator, telegraphed General 
Meade asking grant leave replied 
applied leave, 
suppose proper know this. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, SEPTEMBER, 11, 1863 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON. 
 
DEAR Tennessee clear armed 
need reminded time 
loyal State government. moment lost. 
co-operating friends better judge ways means 
judged here. offer 
must give control State representation 
Congress enemies Union, driving friends 
political whole struggle Tennessee 
State nation ends Governor Johnson 
put Governor Harris put up. must so. must 
otherwise. Let reconstruction work men 
trusted Union. Exclude others, trust government 
organized recognized one republican form 
guaranteed State, protected invasion 
domestic violence. something question time remember 
cannot known next occupy position hold, 
do. see declared favor emancipation 
Tennessee, may God bless you. Get emancipation new 
State government constitution word fail 
cause. raising colored troops, think, greatly help 
every way. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL BURNSIDE, Cumberland 
 
received. thousand thanks late successes given 
us. cannot allow resign things shall little 
settled East Tennessee. then, purely account, wish 
refuse you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 11, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Warrenton, Va.: 
 
represented Thomas army, sentence 
death desertion, executed next Monday. also said 
supposed desertion absence commencing falling 
behind last winter, captured enemy, 
going home. near truth, please suspend execution till 
order send record trial. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 12, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL Warrenton, Va.: 
 
name despatch. papers 
left designate regiment man 
gave papers, know find again. told 
Army Potomac, fell ranks 
march last get information 
telegraph again. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM H. H. SCOTT. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 13, 1863. 
 
Dr. WILLIAM H. H. SCOTT, Ill.: 
 
Mrs. Sharp, difficulty going 
Knoxville, place within military lines. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. G. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 25, 1863. 
 
J. G. Thanks good news send 
sending it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SUSPENDING WRIT HABEAS CORPUS, SEPTEMBER 15, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas Constitution United States 
privilege writ habeas corpus shall suspended unless when, 
cases rebellion invasion, public safety may require it; and: 
 
Whereas rebellion existing third day March, 1863, 
rebellion still and: 
 
Whereas statute approved day enacted 
Senate House Representatives United States Congress 
assembled present insurrection President 
United States, whenever judgment public safety may 
authorized suspend privilege writ habeas corpus 
case throughout United States part and: 
 
Whereas, judgment President, public safety require 
privilege said writ shall new suspended throughout 
United States cases where, authority President 
United States, military, naval, civil officers United States, 
them, hold persons command 
either prisoners war, enemy, 
officers, soldiers, seamen enrolled drafted mustered enlisted 
belonging land naval forces United States, 
deserters therefrom, otherwise military law rules 
articles war rules regulations prescribed 
military naval services authority President United 
States, resisting draft, offense 
military naval service. 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
hereby proclaim make known may concern 
privilege writ habeas corpus suspended throughout United 
States several cases mentioned, suspension 
continue throughout duration said rebellion 
proclamation shall, subsequent one issued President 
United States, modified hereby require 
civil officers within United States 
officers others military naval services 
United States take distinct notice suspension give 
full effect, citizens United States conduct govern 
accordingly conformity Constitution 
United States laws Congress case made provided. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States fifteenth day September, 
A.D. 1863, independence United States America 
eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
  Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 13, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
misunderstand General Meade's last despatch, posts 
facts well can, desires views 
Government shall do. opinion move upon 
Lee manner general leaving developments whether 
make real attack. think would develop Lee's real 
condition purposes better cavalry alone do. course 
opinion control General Meade. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. SPEED. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 16, 1862. 
 
MRS. J. F. SPEED, Louisville, Ky.: 
 
Mr. place knowledge 
consent. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 16, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Warrenton, Va.: 
 
Albert Company K, Third Maryland Volunteers, shot 
Friday next? please state general features case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHENCK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 17, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Major left several days ago promise put 
writing, detail, facts relation people 
eastern Virginia. returned. Please send 
over. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 17, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Headquarters Army Potomac: 
 
relation Albert received. appealed 
behalf Richard M. Company A, Sixth New Jersey Volunteers, 
Governor Attorney-General Governor Hon. Mr. 
M. C., district, marshal arrested him. 
also appealed behalf Joseph S. Smith, Company A, Eleventh New 
Jersey Volunteers, Governor Attorney-General 
Hon. C. Please state circumstances cases me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REQUEST SUGGEST NAME 
 
TELEGRAM C. M. SMITH. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., September 18, 1863. 
 
SMITH, Esq., Springfield, Ill.: 
 
name general fancy suggestion. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. 
 
WASHINGTON, September 18, 1863. 
 
MRS. Ill.: 
 
ordered discharge boy say, 
Louisville, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR JOHNSON. 
 
(Private.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON. 
 
DEAR send paper, substantially 
one drawn mentioned despatch, slightly 
changed two First, drawn authorized 
carry effect fourth section, etc., whereas modify 
authorize act require United States carry 
effect section. 
 
Secondly, clause committing sort State 
constitution Tennessee, feared might embarrass making 
new constitution, dropped 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 

 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C., 
 
September 19, 1863. 
 
HON. ANDREW JOHNSON, Military Governor Tennessee: 
 
addition matters contained orders instructions given 
Secretary War, hereby authorized exercise 
powers may necessary proper enable loyal people 
Tennessee present republican form State government 
entitle State United States 
protected State government United States 
invasion domestic violence, according fourth Section 
fourth article Constitution United States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
MILITARY 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON D.C. September 19, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
General Meade's despatch yesterday appears desires 
views government whether shall advance upon 
enemy. prepared order, even advance 
case, wherein know little wherein he, 
field, thinks risk great promise advantage 
 
yet case presents matter serious consideration 
another two armies across small river, 
substantially two defending 
capital, menacing other. General Meade estimates enemy's 
infantry front less Suppose add fifty per 
cent. cavalry, artillery, men stretching far 
Richmond, making whole force enemy 
 
General Meade, shown him, 
Washington, classes, well men, Neither 
bring whole men bring large 
percentage other. battle, then, General Meade three 
men General Lee's two. Yet, determined choosing 
ground standing defensive gives great advantage 
three cannot safely attack two, three left simply standing 
defensive also. 
 
enemy's sufficient keep away 
Richmond, why, rule, may keep 
away Washington, leaving us 50,000 put 
practically come mere seems economy 
employ twice many men object needed. object, 
certainly, myself, perceive fault statement, 
unless admit equal enemy, man man. hope 
consider it. 
 
avoid misunderstanding, let say attempt fight enemy 
slowly back Richmond, capture him, 
idea trying repudiate quite year. 
 
judgment clear would scarcely allow attempt 
made general command desire make it. last 
attempt upon Richmond get McClellan, nearer 
enemy was, run ahead him. Since constantly 
desired Army Potomac make Lee's army, Richmond, 
objective point. army cannot fall upon enemy hurt 
is, plain gain nothing attempting follow 
succession lines city. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 20, 1863. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, New York: 
 
neither see hear anything now, though may 
much without knowing it. wish stay come 
agreeable yourself. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C, September 21, 1863. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN. Fifth Avenue New York: 
 
air clear cool apparently would glad 
come. Nothing particular, would glad see 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, D. C., September 21, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
think important General Rosecrans hold position 
Chattanooga, held place 
keeps Tennessee clear enemy, also one 
important railroad lines. prevent consequences 
vital cause cannot give effort us 
position, thus bringing us saving us labor, expense, 
hazard going farther find him, also giving us advantage 
choosing ground preparing fight upon. details 
must, course, left General Rosecrans, must furnish 
means utmost think would 
better informed pushing beyond position; 
that, fact, judgment rather going beyond it. 
maintain position, without more, rebellion 
short feeble existence, animal sometimes may thorn 

 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D.C., September 21, 1863. 
 
GENERAL BURNSIDE, Tenn.: 
 
good Rosecrans waste time 
already late good might 
done, hope still good. Please lose moment. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL A. E. BURNSIDE 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, September 21, 1863. 11 A.M. 
 
GENERAL BURNSIDE, Knoxville, Tenn.: 
 
Go Rosecrans force without moment's delay. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS 
 
WASHINGTON, September 21, 1863. PM. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, 
 
good confidence you, soldiers 
officers. main must judge 
done. suggest, would say, save army taking strong 
positions Burnside you, when, hope, turn 
think better send Burnside hurry up. 
cannot reach suppose force going 
Corinth, want communication know 
getting along. shall utmost assist you. Send us present 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, September 22, A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, Tenn.: 
 
word condition army 
later hour Sunday, despatches 9 
A.M., General Halleck 2 P. yesterday, tell us nothing 
later points. Please relieve anxiety position 
condition army latest moment. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM O. M. J. K. DUBOIS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON. September 22, 1863. 
 
HON. O. M. HON. J. K. Springfield, Ill.: 
 
letter received. particular form despatch 
supposed gentlemen knew well enough understand. 
General considered faithful capable officer, 
one would least thought 
office 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 22, 1863. 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, Fifth Avenue House, New receive 
despatch Mrs. Cuthbert correctly understand me. 
directed tell use pleasure whether stay come, 
say account come. 
far see know, never really wish see 
you. Answer 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WASHINGTON, September A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, 
 
despatch found Richmond papers. see 
claim many prisoners captured guns inclined 
also heavy loss. exchanged general 
leaving Richmond yesterday says two divisions 
entire artillery two brigades gone 
Tennessee. other. 
 
RIVER, SEPTEMBER 
 
"GENERAL 
 
"After two days' hard fighting 
driven enemy, desperate resistance, several positions, 
hold still us. loses heavy 
sides, especially 
 

 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION OPENING PORT ALEXANDRIA, VIRGINIA, 
 
SEPTEMBER 24, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, proclamation April, 1861, 
ports States Virginia North Carolina were, reasons 
therein set forth, placed whereas port 
Alexandria, Virginia, since blockade 
said port may safely relaxed advantage interests 

 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United pursuant authority vested fifth section 
act Congress, approved 13th July, 1861, entitled "An 
act provide collection duties imports, 
purposes," hereby declare blockade said port 
shall far cease determine, date, 
commercial intercourse said except persons, things, 
information contraband war, may date carried on, 
subject laws United States, limitations 
pursuance regulations prescribed Secretary 
Treasury order appended proclamation 12th 
May, 1862. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, twenty-fourth day September 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-three, 
independence United States eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
  Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, September 24, 1863. 10 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, 
 
Last night received rebel Richmond papers, 
late battle. give Major-General wounded, 
Smith, Kentucky, 

Adams, Brown, John 
confusion two may man, 
Brown may man. Burnside, Sherman, elsewhere 
shall get forty sixty thousand additional men. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
MRS. LINCOLN'S REBEL KILLED 
 
TELEGRAM MRS. LINCOLN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, SEPTEMBER 24, 1863 
 
MRS. A. LINCOLN, Fifth Avenue New York: 
 
tolerably accurate late battle 
Rosecrans result all, 
fact we, main fighting over, yielded ground, 
thus leaving considerable artillery wounded fall 
enemy's got nothing turn. lost general 
officers one killed three four wounded, while, 
according rebel accounts have, lost six killed 
eight killed one major-general five 
including wounded three 
five list may reduced two number 
confusion A.M. yesterday General 
Rosecrans telegraphed "We hold point, cannot 
except superior numbers great 
despatch leaving night yesterday says, "No fight 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 25, 1863. 
 
GENERAL Alexandria, Va.: 
 
sent General Meade, telegraph, suspend execution 
Daniel Company Massachusetts, 
to-day, understanding line, may beg 
send mode 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., September 25, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
Owing press behalf Daniel Company 
Massachusetts, though small, express 
guilty intention, concluded say let execution suspended 
till order, copy record sent me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 25, 1863. 
 
DEAR GENERAL ROSECRANS: 
 
sending two small corps, one General Howard one 
General whole General Hooker. 
 
relations Generals Hooker 
promise good, present relative positions remain. 
Therefore, let enjoin upon reaching you, 
make General Corps, may 
pass command General General 
turn receive equal force. important done, 
though could well arrange here. Please it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, September 28, 1863. 8 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Tenn.: 
 
perhaps communicate General Burnside rapidly sending 
telegrams directly Think it. send like 
despatch him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D. C, September 30, 1863. 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
 
Following despatch 
 
Men Driven 
 
September 29, 1863. 
 
Gamble authorized Colonel Liberty, Missouri, 
arm men Counties, armed mostly 
returned rebel soldiers men wider bonds. men driving 
Union men Missouri. one hundred families crossed river 
to-day. Many wives Union soldiers compelled 
Four five Union men murdered Colonel men." 
 
Please look and, true, main part, put stop it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM F. S. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, September 30, 1863. 
 
HON. FRANCIS S. Baltimore, Md.: MRS. L. home would 
pleased see time. time passed away, 
would pleased join enterprise mention. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL TYLER 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., October 1, 1863. 
 
GENERAL TYLER, 
 
Take care colored troops charge, nothing 
branch affairs orders. Particularly nothing 
General Kent County. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Send copy Colonel A. L. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL SCHOFIELD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
OCTOBER 1, 1863 
 
GENERAL JOHN M. 
 
organized military force avowed opposition General 
Government Missouri, shall duty regard 
plain require special Still, 
condition things, elsewhere, render 
indispensable time, United States military 
establishment State, well rely upon fair 
support establishment immediate 
duty regard Missouri advance efficiency 
use it, far practicable, compel 
excited people let one another alone. 
 
recent order, approved, arrest 
individuals, suppress newspapers, may 
working palpable injury military 
case interfere expression opinion form, 
allow violently others. 
discretion exercise great caution, 
 
matter removing inhabitants certain counties en 
removing certain individuals time time, supposed 
leaving 

 
interfering may still seem necessary 
restrictions upon trade intercourse. think proper, however, 
enjoin upon following: Allow part military 
command engaged either returning fugitive slaves forcing 
slaves and, far practicable, enforce 
forbearance upon people. 
 
Report opinion upon good enrolled 
militia State. Allow one colored troops, except upon 
orders you, you. 
 
Allow one assume functions property, 
law Congress, otherwise, except upon orders here. 
 
elections see those, those, allowed vote 
entitled laws Missouri, including laws 
restrictions laid Missouri convention upon may 
participated rebellion. 
 
far practicable, will, means military force, 
murderers, known harbor, 
aid, them. like manner repress assumptions 
individuals perform service, 
pretense become themselves. 
 
restore peace, let military obey orders, 
military leave alone, thus breaking peace themselves. 
 
giving intended restrain 
expedient necessary matters falling within range. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL S. M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C. OCTOBER 2, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL 
 
seen despatch Halleck Major-General 
possible, better allow get certain matter 
here, adding difficulties it. Meantime supply 
particulars Major-General case. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
TELEGRAM COLONEL [Cipher.] WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., 
October 3, 1863. 
 
COLONEL Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Please give me, near can, number slaves 
recruited Maryland. course number include free 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION THANKSGIVING, OCTOBER 3, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
year drawing towards close filled 
blessings fruitful fields healthful 
constantly enjoyed forget source 
come, others added extraordinary 
nature cannot fail penetrate even heart 
habitually providence Almighty God. 
midst civil war magnitude severity 
sometimes seemed invite foreign states; 
peace preserved nations, order maintained, 
laws respected harmony prevailed everywhere 
except theatre military theatre 
greatly contracted advancing armies Union. 
needful wealth strength fields peaceful 
industry, national defense arrested 
axe enlarged borders 
mines, well of, iron coal precious 
yielded even abundantly heretofore. Population steadily 
notwithstanding waste made camp, 
country, rejoicing 
consciousness augmented strength permitted expect 
continuance years, large increase freedom. 
 
human counsel hath hath mortal hand worked 
great things. gracious gifts High God, who, 
dealing us anger sins, hath nevertheless remembered 
 
seemed fit proper 
gratefully one heart voice, 
whole American people. do, therefore, invite fellow-citizens every 
part United States, also sea, 
foreign lands, set apart observe last 
Thursday November next day thanksgiving prayer 
beneficent Father recommend 
that, offering justly due 
singular also, humble 
national commend tender care 
become widows, orphans, 
civil strife engaged, fervently 
implore interposition Almighty hand wounds 
nation, restore it, soon may consistent divine 
purposes, full enjoyment peace, harmony, 
union. 
 
testimony whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, third day October, year 
Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-three, 
independence United States eighty-eighth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
  Secretary State 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL J. M. SCHOFIELD. 
 
WASHINGTON D.C., OCTOBER 4, 1863 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHOFIELD, St. Louis, Mo.: 
 
think cause complain action. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 4, 1863. A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, Tenn.: 
 
yesterday received. hold Chattanooga East 
Tennessee, think rebellion must think 
Burnside this, hence main object. course 
greatly destroy enemy front would greater 
object, would include former more, 
certainly within power. understand main body enemy 
near you, near could speak, 
menace attack day. Would best 
mode raid 
order. intend something like suggest whenever case 
shall appear ripe enough accepted true understanding 
rather fear. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
C. D. OTHERS. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 5, 1863. 
 
HON. CHARLES D. OTHERS, Committee. 
 
original address, presented 30th 
four ones presented 3d carefully 
considered. hope regard duties claiming attention, 
together great length importance documents, 
constituting sufficient apology responded 
 
papers, framed common object, consist things demanded 
reasons demanding them. 
 
things demanded 
 
First. General Schofield shall General Butler 
appointed Commander Military Department Missouri. 
 
Second. system enrolled militia Missouri may broken up, 
national forces substituted it; 
 
Third. elections persons may allowed vote 
entitled law so. 
 
Among reasons given, enough suffering wrong Union men 
certainly, suppose truly, stated. Yet whole case, presented, 
fails convince General Schofield, enrolled 
responsible suffering wrong. whole explained 
and, think, rational 
 
civil war. cases always main question, 
case question slavery. 
thus becomes question two sides merely, least four 
sides, even among Union, saying nothing 
it. Thus, Union with, without 
slavery; 
prefer prefer 

 
Among these, again, gradual, 
gradual 
extinction slavery. 
 
easy conceive opinion, even more, 
may sincerely entertained honest truthful men. Yet, 
Union, reason differences prefer different 
way sustaining Union. once, sincerity questioned, motives 
Actual war blood grows hot blood 
Thought forced old confusion. Deception 
Confidence universal suspicion man feels 
impulse kill lest killed him. 
follow. this, said, may among honest men 
only. all. Every foul comes abroad, every dirty 
up. add crime confusion. Strong measures 
deemed harsh best, men make worse 
old proceed 
best serve occasion. 
 
causes amply account occurred Missouri, without 
wickedness general. newspaper 
current events, show evils 
complained quite Fremont, Hunter, Halleck, 
Curtis, Schofield. former greater force opposed 
them, also greater force meet it. 
organized rebel army left State, main Federal force go 
also, leaving department commander home relatively stronger 
before. Without any, affirm confidence 
commander department has, proportion means, done better 
General Schofield. 
 
first specific charge General Schofield is, enrolled 
militia placed command, whereas placed 
command General Curtis. fact is, believe, true; 
point out, did, could, injure loyal 
men Union cause. 
 
charge that, General Curtis General Schofield, 
Franklin A. James O. Provost-Marshal 
General. specific showing made could 
injure Union cause. however, condition things, 
presented me, led change commander department. 
 
restrain contraband intelligence trade, system 
introduced, think, General 
Fremont. General Halleck came, found continued system, 
added order, applicable parts State, 
collect noted rebels, compensate losses relieve 
caused rebellion. action General Fremont 
General Halleck, stated, constituted sort system General 
Curtis found full operation took command department. 
necessity something sort 
could justified stern necessity, liable 
great abuse administration, equally clear. Agents execute it, 
contrary great prayer, led might, 
others would not, resist possible hold 
strict yielding temptation 
would sell permits passes would pay readily 
them, would seize property collect way 
fill Money object, man money, 
whether loyal would practice doubtless 
existed extent, was, real additional evil could 
be, was, charged exist greater extent did. 
 
General Curtis took command department, Mr. 
never knew anything general charge system. 
controversy regard rapidly grew almost 
One side necessity evils 
system, evils 
bitterly assailed other. could fail see 
controversy enlarged proportion professed Union men 
distinctly took sides two opposing political parties. exhausted 
nearly patience also, efforts convince 
evils charged inherent case, 
could giving either party victory other. 
 
Plainly, system 
urged could modified advantage. case 
could scarcely worse, whether could made better could 
determined trial. view, General 
Curtis, give victory party, made change commander 
department. learn soon change Mr. 
removed, Mr. gentleman less good character, 
put place. mere fact change distinctly 
complained conduct new officer, consequence 
change. 
 
gave new commander instructions administration 
system mentioned, beyond contained private letter 
afterwards published, directed act 
solely public good, independently parties. Neither 
thing presented me, anything otherwise 
convinced charge. 
 
urged one cause removing General 
late massacre Lawrence, Kansas, pressed evidence 
mind fact scarcely tends prove proposition. 
massacre example John Morgan, many 
others might repeatedly done respective 
chosen personal possessed hearts 
it. 
 
charge made General Schofield, purpose protect 
Lawrence murderers, would allow pursued Missouri. 
punishment could sudden severe murderers, 
well satisfied preventing threatened raid 
Missouri way avoid massacre there, 
including probably innocent Instead 
therefore approve understand General Schofield 
 
charges General Schofield purposely withheld protection 
loyal people purposely objects disloyal 
altogether beyond power belief. veracity 
gentlemen facts complained of, question 
judgment would infer facts occurred accordance 
purposes General Schofield. 
 
present views, must decline remove General Schofield. 
decide nothing General Butler. sincerely wish 
convenient assign suitable command. order meet 
existing evils addressed letter instructions General 
Schofield, copy enclose you. 
 
enrolled shall endeavor ascertain better 
know exact Let say now, however, 
proposal substitute national forces enrolled militia 
judgment latter something needs 
done; so, proposition throw force away supply 
place bringing forces field 
needed seems Whence shall Shall 
withdrawn Banks, Grant, Steele, things 
grateful anxious feelings when, June last, 
local force Missouri aided General Schofield promptly send 
large general force relief General Grant, 
Vicksburg menaced without General Johnston. 
enrolled militia broken General 
kept Grant police far finding cause 
object, confess sympathy whatever relieves general force 
Missouri allows serve elsewhere. therefore, present 
cannot attempt destruction enrolled militia 
Missouri. may add that, force national military 
control, also within proclamation regard habeas 

 
concur propriety request regard elections, 
have, see, directed General Schofield accordingly. feel 
justified enter upon broad field present regard 
political differences time 
time done said appeared proper say. 
public knows all. nobody follow me, trust 
follow agree 
things disagree others. could wish agree 
things, would agree other, 
would strong They, however, choose 
question right. shall 
seems duty. hold whoever commands Missouri elsewhere 
responsible either 
duty hear all, last must, within sphere, judge 

 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CASE DR. DAVID M. WRIGHT 
 
APPROVAL DECISION COURT 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, OFFICE, 
 
WASHINGTON, October 8, 1863. 
 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL J. G. FOSTER, Commanding Department Virginia North 
Carolina, Fort Monroe, Va. 
 
SIR:--The proceedings military commission instituted trial 
David Wright, Norfolk, Special Orders 
1863, headquarters Department Virginia, submitted 
President United States. following remarks 
 
Upon presentation record case examination 
thereof, aided report thereon 
full hearing counsel specified proper 
question remained open except caused 
full examination made question, upon great amount 
evidence, including effort counsel 
high reputation professional department, thereon reports 
me, opinion, Dr. David M. Wright, insane 
prior 11th day July, 1863, date 
Lieutenant insane since, insane 
7, therefore approve finding sentence 
military commission, direct major-general command 
department including place trial, wherein 
appoint time place carry sentence execution. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
appealed behalf August Station, 
Va., shot to-morrow unwilling boy 
eighteen father affirms yet 
Please answer. regiment company given me. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 8, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
boy telegraphs Station, Va. father thinks 
One hundred nineteenth Pennsylvania Volunteers. father signs 
name tell more. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 12, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
father mother John One hundred nineteenth 
Pennsylvania Volunteers, filed born 
June 22, 1846, also three persons 
swear remembered circumstances birth 
year 1846, though remember particular day. 
therefore, account tender age, concluded pardon him, 
leave whether discharge continue 
service. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
[Cipher.] 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 12, A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, 
 
understand, Burnside menaced west, cannot go 
without surrendering East Tennessee. think enemy 
attack Chattanooga, think look making 
concentrated drive Burnside. Burnside 
throat, must break hold perish therefore think better 
try hold road leaving Burnside 
there. Sherman coming you, though telegraph prevent 
knowing far advanced. Hooker support 
west northwest enable look east 
order. General Halleck give views. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. G. MEADE. 
 
WASHINGTON, October 12, 1863. 9 A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL news despatch Rosecrans, 
leaving P.M. yesterday, says: 
 
head column reached 
 
send worth. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 13, 1863. 
 
Philadelphia: 
 
enemy days ago made movement, apparently turn General 
Meade's right. led two armies pretty 
heavy Saturday, Sunday, Monday. frequent 
despatches General Meade 10 o'clock last night nothing 
happened giving either side marked advantage. army reported 
excellent condition. telegraph open General Meade's camp 
morning, troubled despatch. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
THURLOW 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 14, 1863. 
 
HON. THURLOW 
 
DEAR SIR:--I brought fear recently somehow, 
commission caused degree 
never entertained unkind feeling thought toward you; 
said done anything construed 
sure 
could meet would part unpleasant impression either 
side. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
L. B. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 15, 1863. 
 
L. B. TODD, Lexington, Ky.: 
 
send following pass care. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
AID MRS. MRS. LINCOLN'S SISTER 
 
WASHINGTON, D. October 15, 1863. 
 
MAY 
 
Allow MRS. Robert S. Todd, go south bring MRS. 
General B. Hardin children, north Kentucky. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 15, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FOSTER, Fort Monroe, Va.: 
 
Postpone execution Dr. Wright Friday 23d instant 
intended preparation 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL MEADE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 15, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MEADE, Army Potomac: 
 
4th instant telegraphed Private Daniel 
New York Volunteers, yet shall 
be, please notify result, brief statement case, 
say enlisted One 
hundred nineteenth Pennsylvania Volunteers William proven 
fifteen years old last pardon him, 
discharge put ranks 
Brown, Nineteenth Pennsylvania Volunteers, proven 
eighteen last May, friends say convicted enlistment 
desertion time. last true 
kept discharged please. true suspend 
execution report facts case. receive despatch 
12th John 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
[The Lincoln papers time suspended execution almost 
every omitted D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. W. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D. C., October 16, 1863. 
 
THOMAS W. Philadelphia: 
 
Tad forward pistol him. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. C. 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., October 16, 1863. 
 
T. C. New York: 
 
remember receiving nothing comprehend 
despatch to-day. fact remember, ever knew, 
are, little conception telegraphing 
about. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COMMENT NOTE. 
 
NEW YORK, October 15, 1863. 
 
DEAR SIR: point leaving told, gentleman 
whose statements attach credit, opposition policy 
Presidential campaign J. 
 

 
likely abstain get it, 
shall voted several times each. 
 
October A. L. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 16, 1863. 
 
MAJOR GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
believe Lee effective men. 
 
corps would sent away bring equal force back 
upon direction come 
from. 
 
Doubtless, making present movement, Lee gathered available 
added all, 
made movement belief four corps left General 
General Meade's apparently collision confirmed 
belief. General Meade attack field 
worse equal us, skill courage 
he, officers, men possess, honor 
blame may mine 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CALL 300,000 VOLUNTEERS, OCTOBER 17, 1863. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas term service part Volunteer forces 
United States coming whereas, addition 
men raised present draft, deemed expedient call 
three hundred thousand volunteers serve three years 
war, not, however, exceeding three 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
Commander-in-Chief Army Navy thereof, militia 
several States called actual service, issue 
proclamation, calling upon governors different States 
enlisted United States service, various 
companies regiments field respective States, 
quotas three hundred thousand men. 
 
 
proclaim volunteers thus called duly 
enlisted shall receive advance pay, heretofore 
communicated governors States War Department 
office, special 
 
proclaim volunteers received call, well 
others heretofore shall duly credited 
quotas established next draft. 
 
proclaim State shall fail raise quota 
assigned War Department call, draft 
deficiency said quota shall made said State, districts 
said State, due proportion said said draft 
shall commence 5th day January, 1864. 
 
proclaim nothing proclamation shall interfere 
existing orders, may issued present 
draft States progress, yet 
commenced. 
 
quotas States districts assigned War 
Department office, due regard 
men heretofore furnished, whether 
recruiting conducted accordance instructions 
may issued department. 
 
issuing proclamation, address governors 
several States, also good loyal people thereof, 
lend willing, effective aid 
measures thus adopted, view reinforce victorious army 
field, bring needful military operations prosperous end, 
thus closing forever civil war. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, D.C., October 17, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FOSTER, Port Monroe, Va.: 
 
would useless Mrs. Dr. Wright come here. subject 
painful one, case settled. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM W. B. THOMAS 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D.C., OCTOBER 17, 1863 
 
HON. WILLIAM B. THOMAS, Philadelphia, 
 
grateful offer 100,000 men, present advised 
consider Washington danger, 
requiring days men. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM J. N. G. TAYLOR. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 17, 1863. 
 
JOHN G. TAYLOR, Knoxville, Tenn.: 
 
estimate holding East Tennessee highly do. 
absolute purpose withdrawing forces it, 
one withdraw temporarily purpose losing 
position great hope finding necessary 
withdraw all, particularly raise new troops rapidly 
us there. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM T. C. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON CITY, October 18, 1863. 
 
T. C. New York: 
 
others, try see come. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL W. S. ROSECRANS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, October 19, A.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL ROSECRANS, Chattanooga, 
 
battle recently Bull Run. suppose 
heard rumor general battle, 
Station railroad, miles beyond Manassas Junction toward 
began attack enemy 
upon General Warren, ended enemy loss 
four cannon four seven hundred prisoners. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. C. SCHENCK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 21, 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
delegation saying armed colored troops many, 
all, River, presence 
arms hands quiet people producing great 
confusion. sent order, so, 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL R. C. SCHENCK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 22, P.M. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL SCHENCK, Baltimore, Md.: 
 
Please come here. fact one officers killed 
specimen would seems could 
send white men better send negroes thus inaugurate 

 
Please come over. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 24, 1863. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
Taking information together, think probable 
corps started East Tennessee way marching 
last Monday, say Meade's front directly railroad 

 
First, object Lee's recent movement destruction 
Orange Railroad, subsequent withdrawal 
without otherwise apparent, would explained 

 
Secondly, direct statement men gone 
Tennessee. 
 
Thirdly, Spy statement 
gone Richmond, statement appeal made 
people Richmond go protect could 
refer works near 
 
statement Martinsburg retreat 
last idea Lee retained 
cavalry, sending perhaps join Upon 
probability 
 
plan matured, nothing say. not, 
suggest that, possible Army Potomac 
get ready attack Lee, meantime raid shall, 
break railroad near 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
(Private Confidential.) 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 26, 1863. 
 
HON. E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 12th hands several days. 
Inclosed send leave absence brother, good form 
think safely put it. Without knowing whether would accept it. 
tendered Maine, brother, 

 
Thanks friend Campbell kind words 
second term would great honor great labor, which, 
together, perhaps would decline 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CHASE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, October 26, 1863. 
 
HON. SECRETARY TREASURY. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The writer accompanying letter one Mrs. 
Lincoln's numerous near 
is, man gave name 
father brother MRS. Lincoln's mother. know 
thing loyalty beyond says. Supposing loyal, 
requests any, them? 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
PAPERS WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN 
 
VOLUME FIVE 
 
CONSTITUTIONAL EDITION 
 
Abraham Lincoln 
 
 
Edited Arthur Brooks Lapsley 
 
 
 
 
 
WRITINGS ABRAHAM LINCOLN, Volume Five, 
 
 
 
 
ILL. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 19, 1858. 
 
Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter introducing Mr. duly received. 
opening nominate Superintendent Public 
Egypt made valuable convention. 
think may fairly said came lion 
rather night. elect seems 
would hard objection could made him? 
Senator Martin saying doing? 
 
Please write me. truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 24, 1858 
 
H. C. WHITNEY, ESQ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter attack Times upon 
received morning. Give concern voting 
Unless without faith lie successfully 
word truth charge, 
considering little best shape put in. Show 
please, publish paper. 
 
friend ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. W. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 25, 1858. 
 
JAMES W. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours inclosing draft two hundred dollars, 
duly received. paid judgment, herewith 
wish say anything shall 
Republican candidate Legislature district, 
full confidence Dr. ever got way 
political true 
judgment good. last heard him, rather thought 
De best representative, things 
considered. must settle among yourselves. may well 
older heads understand how, Dred Scott 
decision Congress authorize Territorial Legislature 
everything else, cannot authorize prohibit slavery. 
one things court decide, never give intelligible 
reason for. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. CAMPBELL. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, June 28, 1858. 
 
A. CAMPBELL, Esq. 
 
DEAR 1856 gave authority draw sum 
exceeding five hundred dollars. see clearly privilege would 
available then. aware times 
then. Please write events, whether 
anything shall continue grateful past. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, July 16, 1858. 
 
HON. JOSEPH GILLESPIE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I write say specimens Douglas 
Democracy occasionally see Madison, learn 
making confident calculation beating friends 
lower house, county. offer upon it. Job, 
respectively, here, learn, talking largely 
it. so, done carrying Fillmore men 
1856 differently seem going 
party. vote 1856, 
 
Counties. 
 
     Counties.    Fremont.   
             
           
             
                     ----     ----     ---- 
                             
 
see, go calculation, get 
one quarter Fillmore votes, three beat 
votes. get one four beat 
Madison, alone, friends get Fillmore votes, 
opponents win two votes. 
 
shows whole field, basis election 1856. 
 
Whether, since then, Buchanan, shifted ground, 
majority new votes go, judge better I. 
 
course you, ground, better determine line tactics 
one wide 
actively 
 
Don't neglect it; write first ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN JACKSONVILLE, ILL. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, JULY 20, 1858. 
 
JNO. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your kind interesting letter 19th duly 
received. suggestions placing one's self offensive 
rather defensive certainly correct. point 
shall spoke Saturday night. speech, 
well appears State journal morning. doubtless 
see it; hope perceive already 
would mail copy now, one hand. 
thank letter shall pleased hear again. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSEPH GILLESPIE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, JULY 25, 1858. 
 
HON. J. GILLESPIE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter 8th received return 
Chicago last night. hope worse scared though 
ought know best. must lose district. must make job 
it, save it. Lay hold proper secure 
Americans can, once. hope, find 
half gone. Make little Run one 
precinct, take first hundred known American 
quietly ascertain many actually going 
Douglas. think find less even find 
make sure is, make sure can, 
events. set work shall compensate 
loss good many Americans. Don't fail check 
once. Trumbull, think, long. 
 
much cannot do, can. reason hope 
help appropriate kind. Write again. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
B. C. COOK. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 2, 1858. 
 
Hon. B. C. COOK. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I letter true intelligent man 
insisting plan foot La Bureau run 
Douglas Republicans Congress Legislature 
counties, get encouragement folks nominating 
pretty extreme 
 
thought nothing folks nominate men 
obnoxious charge Please eye upon 
this. Signs looking pretty fair. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HON. J. M. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 5, 1858. 
 
HON. J. M. 
 
DEAR parted last evening new thought occurred 
subject talked yesterday. 
 
however, speak town Tuesday, August 
promised appear papers to-morrow. Judge 
Trumbull yet reached here. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ALEXANDER 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Aug. 11, 1858. 
 
ALEXANDER Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 6th received. life health continue shall 
pretty likely 
 
Things look reasonably well. tell fully see you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. O. 
 
OTTAWA, August 22, 1858. 
 
J. O. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours signed secretary Republican 
received. matter making speeches good deal 
pressed almost hope 
time canvass, cannot yet say 
see 6th 
 
Douglas I, first time canvass, crossed 
fire some, glad know yet 
vast could get near enough 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SLAVERY DEMOCRACY. 
 
1858 
 
would slave, would master. expresses 
idea democracy. Whatever differs this, extent 
difference, democracy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
B. C. COOK. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, August 2, 1858 
 
HON. B. C. COOK. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I letter true friend, intelligent 
man, writing plan foot La run 
Douglas Republican Congress Legislature counties, 
get encouragement folks nominating pretty 
extreme thought nothing folks 
nominate men word looks like 
charge Please eye upon this. Signs 
looking pretty fair. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DR. WILLIAM ILL. 
 
BLOOMINGTON, Sept. 3, 1858 
 
DEAR 1st received morning, also one 
Mr. one Hiram subject. see 
Journal appointed speak 22d 
day Douglas speaks there. recent experience 
shows speaking place next day D. 
is, fact, concluding speech him. Please show 
Messrs. tell must excuse 
writing separate letters them. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
P. full notice surrounding country. A.L. 
 
 
 
 
FRAGMENT SPEECH PARIS, ILL., 
 
SEPT. 8, 1858. 
 
Let us inquire Judge Douglas really invented introduced 
Nebraska called Popular Sovereignty. mean? 
means sovereignty people 
words, right people govern themselves. Judge Douglas 
invent this? idea popular sovereignty 
several ages author Nebraska Bill 
Columbus set foot year took form 
noble words familiar "We hold truths 
self-evident, men created equal," etc. 
origin popular sovereignty applied American people? 
told governments instituted among men 
powers consent popular 
sovereignty, conception meaning words. Judge 
Douglas invent kind popular sovereignty, let us pursue 
inquiry find kind right 
Kansas Nebraska govern themselves, lot 
too, wanted them? Clearly invention 
General Cass put forth doctrine 1848 called 
letter, six years Douglas thought thing. 
"Little never occurred General 
Cass call discovery odd name popular sovereignty. 
face say right people govern 
right people govern themselves. 
things moulded calling right put 
hundred lash Nebraska right 
self-government. submit Judge Douglas's discovery, 
whole it: discovered right 
negroes Nebraska popular sovereignty. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH ILLINOIS, 
 
SEPTEMBER 8, 1858. 
 
questions sometimes asked "What fuss 
made amount to? 
questions ask consider slavery question 
insignificant matter think amounts little nothing 
extremely must 
admitted great question caused much trouble 
foolish anything 
importance better throw aside busy 
something else. let us inquire little insignificant 
matter, called some, see important enough 
demand close attention every Union. one 
Douglas's recent speeches, find reference one made 
Springfield time ago. judge makes one quotation 
speech requires little notice time. regret 
Springfield speech me, judge quoted 
one particular part often think recollect it. 
runs think follows: 
 
"We far fifth year since policy initiated 
avowed object confident promise putting end slavery 
agitation. operation policy agitation 
ceased constantly augmented. opinion cease 
crisis shall reached passed. 
 
"A house divided cannot stand. believe government 
cannot endure permanently half slave half free. expect 
Union dissolved. expect house fall, expect 
cease divided. become one thing 
other. Either opponents slavery arrest spread 
place public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction; advocates push 
forward till shall become alike lawful States, old well 
new, North well South." 
 
Judge Douglas makes use finds great deal 
fault it. deals me, make people 
State believe advocated dangerous doctrines Springfield 
speech. Let us see portion Springfield speech Judge 
Douglas complains objectionable others 
him. are, certainly, far fifth year since policy 
initiated avowed object confident promise putting end 
slavery agitation. fourth day January, 1854, Judge Douglas 
introduced Kansas-Nebraska bill. initiated new policy, 
policy, says, put end agitation slavery 
question. Whether object stop 
events kind policy 
Instead quiet good feeling promised us 
author Popular Sovereignty, nothing 
agitation. According Judge Douglas, passage 
Nebraska bill would whole would 
slavery agitation Congress, vexed question would 
left entirely people Territories. opinion 
Judge Douglas, opinions leading men 
Democratic Party. Even late spring 1856 Mr. Buchanan said, 
short time subsequent nomination Cincinnati convention, 
territory Kansas would less six weeks. Perhaps 
thought so, Kansas may 
long time may so. 
 
know fierce agitation Congress last winter, 
narrow escape Kansas admitted Union 
constitution citizens. 
angry debates took place Washington last 
season Congress lead suppose slavery agitation 

 
election held Kansas month August, 
constitution submitted people voted large 
majority. Kansas still Union, probability 
remain time. Judge Douglas says slavery 
question settled. says bill introduced Senate 
United States 4th day January, 1854, settled slavery 
question Perhaps tell us bill settled slavery 
question, able settle question great magnitude 
ought able explain manner it. knows 
know question settled, 
experiment settle made worse ever before. 
 
let say words regard Douglas's great negro 
equality. says Republican party 
favor allowing whites blacks man can't 
good Republican unless willing black men office 
associate terms perfect equality. knows 
advocate doctrines these, cares much 
us gain votes doing. show 
opinion negro equality times past, prove 
stand question always stood, read 
extracts speech made Peoria 1854. made 
reply one Judge Douglas's speeches. 
 
(Mr. Lincoln read number extracts ring true 
rarely heard anything 
audience hearing extracts read, 
conservative sentiments advocated Mr. Lincoln, testified 
approval loud applause. reasonable man hear one 
Mr. Lincoln's speeches without 
something can't account for. 
 
Slavery, continued Mr. Lincoln, matter little importance, 
every question interested. 
divided Methodist churches, discord 
American Tract Society. churches split society 
follow example long. seen slavery 
agitated religious well political world. Judge Douglas 
much afraid triumph Republican party lead 
general mixture white black races. Perhaps wrong 
saying afraid, correct saying 
fear success party result 
amalgamation blacks whites. think show plainly, 
documents me, Judge Douglas's fears groundless. 
census tells us year four hundred 
thousand mulattoes United States. let us take called 
Abolition Republican, State New 
see many mulattoes find within 
number amounts one hundred Old 
Democratic aristocratic State 
mulattoes found New 
many suppose thousand, seven hundred 
thousand 
free slave States three hundred 
forty-eight thousand mulattoes home free 
States less sixty thousand large number 
imported South. 
 
 
 
 
FRAGMENT SPEECH ILL., 
 
SEPT. 13, 1858. 
 
requested give statement difference, 
understand it, Democratic Republican parties, 
leading issues campaign. question put 
gentleman know. even know whether friend 
mine Judge Douglas contest, make 
difference. question proper one. Lest forget it, 
give answer proceeding line argument 
marked discussion. 
 
difference Republican Democratic parties 
leading issues contest, understand it, former 
consider slavery moral, social political wrong, latter 
consider either moral, social political wrong; 
action each, respects growth country expansion 
population, meet views. affirm 
Democratic party consider slavery socially politically right, 
though tendency view has, opinion, constant 
unmistakable past five years. prefer take, accepted 
maxim party, idea put forth Judge Douglas, "don't 
care whether slavery voted voted up." quite willing 
believe many Democrats would prefer slavery always 
voted down, know prefer always voted up; 
right insist action, especially 
constant action, shall determine ideas 
subject. Every measure Democratic party late years, bearing 
directly indirectly slavery question, 
notion utter indifference whether slavery freedom shall 
race empire across measure, say, 
Dred Scott decision, where, seems me, idea boldly suggested 
slavery better freedom. Republican party, 
contrary, hold government instituted secure blessings 
freedom, slavery evil negro, 
white man, soil, State. Regarding evil, 
States exists, overlook 
constitutional fathers placed around it; 
nothing give proper offence hold slaves legal 
use every constitutional method prevent 
evil becoming larger involving negroes, white men, 
soil, States consequences. will, 
possible, place public mind shall rest belief 
course ultimate extinction God's good time. 
end will, possible, restore government policy 
fathers, policy preserving new Territories 
influence human bondage, Northwestern Territories 
sought preserved Ordinance 1787, Compromise Act 
length modern 
Democratic idea, slavery good freedom, ought 
room expansion continent, people found carry 
it. All, nearly all, Judge Douglas's arguments logical, 
admit slavery good right freedom, one 
worth rush deny it. difference, understand 
it, Republican Democratic parties. 
 
friends, show logical consequences 
Dred Scott decision, holds people Territory cannot 
prevent establishment slavery stated 
cannot grounds upon decision made 
equally applicable free States free Territories, 
peculiar reasons put forth Judge Douglas indorsing 
decision commit him, advance, next decision 
decisions when, means, 
succeeded put 
made impossible 
soul world placed ray 
hope blown darkness quite 
sure demon roused turn rend you? 
constitutes liberty 
sea army navy. 
reliance may turned 
us without making us struggle. reliance 
love liberty God planted us. defense 
spirit liberty men, lands 
everywhere. Destroy spirit planted 
despotism 
bondage prepare limbs wear them. Accustomed trample 
rights others, lost genius independence 
become fit subjects first tyrant among 
you. let tell you, things prepared 
teachings history, elections shall promise next 
Dred Scott decision future decisions quietly acquiesced 
people. 
 
 
 
 

 
September 1858. 
 

 
     sweet song hear 
     fancied 
     May emotions pure song set 
     future shall bring her. 
 
 
 
 
NEGROES MEN 
 
J. U. BROWN. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 18, 1858 
 
HON. J. U. BROWN. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I perceive express plainly 
four expressly 
intention bring social political equality 
white black races rest done 
thing clear 
 
made equally plain think negro included 
word used Declaration Independence. 
 
believe declaration "all men created great 
fundamental principle upon free institutions 
negro slavery principle; that, frame 
government, principle made one legal 
frame government, States slavery retain it, 
surrender free 
States national constitutionally bound leave 
alone it. 
 
believe Government thus framed necessity 
springing actual presence slavery, 
 
necessity exist Territories slavery 
present. 
 
speech Mr. Clay says: "Now abstract principle 
doubt truth declaration men created 
desirable, original construction society, 
keep view great fundamental 
 
Again, speech Mr. Clay says: "If state nature existed 
lay foundations society, man would 
strongly opposed institution slavery 
among 
 
Exactly so. new free Territories, state nature exist. 
Congress lays foundations laying 
say, Mr. Clay, desirable declaration 
equality men shall kept view great fundamental 
principle, Congress, lays foundations society, 
should, like Mr. Clay, strongly opposed slavery 
elements. 
 
follow social political equality whites 
blacks must incorporated slavery must not. declaration 
require. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
Lincoln's speeches Peoria, 1854, 
Springfield, Ottawa, Chicago, Charleston, 1858. 
little book letter also 
 
 
 
 
A. 
 
26, 1858 
 
A. Esq. 
 
DEAR parting morning heard things 
make believe spend week among 
National Democrats, trying induce content voting 
Davis, vote Douglas candidates senator 
headed off, can. Call 
attention National Democrat 
far can. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SENATORIAL ELECTION LOST MONEY 
 
N. B. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, NOVEMBER 16, 1858 
 
HON. N. B. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 15th received. wrote day. 
pecuniary matter, willing pay according 
hand living get others pay. 
expenses long without anything absolutely without 
money even household purposes. Still, put two 
hundred fifty dollars toward debt 
committee, allow settle private matter 
us. This, already paid, 
note mine, exceed five hundred dollars. This, 
too, exclusive ordinary expenses campaign, 
which, added loss time business, bears pretty heavily 
upon one better world's goods 
post honor, feeling 
shall pass never fear. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FIGHT MUST GO 
 
H. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November 19, 1858. 
 
HENRY Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 13th received days ago. fight must go 
on. cause civil liberty must surrendered end one 
even one hundred Douglas ingenuity supported 
late contest best means break 
slave interest. ingenuity keep elements 
harmony long. Another soon come. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
DEBATES MUST SAVED 
 
C. H. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 1858 
 
DR. C. H. RAY 
 
DEAR SIR:--I wish preserve set late debates (if may 
called Douglas myself. enable so, please get 
two copies number paper containing whole, send 
pay papers 
trouble. wish two sets order lay one away 
put Remember, 
part debate sides sheet take two sets 
make one 
 
believe, according letter like 
Quit soon feel better. Another up" 
shall fun again. Douglas managed supported 
best instrument slave power; 
ingenuity long keep 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
H. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November 30, 1858 
 
H. C. WHITNEY, ESQ. 
 
DEAR desirous preserving permanent form late 
joint discussion Douglas myself, ten days ago wrote Dr. 
requesting forward express two sets numbers 
contain reports date 
word subject. you, power, procure 
forward will, pay 
charges, greatly Hoping visit long, 
remain 
 
ever friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. D. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Dec. 8, 1858. 
 
H. D. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your kind letter Nov. 9th duly received. 
know expected desired glancing 
contents again, prompted say that, desired 
result late canvass different, still regard 
exceeding small matter. think fairly entered upon durable 
struggle whether nation ultimately become slave 
free, though fall early contest, nothing shall 
least degree, final rightful result. 
 
Respectfully yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 1858. 
 
ALEXANDER Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I expect result election went hard you. 
me, too, perhaps quite hard may 
faith shall beat long run. Step 
step objects leaders become plain people 
stand them. write merely let know neither dead 
Please give respects good family, inquiring 
friends. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
 
NOTES ARGUMENT. 
 
December 1858. 
 
Legislation adjudication must follow conform progress 
society. 
 
progress society begins produce cases transfer 
debts entire property railroad enable 
use enjoy transferred property, legislation 
adjudication begin necessary. 
 
Shall class legislation beginning us general 

 
 
Section Ten Constitution requires general, 
 
possible. 
 
Special legislation always upon judicial 
far violates Section Two Constitution. 
 
favor general 
Legislature investigation smaller 
work courts ought perform much 
Legislature rightly decide facts P. & 
B. 
 
said general law, whenever R. R. Co. gets tired 
debts, may transfer get rid them. 
may Legislature best 
suited try question fraud either case? 
 
said, acquired legal rights, let 
them, needs legislation let submit terms 
obtain it. 
 
Let him, say we, general law advance every possible 
way that, legal right, 
occasion wait additional practiced 
fraud let courts decide. 
 
 
 
 
LEGAL OPINION ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
11th Section Act Congress, approved Feb. 11, 
rules sections land within 
United States system standing unrepealed, opinion, 
binding respective different parts 
section, furnishes true rule establishing 
lines them. law, force time became 
becomes condition 
 
And, law, think true rule dividing quarters 
interior section sections, run straight 
lines section opposite quarter section 
fixing point straight lines other, 
middle centre section. 
 
perhaps original extent 
erroneous, sections, greatly so. latter, 
obvious equitable mode division might 
error infinitely various perhaps better single 
rules 
 
events think prescribed competent 
authority. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, 6, 1859. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
M. W. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 4, 1859. 
 
M. W. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR: second letter relation 
Republican convention duly received. hand now, 
impression convention 
day yesterday friend handed letter Judge M. F. 
also expresses wish come, 
place believe river, 
require time labor get it. push hard get 
without injury shall try it, though 
yet quite certain shall succeed. 
 
like know coming, wish 
come, may others would quite would stay away. 
Write again. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. M. MORRIS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 28, 1859. 
 
W. M. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your kind note inviting deliver lecture 
received. regret say cannot now; must stick courts 
read sort lecture three different audiences 
last month this; circumstances made 
waste time whatever. 
 
truly, 
 
 
 
 
H. L. PIERCE OTHERS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, April 6, 1859. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your kind note inviting attend Boston, 
28th instant, honor birthday Thomas Jefferson, duly 
received. cannot 
 
Bearing mind seventy years ago two great political parties 
first formed country, Thomas Jefferson head 
one Boston headquarters other, curious 
interesting supposed descend politically party 
opposed Jefferson birthday 
original seat claiming political descent 
nearly ceased name everywhere. 
 
too, Jefferson party formed upon supposed 
superior devotion personal rights men, holding rights 
property only, greatly inferior, assuming 
so-called Democracy to-day Jefferson, opponents 
party, equally interesting note 
completely two changed hands principle upon 
originally supposed divided. Democracy to-day hold 
liberty one man absolutely nothing, conflict another 
man's right property; Republicans, contrary, 
man case conflict man 
 
remember much amused seeing two partially intoxicated men 
engaged fight on, fight, long 
rather harmless contest, ended fought 
coat other. two leading parties 
day really identical two days Jefferson 
Adams, performed two men. 
 
play save principles Jefferson 
total overthrow nation. One would state great confidence 
could convince sane child propositions 
Euclid true; nevertheless would fail, one 
deny definitions principles Jefferson 
definitions free society. yet denied 
small show success. One calls 
Another calls 
others argue apply 
differing form, identical object 
principles free government, restoring 
would delight 
crowned heads people. 
miners returning despotism. must them, 
us. world would 
slave must consent slave. deny freedom others 
deserve themselves, and, God, cannot long retain 
it. honor Jefferson man who, pressure 
struggle national independence single people, 
capacity introduce mere revolutionary document 
abstract truth, applicable men times, 
to-day coming days shall rebuke 


 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
T. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, May 17, 1859. 
 
DR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your note behalf German 
citizens, whether constitutional provision 
regard naturalized citizens, lately adopted Massachusetts, 
whether Republicans 
opposition elements canvass 1860, received. 
 
Massachusetts sovereign independent State; privilege 
mine does. Still, done 
inference sought drawn would do, may 
without impropriety speak out. say, then, that, understand 
Massachusetts provision, adoption Illinois, 
place right oppose it. Understanding spirit 
institutions aim elevation men, opposed whatever 
tends degrade them. little 
oppressed strangely inconsistent could favor 
project existing rights white men, even though 
born different lands, speaking different myself. 
matter Republican 
terms. 
terms would foolish would lose whole North, 
common enemy would still carry whole South. question 
men different one. good, patriotic men able statesmen 
South would cheerfully support, would place 
Republican ground, letting 
Republican standard 
 
written believe answers questions 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR, AUDITOR, STATE ILLINOIS. 
 
GENTLEMEN: 
 
reply requesting written opinion 
duty requires executing latter clause Seventh 
Section "An Act relation payment principal 
interest State approved 22, 1859, reply 
said last clause said section certainly general, 
description bonds issued you; giving 
time bonds made place either 
principal interest paid, rate interest 
bonds description except 
bonds, commercial means bonds 
obligations orders attached payment annual 
interest; suppose difficulty 
act stood alone, ought construction terms 
it, would mean bonds bearing interest 
time issuing same. act considered 
creditors would right require bonds. inquiry 
regard class bonds interest paid shall 
begin run January 1, 1860, whether Act February 18, 
would authorize refuse give bonds 
attached payable first day July, 1860. maturely 
considered question arrived conclusion 
right use measures secure State loss 
six months' interest bonds Act 
1859. cannot denied letter laws favor 
construction claimed creditors bonds 
required issued them, inasmuch restriction 
interest run said bonds 1st January, 1860, relates solely 
bonds issued Act 1857. Act 1859 directing 
issue new bonds contain restriction, directs 
issue bonds. Nevertheless 
Act 1859, giving rate interest, time due, place 
postponement time interest necessarily 
Legislature intended discretion 
impose terms restrictions would protect interest 
State; think right duty see 
State Bonds issued State shall lose six months' 
interest. Two plans present either secure 
State. compliance law issue bonds bearing 
interest 1st July, 1859, may bonds presented 
three thousand every bonds issue 
plan principal would 
consideration paying interest first 
January, interest would forever 
would doubt advantageous State. 
consent this, then, Cut bond 
payable 1st July, 1860. 
 
One plans would undoubtedly prescribed 
Legislature attention directed question. 
 
May 28, 1859. 
 
 
 
 
LINCOLN'S SCRAP BOOK 
 
H. C. WHITNEY. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, December 25, 1858. 
 
H. C. WHITNEY, ESQ. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I received inquiring whether 
received newspapers sent receive them, 
much probability 
shall, save copy. 
 
friend ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
1859 
 
 
 
 
FIRST SUGGESTION PRESIDENTIAL 
 
 
 
 
S. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., July 28, 1859. 
 
HON. SAMUEL 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your say letter 
23d received. Dr. induced expect here; 
disappointed little failure come. yet 
fear formed estimate scarcely sustained 
personal acquaintance. 
 
Two things done Ohio Republican 
Judge repeal Fugitive Slave 
much two things viewed 
many good men, sincerely opposed slavery, struggle 
disregard of, Constitution itself. thing 
greatly endanger cause, kept national 
convention. another thing friends gives 
leaning toward "popular sovereignty." 
three substantial objections this: First, party command 
respect year opposed last. Secondly, Douglas 
dangerous enemy liberty, insidious 
would little support North, consequence, 
capital trade South, friends thus 
lastly, Douglas's popular 
sovereignty, accepted public mind principle, 
slavery, African slave trade 
 
Taking slaves new Territories, buying slaves Africa, 
identical things, identical rights identical argument 
establishes one establish other. Try thousand years 
sound reason Congress shall hinder people Kansas 
slaves, and, found it, equally good one 
Congress hinder people Georgia slaves 

 
Governor Chase, kind side him. one 
distinguished men nation gave us, Illinois, sympathy 
last year. never saw him, suppose able 
still may suitable candidate 
Presidency. 
 
must say think fit Presidency. propose 
correspondence me, shall look letters 
 
met Dr. since receiving letter; shall, 
present respects 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
BAD 
 
TAYLOR 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL. Sept. 6, 1859. 
 
TAYLOR, Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 3d received. mistake 
expected U.S. Court city 3d Tuesday 
month. thought there. 
 
bad shall go wall bread 
neglect business year well last. would please much 
see city good people year little 
less constantly receiving 
compelled urged go 
two go Ohio. last prompted Douglas 
going there; really tempted make flying trip Columbus 

 
hope serious trouble Iowa. thinks 
it? known mistaken election Iowa. 
Present respects Col. Carter, friends, believe 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH COLUMBUS, OHIO. 
 
SEPTEMBER 16, 1859. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS STATE OHIO: cannot fail remember 
appear first time audience great 
audience accustomed hear speakers Chase, 
many men; and, remembering this, feel 
well you, me, raise 
expectations standard would justified 
raising one distinguished men appeared you. 
would perhaps preparing disappointment yourselves, and, 
consequence me. hope, 
therefore, commence moderate 
perhaps, give attention, shall able interest 
moderate 
 
Appearing first time life, somewhat 
topic way introduction 
relieved embarrassment introduction Ohio 
Statesman newspaper gave morning. paper read 
article, which, among find following: 
 
"In Senator Douglas contest last 
fall, Mr. Lincoln declared favor negro attempted 
defend conception Little 
 
mention now, opening remarks, purpose 
making three comments upon it. first already 
furnishes introductory second show 
gentleman thirdly, give opportunity correct it. 
 
first place, regard matter mistake. found 
entirely safe, one 
allow misrepresentation go 
therefore propose, say 
show conclusively so; 
bear read couple extracts 
debate Judge Douglas last year, newspaper 
first battle Senator Douglas had, 
town Ottawa, used language read. 
previously reading continued follows: 
 
"Now, gentlemen, don't want read greater length, 
true ever said regard institution 
slavery black race. whole it; anything 
argues idea perfect social political equality 
negro, fantastic arrangement words, 
man prove horse. say here, 
upon subject, purpose directly indirectly 
interfere institution slavery States exists. 
believe lawful right so, inclination 
so. purpose introduce political social equality 
white black races. physical difference 
two which, judgment, probably forbid ever living together 
upon footing perfect equality; inasmuch becomes 
necessity must difference, I, well Judge Douglas, 
favor race belong superior position. 
never said anything contrary, hold that, notwithstanding 
this, reason world negro entitled 
natural rights enumerated Declaration 
right life, liberty pursuit happiness. hold 
much entitled white man. agree judge Douglas, 
equal many color, perhaps 
moral intellectual right eat bread, 
without leave anybody else, hand equal, 
equal Judge Douglas, equal every living man." 
 
Upon subsequent occasion, reason making statement like 
occurred, said: 
 
hotel to-day elderly gentleman called upon 
know whether really favor producing perfect equality 
negroes white people. proposed 
occasion say much subject, yet, question asked me, 
thought would occupy perhaps five minutes saying something regard 
it. say, then, not, ever been, favor 
bringing way social political equality white 
black races; not, ever been, favor making 
voters negroes, hold office, 
white people; say addition 
physical difference white black races 
believe forever forbid two races living together terms 
social political equality. inasmuch live, 
remain together must position superior 
inferior, I, much man, favor 
superior position assigned white race. say upon occasion 
perceive white man superior 
position, negro denied everything. understand 
want negro woman slave, must necessarily want 
wife. understanding let alone. 
fiftieth year, certainly never black woman 
either slave wife. seems quite possible us get 
along without making either slaves wives negroes. add 
never seen, knowledge, man, woman, child, 
favor producing perfect equality, social political, 
negroes white men. recollect one distinguished instance 
ever heard frequently satisfied 
case Judge Douglas's old friend Colonel Richard M. Johnson. 
also add remarks made (for going enter 
large upon never least apprehension 
friends would marry negroes, law keep 
it; judge Douglas friends seem great 
apprehension might, law keep it, 
give solemn pledge last stand 
law State forbids marrying white people 
 
There, friends, briefly have, upon former occasions, 
said upon subject newspaper, extent 
ability, drawn public attention. perceive, 
probability, contest time say favor 
negro absolute proof substantially, 
declared it. shown this, 
remains word comment upon newspaper this, 
presume editor paper honest man, 
greatly obliged furnishing thus early 
opportunity correct misrepresentation made, 
run long malicious people call 
 
Giant seen brief report 
speech. otherwise unpleasant introduce subject 
negro topic discussion, might somewhat relieved 
fact dealt exclusively subject here. 
shall, therefore, without much hesitation enter upon 
subject. 
 
American people, first day January, 1854, found African 
slave trade prohibited law Congress. majority States 
Union, found African slavery, sort slavery, 
prohibited State constitutions. also found law existing, 
supposed valid, slavery excluded almost 
territory United States condition 
country, reference institution slavery, first 
January, 1854. days that, bill introduced Congress, 
ran regular course two branches national 
legislature, finally passed law month May, 
Act Congress prohibiting slavery going Territories 
United States connection law itself, and, 
fact, terms law, existing prohibition 
declaration purpose part Congress 
never thereafter exercise power might have, real 
supposed, prohibit extension spread slavery. 
great law thus repealed thirty years' 
Following rapidly upon heels action Congress, 
decision Supreme Court made, declared 
Congress, desires prohibit spread slavery 
Territories, constitutional power so. so, 
decision lays principles which, pushed logical 
say pushed logical decide 
constitutions free States, forbidding slavery, 
unconstitutional. Mark me, say judges said this, let 
man say affirm judges used say 
opinion say, pressed logical conclusion, 
inevitably result 
 
Looking things, Republican party, understand 
principles policy, believes great danger 
institution slavery spread extended 
ultimately made alike lawful States Union; 
prevent incidental ultimate consummation 
original chief purpose Republican organization. say 
Republican certainly true 
National House shall fall hands Republicans, 
attend matters national well 
this. chief real purpose Republican party eminently 
proposes nothing save except restore 
government original tone regard element slavery, 
maintain it, looking change reference 
original framers Government expected 
looked forward to. 
 
chief danger purpose Republican party 
revival African slave trade, passage Congressional 
slave code, declaring second Dred Scott decision, making 
slavery lawful States. pressing us now. 
quite ready yet. authors measures know 
strong them; upon us due time, 
hand hand, headed off. 
chief danger purpose Republican 
danger threatens purpose 
insidious Douglas popular sovereignty. 
propose revive African slave trade, pass slave 
code, make second Dred Scott decision, preparing us 
charge ultimate enemies shall ready 
come on, word command advance shall given. say 
popular broad distinction, 
understand it, article genuine popular sovereignty. 
 
believe genuine popular sovereignty. think definition 
popular sovereignty," abstract, would this: 
man shall precisely pleases himself, 
things exclusively concern him. Applied government, 
principle would be, general government shall things 
pertain it, local governments shall precisely 
please respect matters exclusively concern them. 
understand government United States, live, 
based upon principle; misunderstood supposed 
war make upon principle. 
 
Now, judge Douglas's popular sovereignty? is, principle, 
one man chooses make slave another man 
neither man anybody else right object. Applied 
government, seeks apply it, this: If, new Territory 
people beginning enter purpose making 
homes, choose either exclude slavery limits 
establish there, however one may affect persons 
infinitely greater number persons afterwards 
inhabit Territory, members families 
general 
head family States all, however action may 
affect one these, power right interfere. 
Douglas's popular sovereignty applied. 
 
good deal trouble popular sovereignty. explanations 
explanations explained 
and, suppose, maturely considered long series 
explanations great essay Harper's attempt 
enter thorough investigation argument made 
presented. nevertheless occupy good portion time 
drawing attention certain points it. may 
read document perceived judge early 
document quotes two persons belonging Republican party, 
without them, readily recognized Governor 
Seward New York myself. true exactly fifteen months ago 
day, believe, first time expressed sentiment upon 
subject, manner get print, 
public might see beyond circle expression 
time quotation Judge Douglas made 
quotation accuracy, justice requires say 
sufficiently accurate change sense. 
 
sense quotation this: slavery element 
durable element discord among us, shall probably 
perfect peace country either masters 
free principle government, far mastered free 
principle public mind rest belief going 
end. sentiment, express way, was, great 
distance time, perhaps different language, connection 
collateral ideas, expressed Governor Seward. Judge Douglas 
much expression sentiment 
believe, almost speeches since 
referring it. find alluded speech here, well 
copyright enter upon purpose 
making elaborate argument show right expression 
sentiment. words, shall stop say might 
properly said upon point, ask attention 
purpose making one two points upon it. 
 
read copyright discover judge 
Douglas says controversy American Colonies 
Government Great Britain began slavery question 
continued time and, say 
so, know continued less violence ever 
since Revolution. 
 
need appeal history, declarations framers 
government, know judge Douglas slavery began 
element discord among white people country far 
back one hundred sixty years ago, five generations 
thirty years generation. Now, would seem 
might occurred Judge Douglas, anybody turned 
attention facts, something nature 
thing, slavery, somewhat durable mischief 
 
another point desire make regard matter, 
leave it. adoption Constitution 1820 
precise period history comparative peace upon 
precise period time came nearer peace 
time entire one hundred sixty years 
says began, eighty years Constitution. 
would worth stop examine probable 
reason coming nearer peace time. 
precise period time fathers adopted, 
followed, policy restricting spread slavery, 
whole Union it. whole country looked 
forward ultimate extinction institution. 
policy adopted, led 
men suppose slavery gradually coming end, 
might quiet it, watching think 
Judge Douglas might perceived too; whether not, 
worth attention men, elsewhere, consider 
whether truth case. looked two 
matter element discord one hundred 
sixty years among people, comparative peace 
policy prevailed government 
upon, might then, perhaps, brought 
appreciation said fifteen months "a house divided 
cannot stand. believe government cannot endure 
permanently, half slave half free. expect house fall, 
expect Union expect cease 
divided. become one thing, other. Either 
opponents slavery arrest spread it, place 
public mind rest belief course 
ultimate extinction, advocates push forward shall 
become alike lawful States, old well new, North well 
South." sentiment time. connection it, 
said: "We far fifth year since policy inaugurated 
avowed object confident promise putting end slavery 
agitation. operation policy agitation 
ceased, constantly say 
advanced still farther sixth year since policy 
Judge popular sovereignty slavery 
question made national policy. Fifteen months 
added since uttered call upon 
men say whether fifteen months 
words. 
 
upon subject, cannot express gratitude 
true view element discord among believe 
attracting attention. believe Governor Seward 
uttered sentiment done before, 
reflected upon subject saw truth it. believe 
Governor Seward uttered Mr. Pennsylvania, 
in, different language, since time, declared belief 
utter exists principles liberty 
slavery. see Now, speaking 
let say, know little him. never seen him, know 
scarcely anything man; say much him: 
Democracy brought notice, 
alone true, genuine ring now, without indorsing 
anything else said, ask audience give three cheers 
[The audience responded three cheers 

 
Another point copyright essay would ask attention 
rather feature whole thing, 
express declaration point. general feature 
and, indeed, Judge Douglas's discussions 
question, Territories United States States 
Union exactly difference all; 
Constitution applies Territories precisely 
States; United States Government, Constitution, 
may State may Territory, must 
State must Territory. Gentlemen, true view 
case? necessary squatter sovereignty, 
 
Let us consider. depend depends altogether upon 
proposition States must, without interference 
General Government, things pertain exclusively 
local nature, connection 
General Government. Judge Douglas established 
proposition, nobody ever proceeds 
assume, without proving it, slavery one little, 
trivial matters much consequence 
question would whether neighbor raise 
cattle plant moral question it, 
altogether matter dollars new 
Territory opened settlement, first man goes may 
plant thing which, like Canada 
soil, cannot millions men come 
one little things trivial 
nature effect upon anybody save men first 
plant upon thing way 
family communities composing States, way endangers 
General Government. Judge Douglas altogether well known 
fact never serious menace political existence, 
except sprang thing, chooses regard upon 
par 
 
Turn it, contemplate another view. says that, according 
popular sovereignty, General Government may give 
Territories judges, 
chief men govern them, they, must touch upon 
question. Why? question shall governor Territory 
year two, pass away, without track left upon soil, 
act good evil left question 
vast national much opposed nature 
nation must decide it: matter 
planting slavery upon thing which, cannot 
succeeding millions much right 
first or, without infinite difficulty 
long struggle, considers power prohibit one 
little trivial things nation ought say word 
nobody save men there. 
 
Take two things consider together, present question 
planting State institution slavery side question 
shall Governor Kansas year two, man 
here, man earth, would say governor question 
little one, slavery question great ask 
honest Democrat small, trivial temporary 
question not, shall important, 
mischievous one is, Shall soil planted slavery? 
 
idea, suppose, arisen Judge Douglas's mind 
peculiar suppose institution slavery really looks 
small him. put nature lash upon back would 
hurt him, lash upon anybody back hurt him. 
build man, consequently looks upon matter slavery 
unimportant light. 
 
Judge Douglas ought remember, endeavoring force 
policy upon American people, put way, 
good many not. ought remember 
country man name Thomas Jefferson, supposed 
man whose principles policy 
amongst Democrats to-day, true; man take exactly 
view insignificance element slavery friend 
judge Douglas does. contemplation thing, know led 
"I country remember God 
know looked upon thus expressed himself. 
danger justice God, 
little unimportant popular sovereignty question judge Douglas. 
supposed question God's eternal justice wrapped 
enslaving race men, man, 
arm nation thus dared Almighty, every 
friend nation cause dread Choose ye 
Jefferson Douglas true view element among 
us. 
 
another little difficulty matter treating 
Territories States alike things, ask attention, 
shall leave branch case. difference 
them, make Territories States 
reason Kansas fit come Union 
organized Territory, Judge Douglas's tell 
reason come Union 
fit, decide upon slavery largest 
important could possibly could 
coming Union fit do, according view, 
staying it? Oh, fit sit Congress decide 
upon rates questions specific duties 
foreign fit decide 
vastly important matters, national 
fit, "from decide little negro question. But, 
gentlemen, case occupy much time head, 
pass on. 
 
Near close copyright judge, think, comes near 
fat think, commenced 
remarks, would read article, believe 
 
"This exposition history measures shows conclusively 
authors Compromise measures 1850 Kansas-Nebraska 
Act 1854, well members Continental Congress 
founders system government subsequent Revolution, 
regarded people Territories Colonies political 
communities entitled free exclusive power 
legislation provisional representation 
could alone preserved, cases taxation internal 
 
judge saw putting word "slavery" would contradict 
history, put knew would pass it, 
Whenever find one speeches, 
substitute used tell reason. would 
say slavery; 
general phrase, would pass hopes 
pass reading community thing. 
 
"This right pertains people 
peaceful community, isolated individuals may 
upon public domain violation law. exercised 
inhabitants sufficient constitute government, 
capable performing various functions fact 
ascertained determined think? Judge Douglas says "by 
"Whether number shall fixed fifteen twenty 
thousand inhabitants, affect 
 
Now, comments make. Popular sovereignty, 
words, pertain persons upon public 
domain violation law. words that. 
pertain them, sufficient formed 
organized political community, ten 
thousand, twenty thousand. Now, would like know 
done nine 
large enough organized political community, 
upon public land, violation law? treated 
driven out, point time would ever ten 
driven out, remained upon 
public land violation law, establish slavery there? 
judge says popular sovereignty don't pertain then. 
exclude then? popular sovereignty don't pertain then. 
would like know, case covered condition 
people Territory reach number ten 

 
main point wish ask attention is, question 
shall reached sufficient number formed 
regular organized community decided "by Congress." Judge Douglas 
says so. Well, gentlemen, want. No, 
want. slavery want. 
want Congress prohibit slavery coming new 
Territories, want popular sovereignty hinder it; 
Congress say ready organized, South 
get Congress hold off. Let Congress hold 
ready admitted State, South wants 
taking slavery planting Territories 
hereafter may have. word, whole thing, dash 
last put power Congress; 
popular sovereignty Congress them, ask last 
come If, last, amounts anything all, 
Congress gives them. submit rather reflection 
said, last, dash 
everything gone puts whole question 
control Congress. fighting three 
hours, undertake read it, last places whole matter 
control power contending 
result directly contrary laboring do. 
last leaves whole matter control Congress. 
 
two main objects, understand it, Harper's Magazine 
One show, possible, men Revolutionary 
times favor popular sovereignty, show 
Dred Scott decision entirely popular 
sovereignty. propose, regard argument drawn 
history former times, enter detailed examination 
historical statements made. impression 
great many positive statement, 
much suppression statements really 
belong history. propose affirm 
great extent, enter minute examination 
historical avoid upon 
important pass lot least period time 
possible, came saw calculation known 
strength could clear would folly 
stop consider whether could 
say whole history contained essay 
link men Revolution popular sovereignty. requires 
effort it, single bound entirely successful. 
read over, find quotes 
documents Revolutionary times, tending show people 
colonies desirous concerns 
way, British Government one time 
struggled British Government permitted exclude 
African slave directly, permitted exclude 
indirectly, taxation sufficient discourage destroy it. 
many things sort, judge Douglas argues 
favor people Territories excluding slavery 
wanted to, planting wanted to, 
pleased time settled upon Territory. Now, however 
history may apply whatever argument may sound 
accurate find men 
upon question slavery Territories, 
end whole If, labor effort 
show men Revolution favor popular 
sovereignty mode dealing slavery Territories, 
show men took hold subject, dealt 
it, see dealt it. matter 
argument inference, know thought it. 
 
precisely upon part history country one 
important omission made Judge Douglas. parts 
history United States upon subject slavery, treats 
whole, omitting historical sketch legislation Congress 
regard admission Missouri, Missouri Compromise 
established slavery excluded country half large 
present United States. left history, nowise 
alluded him, far remember, save once, makes 
upon principle Supreme Court authorized 
pronounce decision act called Missouri Compromise 
unconstitutional. history left out. part 
history country made men Revolution. 
 
another part political history, made men 
Revolution, taken name 
Ordinance '87. Let bring history attention. 1784, 
believe, Mr. Jefferson drew ordinance government 
country upon stand, or, rather, frame draft 
ordinance government country, Ohio, neighbors 
Indiana, us live Illinois, neighbors Wisconsin 
drawn government 
Territory, Territories south Ohio River, Mr. Jefferson 
expressly provided prohibition slavery. Judge Douglas says, 
perhaps right, provision lost 
believe true. vote taken upon it, majority 
present Congress Confederation voted it; 
many voting make clear majority 
necessary, lost. three years that, Congress 
Confederation together again, adopted new ordinance 
government Northwest Territory, contemplating 
territory south river, States owning territory 
hitherto giving General Government; hence 
made ordinance apply Government fact, 
provision excluding slavery inserted aside, passed 
rate passed became part law land. 
ordinance live. First Ohio Territory; 
enabling act passed, authorizing form constitution 
State Government, provided republican conflict 
Ordinance '87. framed constitution presented 
admission, think find legislation upon subject 
show that, whereas formed constitution republican, 
conflict Ordinance '87, therefore admitted 
upon equal footing original States. process 
years gone Indiana, Illinois, 
substantially Michigan 
 
Ordinance constantly looked 
whenever step taken new Territory become State. Congress 
always turned attention it, movements upon 
subject traced course Ordinance '87. 
admitted new States, part 
legislation country. traced 
Ordinance '87 throughout history country. Begin 
men Revolution, go sixty entire years, 
last scrap Territory comes Union form State 
Wisconsin, everything made conform Ordinance '87, 
excluding slavery vast extent country. 
 
omitted mention right place Constitution 
United States process framed Ordinance 
made Congress one first Acts 
Congress itself, new Constitution itself, give force 
Ordinance putting power carry hands new 
officers Constitution, place old ones, 
existence change Government 
Confederation Constitution. so, believe Indiana 
twice, Ohio, General Government privilege 
suspending provision allowing slaves. report 
made Mr. Virginia, directly 
it, action refuse privilege violating 
Ordinance '87. 
 
period history, run briefly, is, presume, 
familiar assembly part history 
country. suppose familiar 
part history am, mention recall attention 
time. hence ask extraordinary thing 
man occupied position upon floor Senate United 
States, third term, looks see government 
whole country fall hands, pretending give 
truthful accurate history o slavery question country, 
entirely whole portion 
important all. extraordinary spectacle man 
stand ask confidence statements sets 
portions history, calling upon people believe 
true fair leading part 
controlling feature whole history carefully 
 
mere leaving remarkable feature 
remarkable proposition establish leading men 
Revolution great principle 
government question slavery Territories, history 
shows decided, cases actually brought them, 
exactly contrary way, knows it. decide 
time, stuck sixty years, thick 
thin, long one Revolutionary upon stage 
political action. whole course, first last, 
clung freedom. asks community believe men 
Revolution favor great principle, 
naked history dealt subject matter 
principle, utterly repudiated principle, acting upon 
precisely contrary ground. absurd 
attorney stand jury ask 
murderer B, B walking alive them. 
 
say, again, judge Douglas asserts men Revolution 
acted upon principles which, consistent themselves, 
ought adopted popular sovereignty, then, upon consideration 
argument, right make believe 
understood principles government, them, 
arisen world application 
principle. right try persuade understands 
principles better did, and, therefore, apply now, 
did, ought done. right go 
community try convince this, right 
attempt impose upon one belief men 
approved great principle. two ways establishing 
proposition. One trying demonstrate upon reason, 
is, show great men former times thought so, 
thus pass weight pure authority. Now, Judge Douglas 
demonstrate somehow popular right 
one man make slave another, without right 
one else Euclid demonstrated 
objection. comes forward, seeking 
carry principle bringing authority men 
utterly repudiate principle, ask shall permitted 
it. 
 
see, judge's speech here, short sentence words: "Our 
fathers, formed government live, understood 
question well, even better than, now." 
true; stick that. stand Judge Douglas bitter 
end. now, Judge Douglas, come stand me, show 
understanding better do. ask you, Judge 
Douglas, stick proposition men Revolution 
understood subject better now, better 
understanding acted better trying act now. 
 
wish say something regard Dred Scott decision, dealt 
Judge Douglas. Judge Douglas 
myself, last year, judge thought fit commence process 
me, Freeport answered questions, propounded 
him. Among others propounded one now. 
substance, remember it, is, "Can people United States 
Territory, Dred Scott decision, lawful way, 
wish citizen United States, exclude slavery limits, 
prior formation State answered 
could lawfully exclude slavery United States Territories, 
notwithstanding Dred decision. something 
answer probably trouble judge ever since. 
 
Dred Scott decision expressly gives every citizen United States 
right carry slaves United States Territories. 
inconsistency saying decision right, 
saying, too, people Territory could lawfully drive slavery 
again. words, collateral matter, 
cleared away it, it, bare 
less thing may lawfully driven away 
lawful right be. Clear 
naked truth thing may lawfully 
driven place lawful right Well, 
judge could n't help seeing much 
trouble it; want ask especial attention to, 
now, remind you, noticed fact, judge 
longer say people exclude slavery. 
say copyright say speech 
made here; and, far know, since re-election Senate 
never said, Freeport, people Territories 
exclude slavery. desires you, wish Territories 
remain free, believe stands position; 
say himself. extent absurd position 
stated, changing language says something 
different language, consider whether different 
sense too. Dred Scott decision, rather 
Constitution decision, carry slavery 
Territories beyond power people Territories control 
property. say people drive out, 
control property. language 
consider whether sense different. Driving horse 
lot plain proposition mistaken putting 
side might sort exclusion 
lot kill let him; 
neither things 
would feed him, him, him, use 
abuse him, make money him, "as 
but, please you, men favor slavery want 
this? really want, slavery, 
Territories, shall controlled want anything 
else, comprehend it. ask attention this, first, 
purpose pointing change ground judge made; and, 
second place, importance change 
give gentlemen want popular sovereignty power 
exclude institution drive all. know judge 
sometimes argument controlling property 
unfriendly legislation may control death; might, 
case horse, perhaps, feed lightly much 
would come legislative control, 
something attended to. doubt, myself, 
Territories undertake control slave property property 
is, control way would valuable 
property, make bear proportion way burdens 
property, really deal Supreme Court 
United States say, speed you, undertake 
give opinion, least, Territories attempt direct 
legislation drive man slave Territory, 
decide slave free taken there, 
tax extent cannot keep there, Supreme Court 
unhesitatingly decide legislation unconstitutional, long 
Supreme Court constructed Dred Scott Supreme Court is. 
first two things already decided, except 
little among lawyers words 
already decided negro cannot made free Territorial 
legislation. 
 
Dred Scott decision? Judge Douglas labors show 
one thing, think altogether different. long opinion, 
embodied short "The Constitution 
United States forbids Congress deprive man property, without 
due process law; right property slaves distinctly 
expressly affirmed therefore, Congress shall 
undertake say man's slave longer slave 
certain line Territory, property 
without due process law, whole 
Dred Scott decision. add Congress cannot itself, 
Congress cannot confer power so; hence effort 
Territorial Legislature either things absolutely decided 
conclusion court. 
 
Now, indirect mode "unfriendly lawyers 
readily understand proposition cannot tolerated 
moment, legislature cannot indirectly 
cannot accomplish say legislation control 
property, property, benefit property, would hailed 
Dred Scott Supreme Court, fully legislation 
driving slave property out, destroying property, directly 
indirectly, court, held unconstitutional. 
 
Judge Douglas says Constitution carries slavery 
Territories, beyond power people Territories control 
property; follows logically every one swears 
support Constitution United States must give support 
property And, Constitution carries slavery 
Territories, beyond power people, control 
property, also carries States, 
Constitution supreme law land. Now, gentlemen, 
modesty, would say told thing 
Judge Douglas quite year ago. argument print, 
modesty, said, might call attention it. 
read it, find made argument, made 
better made since. 
 
is, however, say now, said then, 
sort question Supreme Court decided right 
slave take slave hold Territory; 
saying this, judge Douglas admits conclusion. says 
so, consequence consequence 
would follow, argument is, decision cannot, therefore, 
would popular cannot possible 
great principle extraordinary 
way. might be, extraordinary consequences 

 
Another feature judge's argument Dred Scott case is, 
effort show decision deals altogether declarations 
Constitution affirm anything 
Dred Scott decision, declares want power total 
absence power, reference Territories. seems 
purpose make whole decision result mere negative 
declaration want power Congress anything relation 
matter Territories. know opinion Judges states 
total absence power; is, 
states: judges add right property slave 
distinctly expressly affirmed Constitution. stop 
saying right property slave recognized 
Constitution, declared exist somewhere Constitution, says 
affirmed Constitution. language equivalent saying 
embodied instrument cannot 
detached without breaking Constitution itself. word, part 
Constitution. 
 
Douglas singularly unfortunate effort make decision 
altogether negative, express language vital part 
distinctly affirmed Constitution. think myself, 
repeat here, decision merely carry slavery 
Territories, logical conclusion carries 
States live. One provision Constitution is, 
shall supreme law quote 
constitution law State contrary 
Dred Scott decision says right property slave affirmed 
Constitution supreme law land, State 
constitution law say destroy thing 
distinctly affirmed supported supreme law land, 
even State constitution law, violation supreme law, 
escape it. judgment 
result, save American people shall see constitutions 
better construed Constitution construed decision. 
must take care faithfully truly carried 

 
must conclusion. Near beginning remarks said 
insidious Douglas popular sovereignty measure 
threatens purpose Republican party prevent slavery 
United States. propose ask attention 
little propositions statement. 
Take stands, apply principle; extend apply 
principle consider lead you. put 
proposition, Judge Douglas's popular sovereignty applied 
African slave demonstrate variety 
ways turn subject look it. 
 
Judge says people Territories right, 
principle, slaves, want them. say people 
Georgia right buy slaves Africa, want them; 
defy man earth show distinction two 
show one either wicked 
show, original principles, one better worse other; 
show, Constitution, one differs other. 
tell me, doubtless, constitutional provision 
people taking slaves new Territories, tell 
equally constitutional provision buying slaves 
tell people, exercise popular 
sovereignty, ought please thing, slaves 
want them; tell people Georgia much 
entitled popular sovereignty buy slaves Africa, want 
them, people Territory slaves want them. 
ask man, dealing honestly himself, point 
 
recently seen letter Judge Douglas's which, without stating 
object, doubtless make distinction 
two. says opposed repeal 
laws African slave trade. why? seeks give 
reason would apply popular sovereignty Territories. 
"The abolition African slave trade 
compromise deny it. truth 
proposition abolition African slave trade compromise 
Constitution. man put finger anything 
Constitution, line history, shows it. mere 
barren made simply purpose getting distinction 
revival African slave trade "great 
 
time Constitution United States adopted, 
expected slave trade would assert 
insist upon that, judge Douglas denied it. know 
equally expected slavery would excluded Territories, 
show history regard two things public opinion 
exactly alike, regard positive action, done 
Ordinance '87 resist spread slavery ever done 
abolish foreign slave trade. Lest say 
time formation Constitution, public expectation 
slave trade would 
spread slavery Territories stand 
alike, except Ordinance '87 mark left public 
opinion, showing committed spread slavery 
Territories foreign slave trade. 
 
word compromise it? Why, public 
sense favor abolition slave 
time great commercial interest involved it, extensive 
capital branch trade. doubtless stages 
improvement South way dependent slave 
trade, made proposition Congress abolish trade 
allowing twenty sufficient time capital commerce 
engaged transferred made provision 
abolished twenty years; doubt 
expected would be, made bargain it. public 
sentiment left doubt minds would done away. 
repeat, nothing history times favor 
matter compromise constitution. public 
expectation time, manifested thousand ways, spread 
slavery also 
 
say, principle established, wrong 
slavery, whoever wants right it, matter 
dollars sort question shall deal 
us negro sort question, 
South question negro 
all, mere matter policy, perfect right, 
according interest, done, 
doctrine miners formed public 
opinion slave trade. ready Davis 
Stephens leaders company sound 
revival slave trade, second Dred Scott decision, 
flood slavery poured free States, shall 
tied run like 
 
part parcel idea say men want 
adhere Democratic party, always belonged 
party, looking excuse stick it, 
nevertheless hate slavery, Douglas's popular sovereignty good 
way oppose slavery. allow persuaded 
accordance previous belief, 
good way opposing slavery any, 
without old party breaking old political 
without called 
without subjected 
readily thrown place argument argument found. 
let us stick popular insidious popular 
sovereignty. 
 
let call attention one thing really happened, 
shows gradual steady public opinion, 
course preparation revival slave trade, 
Territorial slave code, new Dred Scott decision carry 
slavery Free States. ever, five years ago, hear 
anybody world saying negro share Declaration 
National Independence; mean negroes all; 
"all men" spoken of, negroes 
 
satisfied five years ago proposition put upon paper 
living anywhere. unable time find man 
audience would declare ever known anybody saying 
five years ago. last year Douglas popular sovereign 
Illinois say it. one Ohio declares firm 
belief Declaration Independence mean negroes all? 
know is; much; presume 
much alike everywhere. suppose express belief 
Declaration Independence never mean negroes. call upon 
one say said five years ago. 
 
think now, think then, next thing 
strikes remark change wrought 
significant change is, less changing negro, 
estimation, rank man 
taking placing him, spoken of, among 
Judge Douglas expresses it. 
 
change wrought minds important Public 
opinion country everything. nation like ours, popular 
sovereignty squatter sovereignty already wrought change 
public mind extent stated. man crowd 
contradict it. 
 
Now, opposed slavery honestly, much ask 
note fact, like follow, on, 
soon prepared deal negro 
every public sentiment 
already point, new turn direction 
constantly done 
insidious popular sovereignty. need one two turns further, 
ready 
things, receive support, submit to, 
slave trade, revived slave code enforced 
Territories, new Dred Scott decision bring slavery 
heart free North. This, must say, carrying 
words spoken Mr. many years believe 
thirty years, told audience would 
repress tendencies liberty ultimate emancipation must go 
back era independence, muzzle cannon 
annual joyous return Fourth must blow 
moral lights around us; must penetrate human soul, eradicate 
love things, others 
enumerated him, could repress tendencies 
ultimate emancipation. 
 
ask attention fact degree popular 
moral lights around us; 
teaching negro longer man, 
Declaration nothing him; ranks crocodile 
man, body soul, matter dollars 
suggest portion Ohio Republicans, Democrats, 
present, serious consideration fact 
going among steady process public opinion 
subject. this, friends, bid 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH CINCINNATI OHIO, SEPTEMBER 17, 1859 
 
Fellow-Citizens State Ohio: first time 
life appeared audience great city this: 
longer young appearance 
degree found one 
usually shortest way get quit 
talking thinking it, go something else. 
 
understand recently distinguished 
friend Judge Douglas, Illinois; understand, without 
opportunity (not greatly seeing report 
speech made here, honor mention humble 
name. suppose purpose making objection 
sentiment time expressed me. true, 
judge Douglas reminded you, informed you, never 
heard it, life declared opinion 
government cannot endure permanently, half slave half free; 
house divided cannot stand, and, expressed it, 
expect house fall, expect Union 
expect would cease 
would become one thing, other; either opponents 
slavery would arrest spread it, place 
public mind would rest belief course ultimate 
extinction, friends slavery push forward 
becomes alike lawful States, old new, free well slave. 
did, fifteen months ago, express opinion, upon many occasions 
Judge Douglas denounced it, 
purpose expression 
opinion. 
 
presume, without seen report speech, 
here. presume alluded also opinion, different 
language, expressed subsequent time Governor Seward 
New York, took two denounced them; 
tried point something opinion 
led making entire uniformity local institutions 
various States Union, utter disregard different States, 
nature would seem require variety institutions 
variety laws, conforming differences nature 
different States. 
 
presume insisted declaration war 
free slave States, 
continual war different States, slave free States. 
 
charge, form, made Judge Douglas on, believe, 
9th July, 1858, Chicago, hearing. next evening, made 
reply it. informed many inferences drew 
expression mine altogether foreign purpose entertained 
me, far ascribe inferences me, 
purpose, entirely far might argue that, 
whatever might purpose, actions conforming views would lead 
results, might argue establish but, far 
purposes concerned, totally mistaken me. 
 
made reply him, told him, question declaring 
war different States Union, said 
expect peace upon question slavery 
said expected peace institution 
put public mind rest belief 
course ultimate extinction; believed, organization 
government recent period time, institution 
placed continued upon basis; comparative 
peace upon question portion period time, 
public mind rested belief regard it, 
returned position relation matter, supposed 
peace previously had. assured him, now, 
assure you, neither had, have, ever had, purpose 
way interfering institution slavery, exists. 
believe power, Constitution United States, 
rather form government live, interfere 
institution slavery, institutions 
sister States, free slave States. declared then, 
little inclination interfere 
institution slavery exists, 
General Government, believe 
power so. accidentally used purpose 
entering slave States disturb institution slavery. 
So, upon first occasion Judge Douglas got opportunity reply 
me, passed whole body said upon subject, 
seized upon particular expression mine purpose 
entering slave States disturb institution slavery. "Oh, 
no," said he, "he won't enter slave States disturb 
institution slavery, prudent man thing 
that; means go line free 
slave States, shoot them. means do. means 
harm can, disturb can, way 
keep hide perfect 
 
Well, now, think, time, either 
dignified logical argument was, get along 
well could. 
 
occurred to-night ever shoot 
line people side line slave State, 
purpose so, keeping skin safe, 
best chance shall ever have. wonder 
Kentuckians close whether 
not, elevated ground, and, speaking 
wonder Kentuckians would hear 
side river. reason propose address portion 
say 
 
say, then, first place, Kentuckians, 
call, understand it, "Black think slavery wrong, 
morally desire spread 
United States, object gradually 
terminate whole Union. say myself, say 
Kentuckians understand differ radically upon 
believe slavery good thing; slavery 
right; ought extended Union. 
Now, broad difference us, 
addressing Kentuckians, attempt you; 
would vain effort. enter upon it. propose try 
show ought nominate next Presidency, 
Charleston, distinguished friend Judge Douglas. 
difference him, understand sincerely you, 
wisely yourselves. try demonstrate 
proposition. Understand, now, say believe sincerely 
you, wisely you, yourselves. 
 
want anything else make successful views 
advance it, secure perpetuate 
it? want anything 
needed indispensable you? Why, may, allowed 
answer question, retain hold upon North, 
retain support strength free States. get 
support strength free States, succeed. 
get support strength free States, 
minority, beaten once. 
 
proposition next 
thing say is, Douglas, men nation, 
man affords hold upon free States; man 
give strength free States. so, doubt 
branch proposition, whether 
really you, expressed propose asking attention 
facts. 
 
issue me, understand, is, think slavery 
wrong, ought think right, 
ought extended [A voice, "Oh, 
talking now. 
 
proceed try show Douglas sincerely 
wisely yourselves. 
 
first place, know government like this, 
government people, voice men country, 
substantially, enters administration, 
government, government, lies bottom 
public opinion. lay proposition, Judge Douglas 
man promises advance hold upon North, 
support North, constantly public opinion 
every possible way constantly public 
opinion North things 
seems things says appear 
you, say would like 
say ought remember saying one, 
say other, would lose hold upon North, and, 
consequence, would lose capacity serve you. 
 
Upon subject public opinion call attention 
well established fact Judge never says 
institution slavery wrong. public man United 
States, believe, exception Senator Douglas, not, 
time life, declared opinion whether thing right 
wrong; Senator Douglas never declares wrong. leaves 
perfect liberty favor would 
declare thing wrong. contrary, 
takes chances sentiment 
North, opposed slavery, support, never saying right. 
ought set ought give full 
credit much; little though be, comparison whole 
you. 
 
other, things ask attention to. said upon floor 
United States Senate, repeated it, understand, great 
many times, care whether slavery voted 
down." shows you, ought show you, would reason 
upon it, believe wrong; man may say 
sees nothing wrong thing; he, dues care whether 
voted voted man logically say cares 
whether thing goes goes appears wrong. 
therefore demonstration Judge Douglas's mind 
favorite institution, would spread made perpetual, 
wrong. 
 
Another thing tells you, speech made Tennessee, 
shortly canvass Illinois, last year. distinctly 
told people drawn Almighty across 
continent, one side soil must always cultivated 
pretend know exactly line was, 
line. want ask attention 
proposition one portion continent 
Almighty signed soil shall always cultivated slaves; 
cultivated slaves place right; 
direct sympathy authority Whenever get 
Northern audiences adopt opinion slavery right 
side Ohio, whenever get them, pursuance Douglas's 
views, adopt sentiment, readily make 
argument, perfectly logical, right 
side Ohio cannot wrong this, 
property side Ohio, seal stamp 
Almighty, means wrong 
constitutions laws "to it. Douglas 
public opinion North, first say thing right 
State Ohio River, hence say right 
wrong here, laws constitutions recognizing 
wrong wrong, ought repealed 
tell you, men Ohio, choose 
laws slavery, conformity idea climate 
suited it, climate suited slave labor, 
therefore constitutions laws it. 
 
Let us attend argument little see sound. 
raise (except 
won't raise raise Louisiana. don't raise 
Ohio, can't raise climate 
don't suit it. raise Louisiana, 
Now, Douglas tell precisely slavery 
question: slaves 
don't so, 
leads dealing one precisely other. 
there, then, anything constitution laws Ohio raising 
found necessary put provision 
law? Surely man desires raise Ohio, 
man desire so, would say law 
forbids so; whenever shall agree Douglas, whenever 
minds brought adopt argument, surely 
reached conclusion although profitable Ohio, 
man wants it, wrong let it. 
 
matter Judge Douglas preparing public mind 
Kentucky make perpetual good thing estimation, 

 
let ask attention another thing. believe 
safe assert five years ago living man expressed 
opinion negro share Declaration Independence. 
Let state again: five years ago living man expressed 
opinion negro share Declaration Independence. 
large audience man ever knew opinion 
put upon paper much five years ago, obliged 
subsequent time show it. 
 
true wish note next within 
space five years Senator Douglas, argument question, 
got entire party, far know, without saying 
negro share Declaration Independence. 
United States one Douglas man say this, 
unable upon occasion up. Now, none said 
five years ago, say now, matter 
Kentuckians ought note. vast change Northern public 
sentiment upon question. 
 
tendency tendency change bring 
public mind conclusion men spoken of, 
negro negroes spoken of, alone 
change public sentiment already 
black man Douglas 
condition man sort, assigned condition 
Now, Kentuckians ought give Douglas credit this. 
largest possible made regard perpetuation 
thing slavery. 
 
voice: Speak Ohio men, 
 
Mr. LINCOLN: beg permission speak please. 
 
Kentucky perhaps, many slave States certainly, trying 
establish slavery reference Bible. 
trying show slavery existed Bible times divine 
Now, Douglas wiser you, upon 
subject. Douglas knows whenever establish slavery 
Bible, occur slavery slavery white 
man, men without reference knows well 
may entertain idea Kentucky much please, 
never win Northern support upon it. makes wiser argument you: 
makes argument slavery black man; slavery 
man skin different color own, right. 
thereby brings support Northern voters could moment 
brought argument Bible right slavery. 
give credit that? say matter 
wisely yourselves? 
 
Now, established entire party doctrine, 
entirely successful branch efforts 
ready another. 
 
meeting declared 
negro white man white man, 
questions negro crocodile negro. 
make declaration accidentally made great many 
times canvass Illinois last year don't know 
reported speeches there, frequently made 
believe repeated Columbus, wonder repeated 
here. is, then, deliberate way expressing upon 
subject. matter mature thus express 
upon point case. therefore requires deliberate 
attention. 
 
first inference seems enslave negro, 
white man way other, whoever 
opposed negro is, way other, 
white man. necessary conflict 
white man negro, white man much 
Judge Douglas; say necessary conflict. say 
room enough us free, 
wrong white man negro free, positively 
wrongs mass white men negro 
mass white men really injured effects slave labor 
vicinity fields labor. 
 
desire dwell upon branch question 
say assumption false, hope 
long prevail minds intelligent white men. 
events, ought thank Judge Douglas it; benefit 
made. 
 
branch is, struggle negro 
negro. Well, don't know 
struggle negro either. suppose 
crocodile old Ohio River used call them, 
come across white man, would kill 
would negro. what, last, believe 
sort proposition may stated thus: "As negro 
white man, crocodile negro 
may rightfully treat crocodile beast white man 
may rightfully treat negro beast really 
argument his. 
 
Now, brother Kentuckians, believe this, ought thank 
Judge Douglas put much taking way 
done. 
 
Again, Douglas's great principle, "popular sovereignty," calls it, 
gives you, natural consequence, revival slave trade whenever 
want it. question this, listen consider 
shall advance support proposition. 
 
says sacred right man goes 
Territories slavery wants it. Grant 
sacred right man don't go equally 
buy slaves Africa, wants them? point 
man goes Territories Kansas Nebraska, 
new Territory, sacred right taking slave belongs 
him, would certainly right take one would, 
slave, would desire buy one take there. 
say you, friends Judge Douglas man 
slave equal right buy one take 
Territory does. 
 
voice: want ask question. Don't foreign nations interfere 
slave 
 
Mr. LINCOLN: understand principle Democracy whip 
foreign nations interfere us. 
 
Voice: asked information. Republican myself. 
 
Mr. LINCOLN: best terms world, 
wish diverted point trying 
 
say Douglas's popular sovereignty, establishing sacred right 
people, please, carried logical conclusion gives 
equally sacred right people States Territories 
buy slaves wherever buy 
man show distinction, like hear try it. man 
show people Kansas better right slaves, 
want them, people Georgia buy Africa, 
want it. think cannot done. "popular 
sovereignty" people slaves want them, 
popular sovereignty buy Africa desire 
so. 
 
know Douglas recently made little effort, seeming 
notice different theory, made effort get rid 
that. written letter, addressed believe, 
Iowa, declaring opposition repeal laws 
prohibit Africa slave trade. opposition repeal 
upon ground laws one compromises 
Constitution United States. Now, would interesting 
see Judge Douglas friends turn, Constitution 
United States point compromise, show 
compromise Constitution, provision Constitution; 
express implied, Constitution 
obligation repeal African slave trade. know, 
least think know, framers Constitution expect 
African slave trade would abolished end twenty years, 
time prohibition abolished extended 
abundant contemporaneous history show framers 
Constitution expected expected, 
gave nothing put provision 
Constitution requiring 
importation persons States shall see fit admit shall 
certain tax might levied upon 
done Constitution silent 
silent, personally, myself. absolutely 
nothing subject; expectation 
framers Constitution slave trade would abolished 
end time; expected would owing public 
sentiment, time; put provision in, order 
abolished time, reasons suppose 
thought sound ones, try enumerate 
you. 
 
while, expected slave trade would abolished time, 
expected spread slavery new Territories 
also easy prove framers 
Constitution United States expected slavery 
prohibited extending new Territories, prove 
expected slave trade 
things expected. One expected other, one 
compromise Constitution other. nothing 
said Constitution regard spread slavery 
Territory. grant that; something important said 
generation men adoption old Ordinance 
'87, influence Ohio, neighbors 
Indiana, Illinois, neighbors Michigan Wisconsin, 
happy, millions free men. generation men, 
though full extent members convention framed 
Constitution, extent members convention, holding 
seats time one body other, 
compromise either strong evidence 
compromise favor restriction slavery new 
Territories. 
 
Douglas says opposed repeal 
laws because, view, compromise Constitution. 
Kentuckians, doubt, somewhat offended that. ought 
ought ought know said less 
that, would lose power Northern States 
support. Really, would push would take 
entire power serve you. ought remember long, 
precedent, Judge Douglas holds obliged stick 
ought remember time think ready 
inaugurate measures revival African slave trade, 
sufficient time arrived, precedent, Judge Douglas 
break through, compromise. says nothing strong 
said 1849 declared favor Missouri 
precisely four years quarter declared Compromise 
sacred thing, "no hand would ever 
brought forward measure destroy it. mere 
calculation time four years ready 
take back profession sacredness Compromise abolishing 
slave trade. Precisely soon ready services 
direction, fair calculation, may sure them. 
 
remember set Judge Douglas's debt, 
he, last year, said people Territories can, spite Dred 
Scott decision, exclude slaves Territories; 
declared, "unfriendly extension property 
new Territories may cut off, teeth decision 
Supreme Court United States. 
 
assumed position Freeport 27th August, 1858. said 
people Territories exclude slavery, many words: 
however, bear mind never said since. 
may hunt every speech since made, never used 
expression once. never seemed notice stating 
views differently then; sort accident, 
always really stated differently. always since declared 
"the Constitution carry slavery Territories 
United States beyond power people legally control it, 
Now, difference language used upon 
former occasion latter day. may may 
difference meaning, worth considering whether 
also difference meaning. 
 
Why, drive out. way 
put Territory. force across line, change 
character that, property, existence. 
controlling "as controlling 
property thing destroying it, driving 
think not. think controlling property would 
Kentucky want. understand controlling 
property means controlling benefit owner 
it. doubt Supreme Court United States would 
say Territorial Legislatures thus 
control slave property, would sing quite different if, 
pretence controlling it, undertake pass laws 
virtually excluded upon well known principle 
lawyers, Legislature cannot directly do, cannot 
Legislature power drive slaves 
out, power, imposing burdens 
way property, effect end, attempt 
would held Dred Scott court unconstitutional. 
 
Douglas willing stand first proposition 
exclude it, seen proposition amounts nothing 
less naked absurdity may lawfully drive 
lawful right remain. admitted first 
slave might lawfully taken Territories Constitution 
United States, yet asserted might lawfully driven 
out. proposition, absurdity stated. 
willing stand face 
has, therefore, modified language 

 
Kentuckians don't like tell 
go. swears court. leading man Illinois 
break court, made decision like. 
swears court, courts got working 
you, denounces men swear courts, 
bad citizens. one acts unfriendly 
legislation shall impose heavy burdens to, effect, destroy 
property slaves Territory, show plainly enough 
mistake purpose Legislature make 
Supreme Court decide law 
unconstitutional, ready say benefit "I swear 
court; give going getting 
men swear courts, give him. 
and, say, wisely serve 
yourselves. 
 
Again: alluded beginning remarks fact 
Judge Douglas made great complaint expressed opinion 
government endure permanently, half slave half 
complained Seward using different language, 
declaring principles 
free slave labor. [A voice: "He says original 
Seward. original attend 
immediately, sir. Since time, Pennsylvania expressed 
sentiment. never denounced Mr. why? little 
chance, notwithstanding opinion mouth may 
yet Douglas man. 
hold opinion man Douglas man. 
 
neither I, Seward, entitled 
distinction first expressed idea. idea 
expressed Richmond Virginia, two 
years expressed first us. Douglas 
conflict humble last year, 
fatal delighted call it, 
suggested chance New York meet 
Seward would also, never occurred 
word don't think discover 
Douglas ever talked going Virginia idea there. 
No. that. Roger A. brought Washington 
City made editor par Douglas paper, making 
use expression, which, us, 
this, Kentucky friends may see opinion 
view expressed men suspected desire 
country shall become free, expressed fairly 
known entertain desire whole country shall become slave. 
expressed class men, nowise offensive him. 
again, friends Kentucky, Judge Douglas you. 
 
another reason Southern people ought nominate Douglas 
convention reason wonderful capacity 
power would seem impossible. Let 
call attention one apparently impossible 
 
Douglas three four distinguished men extreme 
anti-slavery views men Republican party expressing 
desire re-election Senate last year. would, itself, 
seemed little wonder 
see Wise Virginia, man exactly opposed them, man 
believes divine right slavery, also expressing desire 
Douglas another man may said 
kindred Wise, Mr. Vice-President, 
State, also agreeing anti-slavery men North 
Douglas ought re-elected. Still senator 
Kentucky, always loved affection tender 
ever loved man, opposed 
anti-slavery men reasons seemed sufficient him, equally 
opposed Wise writing letters Illinois 
secure Douglas. Now, conflicting elements 
points one another, support 
him, worthy note consider. quite 
probable classes men thought, re-election 
Douglas, peculiar views would gain probable 
anti-slavery men thought views would gain Wise 
thought too, regards Mr. 
thought views would gain something, although 
opposed men. probable 
thought using Douglas; yet problem 
whether using all. was, 
consider whether power perform one lightly 
throw away. 
 
one thing say you, relation. 
opinion, give without opinion 
take take 
may beaten. surely beaten take him. We, 
Republicans others forming opposition country, intend 
patient firm, long run beat 
you, whether take not. know fairly beat 
beat together. know "all 
beat together, expect 
it. don't intend impatient it. mean 
deliberate calm possible be, firm 
resolved possible men be. 
perhaps want know you. 
 
tell you, far authorized speak opposition, 
mean you. mean treat you, near possibly 
can, Washington, Jefferson, Madison treated you. mean leave 
alone, way interfere institution; abide 
every compromise Constitution, and, word, coming back 
original proposition, treat you, far men (if 
may, according noble fathers, 
Washington, Jefferson, Madison. mean remember 
good difference us 
difference circumstances. mean recognize bear mind always 
good hearts bosoms people, 
claim have, treat accordingly. mean marry girls 
chance, white ones honor inform 
chance way. 
 
told mean do. want know, now, thing 
takes place, mean do? often hear intimated 
mean divide Union whenever Republican, anything like it, 
elected President United States. [A voice: "That "That 
so," one wonder [A voice: "He 
Douglas Well, then, want know going 
half it? going split Ohio through, push 
half going keep right alongside us 
outrageous going build wall way 
country ours, movable property can't come 
more, danger losing it? think 
better yourselves, subject, leaving us obligation 
whatever return specimens movable property come 
divided Union would right you, 
think, upon subject; cease obligations 
anything you, much better think be? 
make war upon us kill us all? Why, gentlemen, think 
gallant brave men fight bravely 
good cause, man man, people shown 
capable upon various but, man man, 
better are, many 
us. never make much hand whipping us. fewer 
numbers you, think could whip us; equal, 
would likely drawn inferior numbers, 
make nothing attempting master us. 
 
perhaps addressed long, longer, Kentuckians 
ought done, inasmuch said whatever course 
take intend end beat you. propose address 
remarks friends, way discussing best means 
keeping promise good faith made. 
 
may appear little mention topic 
speak now. favorite position Douglas's 
interference General Government, Ordinance '87, 
act General Government never made ever 
make free State; Ordinance '87 make free States 
Ohio, Indiana, Illinois; States free upon "great 
popular sovereignty, people several 
States chosen make so. Columbus, probably here, 
undertook compliment people made 
State Ohio free, Ordinance '87 entitled 
degree divide honor them. doubt people 
State Ohio make free according 
judgment, let facts 
 
believe, made first constitution, 
clause prohibiting slavery, it, suppose, nearly 
bear mind 
one actual presence 
institution amongst you; made free State 
embarrassment upon already among many slaves, 
here, sought make free State, would 
know with. among you, embarrassing 
difficulties, probably, would induced tolerate slave 
constitution instead free one, indeed difficulties 
constrained every people continent adopted slavery. 
 
Pray made kept 
find country free came decide Ohio free 
State? important inquire reason found so. Let us 
take illustration States Ohio Kentucky. Kentucky 
separated River Ohio, mile wide. portion Kentucky, 
reason course Ohio, farther north portion 
Ohio, stand. Kentucky entirely covered slavery; 
Ohio entirely free it: made 
No. portion Kentucky farther north portion Ohio. 
No. nothing soil one favorable 
slave other. climate soil one side 
line entirely covered slavery, side free 
it. it? Study it. Tell us, can, range 
anything conceive made 
difference, law sort keeping 
Kentucky, Ordinance '87 kept Ohio. 
reason this, confess wholly beyond power 
conceive it. This, then, offer combat idea Ordinance 
never made State free. 
 
don't stop come State 
said Kentucky Ohio, repeat 
Indiana Kentucky: equally One additional argument 
applicable also Indiana. Territorial condition 
Congress Ordinance least 
far suspend operation time, order 
exercise "popular sovereignty" slaves wanted them. 
men controlling General Government, men 
Revolution, refused Indiana evidence 
Indiana supposed could slaves, 
Congress put way; 
Congress refused so; ended last Indiana 
free State. Tell Ordinance '87 nothing 
making Indiana free State, find men 
restrained by, 
 
Come State Illinois. great Northwest Territory, 
including Ohio, Indiana, Illinois, Michigan, Wisconsin, acquired 
first, believe, British Government, part least, 
French. establishment independence became part 
Virginia, enabling Virginia afterward transfer General 
Government. French settlements Illinois, 
time French settlements Missouri, 
tract country purchased till 
French settlements negro slavery existed many years, perhaps 
much two hundred 
Illinois, St. perhaps, Missouri. 
number slaves great, 
number place. acquired Territory. 
effort made break relation master slave, 
even Ordinance 1787 enforced destroy slavery 
Illinois; Ordinance apply Missouri all. 
 
want ask attention to; point, Illinois 
Missouri came Union time, Illinois latter 
part Missouri, struggle, believe sometime 
filling American people period 
time; progress enabling come Union 
time. end ten years, preparing 
(for period number slaves Illinois 
actually Missouri, beginning few, 
end ten years ten thousand. so, 
remembered Missouri Illinois are, certain extent, 
parallel northern half Missouri 
southern half Illinois parallel 
climate would effect upon one upon other, 
soil material difference far bears upon question 
slavery settled upon one none 
natural causes produce difference filling them, yet 
broad difference filling up, led inquire 
cause difference. 
 
natural say Missouri law keep 
country filling slaves, Illinois 
Ordinance Ordinance there, slavery ten 
years; Ordinance other, increased 
ten thousand. anybody doubt reason 
 
think facts abundantly prove friend Judge 
Douglas's proposition, Ordinance '87, national 
restriction slavery, never tendency make free State, 
proposition without shadow substance truth it. 
 
Douglas sometimes says States (and part 
proposition become free become 
upon "great State Illinois came 
Union slave State, people, upon "great 
popular sovereignty, since made free State. Allow 
little state facts justify 
saying Illinois came Union slave State. 
 
mentioned old French slaves there. 
think, one two Besides that, 
Territorial law black persons. law, 
violation Ordinance '87, without enforcement 
Ordinance overthrow system, small number 
slaves introduced indentured persons. Owing this, clause 
prohibition slavery slightly Instead running like 
yours, neither slavery involuntary except crime, 
party shall duly exist 
State, said neither slavery involuntary 
thereafter children indentured servants 
born free; nothing said old French slaves. 
fact, clause prohibiting slavery modified 
actual presence it, Douglas asserts 
Illinois came Union slave State. far facts sustain 
conclusion intelligent impartial men 
decide. leave you, remarks, worthy 
remembered, little thing, indentured servants 
there, sufficient modify constitution made people 
ardently desiring free constitution; showing power 
actual presence institution slavery prevent people, 
however anxious make free State, making perfectly so. 
 
longer, perhaps, ought do. 
 
doubt whether introduce another topic upon could 
talk while. [Cries "Go on," "Give us this, 
Douglas's Popular sovereignty, principle, simply this: one man 
chooses make slave another man, neither man anybody else 
right object. Apply government, seeks apply 
it, this: If, new Territory people 
beginning enter purpose making homes, choose 
either exclude slavery limits, establish there, 
however one may affect persons 
infinitely greater number persons afterward inhabit 
Territory, members family communities 
general head family States 
all, however action may affect one 
these, power right interfere. Douglas's popular 
sovereignty applied. Now, think real popular sovereignty 
world. think definition popular sovereignty, 
abstract, would this: man shall precisely 
pleases himself, things exclusively concern 
him. Applied government, principle would general 
government shall things pertain it, 
local governments shall precisely please respect 
matters exclusively concern them. 
 
Douglas looks upon slavery insignificant people must decide 
question themselves; yet fit decide 
shall governor, judge, shall 
officers. vast national matters 
little matter planting slavery there. 
purely local interest, nobody allowed say word 
about. 
 
Labor great source nearly all, all, human 
necessities difference opinion 
elements labor society. men assume necessary 
connection capital labor, connection draws within 
whole labor community. assume nobody works 
unless capital work. begin next consider 
best way. say two one hire men, 
labor buy men, 
drive them, it, slavery. assumed that, proceed 
discuss question whether laborers better 
condition slaves hired laborers, usually decide 
better condition slaves. 
 
first place, say whole thing mistake. 
certain relation capital labor, exist, 
rightfully exists, think true. men 
honest pursuit interests 
capital, allowed enjoy 
peace, also, choose, it, 
use save actual labor, hire people 
labor them, right. wrong man 
find men land work upon, 
work in, working others, hired 
laborers, receiving capital it. Thus men, 
capital, hire others, establish relation capital 
labor relation make 
insist all, embrace one 
eighth labor country. 
 
[The speaker proceeded argue hired ability 
become must every labors 
force. 
 
taken upon name say expect 
upon principles ultimately beat them. order so, think 
want must national policy regard institution 
slavery deals institution 
wrong. Whoever desires spread slavery 
nationalization institution yields yields 
policy either recognizes slavery right 
indifferent thing. Nothing make successful setting 
policy shall treat thing say this, 
mean say General Government charged duty 
preventing wrongs world, think 
charged preventing wrongs wrongs 
itself. Government expressly charged duty providing 
general believe spreading 
perpetuity institution slavery general 
thing ever 
threatened perpetuity Union itself. thing 
ever menaced destruction government live 
thing. repress thing, think, is, Providing general 
friends Kentucky differ us. need make 
argument them, think wrong relations, 
least, must decide actions 
course, upon judgment. 
 
say must interfere institution slavery 
States exists, Constitution forbids it, 
general welfare require us so. must withhold 
efficient Fugitive Slave law, Constitution requires us, 
understand it, withhold law. must prevent 
institution, neither Constitution 
general welfare requires us extend it. must prevent revival 
African slave trade, Congress Territorial 
slave must prevent things done either 
courts. people United States rightful 
masters courts, overthrow Constitution, 
overthrow men Constitution. 
 
things must employ must hold 
must adopt conform ordinary 
must nominate must carry elections. 
things, think ought keep view real purpose, 
none anything stands adverse purpose. shall adopt 
platform fails recognize express purpose, elect man 
declares inimical purpose, take nothing 
success, admit act upon principle 
desire "the which, end, 
apparent success really injury us. 
 
know desirable me, everybody else, 
elements opposition shall unite next Presidential 
election future time. anxious be; 
things seriously considered relation matter. 
terms favor union. suppose 
shall take man, put upon one end 
declares us regard 
spread slavery, turns nose says tired hearing 
anything it, us enemy, 
issue? Why, get slave States, 
tried already beat rule him. 
nominate upon ground, carry slave State; 
so, portion men upon 
principle really fight go him, won't get 
single electoral vote anywhere, perhaps, State Maryland. 
use saying us 
won't thing this. cannot it. cannot get 
men vote it. speak cannot give State 
Illinois case fifty thousand. would flatter 
heart wish see us. 
 
saying much let say little side. 
plenty men slave States altogether good enough 
either President Vice-President, provided profess 
sympathy purpose, place ground 
men, upon principle, vote them. them, good 
men character intelligence talent 
one place upon right ground, occupying one 
place upon next Republican opposition ticket. heartily 
go him. unless place himself, think matter 
perfect nonsense attempt bring union upon basis; 
union made, elements 
success anything like success. good old maxims 
Bible axe applicable, truly applicable, human affairs, 
this, things, may say us 
us; us, glad 
many good able noble men South place 
confer upon high honor election 
upon one end ticket. would soul good 
thing. would enable us teach that, inasmuch select 
one number carry principles, free 
charge mean say. 
 
But, friends, detained much longer expected do. 
believe may compliment say stayed 
heard great patience, return sincere 
thanks. 
 
 
 
 
PROTECTIVE 
 
EDWARD 
 
October 11, 1859 
 
Dr. EDWARD 
 
DEAR SIR:--I attending court. Yesterday, left 
Springfield, brother, Dr. William S. showed letter 
yours, kindly mention name, inquiring tariff views, 
suggest propriety writing letter upon subject. 
old old times made speeches 
subject other. 
 
since changed views. believe yet, could 
carefully adjusted protective tariff, far acquiesced 
perpetual subject political strife, 
would better us. Still opinion 
revival question advance cause itself, 
man it. 
 
thought much subject recently, general impression 
necessity protective tariff ere long force 
old opponents take up; old friends join 
establish firm durable basis. We, Old Whigs, 
entirely beaten tariff question, shall able 
policy absence shall demonstrated 
necessity minds men heretofore opposed it. 
view, prefer write public letter 
subject. therefore wish considered confidential. shall 
glad receive letter you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
W. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, November, 2, 1859. 
 
WM. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours October received. given 
secure two notes, one notes sold 
sufficient pay one note, one assigned 
take all. Also, execution judgment assigned note 
may take all; thing redemption 
execution sales United States Court 
court. 
 
mention name plaintiff suit, 
tell nothing etc. Write again. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FRAGMENT SPEECH KANSAS, 
 
DECEMBER, 1859. 
 
Democrats Union; greatly fear 
success Republicans would destroy Union. Why? 
Republicans declare Union? Nothing like it. statement 
Black Republicans elect President, stand 
it." break Union. shall constitutionally elect 
President, duty see Old John Brown 
executed treason State. cannot object, even though 
agreed us thinking slavery wrong. cannot excuse violence, 
bloodshed could avail nothing might think 
right. So, constitutionally elect President, therefore 
undertake destroy Union, duty deal 
old John Brown dealt with. shall try duty. 
hope believe section majority act render 
extreme measures necessary. 
 
 
 
 
G. W. G. S. W. H. BROWN. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, Dec. 14, 1859 
 
MESSRS. & BROWN. 
 
favor 12th hand, gives pleasure 
able answer it. intention take part 
fear 
misunderstood upon subject ought deter justice 
Mr. preventing wrong done use 
name connection alleged wrongs me. 
 
answer first question, whether Mr. guilty 
time Senator Trumbull's election, answer 
unhesitatingly Mr. owed political allegiance 
party whose candidate was. Senate, holding over, 
elected Democratic never 
caucus friends sought make U. S. Senator, never gave 
promises pledges support me, subsequent events greatly 
tended prove wisdom, politically, Mr. course. 
election Judge Trumbull strongly tended sustain preserve 
position lion Democrats condemned repeal 
Missouri Compromise, left position joining us 
forming Republican party, done Bloomington convention 
1856. 
 
canvass 1858 belief was, 
still is, sincere faithful friend Mr. 
none trusted more. position chairman 
State Central Committee led greater intercourse him, 
giving larger share confidence, almost 
friend; never suspected confidence was, 
degree, 
 
relations Mr. since organization Republican 
party, in, State, 1856, especially since adjournment 
Legislature intimate deem 
impossibility could dealing me. 
also, times, appeared equally true faithful party. 
position chairman committee, believe 
man could done. best us liable commit 
become apparent subsequent know single 
error, even, committed Mr. since acted together 

 
I, occasionally heard insinuations Mr. 
receipt letter; instance hesitated pronounce 
wholly full extent knowledge belief. 
been, still am, anxious take part many friends, 
good true, mentioned candidates Republican 
feel honor quite 
clear remain silent hear one assailed 
matters believe know 
 
take pleasure adding that, avowed friends 
canvass last year, suspect acted 
me, cause; one whose 
honor, integrity I, greater confidence 
Mr. 
 
dislike appear public matter; 
liberty make use letter may think justice 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
G. M. OTHERS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, December 19, 1859. 
 
MESSRS. G. M. OTHERS, CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, ETC. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter 7th instant, accompanied similar one 
Republican State officers, Republican 
members State Board Ohio, requesting me, 
publication permanent form, copies political debates 
Senator Douglas last year, received. grateful 
terms 
request transmit copies 
send reported printed respective friends Senator 
Douglas myself, is, friends, mine 
mine. would liberty us change word 
letter his, changes made mine, perceive, 
verbal only, number. wish precisely 
copies without comment whatever. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SKETCH 
 
J. W. FELL, 
 
SPRINGFIELD, December 20, 1859. 
 
J. W. FELL, Esq. 
 
DEAR little 
much it, reason, suppose, much me. 
anything made it, wish go beyond 
thought necessary anything 
speeches suppose would objection. course 
must appear written myself. 
 
truly, A. LINCOLN 
 
------ 
 
born February 12, Hardin County, Kentucky. parents 
born Virginia, families, 
perhaps say. mother, died tenth year, 
family name reside Adams, others 
Macon County, Illinois. Abraham Lincoln, 
County, Virginia, Kentucky 
year two later killed Indians, 
battle, laboring open farm 
ancestors, went Virginia County, 
Pennsylvania. effort identify New England family 
name ended nothing definite similarity 
Christian names families, 
like. 
 
father, death father, six years age, 
grew literally without education. removed Kentucky 
County, Indiana, eighth year. reached new home 
time State came Union. wild region, 
many bears wild animals still grew up. 
schools, called, qualification ever required 
teacher beyond Rule 
Three. supposed understand Latin happened 
looked upon absolutely 
nothing excite ambition education. course, came age 
know much. Still, somehow, could read, write, 
Rule Three, all. school since. 
little advance upon store education picked 
time time pressure necessity. 
 
raised farm work, continued till 
twenty-one came Illinois, Macon County. got New Salem, 
time Sangamon, Menard County, remained year 
sort clerk came Black Hawk war; elected 
captain volunteers, success gave pleasure 
since. went campaign, elected, ran Legislature 
year time ever 
beaten people. next three succeeding elections 
elected Legislature. candidate afterward. 
legislative period studied law, removed Springfield 
practice it. 1846 elected lower House Congress. 
candidate 1849 1854, 
practiced law ever before. Always Whig 
generally Whig electoral making active 
losing interest politics repeal 
Missouri Compromise aroused again. done since 
pretty well known. 
 
personal description thought desirable, may said 
am, height, six feet four flesh, weighing 
average one hundred eighty dark coarse black 
hair eyes. marks 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NOMINATION NATIONAL 
 
N. B. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, FEBRUARY 9, 1859 
 
HON. N. B. 
 
DEAR Sir:--I position would hurt much 
nominated national would hurt 
get Illinois expected wrote 
letter Messrs. others 
bitter me; will, upon me, 
lay egg South, Seward egg North, 
go far toward middle nothing. help 
little matter end mean 
private. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
1860 
 
 
SPEECH COOPER NEW YORK FEBRUARY 27, 1860 
 
MR. PRESIDENT FELLOW-CITIZENS NEW facts 
shall deal evening mainly old anything 
new general use shall make them. shall 
mode presenting facts, 
inferences observations following 
 
speech last autumn Columbus, Ohio, reported New York 
Times, Senator Douglas said: 
 
"Our fathers, framed Government live, 
understood question well, even better now." 
 
fully indorse this, adopt text discourse. 
adopt furnishes precise agreed 
discussion Republicans wing Democracy headed 
Senator Douglas. simply leaves understanding 
fathers question 
 
frame Government 
 
answer must Constitution United States. 
Constitution consists original, framed 1787 (and 
present Government first went twelve subsequently 
framed amendments, first ten framed 
 
fathers framed Constitution? suppose 
"thirty-nine" signed original instrument may fairly called 
fathers framed part present Government. almost 
exactly true say framed it, altogether true say 
fairly represented opinion sentiment whole nation 
time. 
 
names, familiar nearly all, accessible quite all, 
need repeated. 
 
take "thirty-nine," present, 
framed Government live." 
 
question which, according text, fathers 
understood "just well, even better 
 
this: proper division local Federal authority, 
anything Constitution, forbid Federal Government control 
slavery Federal Territories? 
 
Upon Senator Douglas holds Republicans 
negative. affirmation denial form issue, 
question precisely text declares fathers understood 
"better 
 
Let us inquire whether "thirty-nine," them, acted upon 
question; did, acted upon expressed 
better understanding. 
 
1784, three years United States 
owning Northwestern Territory, Congress 
Confederation question prohibiting slavery 
Territory; four afterward framed 
Constitution Congress voted question. 
these, Roger Sherman, Thomas voted 
prohibition, thus showing that, understanding, line dividing 
local Federal authority, anything else, properly forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal territory. 
voted prohibition, showing 
that, cause, thought improper vote it. 
 
1787, still Constitution, convention 
session framing it, Northwestern Territory still 
Territory owned United States, question 
prohibiting slavery Territory came Congress 
two "thirty-nine" afterward signed 
Constitution Congress, voted question. 
William William voted prohibition 
thus showing that, understanding, line dividing local 
Federal authority, anything else, properly forbade Federal 
Government control slavery Federal territory. time 
prohibition became law, part well known 
Ordinance '87. 
 
question Federal control slavery Territories seems 
directly convention framed original 
Constitution; hence recorded "thirty-nine," 
them, engaged instrument, expressed opinion 
precise question. 
 
first Congress sat Constitution, act 
passed enforce Ordinance '87, including prohibition 
slavery Northwestern Territory. bill act reported 
one "thirty-nine," Thomas member 
House Representatives Pennsylvania. went stages 
without word opposition, finally passed branches without 
yeas equivalent unanimous passage. 
Congress sixteen thirty-nine fathers framed 
original Constitution. John Langdon, Wm. S. 
Roger Sherman, Robert William Few, 
Abraham King, William George Richard 
George Read, Pierce Butler, Daniel James Madison. 
 
shows that, understanding, line dividing local 
Federal authority, anything Constitution, properly forbade 
Congress prohibit slavery Federal territory; else 
fidelity correct principles oath support Constitution 
would constrained oppose prohibition. 
 
Again: George Washington, another President 
United States, and, such, approved signed bill; 
thus validity law, thus showing that, 
understanding, line dividing local Federal authority, anything 
Constitution, forbade Federal Government control 
slavery Federal territory. 
 
great adoption original Constitution, North 
Carolina ceded Federal Government country constituting 
State Tennessee; and, years later, Georgia ceded 
constitutes States Mississippi deeds 
cession made condition States Federal 
Government prohibit slavery ceded country. Besides this, 
slavery actually ceded country. circumstances, 
Congress, taking charge countries, absolutely prohibit 
slavery within them. interfere control 
there, certain extent. Congress organized 
Territory Mississippi: act organization prohibited 
bringing slaves Territory place without United 
States, fine giving freedom slaves act passed 
branches Congress without yeas Congress 
three "thirty-nine" framed original Constitution. 
John Langdon, George Read, Abraham all, probably, voted 
it. Certainly would placed opposition upon 
record, if, understanding, line dividing local Federal 
authority, anything Constitution, properly forbade Federal 
Government control slavery Federal territory. 
 
Federal Government purchased Louisiana country. 
former territorial came certain States; 
Louisiana country acquired foreign nation. 
Congress gave territorial organization part 
constitutes State New Orleans, lying within part, 
old comparatively large city. considerable 
towns slavery thoroughly 
people. Congress not, Territorial Act, 
prohibit slavery; interfere take control 
marked extensive way case Mississippi. 
substance provision therein made relation slaves 
 
First. slave imported Territory foreign 

 
Second. slave carried imported 
United States since first day May, 
 
Third. slave carried except owner, 
use penalty cases fine 
upon law, freedom slave. 
 
act also passed without yeas Congress 
passed two Abraham 
stated case Mississippi, probable 
voted it. would allowed pass without 
opposition it, if, understanding, violated 
either line properly dividing local Federal authority, 
provision Constitution. 
 
came passed Missouri question. Many votes taken, 
yeas branches Congress, upon various 
general question. Two King Charles 
members Congress. Mr. King steadily voted 
slavery prohibition Mr. 
steadily voted slavery prohibition, 
this, Mr. King showed that, understanding, line dividing 
local Federal authority, anything Constitution, 
violated Congress prohibiting slavery Federal territory; Mr. 
vote, showed understanding 
sufficient reason opposing prohibition case. 
 
cases mentioned acts "thirty-nine," 
them, upon direct issue, able 
 
enumerate persons thus four 1784, two 
1787, seventeen three two two 
would thirty them. would John 
Langdon, Roger Sherman, William Few, King, George Read, 
twice, Abraham three times. true number 
"thirty-nine" shown acted upon question which, 
text, understood better we, twenty-three, leaving sixteen 
shown acted upon way. 
 
Here, then, twenty-three thirty-nine fathers "who 
framed Government live," have, upon official 
responsibility oaths, acted upon question 
text affirms well, even better 
twenty-one clear majority whole 
acting upon make guilty gross political 
impropriety if, understanding, proper 
division local Federal authority, anything 
Constitution made themselves, sworn support, forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal Territories. 
Thus twenty-one and, actions speak louder words, 
actions responsibilities speak still 
 
Two twenty-three voted Congressional prohibition slavery 
Federal Territories, instances acted upon 
question. reasons voted known. may 
done thought proper division local Federal 
authority, provision principle Constitution, stood 
way; may, without question, voted 
prohibition appeared sufficient grounds 
expediency. one sworn support Constitution 
conscientiously vote understands unconstitutional 
measure, however expedient may think it; one may ought vote 
measure deems constitutional, if, time, 
deems therefore would set even 
two voted prohibition done because, 
understanding, proper division local Federal authority, 
anything Constitution, forbade Federal Government control 
slavery Federal territory. 
 
remaining sixteen "thirty-nine," far 
left record understanding upon direct question 
Federal control slavery Federal Territories. much 
reason believe understanding upon question would 
appeared different twenty-three 
manifested all. 
 
purpose rigidly text, purposely omitted 
whatever understanding may manifested person, however 
thirty-nine fathers framed original 
Constitution; and, reason, also omitted whatever 
understanding may manifested even 
phase general question slavery. look 
acts declarations foreign slave 
trade, morality policy slavery generally, would appear 
us direct question Federal control slavery Federal 
Territories, acted all, would probably 
acted twenty-three did. Among sixteen several 
noted anti-slavery men Dr. Franklin, Alexander 
Hamilton, Morris one known 
otherwise, unless may John Rutledge, South Carolina. 
 
sum whole is, thirty-nine fathers framed 
original Constitution, clear majority 
understood proper division local 
Federal authority, part Constitution, forbade Federal 
Government control slavery Federal Territories; whilst 
rest probably understanding. Such, 
understanding fathers framed original Constitution; 
text affirms understood question "better 
 
But, far, considering understanding question 
manifested framers original Constitution. 
original instrument, mode provided amending it; and, 
already stated, present frame "the Government live" 
consists original, twelve amendatory articles framed 
adopted since. insist Federal control slavery 
Federal Territories violates Constitution, point us provisions 
suppose thus and, understand, fix 
upon provisions amendatory articles, original 
instrument. Supreme Court, Dred Scott case, plant 
upon fifth amendment, provides person shall deprived 
"life, liberty, property without due process Senator 
Douglas peculiar plant upon tenth 
amendment, providing "the powers United States 
"are reserved States respectively, 

 
Now, happens amendments framed first Congress 
sat identical Congress passed 
act already mentioned, enforcing prohibition slavery 
Northwestern Territory. Congress, 
identical individual men who, session, 
time within session, consideration, progress 
toward Constitutional amendments, act prohibiting 
slavery territory nation Constitutional 
amendments introduced passed act enforcing 
Ordinance that, whole act enforce 
Constitutional amendments also 
 
seventy-six members Congress, including sixteen framers 
original Constitution, stated, 
fathers framed part "the Government live," 
claimed forbidding Federal Government control 
slavery Federal Territories. 
 
little one day affirm 
two things Congress deliberately carried 
maturity time, absolutely inconsistent other? 
affirmation become absurd coupled 
affirmation mouth, two 
things alleged inconsistent understood whether really 
inconsistent better affirms 

 
surely safe assume thirty-nine framers original 
Constitution, seventy-six members Congress framed 
amendments thereto, taken together, certainly include may 
fairly called "our fathers framed Government live." 
And, defy man show one ever, 
whole life, declared that, understanding, proper division 
local Federal authority, part Constitution, forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal Territories. 
go step further. defy one show living man 
world ever did, prior beginning present century (and 
might almost say prior beginning last half present 
declare that, understanding, proper division 
local Federal authority, part Constitution, forbade 
Federal Government control slavery Federal Territories. 
declare, give "our fathers framed 
Government live," living men within 
century among search, shall 
able find evidence single man agreeing them. 
 
let guard little misunderstood. 
mean say bound follow whatever fathers 
did. would discard lights current experience 
reject progress, improvement. say that, would 
opinions policy fathers case, 
upon evidence argument clear, even 
great authority, fairly considered cannot 
surely case whereof declare understood 
question better 
 
man day sincerely believes proper division local 
Federal authority, part Constitution, forbids 
Federal Government control slavery Federal Territories, 
right say so, enforce position truthful evidence 
fair argument can. right others 
less access history, less leisure study it, false 
belief "our fathers framed Government live" 
opinion thus substituting falsehood deception 
truthful evidence fair argument. man day sincerely 
believes "our fathers, framed Government live," 
used applied principles, cases, ought led 
understand proper division local Federal authority, 
part Constitution, forbids Federal Government control 
slavery Federal Territories, right say so. 
should, time, brave responsibility declaring that, 
opinion, understands principles better 
themselves; especially responsibility 
asserting question well, even better 
now." 
 
Let believe "our fathers, framed 
Government live, understood question well, 
even better now," speak spoke, act acted 
upon it. Republicans Republicans relation 
slavery. fathers marked it, let 
evil extended, tolerated protected 
of, far as, actual presence among us makes 
protection necessity. Let guaranties fathers gave 
grudgingly, fully fairly maintained. Republicans 
this, far know believe, content. 
 
now, would suppose would address 
words Southern people. 
 
would say them: consider reasonable 
people; consider general qualities reason justice 
inferior people. Still, speak us 
Republicans, denounce us or, 
best, better grant hearing 
murderers, nothing like "Black 
one another, deems unconditional 
condemnation "Black first thing attended 
to. Indeed, condemnation us seems indispensable 
speak among you, admitted permitted 
speak Now; you, not, prevailed upon pause, 
consider whether quite us, even yourselves? Bring 
forward charges patient long enough 
hear us deny 
 
say sectional. deny it. makes issue; burden 
proof upon you. produce it? Why, 
party existence votes section. 
fact substantially true; prove issue? does, 
case should, without change principle, begin get votes 
section, thereby cease sectional. cannot escape 
yet, willing abide it? are, 
probably soon find ceased sectional, shall 
get votes section year. begin discover, 
truth plainly is, proof, touch issue. 
fact get votes section fact making, 
ours. fault fact, fault primarily 
yours, remains show repel by, wrong 
principle practice. repel wrong principle 
practice, fault ours; brings ought 
started discussion right wrong principle. 
principle, put practice, would wrong section benefit 
ours, object, principle, it, 
sectional, justly opposed denounced such. Meet us, then, 
question whether principle, put practice, would wrong 
section; meet us possible something may said 
side. accept No! really believe 
principle "our fathers framed Government 
live" thought clearly right adopt it, indorse 
again, upon official oaths, fact clearly wrong demand 
condemnation without moment's consideration. 
 
delight faces warning sectional 
parties given Washington Farewell Address. Less eight years 
Washington gave had, President United 
States, approved signed act Congress enforcing prohibition 
slavery Northwestern Territory, act embodied policy 
Government upon subject to, at, moment penned 
one year penned it, wrote La 
considered prohibition wise measure, expressing 
connection hope time confederacy free 
States. 
 
Bearing mind, seeing sectionalism since arisen upon 
subject, warning weapon hands us, 
hands you? Could Washington speak, would cast 
blame sectionalism upon us, sustain policy, upon 
you, repudiate it? respect warning Washington, 
commend you, together example pointing right 
application it. 
 
say 
revolutionary, something, sort. 
adherence old tried, new 
stick to, contend for, identical old policy point 
controversy adopted "our fathers framed Government 
one accord 
upon old policy insist upon substituting something new. 
True, disagree among substitute shall be. 
divided new propositions plans, unanimous 
rejecting denouncing old policy fathers. 
reviving foreign slave Congressional slave 
code Territories; Congress forbidding Territories 
prohibit slavery within limits; maintaining slavery 
Territories 
"if one man would enslave another, third man 
called "popular never man among 
favor Federal prohibition slavery Federal Territories, according 
practice "our fathers framed Government 
live." one various plans show precedent 
advocate century within Government originated. Consider, 
then, whether claim yourselves, charge 
us, based clear 

 
Again: say made slavery question prominent 
formerly was. deny it. admit deny 
made so. we, you, discarded old policy 
fathers. resisted still resist thence 
comes greater prominence question. Would question 
reduced former Go back old policy. 
again, would peace 
old times, policy old times. 
 
charge stir insurrections among slaves. deny it; 
Harper's John John Brown 
failed single Republican 
Harper's Ferry enterprise. member party guilty 
matter know know it. know it, 
inexcusable designating man proving fact. 
know it, inexcusable asserting it, especially 
persisting assertion tried failed make 
proof. need told persisting charge one 
know true simply malicious 
 
admit Republican aided encouraged 
Harper's Ferry affair, still insist doctrines 
declarations necessarily lead results. believe it. 
know hold doctrine, make declaration, held 
made fathers framed Government live. 
never dealt fairly us relation affair. occurred, 
important State elections near hand, evident 
belief that, charging blame upon us, could get 
advantage us elections. elections came, 
expectations quite fulfilled. Every Republican man knew that, 
least, charge much 
inclined cast vote favor. Republican doctrines 
declarations accompanied continued protest 
interference whatever slaves, slaves. 
Surely, encourage True, do, common 
"our fathers, framed Government live," declare 
belief slavery wrong; slaves hear us declare 
even this. thing say do, slaves would scarcely know 
Republican party. believe would not, fact, generally 
know us hearing. 
political among yourselves, faction charges 
sympathy Black then, give point charge, 
Black simply insurrection, blood, 
among slaves. 
 
Slave insurrections common 
Republican party organized. induced Southampton insurrection, 
twenty-eight years ago, which, least, three times many lives 
lost Harper's Ferry? scarcely stretch 
elastic fancy conclusion Southampton "got Black 
present state things United States, 
think general even extensive slave insurrection 
possible. indispensable concert action cannot attained. 
slaves means rapid incendiary 
black white, supply it. materials everywhere 
neither are, supplied indispensable 
connecting 
 
Much said Southern people affection slaves 
masters part it, least, true. plot 
could scarcely devised communicated twenty individuals 
one them, save life favorite master 
mistress, would divulge it. slave revolution 
exception it, case occurring peculiar 
circumstances. plot British history, though connected 
slaves, point. case, twenty 
admitted yet one them, anxiety save 
friend, betrayed plot friend, and, consequence, averted 
Occasional kitchen, open 
field, local extending score 
so, continue occur natural results slavery; 
general insurrection slaves, think, happen country 
long time. Whoever much fears much hopes event 
alike disappointed. 
 
language Mr. Jefferson, uttered many years ago, "It still 
power direct process emancipation deportation peaceably, 
slow degrees evil wear 
places be, filled free white laborers. If, 
contrary, left force on, human nature must 
prospect held up." 
 
Mr. Jefferson mean say, I, power 
emancipation Federal Government. spoke Virginia; and, 
power emancipation, speak slave holding States 
only. Federal Government, however, insist, power 
extension power insure 
slave insurrection shall never occur American soil 
free slavery. 
 
John Brown's effort slave insurrection. 
attempt white men get revolt among slaves, 
slaves refused fact, absurd slaves, 
ignorance, saw plainly enough could succeed. 
affair, philosophy, corresponds many attempts related 
history kings 
oppression people till fancies commissioned 
Heaven liberate them. attempt, ends little 
else execution. attempt Louis John 
Brown's attempt Harper's Ferry were, philosophy, precisely 
same. cast blame old England one case, 
New England other, two 
things. 
 
much would avail you, could, use John Brown, 
Book, like, break Republican Human 
action modified extent, human nature cannot changed. 
judgment feeling slavery nation, 
cast least million half votes. cannot destroy 
judgment breaking political 
organization around it. scarcely 
disperse army formed order face 
heaviest could, much would gain forcing 
sentiment created peaceful channel 
would channel probably be? Would 
number John enlarged 
 
break Union rather submit denial 
constitutional rights. 
 
somewhat reckless sound; would 
fully justified, mere force numbers, 
deprive right plainly written Constitution. 
proposing thing. 
 
make declarations, specific 
allusion assumed constitutional right take slaves 
Federal Territories, hold property. 
right specifically written Constitution. instrument 
literally silent right. We, contrary, deny 
right existence Constitution, even 
 
purpose, then, plainly stated, destroy 
Government unless allowed construe enforce Constitution 
please points dispute us. rule 
events. 
 
This, plainly stated, language. Perhaps say Supreme 
Court decided constitutional question favor. 
quite so. But, lawyer's distinction 
decision, court decided question sort way. 
court substantially said constitutional right take 
slaves Federal Territories, hold property. 
say, decision made sort way, mean made 
divided court, bare majority judges, quite 
agreeing one another reasons making it; made 
avowed supporters disagree one another meaning, 
mainly based upon mistaken statement 
statement opinion "the right property slave 
distinctly expressly affirmed Constitution." 
 
inspection Constitution show right property 
slave "distinctly expressly it. Bear mind, 
judges pledge judicial opinion right 
affirmed Constitution; pledge veracity 
"distinctly affirmed 
is, mingled anything is, words meaning 
that, without aid inference, 
meaning. 
 
pledged judicial opinion right 
affirmed instrument implication, would open others 
show neither word "slavery" found 
Constitution, word even, connection 
language alluding things slave slavery; wherever 
instrument slave alluded to, called 
wherever legal right relation alluded to, 
spoken labor may debt payable 
service labor. Also, would open show, contemporaneous 
history, mode alluding slaves slavery, instead 
speaking them, employed purpose exclude Constitution 
idea could property man. 
 
show this, easy certain. 
 
obvious mistake judges shall brought notice, 
reasonable expect withdraw mistaken 
statement, reconsider conclusion based upon it? 
 
remembered "our framed 
Government men made 
constitutional question favor, 
long ago; decided without division among themselves, making 
decision, without division among meaning 
made, and, far evidence left, without upon 
mistaken statement facts. 
 
circumstances, really feel justified 
break Government unless court decision shall 
submitted conclusive final rule political 
abide election Republican 
supposed event, say, destroy Union; then, say, 
great crime destroyed upon cool. 
holds pistol teeth, 
shall kill you, you'll 
 
sure, demanded money own, 
clear right keep it; vote 
own; threat death me, extort money, threat 
destruction Union, extort vote, scarcely distinguished 
principle. 
 
words exceedingly desirable 
parts great confederacy shall peace harmony one 
another. Let us Republicans part so. Even though much 
let us nothing passion ill temper. Even though 
Southern people much listen us, let us calmly 
consider demands, yield if, deliberate view 
duty, possibly can. Judging say do, 
subject nature controversy us, let us determine, 
can, satisfy them. 
 
satisfied Territories surrendered 
them? know not. present complaints 
us, Territories scarcely mentioned. Invasions insurrections 
rage now. satisfy if, future, nothing 
invasions and, know not. 
know know never anything invasions 
yet total exempt us 
charge 
 
question recurs, satisfy them? Simply this: must 
let alone, must, somehow, convince let 
alone. This, know experience, easy task. 
trying convince beginning organization, 
success. platforms speeches constantly 
protested purpose let alone; tendency 
convince them. Alike convince fact 
never detected man us attempt disturb them. 
 
natural apparently adequate means failing, 
convince them? This, cease call slavery wrong, join 
calling right. must done 
acts well words. Silence must place 
avowedly them. Senator Douglas's new law must 
enacted enforced, suppressing declarations slavery wrong, 
whether made politics, private. must 
arrest return fugitive slaves greedy pleasure. must 
pull free State constitutions. whole atmosphere must 
opposition slavery, 
cease believe troubles proceed us. 
 
quite aware state case precisely way. 
would probably say us, "Let us alone, nothing us, 
say please slavery." let alone never 
disturbed say 
them. continue accuse us doing, cease saying. 
 
also aware yet, terms, demanded overthrow 
free State constitutions. Yet constitutions declare wrong 
slavery, solemn sayings it; 
sayings shall overthrow 
constitutions demanded, nothing left resist 
nothing contrary, demand whole 
now. Demanding do, reason do, 
voluntarily stop nowhere short consummation. 
do, slavery morally right, socially cannot 
cease demand full national recognition it, legal right 
social 
 
justifiably withhold ground save conviction 
slavery wrong. slavery right, words, acts, laws, 
constitutions wrong, silenced 
swept away. right, cannot justly object 
wrong, cannot justly insist upon 
ask could readily grant 
thought slavery right; ask could readily grant, 
thought wrong. thinking right thinking wrong 
precise fact upon depends whole controversy. Thinking right, 
do, blame desiring full 
right; thinking wrong, do, yield them? 
cast votes view, view moral, 
social, political this? Wrong think 
slavery is, yet afford let alone is, 
much due necessity arising actual presence 
nation; we, votes prevent it, allow spread 
national Territories, overrun us free 
States? sense duty forbids this, let us stand 
duty, Let us diverted none 
industriously 
middle ground 
right wrong, vain search man neither 
living man dead policy "don't question 
true men Union appeals 
true Union men yield Disunionists, reversing divine rule, 
righteous 
Washington, imploring men Washington said, 
Washington did. 
 
Neither let us duty false us, 
frightened menaces destruction Government 
ourselves. LET US FAITH RIGHT MAKES MIGHT, 
FAITH LET US, END, DARE DUTY UNDERSTAND IT. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH NEW CONNECTICUT, MARCH 6, 1860 
 
MR. PRESIDENT, FELLOW-CITIZENS NEW Republican 
party nation shall ever national House entrusted 
duty party attend affairs 
national Whatever matters importance may come up, 
whatever difficulties may arise way administration 
Government, party attend to. 
compelled attend questions, besides question 
assumes overwhelming question slavery. true 
organization Republican party question slavery 
important indeed, much important 
become national question even get hearing 
present. old question matter remain one 
chief affairs national time; question 
management financial question disposition 
public domain shall managed purpose getting well 
settled, making homes free happy people? 
remain open require attention great yet, 
questions attended whatever party control 
Government. Yet, now, cannot even obtain hearing, 
propose detain upon topics sort hearing 
opportunity shall come. 
 
For, whether not, question slavery question, 
topic day. true 
Republican party alone, whole American people, 
us wish question settled, wish 
way. stands way, giving 
necessary attention questions national 
people whole nation agree question ought settled, 
yet settled. reason yet agreed 
shall settled. wish done, wish one way 
another, third, fourth, different bodies 
pulling different none them, decided 
majority, able accomplish common object. 
 
beginning year 1854, new policy inaugurated 
avowed object confident promise would entirely forever 
put end slavery agitation. declared 
policy, successfully established, country would 
forever rid whole question. Yet operation 
policy agitation ceased, constantly 
augmented. too, day 
friends, promised would wholly end constantly 
time Lecompton Bill introduced, 
working inevitable tendency remove 
question forever politics country. call mind 
Democratic speech, made repeal Missouri Compromise, 
time Lecompton Bill, predicted 
slavery agitation end, "the abolition excitement 
played "the Kansas question "they made 
question forever since 
Lecompton Bill Democrat, within experience, ever pretended 
could see end. cry 
now, agitation subject come end 
yet. 
 
truth question one national importance, 
cannot help dealing it; must something it, whether 
not. cannot avoid it; subject one cannot avoid 
avoid man live without 
upon us; body much closely 
natural wants attach natural bodies. think important 
matter taken earnest, really one way 
bring true settlement question understand true 

 
many efforts made settle it. 
fondly hoped every time 
violently ever. settled, fathers 
Missouri Compromise, stay settled. 
compromises 1850 declared full final settlement 
question. two great parties, national convention, adopted 
resolutions declaring settlement made Compromise 1850 
would last forever. Yet long 
again? broke 1854, higher 
furiously ever before, agitation rested since. 
 
repeated settlements must them. must 
nature purpose 

is, may perhaps profit past 
 
think one causes repeated best 
greatest men greatly size question. 
constantly brought forward small great 
small cover one reason settlements 
proved 
 
Look magnitude One sixth population, 
round quite one sixth, yet 
one sixth whole population United States slaves. 
owners slaves consider property. effect upon minds 
owners property, nothing else induces 
insist upon favorably affect value property, 
demand laws institutions public policy shall increase 
secure value, make effect 
minds owners persuade wrong 
it. slaveholder like considered mean fellow 
holding species property, hence, struggle within 
sets arguing belief slavery 
right. property influences mind. dissenting minister 
argued point one established church 
always met reply, "I can't see so." opened Bible 
pointed passage, minister replied, "I can't see 
so." showed single see that?" "Yes, see 
it," reply. laid word asked, 
"Do see now?" here. Whether owners species 
property really see is, say, 
do, see two thousand millions dollars, 
pretty thick Certain see 
see it. Certain two thousand millions dollars, 
invested species property, concentrated mind 
immense pecuniary influence 
upon 
 
North slavery exist, 
see medium. 
 
us appears natural think slaves human men, 
property; things, least, stated men 
Declaration Independence apply well us. say 
think, us, charter freedom applies slaves 
well class arguments put forward 
idea also calculated break idea free 
government, even white men, foundations 
free society. think slavery great moral wrong, and, 
claim right touch exists, wish treat 
wrong Territories, votes reach it. think 
respect ourselves, regard future generations God 
made us, require put wrong votes 
properly reach it. think species labor injury free white 
short, think slavery great moral, social, political 
evil, tolerable because, far as, actual existence makes 
necessary tolerate it, beyond ought treated 
wrong. 
 
two ideas, property idea slavery right, 
idea wrong, come actually produce 
conflict Mr. Seward roundly 
two ideas must conflict. 
 
Again, political anything way endanger 
perpetuity Union single thing, slavery? Many 
adversaries anxious claim specially devoted 
Union, take pains charge upon us hostility Union. 
claim true Union men, put one 
Whatever endangers Union, save except slavery? 
thing ever cause moment's men must agree 
thing alone ever endangered perpetuity Union. 
threatened influence, would men say 
best thing could done, could ought destroy it, 
would least keep growing man believe, 
way save Union extend increase thing 
threatens Union, suffer grow 
 
Whenever question shall settled, must settled 
philosophical basis. policy rest upon philosophical 
opinion permanently maintained. hence two 
regard slavery maintained. first, 
based property view slavery right, idea 
demands shall everything ought 
right. must sweep away opposition, opposition 
right wrong; must agree slavery right, must 
adopt idea property persuaded owner believe 
slavery morally right socially gives 
philosophical basis permanent policy 
 
policy one squares idea slavery wrong, 
consists everything ought wrong. 
Now, don't wish leave gap 
misrepresented, don't mean ought attack 
exists. seems form government view 
actual presence slavery find necessary frame 
government fathers slaveholder 
entire control system established, possessed 
power restrain going outside limits. necessities 
case compelled form government 
blessed fathers gave us; and, surely, made it, adds 
another reason let slavery alone exists. 
 
saw road, man would say might 
seize nearest stick kill it; found bed 
children, would another question. might hurt children 
might them. Much found 
bed children, bound solemn 
children circumstances, would 
become let particular mode getting rid gentleman 
alone. bed newly made up, children 
taken, proposed take young put 
them, take man would say question 
ought 
 
case. new Territories newly made bed 
children go, lies nation say whether 
shall mixed not. seem 
could much hesitation policy 
 
spoken policy based idea slavery wrong, 
policy based idea right. effort made 
policy shall treat neither right wrong. based 
upon utter leading advocate said, "I don't 
care whether voted down." "It merely matter dollars 
"The Almighty drawn line across continent, one 
side soil must forever cultivated slave labor, 
"When struggle white man 
negro, white man; negro 
central idea holds 
makes difference us whether Territories become 
free slave States whether neighbor farm 
cattle puts recognize policy, plausible 
name "popular sovereignty." 
 
policy chiefly stands way permanent settlement 
question. believe danger becoming permanent 
policy country, based public 
nobody "don't people care one way 
charge author, says "don't states 
individual expresses policy government. 
understand never said individual whether thought 
slavery right man nation 
policy may temporary may spring necessary 
political prospects utterly 
people therefore 

 
suppose could maintained public opinion 
shall say, "We don't must change public 
public mind must far square policy 
all. people must come consider 
question dollars believe places 
Almighty made slavery necessarily policy brought 
prevail people brought round say honestly, "We don't 
not, never maintained. say whether 
done. 
 
ready say cannot, Remember long 
taken since repeal Missouri 
know Democrat, either branch know one 
declares believes Declaration Independence 
application Judge Taney declares not, Judge 
Douglas even personally roundly saying 
Declaration applies men, negroes men. 
Democrat deny Declaration applies 
know Well, tried perhaps 
fifty larger smaller this, find one 
Democrat, never yet found one said place 
right that. must assume Democrats hold that, now, one 
Democrats show said five years venture 
defy whole party produce one man ever uttered belief 
Declaration apply negroes, repeal 
Missouri Four five years ago thought negroes 
men, "all men" negroes 
whole Democratic party deliberately taken negroes class 
men put class Turn simply 
Don't then, saying people cannot 
brought new doctrine, note long One long 
journey negroes estimated men 
estimated mere rightful 
 
saying "In struggle white men etc., 
know came source saying marks another 
falsehood wrapped statement. "In struggle 
white man assumes struggle, 
either white man must enslave negro negro must 
enslave white. merely ingenious 
falsehood degrade negro. Let let 
alone, struggle it. like two 
seamen narrow must push 
himself, would push negro white man either, not; 
plank large enough both. good earth plenty broad enough 
white man negro both, need either pushing 
off. 
 
saying, "In struggle negro 
etc., made idea crocodile 
white man can't must nothing else crocodile 
negro crocodile must possess case 
declares negro. meaning whole this: white 
man negro, negro negro may 
rightfully treat may white man rightfully treat 
negro. dear phrase author, dear 
deliberately repeats many speeches, tendency still 
negro, bring public opinion point utter 
indifference whether men not. time 
shall come, ever, think policy refer may 
hope good freemen country never allow come, 
policy never maintained. 
 
consider effect policy. States 
care whether freedom slavery gets better, people 
Territories may care. decide, may think 
matter dollars people 
Territories detailed States? feeling indifference 
absence moral sense question prevails States, 
carried Territories? every man say, "I don't 
care, nothing one comes wants slavery, must 
say, "I don't care whether freedom slavery voted voted 
results last nationalizing institution slavery. 
Even fairly carried out, policy certain nationalize 
slavery doctrine Davis himself. two roads 
"popular sovereignty" sure almost 
short other. 
 
want, want, us men think 
slavery wrong. say hate slavery, opposed it, 
yet act Democratic they? Let us apply 
say think slavery wrong, denounce 
attempts restrain it. anything else think wrong 
willing deal careful, 
one wrong other? let us single 
thing wrong; place even allow 
called must call wrong free States, 
there, must call wrong slave States, 
there; must call wrong politics 
bringing morality politics, must call wrong 
bringing politics must bring 
Tract Society 
single place, according you, 
wrong thing properly called 
 
Perhaps people slave States 
set foot effort emancipation, would wish 
success, bid Let us test that: 1858 
emancipation party Missouri, Frank Blair head, tried 
get movement purpose, started party contested 
State. Blair beaten, apparently truly, news 
came Connecticut, you, knew Frank Blair taking hold 
thing right end, thing say 
properly done remove bow heads sorrow 
you, you, know one single Democrat 
showed sorrow contrary every man threw 
hat, top 
 
Now, gentlemen, Republicans desire place great question 
slavery basis fathers placed it, other. 
easy demonstrate "our fathers, framed Government 
live," looked slavery wrong, framed 
everything square idea wrong, far 
necessities arising existence forming 
Constitution found slave trade existing, capital invested it, 
fields upon labor, whole system resting upon 
importation slave labor. therefore prohibit slave 
trade once, gave power prohibit twenty years. 
this? foreign trade treat way? Would 
done thought slavery 
 
Another thing done men framed 
Constitution, afterwards adopted act first 
Congress held Constitution, many framers 
members, prohibited spread slavery Territories. Thus 
men, framers Constitution, cut supply 
prohibited spread slavery, acts show conclusively 
considered thing wrong. 
 
additional proof wanted found 
Constitution. men framing supreme law government, 
secure blessings prosperity generations yet come, 
use language short direct plain found, express 
meaning matters slavery framers 
Constitution used direct language. 
Constitution slavery three times without 
language used becomes 
speak mean importation slaves, 
say so. establishing basis representation say "all 
mean say use 
shortest providing return fugitives say 
held service said slaves would 
less liable n't it? 
cannot doubt done purpose. one reason possible, 
supplied us one framers 
possible man conceive expected 
desired system would come end, meant did, 
Constitution show ever slave 
good free country ours. 
 
dwell longer. see signs approaching triumph 
Republicans bearing political great 
deal war us mere battle 
cavalry charged upon 
squares British infantry, last giving 
attempt, going officers mere 
complete despair fired solid 
Democrats sort extreme nothing else. 
take 
 
"the Seward 
repeat and, although proof thrust 
almost every good man since 
formation Government uttered sentiment, General 
Washington, yet confederacy free 
States," Jefferson, Monroe, latest days, yet 
refuse notice all, Seward saying 
it. Even Roger A. editor Richmond uttered 
sentiment almost language, yet little offence 
give Democrats sent Washington 
Douglas organ Douglas goes 
rage Seward dared repeat it. call 
sort argument must know child see 
through. 
 
Another John "You stir 
John Harper's Why, John Brown 
never implicated single Republican Harper's Ferry 
enterprise. tell member Republican party 
guilty matter, know know it. know 
it, inexcusable designate man prove fact. 
know it, inexcusable assert it, especially 
assertion tried failed make 
proof. need told persisting charge one 
know true simply malicious admit 
Republican aided encouraged Harper's Ferry affair, 
still insist doctrines declarations necessarily lead 
results. believe it. know hold make 
declarations, held made fathers framed 
Government live, cannot see declarations 
patriotic made make them. 
never dealt fairly us relation say 
frankly know nothing character lead us 
suppose would. elections 
several States, others soon come. 
occasion, troubled three times many 
killed affair. evident sorrow 
killed peace Virginia rejoicing 
charging Republicans thing might get advantage 
us New York, States. pulled string 
could, generous worthy expectations quite 
fulfilled. Republican knew charge 
least, inclined cast vote 
favor. mere nothing else do. 
still track, say, go think 
woman man voting you, try till 

 
Another specimen 
understood pretend know matter. merely 
going little 
glad see system labor prevails New England 
laborers strike want to, obliged 
work circumstances, tied obliged labor 
whether pay like system man quit 
wants to, wish might prevail everywhere. One reasons 
opposed slavery here. true condition 
take best leave man free 
acquire property fast can. get don't believe 
law prevent man getting would harm 
good. So, propose war upon capital, wish 
allow man equal chance get rich everybody else. 
one poor, race life, free society 
knows better condition; knows fixed 
condition labor whole life. ashamed confess 
twenty-five years ago hired work 
might happen poor man's want every man 
believe Black man entitled 
better condition; may look forward hope hired 
laborer year next, work afterward, finally 
hire men work system. New England, 
soil scarcely yet 
find wealthy men rarely 
another place desire get thick here, 
find hard better condition soil, may 
chance strike go somewhere else, may 
families forced negro slaves. want 
clean bed it! better 
condition, may go one endless round long man 
exists face 
 
Now, come back senator Illinois 
caused withdrawal Southern votes, consider 
briefly meet difficulty. done nothing, 
protested done nothing, injure South. yet, get 
back trade, must leave something 
doing. it? must stop thinking slavery Let 
institutions wholly let State constitutions 
slavery, get back what? 
brought owned labor it, labor, 
you, degrade you! ready get back trade 

 
statement correct. lost orders 
never better Senator Mason, Democrat, comes 
Senate proof dissolution Union actually 
orders same. struck work, 
neither make anything 
Mr. Mason reached 
ought made coat make 
proof good anything come Senate 
 
Another simply that, nothing find good 
many people much concerned loss Southern trade. 
either people sincere not. 
little that. moved real danger 
loss Southern trade, simply get names 
white list, then, instead Republicans 
glad keep Don't see cut 
would around Republicans come 
share them. 
merely trying fool Republicans votes, grow 
anxious pecuniary afraid going 
get broken care Democratic votes, oh, no, 
no, no! must judge class belong leave 
determine facts. 
 
Let us notice charges Republicans. say 
sectional. deny it. makes issue; burden proof 
upon you. produce it? Why, party 
existence votes section. fact 
substantially true; prove issue? does, 
case should, without change principle, begin get votes 
section, thereby cease sectional. cannot escape 
yet, willing abide it? are, 
probably soon find ceased sectional, shall get 
votes section year. fact get votes 
section fact making ours. 
fault fact, fault primarily yours, remains 
show repel wrong principle practice. 
 ours; brings ought 
discussion right wrong principle. principle, put 
practice, would wrong section benefit ours, 
object, principle, it, sectional, 
justly opposed denounced such. Meet us, then, question 
whether principle put practice would wrong section; 
meet possible something may said side. 
accept really believe principle 
fathers framed Government live thought 
clearly right adopt it, indorse again, upon 
official oaths, fact clearly wrong demand condemnation 
without moment's consideration. delight 
faces warning sectional parties given Washington 
Farewell Address. Less eight years Washington gave 
had, President United States, approved signed 
act Congress enforcing prohibition slavery Northwestern 
Territory, act embodied policy government upon subject, 
moment penned one year 
penned wrote La considered prohibition 
wise measure, expressing connection hope 
sometime confederacy free States. 
 
Bearing mind, seeing sectionalism since arisen upon 
subject, warning weapon hands us, 
hands you? Could Washington speak, would cast 
blame sectionalism upon us, sustain policy, upon 
you, repudiate it? respect warning Washington, 
commend you, together example pointing right 
application it. 
 
say 
revolutionary, something sort. 
adherence old tried, new 
stick to, contend for, identical old policy 
point controversy adopted fathers framed 
Government one accord reject 
upon old policy, insist upon substituting something new. 
 
True, disagree among substitute shall be. 
considerable variety new propositions plans, 
unanimous rejecting denouncing old policy fathers. 
reviving foreign congressional 
slave code Territories; Congress forbidding 
Territories prohibit slavery within limits; maintaining 
slavery Territories 
one man would enslave another, third man 
called "popular sovereignty." never man among 
favor prohibition slavery Federal Territories, according 
practice fathers framed Government 
live. one various plans show precedent 
advocate century within Government originated. yet 
draw say, "We eminently 
 
exceedingly desirable parts great confederacy shall 
peace, harmony one another. Let us Republicans 
part so. Even though much let us nothing 
passion Even though Southern people much 
listen us, let us calmly consider demands, yield 
if, deliberate view duty, possibly can. Judging 
say do, subject nature controversy 
us, let us determine, can, satisfy them. 
 
satisfied Territories surrendered 
them? know not. present complaints 
us, Territories scarcely mentioned. Invasions insurrections 
rage now. satisfy them, future, nothing 
invasions know not. 
know know never anything invasions 
yet total exempt us 
charge 
 
question recurs, satisfy them? Simply this: must 
let alone, must, somehow, convince let 
alone. This, know experience, easy task. 
trying convince them, beginning organization, 
success. platforms speeches, constantly 
protested purpose let alone; tendency 
convince them. Alike convince fact 
never detected man us attempt disturb them. 
 
natural apparently adequate means failing, 
convince them? This, cease call slavery wrong, join 
calling right. must done 
acts well words. Silence must place 
avowedly them. Douglas's new law must enacted 
enforced, suppressing declarations slavery wrong, whether 
made politics, private. must arrest 
return fugitive slaves greedy pleasure. must pull 
free State constitutions. whole atmosphere must 
opposition slavery, cease believe 
troubles proceed us. long call slavery wrong, 
whenever slave runs away overlook obvious fact ran 
away declare off. Whenever 
master slaves cry it, 
overlook obvious fact negroes cry 
insist put 
 
quite aware state case precisely way. 
would probably say us, "Let us alone, nothing us, 
say please slavery." let 
never disturbed that, all, say 
them. continue accuse us doing, 
cease saying. 
 
also aware yet terms demanded overthrow 
free-State constitutions. Yet constitutions declare wrong 
slavery solemn sayings it; 
sayings shall overthrow 
constitutions demanded. nothing contrary 
demand whole now. Demanding 
do, reason do, voluntarily stop nowhere short 
consummation. Holding slavery morally right, 
socially cannot cease demand full national 
recognition it, legal right, social 
 
justifiably withhold ground save conviction 
slavery wrong. slavery right, words, acts, laws, 
constitutions wrong silenced 
swept away. right, cannot justly object 
wrong, cannot justly insist 
upon ask, could readily grant, 
thought slavery right; ask, could readily grant, 
thought wrong. thinking right thinking wrong 
precise fact depends whole controversy. Thinking 
right do, blame desiring full 
right; but, thinking wrong, do, yield them? 
cast votes view, view 
moral, social, political this? 
 
Wrong think slavery is, yet afford let alone 
much due necessity arising actual 
presence nation; we, votes prevent it, allow 
spread national Territories, overrun us 
free States? 
 
sense duty forbids this, let us stand duty, 
Let us diverted none 
industriously 
middle ground 
right wrong, vain search man would neither 
living man dead policy "don't question 
free men Union appeals true 
Union men yield Disunionists, reversing divine rule, 
righteous 
Washington, imploring men Washington did. 
 
Neither let us duty false us, 
frightened menaces destruction Government, 
ourselves. Let us faith right makes 
faith, let us, end, dare duty understand it. 
 
Mr. Lincoln concluded address, witnessed 
scene enthusiasm excitement New years. 
says: "We give space to-day 
full report eloquent speech HON. Abraham Lincoln, 
Illinois, delivered last night Union 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE REQUEST MONEY 
 
March 16, 1860 
 
kind wishes myself, allow say cannot enter ring 
money main wrong; secondly, 
cannot get money. 
 
say, use money wrong; certain objects 
political contest, use right indispensable. 
me, yourself, long struggle one great pecuniary 
loss. 
 
distinctly say shall appointed delegate 
Chicago, furnish one hundred dollars bear expenses 

 
friend ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
letter Kansas 
 
 
 
 
J. W. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, March 17, 1860 
 
JAMES W. Esq. 
 
DEAR home three days ago, found letter February 
Considering difficulty hearing, think better 
settle Chicago, if, say, good man already fair practice 
take difficulty, 
still think even balance whether would better remain 
Chicago, chance 
 
went west, think would go Kansas, 
continue fine growing 
 
believe said can, said deepest 
interest 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PAID POLITICAL SPEECH 
 
C. F. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, April 6, 1860 
 
C. F. Esq. 
 
DEAR home yesterday, found 23d March, 
inclosing slip true ever 
charged anything political speech life; much 
Last October requested letter deliver sort speech 
Mr. church, hundred dollars offered 
first letter. wrote could February, provided 
would take political speech could find time get other. 
subsequently informed speech would 
political one. reached New York, first time learned 
place changed made speech, 
left New Hampshire, son neither asking 
pay offered me. Three days check two hundred 
dollars sent New took it, know 
wrong. understanding knew nothing 
charge Cooper 
took twice two hundred dollars. 
 
made explanation friend; wish explanation 
made enemies. want squabble 
cannot 
 
returned New York New England, told 
gentlemen sent Check 
learned something two hundred dollars, made 
exhibition manufactured article quoted 
Press town. 
 
judgment is, therefore request is, give denial 

 
kind interest matter, remain, truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
H. TAYLOR. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., April 21, 1860. 
 
TAYLOR, Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 15th received. 
written twice, without receiving answer. answered 
ever received you; certainly one since return 
 
Opinions here, prospect Douglas quite 
confident will, others be. 
think nomination possible, chances him. 
 
glad prospect party passing way Chicago. 
Wishing make visit pleasant can, wish 
notify us soon possible whether come way, many, 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM MEMBER ILLINOIS DELEGATION 
 
CHICAGO CONVENTION. SPRINGFIELD, May 1860. 
 
authorize bound none. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE SENT CHICAGO CONVENTION INFORM 
 
LINCOLN NOMINATION, 
 
MAY 19, 1860. 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN GENTLEMEN tender you, 
Republican National Convention, people represented 
it, profoundest thanks high honor done me, 
formally Deeply even painfully sensible great 
responsibility high responsibility 
could almost wish fallen upon one far eminent 
men experienced statesmen whose distinguished names 
shall, leave, consider fully resolutions 
convention, platform, without unnecessary 
unreasonable delay respond you, Mr. Chairman, 
doubting platform found satisfactory, nomination 
gratefully accepted. 
 
longer pleasure taking you, 
you, hand. 
 
 
 
 
ACCEPTANCE NOMINATION REPUBLICAN CANDIDATE PRESIDENT 
 
UNITED STATES 
 
GEORGE OTHERS. 
 
SPRINGFIELD ILLINOIS, May 23, 1860 
 
HON. GEORGE President Republican National Convention. 
 
SIR:--I accept nomination tendered convention 
formally letter 
others, acting committee convention purpose. 
 
declaration principles sentiments letter 
meets shall care violate disregard 
part. 
 
Imploring assistance Divine Providence, due regard 
views feelings represented convention, 
rights States Territories people nation, 
Constitution, perpetual union, harmony, 
prosperity happy co-operate practical success 
principles declared convention. 
 
obliged friend 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
C. B. SMITH. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., May 26, 1860. 
 
HON. C. B. SMITH. 
 
DEAR 21st duly received, found time 
say word way answer. indeed much indebted 
and, home friends tell me, much personally. 
saying, longer consider doubtful State 
thing well well, almost fear, last. 
in, stick go must word. 
 
Let hear Indiana 
 
friend, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FORM REPLY PREPARED MR. LINCOLN, 
 
PRIVATE SECRETARY INSTRUCTED ANSWER NUMEROUS CLASS 
LETTERS CAMPAIGN 1860. 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, 1860 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your letter Mr. Lincoln seek obtain 
opinions certain political points, received him. 
received others similar character, also greater number 
exactly opposite character. latter class beseech write 
nothing whatever upon point political doctrine. say 
positions well known must 
embarrass canvass shift modify them. 
cannot oblige all, perceive impossible 
so. 
 
Yours, etc., 
 
JNO. J. 
 
 
 
 
E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, MAY 26, 1860 
 
HON. E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I several letters written since 
nomination, till found moment say word way 
answer. course glad nomination well received 
friends, sincerely thank me. far 
learn, nominations start well and, get 
would seem going through. hope 
write write rapidly do, don't make 
letters short mine. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
S. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., June 4, 1860. 
 
HON. SAMUEL 
 
DEAR belonged old Whig party 
origin close. never belonged American party organization, 
ever party called Union though hope neither 
ever less devoted Union 
patriotic man. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ABRAHAM 
 
G. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL. June 4, 1860 
 
HON. GEORGE 
 
DEAR SIR:--It seems question whether first name 
never settled. 
letter acceptance yet print, may, think fit, 
signature thereto printed Exercise judgment 
this. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
S. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., June 19, 1860 
 
HON. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your kind letter 15th received. Messrs. 
Foster, & Life authority; 
scarcely much anything, public 
announcement authorized me. fallen 
strange certainly knew contemplated 
certainly object so, upon 
responsibility. even took pains facilitate them. But, 
time, made Mr. Howard, 
agent seen me, protest authorized 
responsible nothing. could misunderstand me, passes 
matter wholly own, would authorize 
without time opportunity carefully examine consider every 
word and, case, nature things, 
time Opportunity But, present position, when, 
past, united voice discreet friends, 
neither write speak word public, dare send forth, 
authority, volume hundreds pages, adversaries make 
points upon without end? so, convention would 
right substitute another name mine. 
 
reasons, would look proof determined 
maintain position truly saying never saw proof 
part work, 
 
Now, mistake feel great kindness Messrs. & 
think done wrong. may nothing 
wrong proposed sincerely hope not. barely 
suggest you, friends there, party account, look 
over, exclude may think would embarrass party bearing 
mind, times, authorize responsible 
nothing. 
 
friend, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
[The custom then, may good one, 
Presidential candidate personal 
stayed home kept mouth 

 
 
 
 
HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, July 18, 1860. 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. DEAR SIR:--It appears ought 
accordingly write sort introduction 
you. first entered Senate single term 
member House Representatives, recollection 
shall pleased receive line you. 
 
prospect Republican success appears far 
see anything 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, JULY 21, 1860. 
 
HON. A. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 20th received. suppose good even 
better men may American 
point fact, never one Quincy elsewhere. never 
Quincy one day two 
existence, day 
never life, never afterward, till joint 
debate Douglas 1858. 1854 spoke 
hall there, speaking, you, others, took 
passed hour there, walked to, parted 
at, Quincy House, quite late night. left stage 
daylight morning, come route 
dark evening, previous speaking, found waiting 
Quincy House meet me. days there, 
understood, started story 
heard charge, soon 
taxed recollection incident could suggested it; 
remembered parting last night went office 
hotel take morning, told 
line kept there, must see driver 
insure calling 
servant sent find who, taking square 
two, stopped me, stepped perhaps dozen steps 
hearing called one, answered him, apparently upper 
part building, promised call stage 
Quincy House. went bed, day stage called 
took me. all. 
 
never lodge expect could 
easily proved respectable men always 
never saw there. affidavit one two would put matter 
rest. 
 
word adversaries think gain point 
could force openly deny charge, degree 
offence would given Americans. reason must 
publicly appear paying attention charge. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOHN B. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, August 15, 1860. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours inclosing letter HON. John Minor 
duly received. latter herewith returned according 
contains one many receive 
South, probable event formidable effort 
break Union. people South much good sense 
good temper attempt ruin government rather see 
administered administered men made it. least 
hope believe. thank letter sight 
Mr. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
THURLOW 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL. August 1860. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 13th received morning. Douglas 
Bell element great men 
Kentucky vote Bell candidate, producing result 
badly alarmed time induced 
Bell men suppose Bell certainly President, 
keep Northern States away us throwing 
Douglas. you, better I, understand this. 
 
think extraordinary effort ever made carry New 
York Douglas. others write State think 
effort cannot succeed, hope right. Still, 
require close watching great efforts side. 
 
Herewith send copy letter written New York, 
sufficiently explains itself, may may give valuable 
seen Bell put track 
Indiana. cases object been, think, 
Hunt movement New throw States Douglas. State, 
know thing Douglas men, believe 
make great deal it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SLOW LISTEN 
 
HON. JOHN 
 
(Private.) 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., Aug. 31, 1860 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 27th duly received. consists almost 
exclusively historical detail local among 
friends suppose object guard 
forming prejudice Mr. heard 
near much upon subject probably slow 
listen among friends, never quarrels 
either side. sincere wish sides allow 
look present future only. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HANNIBAL 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, September 4, 1860 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I letter friend Chicago, 
following passage written two 
members Congress will, fears, lost Maine, first sixth 
majority governor exceed six 

 
heard something like six weeks ago, assured since 
so. secretary Smith, 
introduced letter, gave recently, Mr. 
candidate Congress one districts, wrote 
relative election sure least five thousand, 
majority would still 
later, Mr. New Hampshire, New York serving national 
committee, wrote desperate fight Maine, 
would end splendid victory us. 
 
result seem predicted Maine, letter 
would, fear, put us track, lose us State 
elections Pennsylvania Indiana, probably ruin us main 
turn 
 
must allow it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, September 9, 1860 
 
HON. E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
DEAR SIR: 5th received last evening. right 
glad see it. contains have. 
relieved little anxiety Maine. 
August wrote letter Mr. saying 
great danger losing two members Congress Maine, 
brother would exceeding six thousand majority 
addressed once, asking latest information. 
Washington, letter receive time 
Maine election. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. H. HERNDON. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., OCTOBER 10, 1860 
 
DEAR cannot give entirely certain 
Pennsylvania Indiana gone Republican Pennsylvania 
Indiana Ohio course safe. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
L. M. 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., October 15, 1860 
 
L. Esq. 
 
DEAR SIR: certainly temper purpose 
feelings South, whether inclined course 
would fact feelings better judge published 
speeches anything would say short letter inclined 
now, not, define position anew. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER SUGGESTING BEARD 
 
MISS GRACE 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., October 19, 1860 
 
MISS GRACE 
 
DEAR LITTLE agreeable letter 15th received. 
regret necessity saying three 
one one mother 
constitute whole family. never worn any, 
think people would call piece silly affectation 
begin wearing now? 
 
true friend sincere 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EARLY INFORMATION ARMY SOUTH 
 
D. HUNTER. 
 
(Private Confidential.) SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, October 26, 1860 
 
MAJOR DAVID HUNTER 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your kind letter 20th duly received, 
please accept thanks. another letter, writer 
unknown me, saying officers army Fort 
determined case Republican success approaching Presidential 
election, take themselves, arms point, south, 
purpose resistance government. think many 
chances one occurs real 
movement sort Army would become known you. 
case, would 
shall much obliged 
it. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HANNIBAL 
 
SPRINGFIELD. ILLINOIS, November 8, 1860 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I anxious personal interview early 
day possible. you, without much meet 
can, please name early day can, 
telegraph me, unless sufficient time day named 
communicate mail. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SAMUEL 
 
(Private Confidential.) 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., 1860 
 
HON. SAMUEL 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 9th received. answer 
Rest fully assured good people South put 
temper mood towards find 
cause complain me. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
LINCOLN'S ELECTION, 
 
REMARKS MEETING SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS 
 
 
NOVEMBER 20, 1860 
 
FRIENDS excuse occasion 
making speech. thank common thought fit 
votes indorse Republican cause. rejoice 
success thus far attended cause. Yet 
let us neither express cherish hard feelings toward citizen 
vote differed us. Let us times remember 
American citizens brothers common country, dwell 
together bonds fraternal feeling. Let beg accept 
excuse speaking time. 
 
 
 
 
ALEXANDER H. STEPHENS 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL. NOV. 30, 1860 
 
HON. A. H. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I read newspapers speech recently delivered 
(I Georgia Legislature, assembled 
revised it, probable, shall much obliged send 
copy. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HANNIBAL 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, December 8, 1860 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 4th duly received. inclosed Governor 
Seward covers two notes him, copies find open 
inspection. Consult Judge see reason 
contrary, deliver letter Governor Seward once. see 
reason contrary write once. 
 
intimation Governor Banks would yet accept place 
Please ascertain write is, 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SLAVERY ISSUE 
 
E. B. 
 
(Private Confidential.) 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., December 13, 1860 
 
HON. E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your long letter received. far possible, 
friends cause entertaining 
propositions compromise sort 
possible compromise upon puts us again, leaves 
work again. Whether Missouri line 
popular sovereignty, same. Let either done, 
immediately extending slavery point 
hold firm, 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
OPINION SECESSION 
 
THURLOW 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, DECEMBER 17, 1860 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 11th received two days ago. 
governors speak seem desirous know views 
present aspect things, tell judge speeches 
inflexible territorial question; probably think 
either Missouri line extended, Douglas's popular 
sovereignty would lose us everything gain election; 
south us making slave States would 
follow spite us, either case; also probably think 
opposition, real apparent, fugitive slave clause 
Constitution ought 
 
believe pretend find little, anything, speeches, 
opinion State way lawfully 
get Union without consent others; 
duty President government run 
is. 
 
Truly yours, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FORTS SURRENDERED SOUTH 
 
E. B. 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, December 21, 1860 
 
HON. E. B. WASHBURNE. 
 
DEAR night received letter giving account 
interview General Scott, thank you. Please present 
respects General, tell him, shall obliged 
well prepared either hold retake 
forts, case may 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
A. H. 
 
(For eye SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, DECEMBER 22, 1860 
 
HON. ALEXANDER 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your answer short note received, 
please accept thanks. fully appreciate present peril 
country in, weight responsibility me. people 
South really entertain fear Republican administration would, 
directly indirectly, interfere slaves, 
do, wish assure you, friend, still, 
hope, enemy, cause South 
would danger respect days 
Washington. suppose, however, meet case. think 
slavery right ought extended, think wrong 
ought That, suppose, certainly 
substantial difference us. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SUPPORT FUGITIVE SLAVE CLAUSE 
 
MEMORANDUM 
 
December 1860 
 
fugitive slave clause Constitution ought 
enforced law Congress, efficient provisions object, 
private persons assist execution, 
resist it, usual safeguards liberty, securing free men 
surrendered slaves. 
 
State laws, such, really apparently conflict 
law Congress, ought opposition 
execution law Congress ought made. 
 
Federal Union must 
 
Prepared consideration Republican members Senate 
Committee 
 
 
 
 
D. HUNTER. 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS December 22, 1860 
 
MAJOR DAVID HUNTER. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I much obliged receipt 
watch events, well prepared possible 
turn things may take. forts fall, judgment 
shall determine definitely time starting 
Washington, notify you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
I. N. MORRIS 
 

 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., 24, 1860 
 
HON. I. N. MORRIS. 
 
DEAR supposing nearer together, 
politically, heretofore, allow tender sincere thanks 
Union resolution, expressive views upon never were, and, 
trust, never 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ATTEMPT FORM CABINET 
 
HANNIBAL 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, December 14, 1860. 
 
HON. HANNIBAL HAMLIN. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I need man Democratic New England. 
cannot get fair share element stands way 
Mr. Adams. think Governor Banks, Mr. Mr. 
New England delegation shall decide 

 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1861 
 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
(Private.) 
 
SPRINGFIELD. ILL., January 3, 1861. 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours without signature received last night. 
considering suggestions reaching Washington somewhat earlier 
seems inauguration dangerous 
point us. adversaries us clearly disadvantage 
second Wednesday February, votes officially 
two houses refuse meet all, meet without each, 
shall be? think counting constitutionally 
essential election, proceed absence 
it? view this, think best attempt appearing 
Washington till result known. 
 
certainly would advantage could know 
heads War Navy departments, ascertain 
definitely whether get suitable men South, who, 
many, well decide. yet, word Mr. 
answer request interview him. look something 
subject, you, long. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
W. H. SEWARD. 
 
(Private.) 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., January 12, 1861 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 8th received. still hope Mr. will, 
fair understanding us, consent take place 
preference Mr. Hunt Mr. that, 
living position South, not. better 
Winter Davis farther south. fear, could 
could safely take one is, one 
opposed us danger lose confidence 
friends. selection State Department become 
public, happy find scarcely objection it. shall 
trouble every Northern Cabinet much 
shall long possible avoid 
make 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
E. D. MORGAN 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL. FEB. 4, 1861 
 
SIR:--Your letter 30th inviting me, behalf 
Legislature New York, pass State way 
Washington, tendering authorities 
people, duly received. feelings deep gratitude 
regard esteem beg notify 
accept invitation kindly 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
let take least time 
possible. A. L. 
 
 
 
 
PATRONAGE CLAIMS 
 
THURLOW 
 
SPRINGFIELD, ILL., February 4, 1861 
 
DEAR SIR:--I letter Judge Davis, 
relation certain gentleman State claiming dispense 
patronage name, also authorized use name advance 
chances Mr. Greeley election United States Senate. 
 
strange things said one. 
gentleman mention speak Mr. Greeley connection 
senatorial election, replied terms kindness toward Mr. 
Greeley, really feel, always expressed protest 
name must used senatorial election favor 
one. representation 
 
matter perhaps surprise 
learn information claim authority 
arrange matter New York. believe 
still men say. subject know said 
all," said nothing particular one. 
say changed position. 
 
hope, however, use name matter, am, 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FAREWELL ADDRESS SPRINGFIELD, ILLINOIS, 
 
FEBRUARY 11, 1861 
 
never placed like position cannot 
understand feelings hour, feel 
twenty-five years lived among you, 
time received nothing kindness hands. 
cherished earth children 
born, one lies you, friends, owe 
have, am. strange past seems crowd upon 
mind. To-day leave you. go assume task difficult 
devolved upon General Washington. Unless great God 
assisted shall aid cannot 
almighty arm directed protected shall guide support 
shall fail; shall succeed. Let us pray God fathers 
may us now. commend all. Permit ask 
equal sincerity faith invoke wisdom goodness 
me. 
 
words must leave you; long know not. Friends, one 
all, must wish affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS ILLINOIS, FEBRUARY 11, 1861 
 
leaving national importance, 
considerable difficulties. Let us believe, 
expressed it, cloud sun still bid 
affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY ADDRESS INDIANAPOLIS, 
 
INDIANA, FEBRUARY 11, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR FELLOW CITIZENS STATE 
 
heartily thank magnificent reception, 
cannot take share compliment thus paid, 
pertains mere instrument, accidental instrument, 
perhaps say, great cause, yet must look upon 
magnificent reception, heartily thank it. 
pleased address chiefly behalf 
glorious Union live, hearty 
sympathy, and, far may within power, have, one 
hearty consideration. upon 
occasion, get Washington, attempt speech, 
say salvation Union needs one single 
hearts people like yours. 
 
rise mass behalf Union 
liberties country, truly may said, "The gates hell 
cannot prevail them." trying positions shall 
doubtless, shall placed many reliance 
placed upon people United States; wish 
remember, forever, business, 
union States liberties people shall lost, 
little one man years age, great 
deal thirty millions people inhabit United States, 
posterity coming time. business rise 
preserve Union liberty yourselves, me. 
 
desire constitutionally performed. I, already 
accidental instrument, serve 
limited time; appeal constantly bear mind 
you, 
question, Shall Union shall 
liberties country preserved latest 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS LEGISLATURE INDIANA, INDIANAPOLIS, 
 
FEBRUARY 12, 1861 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS STATE thank much 
magnificent still generous support given 
State political cause think true 
cause whole country whole world. 
 
Solomon says "a time keep men 
mouth certainty mean thing using 
word, perhaps well would keep silence. 
 
words much used days, often 
temper hot blood. Let us make sure, can, meaning 
use them. Let us get exact definitions words, 
men themselves, certainly 
things would represent use words. 
 
What, then, Would marching army 
South Carolina, without consent people, hostile 
intent toward them, certainly think would, would 
coercion also, South forced 
United States merely hold retake forts 
property, collect duties foreign even withhold 
places habitually would 
things invasion professed lovers 
Union, resolve resist coercion 
invasion, understand things these, part United 
States, would coercion invasion State? so, idea 
means preserve object great affection would seem 
exceedingly thin little 
would much large view, Union, 
family would seem regular marriage, rather sort 
arrangement, maintained 
 
way, consists special sacredness State? speak 
position assigned State Union Constitution, 
bond position, however, State 
cannot carry Union it. speak assumed primary 
right State rule less itself, ruin 
larger itself. State county, given case, 
equal number inhabitants, what, matter 
principle, State better Would exchange 
name exchange Upon principle, upon rightful 
principle, may State, one fiftieth part 
nation soil population, break nation, 
large arbitrary way? 
mysterious right play tyrant conferred district country, 
people, merely calling State? Fellow-citizens, 
asserting anything. merely asking questions consider. 
allow bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
TOWARD SOUTH 
 
ADDRESS MAYOR CITIZENS 
 
CINCINNATI, OHIO, FEBRUARY 12, 1861 
 
Mr. MAYOR, hours ago, capital 
Indiana, said myself, "I never seen many people assembled 
together winter longer able say that. 
might reasonably great city 
Cincinnati would thus occasion. friends, 
entirely overwhelmed reception 
given, say me, United 
States America. heartily thank you, one all, it. 
 
spoken year previous 
late Presidential election. occasion, 
manner, sincere words, addressed much said 
gave opinion we, Republicans, would ultimately 
beat Democrats, could postpone result longer 
nominating Senator Douglas Presidency could 
way. not, true sense word, nominate Mr. Douglas, 
result come certainly soon ever expected. also told 
expected would treated 
beaten, wish call attention said upon 
subject. said: 
 
"When say, beat you, perhaps want know 
you. tell you, far authorized speak 
Opposition, mean you. mean treat you, near 
possibly can, Washington, Jefferson, Madison treated you. 
mean leave alone, way interfere 
abide every compromise Constitution, 
and, word, coming back original proposition, treat 
far men, may, according 
example noble fathers, Washington, Jefferson, Madison. 
 
"We mean remember good 
difference us difference circumstances. mean 
recognize bear mind always good hearts 
bosoms people, claim have, treat 

 
Fellow-citizens may call 
new see occasion feel inclination retract word 
this. shall made good, assured fault shall 
mine. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS GERMAN CINCINNATI, OHIO, 
 
FEBRUARY 12, 1861 
 
Mr. thank represent compliment 
paid tendering address. far 
allusion present national difficulties, 
said, views gentlemen present, shall beg pardon 
entering fully upon questions address 
read 
 
deem duty owe you, 
gentlemen, wait last moment development 
present national difficulties express decidedly 
course shall hope, then, false anything 
expected me. 
 
agree you, Mr. Chairman, working men basis 
governments, plain reason 
added sentiments gentlemen present, 
representing working class, citizens 
happy concur 
sentiments, citizens, also Germans 
foreigners countries. 
 
Mr. Chairman, hold man exists duty improve 
condition, assist condition 
therefore, without entering upon details question, 
simply say means give greatest 
good greatest number. 
 
regard Homestead law, say that, far 
government lands disposed of, favor cutting wild 
lands every poor man may home. 
 
regard Germans esteem better 
people, worse. nature, see people 
borne weight oppression 
make life bitter upon greater 
rather would power raise add anything 
would tend crush them. 
 
Inasmuch country extensive new, countries 
Europe populated, abroad desire make 
land heart throw aught 
way prevent coming United States. 
 
Mr. Chairman gentlemen, bid affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS LEGISLATURE OHIO COLUMBUS 
 
FEBRUARY 13, 1861 
 
Mr. PRESIDENT Mr. SPEAKER, GENTLEMEN GENERAL ASSEMBLY 
true, said president Senate, 
great responsibility rests upon position 
votes American people called me. deeply sensible 
weighty responsibility. cannot know know, without 
name, perhaps without reason name, 
fallen upon task rest even upon Father 
Country; feeling, turn look support without 
impossible perform great task. turn, 
then, look American people God never 
forsaken them. Allusion made interest felt relation 
policy new administration. received 
degree credit kept silence, others 
still think right. 
 
varying repeatedly shifting scenes present, without 
precedent could enable judge past, seemed 
fitting speaking upon difficulties country 
gained view whole field, liberty modify 
change course policy future events may make change necessary. 
 
maintained silence want real anxiety. 
good thing anxiety, nothing going 
wrong. circumstance look 
nothing really hurts anybody. entertain different views upon 
political questions, nobody suffering anything. 
circumstance, may conclude want 
time, patience, reliance God never forsaken 
people. 
 
Fellow-citizens, said said altogether 
come close. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS OHIO, 
 
FEBRUARY 14, 1861 
 
fear great confidence placed ability 
Indeed, sure is. vast difficulties am, nothing 
shall wanting part, sustained God American people. 
believe devotion Constitution equally great sides 
river. different understanding instrument 
causes difficulty. dispute sides is, "What 
majority rule, would 
judge bound majority 
American people; not, minority must control. Would 
right? Would not. reiterate 
majority adopt wrong policy, opportunity 
condemnation occur four years' time. turned out, 
better man better views put place. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS PENNSYLVANIA 
 
FEBRUARY 15, 1861 
 
cordially thank Honor Mayor Wilson, citizens 
generally, reception. 
grateful know given alone, cause 
represent, clearly proves sincere 
feeling bottom it. may remark every short 
address made people, every crowd 
passed late, allusion made present distracted 
condition country. natural expect say 
something subject; touch upon would involve 
elaborate discussion great many questions circumstances, 
requiring time present command, would, perhaps, 
unnecessarily commit upon matters yet fully developed 
themselves. condition country extraordinary one, 
mind every patriot anxiety. intention 
give subject consideration possibly specially 
deciding regard it, speak may nearly 
right possible. speak hope may say nothing opposition 
spirit Constitution, contrary integrity Union, 
prove inimical liberties people, 
peace whole country. furthermore, time 
speak great subject, hope may say nothing disappoint 
people generally throughout country, especially expectation 
based upon anything may heretofore said. Notwithstanding 
troubles across river [the speaker pointing across 
crisis artificial one. 
warrant condition affairs presented friends 
Take even view questions 
nothing justify course repeat, then, 
excepting one may gotten time 
men aided advice them, 
circumstances, keep cool. great American people 
keep temper sides line, troubles come 
end, question country settled, 
surely difficulties like character 
originated government Let people 
sides keep cleared 
away due time, great nation continue 
heretofore. But, fellow-citizens, spoken longer subject 
intended 
 
often said tariff Pennsylvania. 
Assuming direct taxation adopted, tariff question 
must durable government itself. question national 
government 
family. Every varying circumstances require frequent 
modifications amount needed sources 
far little difference opinion among people. 
whether, far, duties shall adjusted favor home 
production home controversy One party insists 
adjustment one class advantage another; 
party argues that, long run 
classes Chicago platform plank upon 
subject general law incoming administration. 
neither less gave people reason 
believe would gave us votes. Permit me, 
fellow-citizens, read tariff plank Chicago platform, 
rather read hearing one younger eyes. 
 
[Mr. Lincoln's private secretary read Section 12 Chicago 
platform, 
 
providing revenue support General Government 
duties upon imports, sound policy requires adjustment 
encourage development industrial interest 
whole country; commend policy national 
secures working-men liberal agriculture prices, 
mechanics adequate return labor, 
enterprise, nation commercial prosperity 
 
general propositions, doubtless, 
difference this. means thoroughly matured 
judgment upon subject, especially general ideas 
all. long thought would advantage produce 
necessary article home made good quality 
little labor home abroad, least difference 
carrying abroad. case carrying dead 
loss labor. instance, labor true standard value, 
plain equal labor get bar railroad iron mine 
England another mine Pennsylvania, laid 
track home cheaper could exchange countries, least 
present cause one made 
carried cheaper money price made without 
cause unnatural injurious one, ought 
rapidly, removed. condition treasury 
time would seem render early revision tariff 
indispensable. bill, pending Congress, may 
may become law. particular provisions, 
generally satisfactory, bill shall 
end present. If, however, shall suppose 
whole subject one pressing important 
next Congress. Constitution, executive may recommend measures 
may think proper, may veto thinks 
supposed may add certain indirect influences 
affect action Congress. political education strongly 
free use means executive control 
legislation country. rule, think better Congress 
originate well perfect measures without external 
therefore would rather recommend every gentleman knows 
member next Congress take enlarged view, post 
contribute part adjustment 
tariff shall produce sufficient revenue, 
far possible, equal sections country 
classes people. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS OHIO, 
 
FEBRUARY 15, 1861 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN FELLOW-CITIZENS marching 
two miles deep large numbers 
turned circumstances testify earnest 
something other. think meanly suppose 
earnestness would 
injustice suppose did. assembled testify respect 
Union, Constitution, laws; let say 
you, people, advance great cause Union 
Constitution, one man. rests alone. fact 
strongly impressed upon mind present. community like this, 
whose appearance intelligence, convinced 
cause liberty Union never danger. Frequent allusion 
made excitement present existing national politics, 
well also allude here. think 
occasion excitement. 'The called, 
altogether artificial crisis. parts nation 
differences opinion politics. differences opinion even 
here. vote person addresses you. 
happening hurt farther away here. 
rights ever 
fugitive slaves returned 
Constitution lived 
position citizens common country, power 
change What, then, matter them? 

 
said before, crisis foundation 
facts. argued up, saying is, cannot, therefore, 
argued down. Let alone go itself. 
 
[Mr. Lincoln said must content words 
him, etc. given understand 
crowd Republican, consisted men parties, 

 
be. Judge Douglas elected 
way Washington, Republicans 
joined supporters him, friends 
joined mine join save good old 
ship Union nobody chance pilot 
another 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 16, 1861 
 
Mr. MAYOR FELLOW-CITIZENS STATE NEW 
thank briefly grand reception given me, 
personally, representative great beloved country. 
worthy mayor pleased address me, 
fortunate agreeable journey home, rather 
route Federal capital. happy 
enabled truth congratulate company fact. 
true nothing thus far pleasure 
met alone assisted giving election 
say alone them, whole population country 
passed. be. election fallen 
distinguished candidates instead myself, 
peculiar circumstances, say least, would proper 
citizens greeted me. evidence 
devotion whole people Constitution, Union, 
perpetuity liberties country. unwilling 
occasion meanly thought supposed 
moment demonstrations tendered personally. 
tendered country, institutions country, 
perpetuity liberties country, institutions 
made 
 
worthy mayor thought fit express hope may able 
relieve country present, or, say, threatened 
difficulties. sure bring heart true work. ability 
perform it, must trust Supreme never forsaken 
favored land, great 
intelligent people. Without assistance shall surely fail; it, 
cannot fail. speak threatened difficulties Country, 
natural expected something said 
regard particular measures. Upon mature reflection, 
however, others agree that, considered 
difficulties without precedent, never acted upon 
individual situated am, proper wait see 
get light possible, speak 
may near right possible. shall speak 
hope say nothing inconsistent Constitution, 
Union, rights States, State, 
section country, disappoint reasonable expectations 
confided votes. connection allow 
say you, portion great American people, need 
maintain stand sober right, 
obligations Constitution, act accordance 
sober 
shall bright glorious generation 
passed away, thousands inhabit country 
thousands inhabit now. propose address length; 
voice it. Allow thank magnificent 
reception, bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1861 
 
confess myself, seen many large audiences since leaving 
home, overwhelmed vast number faces hour 
morning. vain enough believe 
wish see individual, time 
representative American people. could not, would, address 
length. strength, even time, 
speech many afforded way 
Washington. appear merely see you, let see me, 
bid farewell. hope understood 
oblige anybody address greater 
length. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1861. 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN:--I See erected fine handsome 
platform me, presume expected speak it. 
go upon it, would imagine deliver 
much longer speech am. wish understand mean 
thus intend one. 
wish understand that, though unwilling go upon 
platform, liberty draw inferences concerning 
platform name wish long life 
prosperity pray perpetuity 
institutions long lived 
happiness may future made glorious 
destiny country established forever. bid kind farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1860 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN:--I speech make you; time 
speak in. appear may see you, may see me; 
willing admit far ladies concerned 
best bargain, though wish understood 
make acknowledgment concerning men. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MAYOR ALBANY, NEW YORK 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1861. 
 
MR. hardly appropriate terms 
communicate tender reception, personal myself. 
gratefully accept tendered me, 
detain audience extended remarks time. 
presume two three shall go, 
shall repeat therefore express 
thanks kind reception. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY GOVERNOR MORGAN NEW YORK, ALBANY, 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1861. 
 
GOVERNOR pleased receive invitation visit 
capital great Empire State nation way 
Federal capital. thank you, Mr. Governor, you, people 
capital State New York, hearty magnificent 
great Empire State time 
contains larger population whole United States 
America time achieved national independence, 
invited visit capital, meet citizens, 
honor do. notified governor reception 
tendered citizens without distinction party. 
accept country, country 
freedom thought citizens attach political 
parties. ordinary degree charity act 
supposition that, thus various parties, 
man judgment supposes thereby best advances 
interests whole country. election past 
altogether free people, suppose, that, next 
election, one people. reception extended 
to-day given 
representative, time being, majority nation. 
election fallen distinguished citizens received 
support people, honor greeted 
day, testimony unanimous devotion 
whole people Constitution, Union, perpetual 
liberties succeeding generations country. 
 
neither voice strength address greater 
length. beg therefore accept grateful thanks 
manifest me, institutions great 
glorious country. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS LEGISLATURE NEW YORK, ALBANY, 
 
FEBRUARY 18, 1861. 
 
MR. PRESIDENT GENTLEMEN GENERAL ASSEMBLY STATE NEW 
feelings great and, may say, 
feelings perhaps greater recently 
meet place. history great State, 
great men stood here, spoken here, 
heard here, crowd around shrink 
attempt address you. Yet confidence given 
generous manner invited me, still 
generous manner received me, speak further. 
invited received without distinction party. cannot 
moment suppose done considerable degree 
reference personal services, done far 
time, representative majesty great 
nation. doubt truth, whole truth case, 
be. much gratifying 
reception given elected representative free 
people, could possibly tendered merely evidence 
devotion me, one man personally. 
 
think fitting close hasty 
true that, hold myself, without modesty, 
individuals ever elevated 
Presidency, difficult task perform one them. 
 
generously tendered united 
great Empire State. this, behalf behalf 
present future behalf civil religious liberty 
time come, gratefully thank you. propose 
enter explanation particular line policy, 
present difficulties, adopted incoming administration. deem 
you, myself, all, see everything, 
hear everything, every light brought 
within order that, speak, shall enjoyed 
every opportunity take correct true reason 
propose speak time policy Government. 
time comes, shall speak, well able, good 
present future country good North 
good one other, sections 
country. meantime, patience, restrain 
ourselves, allow run passion, still 
confidence Almighty, universe, will, 
great intelligent people, bring us 
difficulties country. 
this, thank generous reception. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
MR. MAYOR CITIZENS thank kindly great 
reception. Since left home fortune meet 
assemblage numerous this. 
gratified mark regard since assure 
individual high office called 
neither strength time make extended remarks 
occasion, repeat sincere thanks kind 
reception thought proper extend me. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
altogether impossible make heard 
considerable portion vast but, although 
appear mainly purpose seeing you, let 
see rather hear me, cannot refrain saying highly 
much here, indeed, circumstances, 
anywhere witness noble 
honor individual, man time 
earnestly, represents majesty nation. 
 
reception, like others tendered me, 
doubtless political parties, one alone. 
accept since earnest 
desire part whole people, regard political 
country, country save 
save institutions country, institutions 
which, last three quarters century, grown 
great, intelligent, happy 
intelligent, people world. noble 
manifestations whole people 
willing make common cause if, ever must 
be, successful recent election 
beaten, satisfied defeated 
party favor ship, desirous running 
safety, willing, think people 
committed error now, wait hope reversing 
setting right next time. say recent 
election people wisest thing, could 
think say accepting 
great trust committed me, determination endeavor 
prove worthy it, must rely upon you, upon people whole 
country, sustaining aid, even I, humble 
am, cannot fail carry ship state safely 
 
thank kind bid 
affectionate farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK. 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1860 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I see providing platform me. shall 
decline standing upon it, president company 
tells shall time wait brought me. 
said yesterday, similar circumstances another 
must draw inference intention 
platform connection stand 
yours. Allow thank splendid reception, bid 
farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK, 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN:--I moment stand listen 
return kind thank reception, 
pleasant manner tendered mutual friends. 
say single sentence, regard difficulties lie 
beloved country, generously 
unanimously sustained demonstrations witnessed indicate 
shall be, shall fail; without sustaining hands sure 
neither man hope difficulties. 
trust course shall pursue shall sustained 
party elected me, patriotic people whole 
country. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS LANDING 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN:--I appear make speech. 
sufficient time, strength, repeat speeches every 
station people kindly gather welcome go along. 
strength, take time, get Washington 
must aware would fit 
exactly. event might know 
readily forego close bidding farewell. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS HOUSE, NEW YORK CITY, FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS:--I stepped merely compliance 
appears wish, purpose making speech. 
propose making speech afternoon. could heard 
small you, but, still worse that, 
nothing say worthy hearing. beg 
believe refuse address disposition 
you, contrary. But, time, beg 
excuse present. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS NEW YORK CITY, 
 
FEBRUARY 19, 1861 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN GENTLEMEN:--I rather old man avail 
excuse do. Yet truth 
distinctly upon me, cannot well avoid 
is, understand brought room 
brought make speech. intimated 
brought room Daniel Webster Henry Clay made 
speeches, one position might expected something 
like men say something worthy 
therefore beg make allowance circumstances 
surprise brought you. habit 
thinking sometimes speaking upon political questions 
years past agitated country; and, disposed so, 
could take one issues, lawyers call them, 
called upon make argument best ability, 
could without much desire 
done to-night. 
 
occupying position, since Presidential election, 
public speaking, public writing. 
thought, upon full consideration, 
proper course take. brought now, required 
make speech, approve anything else fact 
keeping silence. seems response 
give remark ought justify closing here. 
kept silence since Presidential election party 
indifference anxiety pervades 
minds men aspect political affairs country. 
kept silence reason supposed peculiarly proper 
time came when, according custom 
country, could speak 
 
still suppose that, political enacted 
country time rapidly shifting 
anticipation degree certainty to-day shall see 
peculiarly fitting see all, 
last minute, take ground might 
shifting scenes afterward, also said several times 
upon repeat you, time 
come, shall take ground think 
North, South, East, West, whole country. 
hope feel necessity pressing upon say 
anything conflict Constitution, conflict continued 
union States, conflict perpetuation liberties 
people, anything conflict anything whatever 
ever given reason expect me. now, friends, said 
"No, no!" and, cheers Now, 
friends, appears difference opinion me, 
really feel called upon decide question myself. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MAYOR NEW YORK CITY, 
 
FEBRUARY 20, 1861 
 
Mr. feelings deep gratitude make 
reception given great 
commercial city New York. cannot remember done 
people not, large majority, agree political 
sentiment. grateful see 
great principles Government people pretty nearly 
quite regard difficulties us 
time, seen fit speak 
say agree sentiments devotion 
Union hope behind man nation. wisdom 
conducting affairs tend preservation Union, fear 
great confidence may placed me. sure bring 
heart devoted work. nothing could ever bring 
destruction Union (in 
great city New York, whole country, acquired 
unless would thing Union 
made. understand ship made carrying 
preservation long ship safe cargo, 
shall Union shall never abandoned, unless 
possibility existence shall cease exist without necessity 
throwing passengers cargo long, then, possible 
prosperity liberties people preserved within 
Union, shall purpose preserve it. now, 
Mr. Mayor, thanks cordial reception, allow come 
close. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS JERSEY CITY, NEW JERSEY 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1860 
 
MR. GENTLEMEN STATE NEW shall thank 
briefly kind reception given me, personally, 
temporary representative majesty nation. kindness 
hearts, hearts brethren State, 
proud shall strength address 
length, even time so. appear 
you, therefore, little else you, briefly 
say farewell. done high honor present 
reception great man man 
honor associated anywhere, owning State 
said enough, saying suggested enough, require 
response hour, well considered. could hour make worthy 
response it. therefore, ladies gentlemen New Jersey, content 
saying, heartily indorse sentiments 
Allow me, bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MAYOR NEW JERSEY, 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1861. 
 
MR. thank reception city 
regard great work speak, say bring 
heart filled love country, honest desire 
right. sure, however, ability anything 
God, without support free, happy, 
intelligent people, man succeed 
importance 
reception given me, bid proceed upon 

 
 
 
 
ADDRESS HOUSE, 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1861 
 
invited representatives Legislature visit 
capital honored State, acknowledging kind 
compelled respond welcome officers 
body, suppose intended speak 
them, representatives you; 
speak here, repeat great measure much 
said, would friends around 
met here. speech make, merely appear see 
let look me; latter think greatly best 
friends, allow bid farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS SENATE NEW JERSEY 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1861 
 
MR. PRESIDENT GENTLEMEN SENATE STATE NEW 
grateful honorable reception 
object. cannot remember place New Jersey holds 
early history. Revolutionary struggle States among 
Old Thirteen country within 
limits New Jersey. May pardoned if, upon occasion, 
mention away back earliest days 
able read, got hold small book, one younger 
members ever seen Life Washington. remember 
accounts given struggles liberties 
country; none fixed upon imagination deeply 
struggle New Jersey. crossing river, 
contest great endured time, 
fixed memory single Revolutionary 
know, early 
last longer others. recollect thinking then, boy even though 
was, must something common men 
struggled for. exceedingly anxious thing something 
even national independence, something held 
great promise people world time 
exceedingly anxious Union, Constitution, liberties 
people shall accordance original idea 
struggle made; shall happy indeed 
shall humble instrument hands Almighty, 
almost chosen people, object great struggle. 
give reception, understand, without distinction party. 
learn body composed majority gentlemen who, 
exercise best judgment choice chief 
think man. understand, nevertheless, come 
forward constitutionally elected President 
United citizens United States meet man who, 
time being, representative majesty 
single purpose perpetuate Constitution, union, 
liberties people. such, accept reception gratefully 
could believe tendered 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS ASSEMBLY NEW JERSEY, 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1861 
 
MR. SPEAKER GENTLEMEN: enjoyed honor reception 
branch Legislature, return 
thanks reception people New Jersey given 
chosen representatives representative, time 
being, majesty people United States. appropriate 
little demonstrations respect 
think little given man, 
manifestation adherence Union Constitution. 
understand received representatives people 
New Jersey, majority differ opinion 
manifestation therefore regarded 
expressing devotion Union, Constitution, 
liberties people. 
 
You, Mr. Speaker, well said time 
wisest look doubt upon aspect presented national 
affairs. circumstances readily see 
speak detail course shall deem best proper 
avail information time 
command, order time must speak 
shall able take ground deem best 
may occasion shall endeavor 
take ground deem North, East, West, 
South, whole country. shall take it, hope, good temper, 
certainly malice toward section. shall may 
power promote peaceful settlement difficulties. man 
live devoted peace am, none would 
preserve it, may necessary put foot firmly. 
duty right, sustain me, not? 
"Yes, Received members 
Legislature majority agree political 
sentiments, trust may assistance ship 
state surrounded is; 
suffer wreck now, pilot ever needed another 

 
Gentlemen, already spoken longer intended, must beg 
leave stop here. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MAYOR PHILADELPHIA, PENNSYLVANIA, 
 
FEBRUARY 21, 1861 
 
MR. MAYOR FELLOW-CITIZENS appear 
make speech, thank reception. reception 
given to-night me, man, individual, 
man temporarily represent, majesty 
nation. true, worthy mayor said, great 
anxiety amongst citizens United States time. deem 
happy circumstance dissatisfied portion fellow-citizens 
point us anything injured 
reason felt justified 
concluding anxiety country 
time differ upon 
subject, pointed substantial difficulty exists. 
mean say artificial panic may considerable 
done deny. hope 
expressed mayor, may able restore peace, harmony, 
prosperity country, worthy him; happy, indeed, 
shall able hope. promise 
bring work sincere heart. Whether bring head 
equal heart future times useless 
speak details plans now; shall speak officially next 
Monday week, ever. speak then, useless 
now. speak then, useless now. 
speak, shall take ground deem best calculated restore 
peace, harmony, prosperity country, tend perpetuity 
nation liberty States people. 
worthy mayor expressed wish, join him, 
convenient remain city long enough consult 
or, were, listen 
rising within consecrated walls wherein Constitution United 
States and, add, Declaration Independence, originally 
framed adopted. assure mayor hoped 
occasion, upon occasions life, shall nothing 
inconsistent teachings holy sacred walls. 
never asked anything walls. 
political warfare favor teachings come forth 
sacred walls. May right hand forget tongue 
mouth ever prove false 
Fellow-citizens, addressed longer expected do, 
allow bid 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS HALL INDEPENDENCE, PHILADELPHIA, 
 
FEBRUARY 22, 1861 
 
MR. filled deep emotion finding standing 
here, place, collected together wisdom, 
devotion principle, sprang institutions 
live. kindly suggested hands task 
restoring peace present distracted condition country. 
say return, sir, political sentiments entertain 
drawn, far able draw them, sentiments 
originated given world hall. never 
feeling politically spring sentiments embodied 
Declaration Independence. often pondered dangers 
men assembled framed adopted 
Declaration Independence. pondered 
endured officers soldiers army achieved 
independence. often inquired great principle idea 
kept confederacy long together. mere 
matter separation colonies 
sentiment Declaration Independence gave liberty, alone 
people country, but, hope, world future 
time. gave promise due time weight would 
lifted shoulders men. sentiment embodied 
Declaration Independence. Now, friends, country saved 
upon can, consider one 
men world help save it. cannot saved upon 
principle, truly awful. country cannot saved 
without giving principle, say would rather 
spot surrender it. Now, view 
present aspect affairs, need bloodshed war. 
necessity it. favor course, may say, 
advance, bloodshed unless forced upon 
Government, compelled act 
 
wholly unexpected speech, expect 
called upon say word came here. supposed merely 
something toward raising flag. may, therefore, said 
something said nothing willing live 
and, pleasure Almighty God, die by. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY DELEGATION, 
 
FEBRUARY 22, 1861 
 
MR. feel highly flattered seen fit 
upon me. Soon nomination General Taylor, attended 
political meeting city since carried 
fond city occasion. 
established provides presence 
twenty-four hours time. expect Washington 
Saturday. is, therefore, impossibility accept 
kind people would gladly 
circumstances many 
character reply compelled give you, bid 

 
 
 
 
ADDRESS PENNSYLVANIA, 
 
FEBRUARY 22, 1860 
 
LADIES GENTLEMEN OLD appear make speech. 
time make speech length, strength make 
every and, worse all, none make. plenty 
matter speak times, well known 
man speaks less says one thing, 
adversaries contend meant something else. shall soon 
occasion speak endeavor put 
thoughts plain express Constitution 
Union States, perpetual liberty 
people. speak, need enter upon 
conclusion, bid affectionate 
farewell. 
 
 
 
 
ADDRESS LEGISLATURE PENNSYLVANIA, HARRISBURG, 
 
FEBRUARY 22, 1861 
 
MR. SPEAKER SENATE, ALSO MR. SPEAKER HOUSE 
REPRESENTATIVES, GENTLEMEN GENERAL ASSEMBLY STATE 
appear brief remarks 
response said me. thank sincerely 
reception, generous words support promised 
upon occasion. thank great overwhelming 
support recently personally, cause think 
one, late election. 
 
Allusion made interesting fact perhaps 
first time appear capital great 
Pennsylvania upon birthday Father 
Country. connection beloved anniversary connected 
history country, already gone one exceedingly 
interesting scene morning Philadelphia. 
kind conduct gentlemen there, first time allowed 
privilege standing old Independence Hall words 
addressed there, opening opportunity 
deep regret time express something 
feelings excited occasion, really feelings 
whole life. 
 
Besides this, friends provided magnificent flag 
country. arranged given honor raising 
head went pleased went 
place strength feeble arm. When, according 
arrangement, cord floated gloriously 
without accident, bright, morning, 
could help hoping entire success 
beautiful least something come. 
could help feeling then, often felt, whole 
proceeding instrument. provided 
made arrangements place; applied 
small portion even feeble strength raising it. 
whole hands people arranged it, 
generous co-operation people 
nation, think flag country may yet kept 

 
recur moment repeat words uttered hotel 
regard said military support General 
Government may expect Pennsylvania proper 
emergency. guard possible mistake recur this. 
pleasure contemplate possibility necessity 
may arise country use military arm. 
exceedingly gratified see manifestation upon streets 
military force here, exceedingly gratified promise use 
force upon proper make desire 
repeat, order possible 
sincerely hope shall use them; 
never become duty shed blood, especially never shed 
fraternal blood. promise far may wisdom 
painful result shall wise brought about, shall 
fault mine. 
 
Allusion also made one honored speakers 
remarks recently made regard supposed 
especial interest great Pennsylvania. 
wish say regard matter, remarks 
uttered occasion rather carefully took pains 
so. seen occasion since add 
them. leave precisely stand, adding 
pleased expression you, gentlemen 
Pennsylvania, satisfactory you. 
 
now, gentlemen General Assembly 
Pennsylvania, allow return sincere thanks. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MAYOR WASHINGTON, D.C., 
 
FEBRUARY 27, 1861 
 
Mr. thank you, municipal authorities 
city accompany you, first time 
life, since present phase politics presented 
country, said anything publicly within region country 
institution slavery exists, take occasion 
say think much ill feeling existed still 
exists people section came people 
here, dependent upon misunderstanding one another. therefore 
avail opportunity assure you, Mr. Mayor, 
gentlemen present, now, never had, 
kindly feelings toward people section. 
now, never had, disposition treat respect 
otherwise purpose withhold 
benefits Constitution, circumstances, 
would feel constrained withhold 
hope, word, shall become better 
say great shall like 
better. thank kindness reception. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY WASHINGTON, D.C., 
 
FEBRUARY 28, 1861 
 
suppose may take compliment paid me, 
please accept thanks it. reached city 
Washington circumstances considerably differing 
man ever reached it. purpose 
taking official position amongst people, almost 
politically opposed me, yet opposed me, suppose. 
 
propose address you. propose say, 
yesterday, worthy mayor board called upon me, 
thought much ill feeling existed 
people people among came, 
depends, upon 
 
hope that, things shall go along believe 
desire may, may power remove something 
may enabled convince you, people 
section country, regard things 
things entitled respect 
treatment claim wise 
power, you, deprive rights 
Constitution United States, even split 
regard rights, determined give you, 
far lies hands, rights 
grudgingly, fully hope that, thus dealing you, 
become better better friends. 
 
now, friends, remarks, returning thanks 
expressing desire hear little 
good music, bid 
 
 
 
 
WASHINGTON, SUNDAY, MARCH 3, 1861 
 
struggle appointments LINCOLN's Cabinet, 
spoke 
 
Gentlemen, evident one must take responsibility 
appointments, it. Cabinet 
positions definitely announce 
privately gentlemen selected Constitutional 

 
 
 
 
FIRST INAUGURAL ADDRESS, MARCH 4, 1861 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS UNITED compliance custom old 
Government itself, appear address briefly, 
take presence oath prescribed Constitution 
United States taken President "before enters 
execution office." 
 
consider necessary present discuss matters 
administration special anxiety excitement. 
 
Apprehension seems exist among people Southern States 
accession Republican administration property 
peace personal security never 
reasonable cause Indeed, ample evidence 
contrary existed open inspection. 
found nearly published speeches addresses 
you. quote one speeches declare 
 
"I purpose, directly indirectly, interfere 
institution slavery States exists. believe 
lawful right so, inclination so." 
 
nominated elected full knowledge 
made many similar declarations, never them. And, 
this, placed platform acceptance, 
law me, clear emphatic resolution 
read: 
 
"Resolved, maintenance rights States, 
especially right State order control domestic 
institutions according judgment exclusively, essential 
balance power perfection endurance 
political fabric denounce lawless invasion armed 
force soil State Territory, matter 
amongst 
 
reiterate sentiments; and, so, press upon 
public attention conclusive evidence case 
property, peace, security section 
wise endangered incoming administration. add, too, 
protection which, consistently Constitution 
laws, given, cheerfully given States 
lawfully demanded, whatever cheerfully one section 
another. 
 
much controversy delivering fugitives 
service labor. clause read plainly written 
Constitution 
 
"No person held service labor one State, laws thereof, 
escaping another, shall consequence law regulation 
therein discharged service labor, shall delivered 
claim party service labor may 
 
scarcely questioned provision intended 
made reclaiming call fugitive slaves; 
intention law. members Congress swear 
support whole provision much 
other. proposition, then, slaves whose cases come within 
terms clause "shall delivered up," oaths 
Now, would make effort good temper, could 
nearly equal unanimity frame pass law means keep good 
unanimous oath? 
 
difference opinion whether clause enforced 
national State authority; surely difference 
material one. slave surrendered, 
little consequence others authority done. 
one case content oath shall go 
merely controversy shall 
 
Again, law upon subject, ought safeguards 
liberty known civilized humane introduced, 
free man not, case, surrendered might 
well time provide law enforcement 
clause Constitution guarantees "the citizens 
State shall entitled privileges immunities citizens 
several 
 
take official oath to-day mental reservations, 
purpose construe Constitution laws 
And, choose specify particular acts Congress 
proper enforced, suggest much safer all, 
official private stations, conform abide 
acts stand unrepealed, violate them, trusting 
find held unconstitutional. 
 
years since first inauguration President 
national Constitution. period fifteen different 
greatly distinguished citizens have, succession, administered 
executive branch Government. conducted many 
perils, generally great success. Yet, scope 
precedent, enter upon task brief constitutional 
term four years great peculiar difficulty. disruption 
Federal Union, heretofore attempted. 
 
hold that, contemplation universal law Constitution, 
Union States perpetual. Perpetuity implied, 
expressed, fundamental law national governments. safe 
assert government proper ever provision organic 
law Continue execute express 
provisions national Constitution, Union endure 
impossible destroy except action 
provided instrument itself. 
 
Again, United States government proper, association 
States nature contract merely, contract 
peaceably less parties made it? One party 
contract may violate it, speak; require 
lawfully rescind it? 
 
Descending general principles, find proposition 
legal contemplation Union perpetual confirmed history 
Union itself. Union much older Constitution. 
formed, fact, Articles Association matured 
continued Declaration Independence 
matured, faith thirteen States expressly 
engaged perpetual, Articles Confederation 
And, finally, 1787 one declared objects 
establishing Constitution "to form perfect Union." 
 
destruction Union one part 
States lawfully possible, Union less perfect 
Constitution, lost vital element 
 
follows views State upon mere motion 
lawfully get Union; resolves ordinances effect 
legally acts violence, within State States, 
authority United States, insurrectionary 
revolutionary, according circumstances. 
 
therefore consider that, view Constitution laws, 
Union extent ability shall take care, 
Constitution expressly upon me, laws 
Union faithfully executed States. deem 
simple duty part; shall perform far 
practicable, unless rightful masters, American people, shall 
withhold requisite means, authoritative manner direct 
contrary. trust regarded menace, 
declared purpose Union constitutionally defend 
maintain itself. 
 
needs bloodshed 
shall none, unless forced upon national authority. power 
confided used hold, occupy, possess property 
places belonging Government, collect duties 
beyond may necessary objects, 
invasion, using force among people anywhere. 
hostility United States, interior locality, shall 
great universal prevent competent resident citizens holding 
Federal offices, attempt force obnoxious strangers 
among people object. strict legal right may exist 
government enforce exercise offices, attempt 
would nearly impracticable 
deem better forego time uses offices. 
 
unless continue furnished parts 
Union. far possible, people everywhere shall 
sense perfect security favorable calm thought 
reflection. course indicated followed unless current 
events experience shall show modification change proper, 
every case best discretion exercised 
according circumstances actually existing, view hope 
peaceful solution national troubles restoration 
fraternal sympathies 
 
persons one section another seek destroy 
Union events, glad pretext it, neither 
affirm such, need address word them. 
those, however, really love Union may speak? 
 
entering upon grave matter destruction national 
benefits, hopes, would 
wise ascertain precisely it? hazard desperate 
step possibility portion ills fly 
real existence? you, certain ills fly 
greater real ones fly risk 
commission fearful 
 
profess content Union constitutional rights 
maintained. true, then, right, plainly written 
Constitution, think not. Happily human mind 
constituted party reach this. Think, 
can, single instance plainly written provision 
Constitution ever denied. mere force numbers 
majority deprive minority clearly written constitutional 
right, might, moral point view, justify 
would right vital one. case. 
vital rights individuals plainly assured 
affirmations guaranties 
Constitution, controversies never arise concerning them. 
organic law ever framed provision specifically applicable 
every question may occur practical administration. 
document reasonable length express 
provisions possible questions. Shall fugitives labor 
surrendered national State authority? Constitution 
expressly say. May Congress prohibit slavery Territories? 
Constitution expressly say. Must Congress protect slavery 
Territories? Constitution expressly say. 
 
questions class spring constitutional 
divide upon majorities minority 
acquiesce, majority must, Government must cease. 
continuing Government acquiescence 
one side other. 
 
minority case secede rather acquiesce, make 
precedent turn divide ruin them; minority 
secede whenever majority refuses controlled 
minority. instance, may portion new confederacy 
year two hence arbitrarily secede again, precisely portions 
present Union claim secede it? cherish disunion 
sentiments educated exact temper this. 
 
perfect identity interests among States compose 
new Union produce harmony only, prevent renewed 
 
Plainly, central idea secession essence 
majority held restraint constitutional limitations, 
always changing easily deliberate changes popular opinions 
sentiments, true sovereign free people. Whoever 
does, necessity, fly anarchy despotism. Unanimity 
impossible; rule minority, permanent arrangement, wholly 
that, rejecting majority principle, anarchy 
despotism form left. 
 
forget position assumed some, constitutional 
questions decided Supreme Court; deny 
decisions must case, upon parties suit, 
object suit, also entitled high respect 
consideration parallel cases departments 
government. And, obviously possible decision may 
erroneous given case, still evil effect following it, 
limited particular case, chance may overruled 
never become precedent cases, better borne 
could evils different practice. time, candid 
citizen must confess policy government, upon vital 
questions affecting whole people, irrevocably fixed 
decisions Supreme Court, instant made, ordinary 
parties personal actions, people 
ceased extent practically resigned 
government hands eminent 
view assault upon court duty 
may shrink decide cases properly brought them, 
fault others seek turn decisions 
political purposes. 
 
One section country believes slavery right, ought 
extended, believes wrong, ought 
extended. substantial dispute. fugitive slave clause 
Constitution law suppression foreign slave 
trade well enforced, perhaps, law ever 
community moral sense people imperfectly supports law 
itself. great body people abide dry legal obligation 
cases, break each. This, think, cannot 
perfectly would worse cases separation 
sections before. foreign slave trade, imperfectly 
suppressed, would ultimately without restriction, one 
section, fugitive slaves, partially surrendered, would 
surrendered other. 
 
Physically speaking, cannot separate. cannot remove respective 
sections other, build impassable wall them. 
husband wife may go presence beyond 
reach other; different parts country cannot 
this. cannot remain face face, intercourse, either 
amicable hostile, must continue them. possible, then, 
make intercourse advantageous satisfactory 
separation before? aliens make treaties easier friends 
make laws? treaties faithfully enforced aliens 
laws among friends? Suppose go war, cannot fight always; 
when, much loss sides, gain either, cease 
fighting, identical old questions terms intercourse 
upon you. 
 
country, institutions, belongs people inhabit 
it. Whenever shall grow weary existing government, 
exercise constitutional right amending it, revolutionary 
right overthrow it. cannot ignorant fact 
many worthy patriotic citizens desirous national 
Constitution amended. make recommendation amendments, 
fully recognize rightful authority people whole 
subject, exercised either modes prescribed 
instrument itself, should, existing circumstances, favor 
rather oppose fair opportunity afforded people act 
upon it. venture add convention mode seems 
allows amendments originate people 
themselves, instead permitting take reject propositions 
originated others especially chosen purpose, 
might precisely would wish either accept 
understand proposed amendment Constitution amendment, 
however, passed Congress, effect 
Federal Government shall never interfere domestic institutions 
States, including persons held service. avoid 
said, depart purpose speak 
particular amendments far say that, holding provision 
implied constitutional law, objection 
made express 
 
chief magistrate derives authority people, 
conferred none upon fix terms separation 
States. people also 
executive, such, nothing it. duty administer 
present government, came hands, transmit it, 
him, 
 
patient confidence ultimate justice 
people? better equal hope present 
differences either party without faith right? 
Almighty Ruler nations, eternal truth justice, 
side North, South, truth justice 
surely prevail judgment great tribunal American 
people. 
 
frame government live, people 
wisely given public servants little power 
have, equal wisdom, provided return little 
hands short people retain virtue 
vigilance, administration, extreme wickedness 
seriously injure government short space four years. 
 
countrymen, one all, think calmly well upon whole subject. 
Nothing valuable lost taking time. object 
hurry hot haste step would never take 
deliberately, object frustrated taking time; good 
object frustrated it. dissatisfied still 
old Constitution and, sensitive point, 
laws framing it; new administration 
immediate power, would, change either. admitted 
dissatisfied hold right side 
still single good reason precipitate action. Intelligence, 
patriotism, firm reliance never yet 
forsaken favored land, still competent adjust best way 
present difficulty. 
 
hands, dissatisfied fellow-countrymen, mine, 
momentous issue civil war. government assail you. 
conflict without oath 
registered heaven destroy government, shall 
solemn one protect, it. 
 
loath close. enemies, friends. must 
enemies. Though passion may must bonds 
affection. mystic chords memory, stretching every battle-field 
patriot grave every living heart 
broad land, yet swell chorus Union 
surely be, better angels nature. 
 
 
 
 
REFUSAL SEWARD RESIGNATION 
 
WM. H. SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, March 4, 1861. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your note 2d instant, asking withdraw 
acceptance invitation take charge State Department, 
duly received. subject painful solicitude me, 
feel constrained beg 
public interest, think, demands personal 
feelings deeply enlisted direction. Please consider 
answer 9 A.M. to-morrow. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY PENNSYLVANIA DELEGATION, 
 
WASHINGTON, MARCH 5, 1861 
 
Mr. CHAIRMAN GENTLEMEN 
frequently said heretofore, occasion address people 
State, repeat 
assurance gratification support gave election, 
promise support tendered 
me. 
 
Allusion made hope entertain 
President government. respect wish say 
position assumed wish ever given 
reason believe would do. wish believe assume 
better others gone me. prefer rather 
understood ever government principles 
remember, exercise opinion, others 
also rights exercise opinions, 
endeavor allow rights, act manner create 
bad feeling. hope government President. hope, 
wish understood, may allusion unpleasant 

 
must remember people States entitled 
privileges immunities citizens several States. 
bear mind, act way say nothing 
would idea, may not, like 
set better people. 
 
Now, friends, public duties pressing to-day, prevent 
giving time you. Indeed, left now, 
could well deny large respectable body. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MASSACHUSETTS DELEGATION, 
 
WASHINGTON, MARCH 5, 1861 
 
thankful renewed assurance kind feeling confidence, 
support old Bay State, far you, Mr. Chairman, 
expressed, behalf represent, sanction 
inaugural address. grateful 
feelings. object one great presenting views 
opening administration peculiar circumstances attending 
entrance upon official duties connected Government. studied 
points great anxiety, presented whatever 
ability sense justice could bring met 
approbation good friends Massachusetts, shall exceedingly 
hope meet approbation friends 
everywhere. thankful expressions voted 
us; like every man you, like certainly 
others. President administration Government, 
hope man enough know one citizen United States 
another, one section another. shall gratified good 
friends Massachusetts others thus far supported 
national views still support carrying out. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD 
 
EXECUTIVE MARCH 7, 1861 
 
DEAR diplomatic address reply. 
reply is, title quite 
understand, therefore left 
 
please bring to-day message War Department, 
General Scott's note upon it, wish 
examine General's opinion, yet done. 
 
truly 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY DIPLOMATIC CORPS 
 
WASHINGTON, THURSDAY, MARCH 7, 1861 
 
Mr. GENTLEMEN DIPLOMATIC accept 
sincere thanks kind affords pleasure 
confidence generously express friendly 
disposition United States, me, towards 
governments respectively equal satisfaction accept 
assurance pleased give, disposition 
reciprocated governments, yourselves. 
 
Allow express hope friendly relations may remain 
also wishes health happiness 
personally. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 
 
HON. SECRETARY STATE. DEAR think sending ministers 
follows: Fremont Clay 

 
need points guarded strongly quickly possible. 
suggestion merely, 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
J. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 12, 1861 
 
HON. JACOB DEAR help me. said offended 
you. hope tell how. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
March 14, 1861. DEAR SIR:--I entirely way 
offended me. cherish sentiment towards kindness 
confidence. humble servant, J. 
 
 
 
glad know 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 13, 1861 
 
HON. P. M. G. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The bearer this, Mr. C. T. 
wishes son, small place think Virginia 
heard, cases. 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NOTE ASKING CABINET OPINIONS FORT SUMTER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 15, 1861 
 
HONORABLE SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR possible provision Fort Sumter, 
circumstances wise attempt it? Please give 
opinion writing question. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
members 
 
 
 
 
ROYAL AMERICAN BOUNDARY LINE 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES 
 
Senate transmitted copy message sent 
body 21st February last, proposing take 
advice subject proposition made British Government 
minister refer matter controversy 
government Government United States 
King King 
Republic 
 
message stated wished present 
Senate precise questions following, namely: 
 
"Will Senate approve treaty referring either sovereign 
powers named dispute existing governments 
United States Great Britain concerning boundary line 
Island American case shall 
find unable decide line description 
treaty June 15, 1846, shall authorized establish line 
according treaty nearly three powers 
named Great Britain shall chosen United 
States?" 
 
find reason course 
important matter; but, contrary, shall receive 
advice Senate thereon respectfully ask Senate 
advice three questions 
 
ABRAHAM LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, March 16, 1861 
 
 
 
 
APPOINTMENTS 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 18, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY STATE. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I believe necessity us make appointments 
mentioned last is, Charles F. Adams England, William L. 
France, George P. 
gentlemen highest one 
originally suggested except Mr. Mr. Adams take 
suggested him, coupled eminent place. Mr. 
Mr. take intense pressure 
respective States, also. 
 
objection card 
New England two single State. considered this, 
shrink responsibility. This, done, leaves 
five full China, Peru, 
Carl or, words, German 
friends? 
 
Shall put card through, arrange rest say 
you? 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
G. E. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, March 19, 1861. 
 
MASTER GEO. 
 
MAY see talk Master Geo. 
last May Springfield, Ill. 
 
Respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
denial interview young 
ever taken 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE SENATE INQUIRY FORT SUMTER 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
SENATE UNITED received copy 
resolution Senate, passed 25th instant, requesting me, 
opinion incompatible public interest, communicate 
Senate despatches Major Robert Anderson War Department 
time command Fort Sumter. examination 
correspondence thus called for, have, highest respect 
Senate, come conclusion present moment 
publication would 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
WASHINGTON, MARCH 16, 1861 
 
 
 
 
PREPARATION FIRST NAVAL ACTION 
 
SECRETARY WAR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, MARCH 29, 1861 
 
HONORABLE SECRETARY WAR. 
 
SIR:--I desire expedition move sea got ready 
early 6th April next, whole according memorandum 
Secretary Navy 
object. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 

 
Norfolk, Washington, Lane 
New York, orders sea, etc., one 
month. Three hundred men kept ready departure board 
New York. Two hundred men ready leave 
Island New York. Supplies twelve months one hundred 
men put shape, ready instant large 
steamer three conditionally engaged. 
 
 
 
 
------ 
 
WASHINGTON, March 30, 1861 
 
DEAR 
 
Cousin shows letter question giving 
Springfield post-office troubles me. see already appointed 
William Territorial governor Judge Trumbull's brother 
go justify declaration 
Trumbull divided offices among Dr. 
know, looks me; personally owe 
much. 
 
see papers, vote taken Could 
set beat all? She, here, need know 
nothing it, therefore would part. 
 
ever, 
 
 
 
 
COMMANDANT NEW YORK 
 
NAVY WASHINGTON, April 1, 1861 
 
COMMANDANT N. Y. 
 
Fit go sea earnest possible moment 
sealed orders. Orders confidential messenger go forward to-morrow. 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LIEUTENANT D. D. PORTER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, April 1, 1861 
 
LIEUTENANT D. D. PORTER, United States Navy. 
 
SIR:--You proceed New York, least possible delay, 
assuming command naval steamer proceed 
Harbor, cost risk prevent expedition 
reaching Fort Santa 
 
exhibit order naval officer deem 
necessary, established within harbor, 
request co-operation entrance least one 
 
order, object, communicated 
person whatever reach harbor 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
 
 
 
RELIEF EXPEDITION FORT SUMTER 
 
ORDER OFFICERS ARMY NAVY. 
 
WASHINGTON, EXECUTIVE MANSION, April 1, 1861. 
 
officers army navy order may exhibited 
aid every means power expedition command 
Colonel Brown, supplying men material, 
co-operating may desire. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER CAPTAIN SAMUEL 
 

 
WASHINGTON CITY, April 1, 1861 
 
render necessary place command 
ship (and special officer fully informed 
instructed relation wishes Government, 
therefore consider taking step 
Government least reflect upon efficiency 
contrary, confidence ability 
perform duty required you. Hoping soon able give 
better command one trusting 
full confidence disposition Government toward you, remain, 
etc., 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD'S BID POWER 
 
MEMORANDUM SECRETARY SEWARD, APRIL 1, 1861 
 
thoughts President's Consideration, 
 
First. end month's administration, yet without 
policy either domestic 
 
Second. This, however, even 
presence Senate, need meet applications 
prevented attention grave 
 
Third. delay adopt prosecute 
domestic foreign affairs would bring scandal 
administration, danger upon country. 
 
Fourth. must dismiss office. 
suggest make local appointments leaving foreign 
general ones occasional action. 
 
policy home. aware views 
perhaps sufficiently explained. system built upon idea 
ruling one, namely, must CHANGE QUESTION PUBLIC 
ONE UPON SLAVERY, SLAVERY, question upon UNION 
words, would regarded party question, 
one patriotism union. 
 
occupation evacuation Fort Sumter, although fact 
slavery party question, Witness temper manifested 
Republicans free States, even Union men 
South. 
 
would therefore terminate safe means changing issue. 
deem fortunate last administration created necessity. 
 
rest, would simultaneously defend reinforce ports 
navy recalled foreign prepared 
blockade. Put island Key West martial law. 
 
raise distinctly question union would 
maintain every fort possession South. 
 
 
FOREIGN NATIONS, 
 
would demand explanations Spain France, once. 
 
would seek explanations Great Britain Russia, send agents 
Mexico, Central America vigorous continental 
spirit independence continent European 
 
And, satisfactory explanations received Spain France, 
 
Would convene Congress declare war them. 
 
whatever policy must energetic prosecution 
it. 
 
purpose must business pursue direct 

 
Either President must himself, active 
it, member adopted, debates 
must end, agree 
 
especial neither seek assume 
responsibility. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY SECRETARY SEWARD'S MEMORANDUM 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, APRIL 1, 1861 
 
HON. W. H. SEWARD. 
 
DEAR parting considering 
paper dated day, entitled "Some Thoughts President's 
first proposition is, end 
month's administration, yet without policy either domestic 

 
beginning month, inaugural, said: "The power 
confided used hold, occupy, possess property 
places belonging Government, Collect duties 
distinct approval time; and, taken 
connection order immediately gave General Scott, directing 
employ every means power strengthen hold 
forts, exact domestic policy single 
exception propose abandon Fort Sumter. 
 
Again, perceive Fort Sumter would 
done slavery party issue, Fort would 
national patriotic one. 
 
news received yesterday regard St. certainly brings 
new item within range foreign time 
preparing instructions ministers like, 
perfect harmony, without even suggestion foreign 
policy. 
 
Upon Closing 
 
policy must energetic prosecution it. 
 
"For purpose must business pursue direct 

 
President must himself, active 
it, or, 
 
member adopted, debates 
must end, agree 
 
remark must done, must it. general line 
policy adopted, apprehend danger changed 
without good reason, continuing subject unnecessary 
still, upon points arising progress wish, suppose 
entitled have, advice 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY COMMITTEE VIRGINIA CONVENTION, APRIL 13, 1861 
 
HON. WILLIAM ALEXANDER H. H. GEORGE W. 
Esq. 
 
committee Virginia Convention Session, 
present preamble resolution words: 
 
opinion Convention, 
prevails public mind policy Federal Executive 
intends pursue toward seceded States extremely injurious 
industrial commercial interests country, tends keep 
excitement adjustment pending difficulties, 
threatens disturbance public therefore 
 
"Resolved, committee three delegates appointed 
Convention wait upon President United States, present 
preamble resolution, respectfully ask communicate 
Convention policy Federal Executive intends pursue 
regard Confederate States. 
 
Convention State Virginia, Richmond, April 8, 

 
answer say that, beginning official term 
expressed intended policy plainly able, 
deep regret learn great 
injurious public mind policy is, 
course intend yet seen occasion change, 
purpose pursue course marked inaugural 
address. commend careful consideration whole document 
best expression give purposes. 
 
therein said, "The power confided 
used hold, occupy, possess property places belonging 
Government, collect duties beyond 
necessary objects, invasion, using force 
among people words places 
belonging chiefly allude military posts 
property possession Government came 
hands. 
 
if, appears true, pursuit purpose drive 
United States authority places, assault 
made upon Fort Sumter, shall hold liberty 
can, like places seized Government devolved 
upon me. every event shall, extent ability, 
repel force force. case proves true Fort Sumter 
shall perhaps cause United States 
withdrawn States claim believing 
commencement actual war Government justifies 
possibly demands this. 
 
scarcely need say consider military posts property 
situated within States claim seceded yet belonging 
Government United States much 
supposed 
 
Whatever else may purpose, shall attempt collect 
duties armed invasion part country; 
meaning this, however, may land force deemed necessary 
relieve fort upon border country. 
 
fact quoted part inaugural address, must 
inferred repudiate part, whole 
except far say may regarded 

 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CALLING 75,000 
 
CONGRESS EXTRA SESSION, APRIL 15, 1861. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas laws United States time past 
execution thereof States South 
Carolina, Georgia, Alabama, Florida, Mississippi, Louisiana, Texas, 
combinations powerful suppressed ordinary course 
judicial proceedings, powers vested 
 
Now, therefore, I, A. LINCOLN, President United States, virtue 
power vested Constitution laws, thought 
fit call forth, hereby call forth, militia several 
States Union, aggregate number seventy-five thousand, 
order suppress said cause laws duly 
executed. 
 
details object immediately communicated State 
authorities War Department. 
 
appeal loyal citizens favor, aid effort 
maintain honor, existence National 
Union, perpetuity popular government; redress wrongs 
already long enough 
 
deem proper say first service assigned forces 
hereby called forth probably forts, places, 
property seized Union; every event 
utmost care consistently objects aforesaid, 
avoid destruction interference property, 
disturbance peaceful citizens part country. 
 
hereby command persons composing combinations aforesaid 
disperse retire respective within twenty 
days date. 
 
present condition public affairs presents 
extraordinary occasion, virtue power vested 
Constitution, convene Houses Congress. Senators 
Representatives therefore summoned assemble respective 
twelve o'clock Thursday, fourth day July 
next, consider determine measures as, 
wisdom, public safety interest may seem 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand, caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, fifteenth day April, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-one, 
independence United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
President: 
 
  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION BLOCKADE, APRIL 19, 1861 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas insurrection Government United States 
broken States South Carolina, Georgia, Alabama, Florida, 
Mississippi, Louisiana, Texas, laws United States 
collection revenue cannot effectually executed therein 
provision Constitution requires duties 
uniform throughout United States: 
 
Whereas combination persons engaged insurrection 
threatened grant pretended letters authorize 
thereof commit assaults vessels, property good 
citizens country lawfully engaged commerce high 
waters United States: 
 
Whereas executive proclamation already issued requiring 
persons engaged proceedings therefrom, 
calling militia force purpose same, 
Congress extraordinary session deliberate determine 

 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham LINCOLN, President United States, 
view purposes mentioned, protection 
public peace, lives property quiet citizens 
pursuing lawful Congress shall assembled 
said unlawful proceedings, shall 
ceased, deemed advisable set foot blockade 
ports within States aforesaid, pursuance laws United 
States, law nations case provided. purpose 
competent force prevent entrance 
vessels ports If, therefore, view violate 
blockade, vessel shall approach shall attempt leave either 
said ports, duly warned commander one 
blockading vessels, indorse register fact date 
vessel shall attempt enter 
leave captured sent nearest 
convenient proceedings cargo, 
may deemed 
 
hereby proclaim declare person, pretended 
authority said States, shall 
vessel United States, persons cargo board her, 
person held laws United States 
punishment 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, nineteenth day April, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-one, 
independence United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR MAYOR BROWN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 20, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR MAYOR BROWN. 
 
GENTLEMEN:--Your letter Messrs. received. 
tender sincere thanks efforts keep peace 
trying situation 
 
future troops must brought here, make point 
bringing Baltimore. Without military knowledge myself, 
course must leave details General Scott. hastily said morning 
presence gentlemen, around Baltimore, 
it." sincerely hope General, fuller reflection, 
consider practical proper, object it. 
collision people Baltimore troops 
unless go way seek it. hope 
influence prevent this. 
 
ever shall power peace consistently 
maintenance Government. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, April 20, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
desire consult Mayor Baltimore relative 
preserving peace Maryland. Please come immediately special 
train, take or, necessary, one sent 
here. Answer 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER DEFEND MARYLAND INSURRECTION 
 
ORDER GENERAL SCOTT. WASHINGTON, April 25, 1861 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL SCOTT. 
 
DEAR Maryland Legislature to-morrow 
take action arm people State 
United States. question submitted 
considered whether would upon ground 
necessary you, General Chief United States Army, 
arrest disperse members body. think would 
efficient desired object. 
 
First. clearly legal right cannot know 
advance action lawful peaceful, wait 
shall acted arrest lessen 
effect action. 
 
cannot permanently prevent action. arrest them, 
cannot long hold prisoners, liberated 
immediately take precisely 
simply disperse immediately 
place. 
 
therefore conclude left Commanding General 
watch await action, which, shall arm people 
United States, adopt prompt efficient 
means even, necessary, 
cities and, necessity, suspension writ 
habeas 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION BLOCKADE, APRIL 27, 1861 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, reasons assigned proclamation nineteenth 
instant, blockade ports States South Carolina, Georgia, 
Florida, Alabama, Louisiana, Mississippi, Texas ordered 

 
whereas, since date, public property United States 
collection revenue duly 
commissioned officers United States, engaged executing 
orders arrested held custody 
prisoners, discharge official duties, 
without due legal process, persons claiming act authorities 
States Virginia North 
 
efficient blockade ports States also 

 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, twenty seventh day April, 
year Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-one, 
independence United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REMARKS MILITARY COMPANY, WASHINGTON, APRIL 27, 1861 
 
desired sincerely man, sometimes think 
man, present difficulties might settled without 
blood. say hope yet 
alternative presented whether Union broken 
liberties people lost, blood shed, probably 
make choice shall 
 
 
 
 
REPEAL WRIT HABEAS CORPUS 
 
GENERAL SCOTT. 
 
COMMANDING GENERAL, ARMY UNITED STATES. 
 
engaged suppressing insurrection laws 
United States. point vicinity military line 
shall used City Philadelphia 
city Washington find resistance renders necessary 
suspend writ habeas corpus public safety, personally, 
officer command point resistance occurs, 
authorized suspend 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 17, 1861 
 
 
 
 
MILITARY ST. LOUIS CITIZENS 
 
SECRETARY WAR WAR DEPARTMENT, April 30, 1861 
 
CAPTAIN NATHANIEL 
 
NATHANIEL Commanding Department West. 
 
SIR:--The President United States directs 
military service United States loyal citizens Saint Louis 
heretofore ten thousand 
number, purpose maintaining authority United 
States; protection peaceful inhabitants Missouri; 
will, deemed necessary purpose yourself, Messrs. 
F. John How, James O. Samuel T. J. 
Francis P. Blair, Jr., proclaim martial law city Saint 
Louis. 
 
additional force hereby authorized shall discharged part 
whole, soon appears gentlemen 
mentioned danger attempt part enemies 
Government take military possession city Saint Louis, 
put city control combination Government 
United States; whilst additional force remains service 
shall governed Rules Articles War, 
special regulations may shall like force hereafter 
directed enrolled command. 
 
arms military Saint Louis Arsenal needed 
forces United States Missouri must removed 
Springfield, safe place State Illinois, 
speedily practicable, officers charge Saint 
Louis. 
 

 
revolutionary times, therefore object 
this. W. S. 
 
Approved, April 30, 1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Colonel Thomas make order.  SIMON CAMERON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
FAILURE SUMTER RELIEF 
 
V. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 1, 1861 
 
CAPTAIN G. V. 
 
DEAR SIR:--I sincerely regret failure late attempt 
provision Fort Sumter source annoyance you. 
 
plan not, fact, brought 
reason well known advance possible 
essential part plan, never reached while, 
accident wise responsible, possibly 
extent was, deprived war vessel, men, 
deemed great importance enterprise. 
 
cheerfully truly declare failure 
lowered qualities developed 
effort greatly 
 
daring dangerous enterprise similar character would 
to-day man would 
anticipated cause country would advanced making 
attempt provision Fort Sumter, even fail; 
small consolation feel anticipation justified 
result. 
 
truly friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION CALLING VOLUNTEERS, 
 
MAY 3, 1861 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES. 
 

 
Whereas existing exigencies demand immediate adequate measures 
protection National Constitution preservation 
National Union suppression insurrectionary combinations 
existing several States opposing laws Union 
execution thereof, end military force 
addition called forth proclamation 15th day April 
present year appears 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States 
Commander Chief Army Navy thereof militia 
several States called actual service, hereby call 
service United States volunteers serve period 
three years, unless sooner discharged, mustered service 
infantry cavalry. proportions arm details 
organization made known Department 
War. 
 
also direct Regular Army United States increased 
addition eight regiments infantry, one regiment cavalry, 
one regiment artillery, making altogether aggregate 
increase officers enlisted men, details 
increase also made known Department War. 
 
direct enlistment less one 
three years seamen, addition present force, 
naval service United States. details enlistment 
organization made known Department Navy. 
 
call volunteers hereby made direction increase 
Regular Army enlistment seamen hereby given, together 
plan organization adopted volunteer 
regular forces hereby submitted Congress soon 

 
meantime earnestly invoke co-operation good citizens 
measures hereby adopted effectual suppression unlawful 
violence, impartial enforcement constitutional laws, 
possible restoration peace order, 
happiness prosperity, throughout country. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto set band caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
COMMUNICATION VICE-PRESIDENT 
 
VICE-PRESIDENT HAMLIN. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., May 6, 1861 
 
HON. H. New York. 
 
DEAR advise close day troops left 
day, going, remaining New 
York, expected next day. Give numbers, near 
convenient, corps are. information, reaching us 
useful well satisfactory. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER COLONEL ANDERSON, 
 
MAY 7, 1861 
 
SHALL SEE 
 
Know ye that, special trust confidence patriotism, 
ability Colonel Robert Anderson, U. S. Army, 
empowered him, hereby him, receive army 
United States many regiments volunteer troops State 
Kentucky western part State Virginia shall 
willing engage Service United States term 
three years, upon terms according plan proposed 
proclamation May 3, 1861, General Orders No. 15, War 
Department, May 4, 1861. 
 
troops receives shall footing every respect 
like kind called proclamation 
except officers shall commissioned United States. 
therefore carefully diligently discharge duty hereby devolved 
upon performing manner things 
 
Given hand, city Washington, 7th day May, A. 
D. 1861, year independence United 
States. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: SIMON CAMERON, Secretary War, 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION SUSPENDING WRIT HABEAS CORPUS FLORIDA, 
 
MAY 10, 1861. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas insurrection exists State Florida, 
liberty, property loyal citizens United States 

 
whereas deemed proper needful measures taken 
protection citizens officers United States 
discharge public duties State 
 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham LINCOLN, President 
United States, hereby direct commander forces United 
States Florida coast permit person exercise office 
authority upon Key West, Santa 
may inconsistent laws Constitution United 
States, authorizing time, shall find necessary, 
suspend writ habeas corpus, remove 
vicinity United States dangerous suspected 
persons. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, May 11, 1861 
 
SECRETARY NAVY. 
 
D. D. Porter placed command steamer 
Captain Samuel detached therefrom, special order, 
neither responsible apparent real 
part connection 
 
Hereafter Captain Porter relieved special service placed 
direction Navy Department, receive 
instructions report. 
 
respectfully, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT LINCOLN'S DIPLOMATIC DESPATCH 
 
WRITTEN SECRETARY STATE MINISTER ADAMS 
 
NO. 
 
DEPARTMENT STATE. WASHINGTON, May 21, 1861 
 
brief despatch May 2d tells us 
Lord John Russell recently requested interview account 
solicitude felt concerning effect certain 
measures represented likely adopted President. 
conversation British secretary told Mr. Dallas three 
representatives Southern Confederacy London, Lord 
John Russell yet seen them, unwilling see 
informed Mr. Dallas understanding 
exists British French governments would lead 
take one course recognition. referred 
rumor blockade us Southern ports, 
ports Mr. Dallas answered knew 
nothing therefore 
 
   (The President's notes text, 
   matter marked 
 
could say nothing. added expected arrive two weeks. 
Upon statement Lord John Russell acquiesced expediency 
waiting full knowledge expected 
 
Mr. Dallas transmitted us newspaper reports 
explanations made 
 
base proceedings parliamentary debates seek 
explanations necessary communicate department. 
intend clear simple record whatever issue may arise 
us Great 
 
President surprised Mr. Dallas 
protest proposed unofficial intercourse British 
Government insurgents well 
demand explanations made British due, 
however, Mr. Dallas say instructions given 
him, loyalty rare 
times late representatives abroad, confessed 

 
Intercourse kind so-called commissioners liable 
construed recognition authority appointed them. 
intercourse would none less us 
called might even 
means knowing points might resolved it. Moreover, 
unofficial intercourse useless expected 
official intercourse direct recognition. left 
doubtful whether proposed unofficial intercourse yet actually 
instructions deemed explicit 
enough, hoped misunderstood them. 
event intercourse whatever, unofficial well 
British Government, long shall continue 
intercourse either kind domestic enemies country 
delivery copy paper Secretary 
State. intercourse shall arrested 
cause, communicate department receive 
directions. 
 
Lord John Russell informed us understanding British 
French governments act together regard 
affairs. communication, however, loses something value 
circumstance communication withheld knowledge 
fact acquired us know also 
another fact yet officially communicated 
European States France England 
expected concur follow whatever 
measures adopt subject recognition. United States 
impartial conduct toward several nations 
Europe. however, combination announced 
two leading powers, although think right expect 
course them. 
take notice Whenever European 
governments shall see fit communicate directly us, shall be, 
heretofore, frank explicit reply. 
 
blockade, say laws 
laws nature laws nations, Government 
clear right suppress insurrection. exclusion commerce 
national ports seized insurgents, equitable 
form blockade, proper means end. 
insist blockade respected maintained 
competent passing question 
least one, add blockade now, 
continue maintained, therefore expect 
respected Great add already revoked 
Russian enlisted military service 
insurgents, shall dismiss demand recall every foreign 
consular shall either Federal laws 
Federal authority. 
 
recognition so-called Southern Confederacy, 
made subject technical is, course, 
direct recognition publish acknowledgment sovereignty 
independence new power. direct recognition receive 
commissioners 
concession belligerent rights liable construed 
recognition them. one proceedings pass 
unquestioned United States case. 
 
Hitherto recognition moved assumption 
so-called Confederate States de power. Now, 
long designed avert need 
civil war, land naval forces United States put 
motion repress insurrection. true character pretended 
new State seen power existing 
only, never won field. obtained forts 
virtually betrayed hands seized breach 
commands single port coast 
pretended capital land. circumstances Great Britain 
called upon give body independence resisting 
measures British recognition would British 
intervention create within territory hostile state 
republic itself. act intervention 
distinctly performed, hour shall cease friends, 
become more, twice forced be, enemies 
Great 
 
treatment insurgent service, say 
question exclusively own. treat 
citizens, persons employed citizens, 
commerce country. Great Britain shall choose recognize 
lawful give shelter pursuit 
laws nations afford adequate proper remedy 
shall avail it. need say 
advance, sure say nothing inconsistent 
 
however, Britannic Majesty's government avoid 
difficulties. invited us 1856 declaration 
Congress Paris, body Great Britain 
abolishing everywhere cases forever. already 
authority propose accession declaration. 
refuse receive it, willing become 

 
positions defended now, 
would possibility them. 
 
1 grave importance 
 
1 line end, lieu write, "This 
paper only, read shown 

 
Seward, despatch returned him, added 
introductory paragraph stating document strictly 
confidential. reason last two remained 

 
occasion. see how, upon result debate 
engaged, war may United States one, two, even 
European nations. War case habits 
sentiments American people. 
come, fully seen results action Great 
Britain, own; Great Britain decided 
domestic enemy, either without waiting hear 
heard them. War defense 
national life war defense independence 
inevitable part discipline nations. 
 
dispute European American branches 
British race. belong race especially it, 
may well believed men every race kindred 
it. war unlike parties occurred 
close last century. Europe forty years suffering 
error Great Britain committed contest. 
nation shall repeat great error, social 
follow may long, general. 
shall ceased, will, think, seen, whatever may 
nations, United States 
come precious Constitution altered 
honestly obtained degree Great Britain 
wait months present cease 
take different course, 
ultimate well immediate consequences, 
consider position hold shall forever lost 
sympathies nation whose sympathies 
natural claim. making calculation 
well remember controversy proposes open shall 
actuated neither pride, passion, 
shall stand simply principle 
cause involve independence nations rights human 
nature. 
 
am, Sir, respectfully obedient servant, W. H. S. 
 
CHARLES FRANCIS ADAMS, Esq., 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, May 21, 1861. 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. DEAR cannot Colonel 
Philadelphia regiment sincerely wish could. 
something strange it. Give gentlemen take 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, May 12, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR E. D. MORGAN, Albany, 
 
wish see face face clear difficulties 
troops New York. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
CAPTAIN 
 
EXECUTIVE, MANSION, May 23, 1863. 
 

 
DEAR introduce Col. J. A. 
district Illinois. desire visit Fortress Monroe, please 
introduce captain one vessels service, 
pass back. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER ONE FIRST CASUALTIES 
 
COLONEL WASHINGTON, D.C., May 25, 1861 
 
FATHER MOTHER COL. E. 
 
DEAR SIR loss noble son, 
affliction scarcely less own. much promised 
usefulness one's country, bright hopes one's self 
friends, never suddenly dashed fall. size, 
years, appearance boy only, power command men 
great. power, combined fine intellectual 
energy, taste altogether military, constituted him, 
seemed me, best natural talent department ever knew. 
yet singularly modest social intercourse. 
acquaintance began less two years ago; yet, 
latter half intervening period, intense 
ages would permit. appeared 
never heard utter 
word. conclusive good heart, never 
forgot honors labored which, 
sad end, gave life, meant less 
himself. 
 
hope may upon sacredness 
sorrow, ventured address memory 
young friend brave early fallen son. 
 
May God give consolation beyond early power. 
 
Sincerely friend common 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
COLONEL 
 
WASHINGTON, May 27, 1861 
 
COL. W. A. New York. 
 
Naval Brigade go Fort Monroe without trouble 
government, must go all. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM INDIANA REGIMENTS. 
 
WASHINGTON, JUNE 11, 1861 
 
 government already accepted ten regiments State 
Indiana. think least six ought received State, 
two Colonel James W. Colonel William L. 
Brown, four designated Governor State 
Indiana, received volunteer service United 
States according General Orders 
War Department, report Major-General McClellan 
condition pass muster according order, approval 
Secretary War indorsed left department, 
direct whole six, smaller number regiments, 
received. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, JUNE 13, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR is, seems, regiment Massachusetts commanded 
Webster, HON. Daniel old friends much 
wish get service. received approval 
department consent Governor Massachusetts shall 
indeed much Give Mr. chance explain fully. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, JUNE 13, 1861 HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR think entirely safe accept fifth regiment 
Michigan, approbation say regiment presented 
Col. T. B. W. ready service within two weeks now, 
received. Look Colonel 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, June 17, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR Governor Indiana, 
favor accepting call three years' service 
number exceeding four additional regiments State. Probably 
come region Ohio 
Rivers, including old home. Please see HON. C. M. 
Speaker Indiana House Representatives, unless perceive 
good reason contrary, draw order according 
above. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY WAR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, JUNE 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. DEAR 
Governor Ohio, favor receiving call 
three years' service number exceeding six additional regiments 
State, unless perceive good reasons contrary. Please 
see HON. John A. bears this, make order corresponding 
above. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
N. W. EDWARDS 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., June 19, 1861 
 
Hon. N. W. EDWARDS DEAR SIR: 
 
wrote time ago reference looking something 
departments here, thought would inquire thing 
write you, extraordinary pressure upon diverted it, 
soon passed mind. thing proposed, seemed me, 
ought understand set foot direction 
really time make acquainted it. 
yet. yet course, 
deprived chance make something, done without 
injustice Government, choose come 
point done shall object, 
shall gratified able oblige you. 
 
friend ever 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CAMERON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, June 20, 1861. 
 
DEAR spoke yesterday General J. H. Lane, 
Kansas, upon subject, concluded 
need service man better 
appoint brigadier-general volunteers to-day, send 
authority raise force (I think two regiments better 
three, think get 
actual work Tell him, put 
writing telegraphing back here, put through. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
General Lane authorized raise two additional regiments 
volunteers. 
 
SIMON CAMERON, Secretary o f War. 
 
 
 
 
KENTUCKY 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, June 29, 1861. 
 
GENTLEMEN KENTUCKY DELEGATION 
 
somewhat wish authorize friend Jesse raise Kentucky 
regiment, wish without consent. consent, 
please write bottom this. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
   
   R. 
   H. 
   G. W. 
   J. S. JACKSON. 
   C. A. 
 
 
 
 
August 5, 1861. 
 
repeat, would like Col. raise regiment cavalry 
whenever Union men Kentucky desire consent it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER AUTHORIZING GENERAL SCOTT SUSPEND WRIT HABEAS CORPUS, JULY 
2, 1861 
 
COMMANDING GENERAL, ARMY UNITED STATES: 
 
engaged suppressing insurrection laws 
United States. point vicinity military line 
shall used city New York 
city Washington find resistance renders necessary 
suspend writ habeas corpus public safety, personally, 
officer command point resistance occurs, 
authorized suspend 
 
Given hand seal United States city 
Washington, second day July, A.D. 1861, independence 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY SEWARD. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, JULY 3, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY STATE. 
 
DEAR Scott sent copy despatch 
kindly sent one. Thanks you. Please assemble 
Cabinet twelve to-day look message 
 
now, suppose step let us see General Scott 
General position General Fremont. 
 
ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS SPECIAL SESSION, 
 
JULY 4, 1861. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE 
extraordinary occasion, authorized Constitution, 
attention called ordinary subject legislation. 
 
beginning present Presidential term, four months ago, 
functions Federal Government found generally 
suspended within several States South Carolina, Georgia, Alabama, 
Mississippi, Louisiana, Florida, excepting 
Post-Office Department. 
 
Within States forts, 
like, including movable property 
them, held open hostility government, 
excepting Forts Taylor, Jefferson, near 
Florida Fort Sumter, Charleston Harbor, South Carolina. 
forts thus seized put improved condition, new ones 
armed forces organized 
avowedly hostile purpose. 
 
forts remaining possession Federal Government 
near States either menaced 
especially Fort Sumter nearly surrounded 
hostile guns equal quality best own, 
latter perhaps ten one. share 
Federal somehow found way 
States, seized used government. 
public revenue lying within seized 
object. navy scattered distant leaving 
small part within immediate reach government. 
Officers Federal army navy resigned great 
large proportion taken arms 
government. connection this, purpose 
Federal Union openly accordance 
purpose, ordinance adopted States, declaring 
States respectively separated national Union. 
formula combined government States 
organization, character 
confederate States, already aid, 
intervention foreign powers. 
 
Finding condition things, believing imperative 
duty upon incoming executive possible, consummation 
attempt destroy Federal Union, choice means 
end became indispensable. choice made declared 
inaugural address. policy chosen looked 
peaceful measures resort stronger ones. sought 
hold public places property already 
government, collect revenue, rest time, 
discussion, promised continuance 
government expense, people resisting government; 
gave repeated pledges disturbance 
people, rights. President might 
constitutionally justifiably case, everything 
forborne without believed possible keep government 

 
5th March (the present first full day 
letter Major Anderson, commanding Fort Sumter, written 28th 
February received War Department 4th March, 
department placed hands. letter expressed 
professional opinion writer reinforcements could thrown 
fort within time relief, rendered necessary 
limited supply provisions, view holding possession 
same, force less twenty thousand good 
men. opinion concurred officers command, 
subject made Major 
letter. whole immediately laid Lieutenant-General Scott, 
concurred Major Anderson opinion. reflection, 
however, took full time, officers, 
army navy, end four days came 
decidedly conclusion before. also stated 
time sufficient force control 
government, could raised brought ground within time 
provisions fort would purely military 
point view, reduced duty administration case 
mere matter getting garrison safely 
 
believed, however, abandon position, 
circumstances, would utterly necessity 
done would fully many would 
construed part voluntary home would 
discourage friends Union, adversaries, go far 
insure latter recognition fact, would 
national destruction could 
yet upon ere would reached 
Fort might last would clear 
policy, would better enable country accept evacuation 
Fort Sumter military necessity. order directed 
sent landing troops Fort 
order could go land, must take longer 
route first return news order received 
one week fall Fort Sumter. news 
officer commanding vessel troops 
transferred acting upon armistice 
late administration (and existence present 
administration, time order 
vague uncertain fix refused land 
troops. reinforce Fort crisis would reached 
Fort Sumter near 
provisions 
government had, days before, commenced preparing 
expedition well adapted might relieve Fort Sumter, 
expedition intended ultimately used, not, according 
circumstances. strongest anticipated case using 
presented, resolved send forward. intended 
also resolved notify governor South 
Carolina might expect attempt would made provision 
that, attempt would 
effort throw men, arms, ammunition, without notice, 
case attack upon notice accordingly 
fort attacked fall, without even 
arrival 
 
thus seen assault upon reduction Fort Sumter 
sense matter part 
well knew garrison fort could possibility commit 
upon them. expressly 
giving bread brave men garrison 
would occasion attempted, unless themselves, resisting 
much, more. knew government desired 
keep garrison assail them, merely maintain 
visible thus preserve Union actual 
immediate hereinbefore stated, time, 
discussion, final assailed 
reduced fort precisely reverse drive 
visible authority Federal Union, thus force immediate 
object executive well 
said inaugural address, "You conflict 
without took pains keep 
declaration good, also keep case free power 
ingenious world able misunderstand 
it. affair Fort Sumter, surrounding circumstances, 
point reached. thereby government began 
conflict arms, without gun sight return 
fire, save fort sent harbor years 
protection, still ready give protection 
whatever act, discarding else, forced 
upon country distinct issue, dissolution 
 
issue embraces fate United States. 
presents whole family man question whether constitutional 
republic government people 
cannot maintain territorial integrity domestic 
presents question whether individuals, 
numbers control administration according organic law 
case, upon made case, 
arbitrarily without break government, 
thus practically put end free government upon earth. 
forces us inherent fatal 
Must government, necessity, strong liberties 
people, weak maintain existence? 
 
issue, choice left call war power 
government, resist force employed destruction 
force 
 
call made, response country 
unanimity spirit sanguine Yet 
none States commonly called slave States, except Delaware, gave 
regiment regular State organization. regiments 
organized within others States individual enterprise, 
received government service. course seceded States, 
called (and Texas joined time 
gave troops cause Union. 
 
border States, called, uniform action, 
almost Union, Virginia, 
North Carolina, Tennessee, Union sentiment nearly 
course taken Virginia 
important. convention elected people 
State consider question Federal 
Union session capital Virginia Fort Sumter fell. 
body people chosen large majority professed Union men. 
Almost immediately fall Sumter, many members majority 
went original disunion minority, adopted 
ordinance withdrawing State Union. Whether change 
wrought great approval assault upon Sumter, 
great resistance 
definitely known. Although submitted ordinance ratification 
vote people, taken day somewhat 
month convention Legislature (which also 
session time leading men State 
members either, immediately commenced acting State 
already Union. pushed military 
forward State. seized United States 
Harper's Ferry, navy-yard near received 
perhaps State large bodies troops, 
appointments, so-called seceded States. formally 
entered treaty temporary co-operation 
so-called States," sent members congress 
finally, permitted insurrectionary government 
transferred capital Richmond. 
 
people Virginia thus allowed giant insurrection make 
within government choice left 
deal finds it. less regret loyal 
citizens have, due form, claimed protection. loyal citizens 
government bound recognize protect, Virginia. 
 
border States, fact, middle 
favor policy call is, 
arming States prevent Union forces passing one way, 
disunion other, soil. would disunion 
speaking, would building impassable wall 
along line yet quite impassable one, 
would tie hands Union men 
freely pass supplies among 
could open enemy. would take trouble 
hands secession, except proceeds external 
blockade. would which, things, 
well give disunion without struggle 
own. recognizes fidelity Constitution, obligation 
maintain Union; many favored doubtless 
loyal citizens, is, nevertheless, injurious effect. 
 
action government, may stated 
first call made 75,000 and, rapidly following this, 
proclamation issued closing ports insurrectionary 
districts proceedings nature blockade. far 
believed strictly point 
announced purpose enter upon practice 
 
calls made volunteers serve three years, unless 
sooner discharged, also large additions regular army 
navy. measures, whether strictly legal not, ventured 
upon, appeared popular demand public 
trusting then, now, Congress would readily ratify them. 
believed nothing done beyond constitutional 
Congress. 
 
Soon first call considered duty 
authorize commanding general proper cases, according 
discretion, suspend privilege writ habeas corpus, or, 
words, arrest without resort ordinary 
processes forms law, individuals might deem dangerous 
public safety. authority purposely exercised 
Nevertheless, propriety done 
questioned, attention country called 
proposition one sworn "take care laws 
faithfully violate them. course 
consideration given questions power propriety 
matter acted upon. whole laws required 
faithfully executed resisted failing execution 
nearly one third States. Must allowed finally fail 
execution, even perfectly clear use 
means necessary execution single law, made extreme 
liberty that, relieves 
guilty innocent, limited extent 
state question directly, laws one 
go government go pieces lest one 
Even case, would official oath broken 
government believed disregarding 
single law would tend preserve it? believed 
question presented. believed law 
provision Constitution "the privilege 
writ habeas corpus shall suspended, unless when, cases 
rebellion invasion, public safety may require it," equivalent 
privilege may suspended when, 
case rebellion invasion, public safety require it. 
decided case rebellion, public safety 
require qualified suspension privilege writ 
authorized made. insisted Congress, 
executive, vested power. Constitution 
silent exercise power; provision 
plainly made dangerous cannot believed 
framers instrument intended every case danger 
run course Congress could called together, 
assembling might intended case, 
rebellion. 
 
extended argument offered, opinion length 
probably presented Whether shall 
legislation upon subject, any, what, submitted entirely 
better judgment Congress. 
 
forbearance government extraordinary long 
continued lead foreign nations shape action 
supposed early destruction national Union 
this, discovery, gave executive happy 
say sovereignty rights United States 
everywhere practically respected foreign general sympathy 
country manifested throughout world. 
 
reports Secretaries Treasury, War, Navy 
give information detail deemed necessary convenient 
executive departments 
stand ready supply communicate new facts considered 
important know. 
 
recommended give legal means making 
contest short decisive place control 
government work least four hundred thousand men 
number men proper 
ages within regions where, willing 
sum less part money value owned 
men seem ready devote whole. debt 
less sum per head debt Revolution came 
money value country bears even greater 
proportion Surely man 
strong motive preserve liberties 
establish them. 
 
right result time worth world ten times 
men ten times money. evidence reaching us country 
leaves doubt material work 
needs hand legislation give legal sanction, hand 
executive give practical shape efficiency. One 
greatest government avoid receiving troops 
faster provide them. word, people save 
government government part 
well. 
 
might first thought, little difference whether 
present movement South called 
however, well understand difference. beginning 
knew could never raise treason respectable magnitude 
name violation law. knew people possessed 
much moral sense, much devotion law order, much 
pride reverence history government common 
country civilized patriotic people. knew 
could make advancement directly teeth strong noble 
Accordingly, commenced insidious 
public mind. invented ingenious sophism which, 
followed perfectly logical 
complete destruction Union. sophism State 
Union may consistently national Constitution, therefore 
lawfully withdraw Union without consent 
Union State. little disguise supposed 
right exercised cause, sole 
judges justice, thin merit notice. 
 
rebellion thus public mind 
section thirty years, length 
brought many good men take arms 
government day assemblage men enacted 
pretense taking State Union, could 
brought thing day before. 
 
sophism derives much, perhaps whole, currency 
assumption sacred supremacy pertaining 
State Federal Union. States neither 
less power reserved Union 
one ever State Union. 
original ones passed Union even cast 
British colonial new ones came Union 
directly condition excepting Texas. even Texas 
temporary independence never designated State. new ones 
took States coming Union, 
name first adopted old ones Declaration 
Independence. Therein declared "free 
independent even object plainly declare 
independence one another Union, directly 
contrary, mutual pledge mutual action before, 
time, afterward, abundantly show. express faith 
original thirteen Articles 
two years later, Union shall perpetual, 
never States either substance name outside 
Union, whence asserting 
claim power lawfully destroy Union Much said 
States; word even national 
Constitution, nor, believed, State constitutions. 
political sense Would far wrong 
define "a political community without political 
Tested this, one States except Texas ever sovereignty. 
even Texas gave character coming Union; 
act acknowledged Constitution United States, laws 
treaties United States made pursuance Constitution, 
supreme law land. States 
Union, legal break this, 
law revolution. Union, 
procured independence liberty. 
purchase Union gave whatever independence 
liberty has. Union older States, and, 
fact, created States. Originally dependent colonies made 
Union, and, turn, Union threw old dependence 
them, made States, are. one ever 
State constitution independent Union. course, 
forgotten new States framed constitutions 
entered Union nevertheless, dependent upon preparatory coming 
Union. 
 
Unquestionably States powers rights reserved 
national Constitution; among surely included 
conceivable powers, however mischievous but, most, 
known world time governmental 
certainly power destroy government never 
known merely administrative power. relative 
matter national power State rights, principle, 
principle Whatever concerns whole 
confided General Government; whatever 
concerns State left exclusively State. 
original principle it. Whether national 
Constitution boundaries two applied 
principle exact accuracy, bound 
without question. 
 
position secession consistent 
lawful contended 
express law it; nothing ever implied law 
leads unjust absurd consequences. nation purchased money 
countries several States formed. 
shall go without leave without nation 
paid large sums (in believe, nearly hundred 
relieve Florida 
shall without consent without making 
nation debt money applied benefit so-called 
seceding States common rest. either creditors 
shall go remaining States pay part 
present national debt contracted pay old debts Texas. 
shall leave pay part 
 
Again, one State may may another; shall 
none left pay quite 
notify sage view borrowed 
recognize doctrine allowing seceders go peace, 
difficult see others choose go extort 
terms upon promise remain. 
 
seceders insist Constitution admits 
assumed make national constitution own, 
necessity either discarded retained right secession 
insist exists ours. discarded it, thereby 
admit principle ought ours. retained 
it, construction ours, show consistent 
must secede one another whenever shall find 
way settling debts, effecting selfish unjust 
object. principle one upon 
government possibly endure. 
 
States save one assert power drive one 
Union, whole class politicians would 
deny power denounce act greatest outrage upon 
State rights. suppose precisely act, instead 
called one called "the seceding others 
one," would exactly seceders claim do, 
indeed, make point one, minority, 
may rightfully others, majority, may 
rightfully do. politicians subtle profound rights 
partial power made Constitution 
speaks preamble calling 
 
may well questioned whether to-day majority 
legally qualified voters State except perhaps South Carolina 
favor much reason believe Union men 
majority many, every one, so-called seceded 
States. contrary demonstrated one them. 
ventured affirm even Virginia Tennessee; result 
election held military one side 
question voted upon, scarcely considered 
popular sentiment. election, large class 
Union coercion would vote 
Union. 
 
may affirmed without free institutions 
enjoy developed powers improved condition whole 
people beyond example world. striking 
large army government 
foot never known without soldier taken 
place free this, many 
single regiments whose members, one another, possess full practical 
knowledge whatever else, 
whether useful known world; scarcely 
one could selected President, Cabinet, 
Congress, perhaps court, abundantly competent administer 
government itself. say true also army 
late friends, adversaries is, much 
better reason government conferred benefits 
us broken up. Whoever section proposes 
abandon government would well consider deference 
principle it; better likely get 
whether substitute give, intended give, 
much good people. subject. 
adversaries adopted declarations independence which, 
unlike good old one, penned Jefferson, omit words "all 
men created equal." Why? adopted temporary national 
constitution, preamble which, unlike good old one, signed 
Washington, omit 
sovereign independent States." Why? deliberate 
pressing view rights men authority people? 
 
essentially people's contest. side Union 
struggle maintaining world form substance 
government whose leading object condition men 
lift artificial clear paths laudable 
pursuit all; afford start, fair chance 
race life. Yielding partial temporary 
leading object government whose 
existence 
 
happy believe plain people understand appreciate 
this. worthy note that, hour 
trial large numbers army navy favored 
offices resigned proved false hand 
them, one common soldier common known 
deserted flag. 
 
Great honor due officers remained true, despite 
example greatest honor, 
important fact all, unanimous firmness common soldiers 
common last man, far known, 
successfully resisted efforts whose commands, 
hour before, obeyed absolute law. patriotic 
instinct plain people. understand, without argument, 
destroying government made Washington means 
good them. 
 
popular government often called experiment. Two points 
people already successful establishing 
successful administering it. One still successful 
maintenance formidable internal attempt overthrow it. 
demonstrate world fairly carry 
election also suppress rebellion; ballots rightful 
peaceful successors bullets; ballots fairly 
constitutionally decided, successful appeal back 
bullets; successful except ballots 
themselves, succeeding elections. great 
teaching men cannot take election, neither 
take war; teaching folly war. 
 
Lest uneasiness minds candid men 
course government toward Southern States 
rebellion shall suppressed, executive deems proper say 
purpose then, ever, guided Constitution 
laws; probably different understanding 
powers duties Federal Government relatively rights 
States people, Constitution, expressed 
inaugural address. 
 
desires preserve government, may administered 
administered men made it. Loyal citizens everywhere 
right claim government, government 
right withhold neglect it. perceived giving 
sense 
terms. 
 
Constitution States accepted provision, 
"the United States shall guarantee every State Union 
republican form State may lawfully go 
Union, done may also discard republican form 
government, prevent going indispensable means 
end maintaining guarantee mentioned; end 
lawful indispensable means also lawful 

 
deepest regret executive found duty 
employing war power defense government forced upon him. 
could perform duty surrender existence government. 
compromise public servants could, case, 
compromises often proper, popular government long 
marked precedent carry election save 
government immediate destruction giving main point upon 
people gave election. people themselves, 
servants, safely reverse deliberate decisions. 
 
private citizen executive could consented 
institutions shall much less could vast 
sacred trust free people confided him. felt 
moral right even count chances 
life, might follow. full view great responsibility 
has, far, done deemed duty. now, according 
judgment, perform yours. sincerely hopes views 
action may accord assure faithful citizens 
disturbed rights certain speedy restoration 
them, Constitution laws. 
 
thus chosen course, without pure purpose, 
let us renew trust God, go forward without fear manly 

 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
July 4, 1861 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, July 6, 1861. 
 
HON. SEC. INTERIOR. 
 
DEAR ask Indian Affairs, 
Land Office come you, see once. want assistance 
list appointments little send 
Senate. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
answer resolution House Representatives 9th 
instant, requesting copy correspondence upon subject 
republic Spanish 
transmit report Secretary State; resolution 

 
WASHINGTON, July 11, 1861. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
transmit Congress copy correspondence Secretary 
State Britannic Majesty's envoy extraordinary minister 
accredited government, relative exhibition 
products industry nations, take place 
London course next year. citizens United States may 
justly pride upon industrial 
desirable proper facilities toward taking part 
view recommend legislation Congress 
session may necessary purpose. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 16, 1861 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
United States have, common Great Britain France, deep 
interest preservation development adjacent 
coast continent, seems proper 
concert governments countries measures 
may important objects. view transmit 
Congress copy correspondence Secretary State 
British minister here, latter behalf 
government, appointment joint commission inquire 
matter, order measures may adopted may 
advisable objects proposed. legislation recommended may 
necessary enable executive provide commissioner behalf 
United States: 
 
WASHINGTON, JULY 19, 1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ADJUTANT-GENERAL 
 
WASHINGTON, JULY 19, 1861 
 

 
agree, two Indian regiments named within 
shall accepted act Congress shall admit it. Let 
question it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MILITARY POLICY SUGGESTED BULL RUN JULY 23, 
1861 
 
1. Let plan making blockade effective pushed forward 
possible despatch. 
 
2. Let volunteer forces Fort Monroe vicinity General 
Butler constantly instructed without 
present. 
 
3. Let Baltimore held now, gentle firm certain hand. 
 
4. Let force Banks strengthened made 
secure position. 
 
5. Let forces Western Virginia act till orders according 
instructions orders General McClellan. 
 
6. General Fremont push forward organization operations 
West rapidly possible, giving rather special attention 
Missouri. 
 
Let forces late Manassas, except men, 
rapidly possible 

 
Let forces decline enter longer service 
discharged rapidly circumstances permit. 
 
9. Let new volunteer forces brought forward fast possible, 
especially two sides river here. 
 
foregoing shall substantially attended 
 
1. Let Manassas Junction (or point one railroads 
near it) Strasburg permanently held, open 
line Washington Manassas, open line Harper's Ferry 
Strasburg military men find way 
 
2. done, joint movement Cincinnati 
East Tennessee. 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR NEW JERSEY. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., July 24, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR NEW JERSEY. 
 
regiments three years' volunteers 
government already service State, enough make eight 
all, tendered reasonable time, accepted, new regiments 
taken, far convenient, three months' men officers 
discharged, organized, sent forward fast 
single regiments ready, terms already 
service State. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
order entered War Department, Governor New 
Jersey authorized furnish regiments wagons 
 
S. CAMERON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
answer resolution House Representatives 22d 
requesting copy correspondence this, government 
foreign powers reference maritime right, transmit report 
Secretary State. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 25, 1861 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
answer resolution House Representatives 15th 
instant, requesting copy correspondence government 
foreign powers subject existing insurrection 
United States, transmit report Secretary State. 
 
WASHINGTON, July 25, 1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CHASE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, JULY 16, 1861 
 
MR Mr. wants ------ custom house 
Baltimore. recommendations satisfactory, recollect 
so, fact urged 
favor, complain us some. 
 
LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
answer resolution House Representatives 24th 
instant, asking grounds, reasons, evidence upon police 
Commissioners Baltimore arrested detained prisoners 
Port state judged incompatible 
public interest time furnish information called 
resolution. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, JULY 27, 1861 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
answer resolution Senate 19th instant requesting 
information concerning armistice alluded message 
4th instant, transmit report Secretary Navy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
JULY 30, 1861 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
answer resolution Senate 23d instant requesting 
information concerning imprisonment Lieutenant John J. 
L. United States navy, transmit report 
Secretary Navy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
July 30, 1861 
 
 
 
 
ORDER UNITED STATES 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, D.C., JULY 31, 1861 
 
United States vicinity forts political 
prisoners held supply decent 
prisoners unless shall prefer provide respects 
themselves, case allowed commanding 
officer charge. 
 
Approved, Secretary State transmit order 
Secretary Interior. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES. 
 
HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
answer resolution House Representatives yesterday, 
requesting information regarding imprisonment loyal citizens 
United States forces rebellion government, 
transmit report Secretary State, copy 
telegraphic despatch 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
WASHINGTON, August 2, 1861. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
answer resolution honorable body date July 31, 1861, 
requesting President inform Senate whether Hon. James 
H. Lane, member body Kansas, appointed 
brigadier-general army United States, so, whether 
accepted appointment, honor transmit herewith 
certain papers, numbered 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, which, taken together, 
explain themselves, contain information possess upon 
questions 
 
intention, shown letter June 20, 1861, appoint 
Hon. James H. Lane, Kansas, brigadier-general United States 
volunteers anticipation act Congress, since passed, 
raising knowledge upon subject, 
except derived papers herewith 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, August 5, 1861 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CAMERON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, AUGUST 7, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR 
 
DEAR SIR:--The within paper, see, HON. John S. 
HON. Frank P. Blair, Jr., members present Congress 
Missouri. object get efficient force 
part State. ought done, Mr. ought 
general it. see private report 
department eighteen regiments already accepted 
Missouri. arranged part (not yet organized, 
may taken mentioned put 
control Mr. let discretion accept 
shorter term three however, 
get full term hope done, 
Mr. efficient understands ground 
well us lose service. course provision 
etc., must made. Mr. here, wishes carry 
home authority matter. 
 
truly, 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION NATIONAL AUGUST 12, 1861. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas joint committee houses Congress waited 
President United States requested day 
public prayer, observed people 
United States religious offering 
Almighty God safety welfare States, 
blessings arms, speedy restoration 
 
Whereas fit becoming people times acknowledge 
supreme government God, bow humble submission 
confess 
full conviction fear Lord beginning wisdom, 
pray pardon past 
offences blessing upon present prospective 
 
Whereas beloved country, once, blessing God, 
happy, afflicted faction civil 
war, peculiarly fit us recognize hand God 
terrible 
crimes nation individuals humble 
pray pray may spared 
though justly arms may blessed made 
effectual order, law, peace throughout 
wide extent country, inestimable civil 
religious liberty, blessing labors 
sufferings fathers, may restored original 

 
Therefore I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, appoint 
last Thursday September next day prayer, 
people nation. earnestly recommend 
people, especially ministers religion 
heads families, observe keep 
day according several modes worship 
religious end united 
prayer nation may Grace bring 
blessings upon country. 
 
     testimony whereof hereunto set hand 
     caused seal United States 
 
     twelfth day August, A. D. 
     1861, independence United 
     States America 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, 
 Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
JAMES 
 
WASHINGTON, AUGUST 15, 1861 
 
HON. JAMES 
 
DEAR SIR:--You must make job bearer job 
done. 
 
ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR O. P. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., AUGUST 15, 1861 
 
GOVERNOR MORTON, Start four regiments St. Louis 
earliest moment possible. Get may necessary 
delay single regiment, everything forward 
soon one regiment ready. three additional regiments 
organized once. shall endeavor send arms week. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL FREMONT, 
 
WASHINGTON, August 15, 1861 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
answering messages since day yesterday. receive 
War Department notified governors 
designate forward available force. telegraphed you. 
received Answer immediately. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION FORBIDDING INTERCOURSE REBEL STATES, AUGUST 16, 1861. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas fifteenth day April, eighteen hundred sixty-one, 
President United States, view insurrection 
laws, Constitution, government United States broken 
within States South Carolina, Georgia, Alabama, Florida, 
Mississippi, Louisiana, Texas, pursuance provisions 
act entitled "An act provide calling forth militia 
execute laws Union, suppress repel 
repeal act force approved 
February seventeen hundred call forth 
militia suppress said insurrection, cause laws 
Union duly insurgents failed disperse 
time directed President; whereas insurrection 
since broken yet exists within States Virginia, North 
Carolina, Tennessee, whereas insurgents 
said States claim act authority thereof, claim 
repudiated persons exercising functions 
government State States, part parts thereof 
combinations exist, insurrection suppressed 
said States: 
 
Now, therefore, I, Abraham Lincoln, President United States, 
pursuance act Congress approved July eighteen hundred 
sixty-one, hereby declare inhabitants said States 
Georgia, South Carolina, Virginia, North Carolina, Tennessee, 
Alabama, Louisiana, Texas, Arkansas, Mississippi, Florida (except 
inhabitants part State Virginia lying west 
Mountains, parts State, 
States hereinbefore may maintain loyal adhesion Union 
Constitution, may time time occupied controlled 
forces United States engaged said 
state insurrection United States, 
commercial intercourse inhabitants thereof, 
exceptions aforesaid, citizens States parts 
United States, remain unlawful 
insurrection shall cease goods 
coming said States, 
exceptions aforesaid, parts United States, without 
special license permission President, Secretary 
Treasury, proceeding said States, exceptions 
aforesaid, land water, together vessel 
conveying same, conveying persons said States, 
said exceptions, forfeited United States; 
fifteen days issuing proclamation ships 
vessels belonging whole part citizen 
said States, said exceptions, found sea, port 
United States, forfeited United States; hereby enjoin 
upon district officers revenue 
military naval forces United States 
execution said act, enforcement 
imposed declared it; leaving party may think 
thereby application Secretary 
Treasury penalty said 
Secretary authorized law grant if, judgment, special 
circumstances case shall require 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:   WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CAMERON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, August 17, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR reason contrary, known 
me, make commission Simon B. Kentucky, 
brigadier-general volunteers. put hands General 
Anderson, delivered General not, discretion 
General course remain secret unless 
commission delivered. 
 
truly, A. LINCOLN 
 
day made. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
 
 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., AUGUST 24, 1861 
 
EXCELLENCY B. Governor State Kentucky. 
 
SIR:--Your letter 19th instant, urge 
limits Kentucky military force organized camp 
within received. 
 
may possess full precisely accurate knowledge upon subject; 
believe true military force camp within 
Kentucky, acting authority United States, force 
large, augmented. 
 
also believe arms furnished force 
United States. 
 
also believe force consists exclusively Kentuckians, 
camp immediate vicinity homes, 
menacing good people Kentucky. 
 
done acted upon urgent 
many Kentuckians, accordance believed, 
still believe, wish majority 
people Kentucky. 
 
subject many eminent men Kentucky, 
including large majority members Congress, remember 
one them, person, except Excellency 
letter, urged remove military 
force Kentucky it. One worthy citizen 
Kentucky augmenting force suspended 
time. 
 
Taking means within reach form judgment, believe 
popular wish Kentucky force shall removed beyond 
limits; and, must respectfully decline 
remove it. 
 
cordially Excellency wish preserve 
peace native State, Kentucky. regret search, 
cannot find, short letter, declaration 
intimation entertain desire preservation 
Federal Union. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., SEPTEMBER 2, 1861 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
DEAR points proclamation August 30 give 
anxiety. 
 
First. shoot man, according proclamation, 
would certainly shoot best men hands 
so, man man, is, therefore, order 
allow man shot proclamation without first 
approbation consent. 
 
Second. think great danger closing 
relation confiscation property slaves 
owners, alarm Southern Union friends turn 
us; perhaps ruin rather fair prospect Kentucky. Allow 
me, therefore, ask will, motion, modify 
paragraph conform first fourth sections act 
Congress entitled "An act confiscate property used insurrectionary 
purposes," approved August 6, 1861, copy act herewith 
send you. 
 
letter written spirit caution, send 
special order may certainly speedily reach 
you. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNORS 
 
MAINE, VERMONT, NEW HAMPSHIRE, ANDREW 
MASSACHUSETTS, CONNECTICUT, RHODE 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, September 11, 1861. 
 
General Butler proposes raising New England six regiments, 
recruited commanded himself, go special service. 
 
shall glad you, governor answer telegraph 
consent. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., SEPTEMBER 11, 1861 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL JOHN C. FREMONT. 
 
answer mine 2d instant, 
received. Assuming you, upon ground, could better judge 
necessities position could distance, seeing 
proclamation August 30 perceived general objection it. 
particular however, relation confiscation property 
liberation slaves appeared objectionable 
act Congress passed 6th last August upon 
hence wrote you, expressing wish 
clause modified accordingly. answer, received, 
expresses preference part make open order 
cheerfully do. therefore ordered 
said clause said proclamation held, construed 
conform to, provisions subject 
contained act Congress entitled "An act confiscate property 
used insurrectionary purposes," approved August 6, 1861, said 
act published length order. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MRS. FREMONT. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 12, 1861 
 
Mrs. GENERAL FREMONT. 
 
DEAR two notes to-day me. answered 
letter bore General Fremont yesterday, hearing 
day, sent answer mail. exactly 
correct, say told Mr. Blair, say 
sent Postmaster-General Blair St. Louis examine department 
report. Postmaster-General Blair go, see 
converse General Fremont friend. feel authorized 
furnish copies letters possession without consent 
impression made mind honor 
integrity General Fremont, enter protest 
understood acting hostility toward him. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
JOSEPH 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, SEPTEMBER 12, 1861 
 
HON. JOSEPH 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours day relation late proclamation 
General Fremont received yesterday addressed letter him, 
mail, subject, made public receives 
it. herewith send copy letter, perhaps shows 
position distinctly new one could write. thank 
make public General Fremont shall time receive 

 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL SCOTT 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., September 16, 1861. 
 
DEAR concluded request 
frame order recruiting North Fort 
suggest framed us accept smaller 
cannot get regiment more. necessary 
say officers judge. Governor Seward says 
A. Seward, would willing go play 
colonel assist raising force. Still considered 
whether North prefer officers own. 
expect would. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY CAMERON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, September 18, 1861 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. DEAR guard misunderstanding, 
think fit say joint expedition army navy agreed 
upon time since, General T. W. Sherman 
bear conspicuous part, wise abandoned, must ready 
move 1st of, early in, Let go 
forward accordingly. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL FREMONT, 
 
WASHINGTON, SEPTEMBER 12, 1861 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL FREMONT: 
 
Governor telegraphs follows: Lane, arrived 
special train, represents forty miles 
possession Green River must 
want sent Send 
if, discretion, think right. Perhaps 
better order charge Ohio River guard 
points. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
O. H. BROWNING. 
 
(Private 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON SEPTEMBER 22, 1861 
 
HON. O. H. BROWNING. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 17th coming you, 
confess me. object law 
assisted making presenting less month 
odd enough. small part. General Fremont's 
proclamation confiscation property liberation slaves 
purely political within range military law necessity. 
commanding general finds necessity seize farm private 
owner right 
so, hold long necessity 
within military law, within military necessity. say 
farm shall longer belong owner, forever, 
well farm needed military purposes is, 
purely political, without military law it. 
true slaves. general needs them, seize 
use them; need past, fix 
permanent future condition. must settled according laws made 
military proclamation 
point question simply assumes general 
may anything pleases confiscate lands free slaves 
loyal people, well disloyal ones. going whole 
doubt, would popular people 
done, cannot assume reckless position, 
allow others assume responsibility. 
 
speak means saving government. 
contrary, surrender government. 
pretended longer Government United 
government constitution laws wherein general president may 
make permanent rules property say Congress 
might propriety pass law point, General 
Fremont 
 
say might not, member Congress, vote it. 
object is, I, President, shall expressly seize 
exercise permanent legislative functions government. 
 
much principle. policy. doubt thing popular 
would general 
declaration emancipation. Kentucky Legislature would till 
proclamation General Anderson telegraphed 
news General Fremont actually issued deeds 
whole company volunteers threw arms 
assured think probable arms 
furnished Kentucky would turned us. think lose 
Kentucky nearly lose whole Kentucky gone, 
cannot hold Missouri, nor, think, Maryland. us, 
job hands large us. would well consent 
separation once, including surrender Capital. 
contrary, give new positions, 
back grounds upon kind friends 
gave election approved public documents, shall 
go must understand took course 
proclamation Kentucky. took ground private 
letter General Fremont heard Kentucky. 
 
think inconsistent also forbid General Fremont 
shoot men proclamation. understand part within 
military law, also think, privately wrote General Fremont, 
this, adversaries power, 
certainly exercise it, shoot many men shoot 
say public letter, subject 
prefer discuss hearing enemies. 
 
thought removing General Fremont ground 
connected proclamation, wish 
removal ground, mutual friend probably tell 
was. hope real necessity exists ground. 
 
friend, ever, 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MEMORANDUM PLAN CAMPAIGN 
 
1861 
 
5th October (the exact date determined 
wish movement made seize hold point railroad 
connecting Virginia Tennessee near called Cumberland 
point guarded us 
rebels twenty-five miles 
toward force General Thomas, 
Camp twenty-five miles 
seventy-five camp, road two. 
railroad anywhere point 
along whole length Union sentiment among people 
largely military possession railroad 
Cincinnati Lexington, Louisville Lexington, 
home General latter line. 
possession railroad Louisville Nashville, far 
Hill, forty rebels possession 
road south there. Hill force 
General Sherman, equal force rebels short 
distance south, General 
 
large force smaller Port 
Kentucky side, Point, City, 
New Albany, side, which, gunboats 
river, perhaps sufficient guard Ohio Louisville 
mouth. 
 
supplies troops, general idea Wisconsin, 
Minnesota, Iowa, Illinois, Missouri, Kansas, elsewhere, 
left Fremont. Indiana Michigan, elsewhere, sent 
Anderson Ohio needed western Virginia 
sent there, remainder sent Cincinnati, 
east mountains McClellan 
coast. 
 
idea one coast 
Cumberland Gap meantime 
defensive acted this, however, 
apply Fremont's operations northern middle Missouri. 
movements Thomas Sherman shall respectively watch 
attack coast Gap movements 
shall ready Sherman merely stand Cincinnati 
Louisville, line, concentrate rapidly 
Lexington, thence camp, joining him, whole thence 
upon military men decide whether find 
pass mountains near Gap cannot defended 
enemy greatly inferior force, done regard 
this. 
 
coast Gap movements made, Generals McClellan Fremont, 
respective departments, avail advantages 
may present. 
 
entirely unable get started, Sherman would taken 
active part given him, others busy getting lines 
communication many supply 
sent them. Also commanding general like it. D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STATE. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, October 4, 1861 
 
HONORABLE SECRETARY STATE. 
 
DEAR see Mr. well Union man 
Governor 
understand Kentucky arrests made special direction 
here, willing parties may 
James James Speed think be. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 

 
WASHINGTON, October 11, 1861. 
 
GREAT GOOD received Mr. 
United States Alexandria, full account 
energetic proceedings which, 
adopted bringing speedy punishment parties, subjects 
Upper Egypt, concerned act criminal 
agent certain Christian 
Upper pray assured proceedings, 
prompt just, regarded new unmistakable 
proof equally friendship United States 
integrity wisdom, government 
Wishing great prosperity success, 
friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
SAID Egypt 
etc. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER AUTHORIZING SUSPENSION WRIT HABEAS 
 
October 14 1861 
 
LIEUTENANT-GENERAL 
 
military line United States suppression 
insurrection may extended far Maine. 
officer acting authority hereby authorized suspend 
writ habeas corpus place place city 
Washington. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY INTERIOR. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, October 14, 1861 
 
HON. SEC. INTERIOR. 
 
DEAR this? supposed appointing register wills 
citizen District. commission comes 
New like this. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TWO SONS WANT WORK 
 
MAJOR 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, October 17, 1861 
 
MAJOR 
 
DEAR SIR:--The lady bearer says two sons want 
work. Set possible. Wanting work rare want 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL THOMAS W. SHERMAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, October 18, 1861. 
 
GENERAL THOMAS SHERMAN, Md.: 
 
despatch yesterday received shown General McClellan. 
promised direct army without consent. 
think shall come 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL CURTIS, 
 
WASHINGTON, October 24, 1861 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. 
 
DEAR letter, half 
wishing see, make public, send Please 
read officer may command 
Department West time reaches him. cannot know 
whether Fremont Hunter command. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
WASHINGTON, October 24, 1861 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL S. R. CURTIS. 
 
DEAR receipt this, accompanying 
take safe, certain, suitable measures addressed 
Major-General Fremont delivered reasonable despatch, 
subject conditions if, General Fremont shall 
reached one sent shall 
have, personal command, fought won battle, shall 
actually battle, shall immediate presence 
enemy expectation battle, held 
orders. After, till after, delivery General 
Fremont, let addressed General Hunter delivered 
him. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
Orders No. HEADQUARTERS ARMY, 
 
WASHINGTON, October 24, 1861 
 
Major-General Fremont, United States Army, present commander 
Western Department same, will, receipt order, 
call Major-General Hunter, United States Volunteers, relieve 
temporarily command, report 
general headquarters letter orders. 
 
SCOTT. E. D. Assistant 
 
 
 
 
WASHINGTON, October 24, 1861 
 
COMMANDER DEPARTMENT WEST. 
 
SIR:--The command Department West devolved upon you, 
propose offer Knowing 
bind distant commander field specific lines 
operations, much always depends knowledge localities 
passing events, intended, therefore, leave considerable 
exercise judgment 
 
main rebel army west Mississippi believed 
passed County full retreat upon northwestern Arkansas, leaving 
Missouri almost freed enemy, excepting 
State. Assuming basis fact, seems desirable, 
likely Price, danger making long line 
base supplies give 
halt main army, divide two corps one 
occupying present 
condition corps improving 
discipline instructions, 
providing less course, 
railroads must guarded kept open, employing 
much force necessary this. two points, 
especially judicious Lane Kansas 
would easy concentrate repel army enemy 
returning Missouri probable 
attempt made approaching cold 
spring people Missouri probably favorable mood 
renew next year troubles much afflicted 
this. adopt line policy, if, 
see enemy great force 
surplus force withdraw points 
direct others may needed, railroads furnishing ready means 
main points occasion Doubtless local 
time continue occur, met 
local forces own, ere long 
themselves. 
 
While, stated beginning letter, large discretion must 
left yourself, feel sure indefinite pursuit 
Price attempt long route reach 
beyond end loss whole 
force engaged it. 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER RETIRING GENERAL SCOTT APPOINTING 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN SUCCESSOR. Orders, 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, OFFICE 
 
WASHINGTON, November 1, 1861 
 
following order President United States, announcing 
active command honored Lieutenant 
general Scott, read army profound 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON. 
 
November 1, 1861 
 
1st day November, A.D. 1861, upon application 
President United States, Lieutenant-General Scott 
ordered hereby upon list retired 
officers army United States, without reduction 
current pay, 
 
American people hear deep emotion General 
Scott withdrawn active control army, 
President unanimous Cabinet express nation's 
sympathy personal affliction profound sense 
important public services rendered country long 
brilliant career, among ever gratefully distinguished 
faithful devotion Constitution, Union, flag 
assailed rebellion. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
President pleased direct Major general George B. McClellan 
assume command army United States. headquarters 
army established city Washington. communications 
intended commanding general hereafter addressed direct 
orders, papers 
heretofore sent assistant headquarters 
army, 
 
order Secretary War:  L. THOMAS, General. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER APPROVING PLAN GOVERNOR GAMBLE MISSOURI. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
November 5, 1861. 
 
Governor State Missouri, acting direction 
convention State, proposes Government United States 
raise military force serve within State State 
militia war there, troops 
service United States invasion State 
suppressing rebellion said State militia embodied 
held camp field, 
governed according Army Regulations subject Articles 
War; said State militia ordered State except 
immediate defense State Missouri, co-operate 
troops service United States military operations within 
State necessary officers State 
militia act officers service United States 
grade officers United States service shall command combined 
State militia 
paid United States time shall 
actually engaged embodied military force service accordance 
regulations United States Army general orders issued 
time time. 
 
order Treasury United States may 
pay unnecessary officers, governor proposes that, although 
State law requires appoint upon general staff 


rank colonel cavalry, yet proposes 
Government United States pay 
services 
necessary relations would exist State militia 
United States. governor proposes 
allowed State law appoint governor 
discretion, rank three shall reported 
United States also proposes State militia 
shall commanded single major-general number 
shall allow one brigade less four 
regiments, greater number staff officers shall appointed 
division duties provided 
act Congress 22d July, that, whatever rank 
officers fixed law State, compensation 
shall receive United States shall belongs 
rank given said act Congress officers United States 
service performing duties. 
 
field officers regiment State militia one one 
one company officers 
first second governor proposes that, 
money money United States, staff 
officers service United States may necessary act 
officers State militia shall assigned War 
Department or, cannot spared present 
duty, appoint persons officers State 
militia President United States may 
regulations may required, judgment President, 
insure returns protect United States 
fraudulent practices shall observed obeyed office 
State 
 
propositions accepted part United States, 
Secretary War directed make necessary orders upon 
Pay, Medical departments 
carry agreement effect. cause necessary 
staff officers United States service detailed duty 
connection Missouri State order make 
necessary provision respective offices 
agreement. upon different officers United 
States agreement made substance mode 
Missouri State militia similar made troops 
service United States; Secretary War cause 
additional regulations may necessary insure 
economy carrying agreement effect adopted 
communicated Governor Missouri government 
Missouri State 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
November 6, 1861. 
 
plan approved, modification governor 
commissions major-general militia shall 
person time command United States Department 
case United States shall change commander 
department, (the revoke State commission given 
person relieved give one person substituted United 
States command said department. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
REPLY MINISTER 
 
November 8, 1861. 
 
SIR:--I receive great pleasure Minister pleasure 
enhanced information arrival here, 
selected fill mission upon 
grounds derivation stock 
glorious era country's noble history, eminent 
social political standing country, sir, 
means rights human nature, capacity men 
self-government. history proves faith 
people know faith practice 
respected Rest therefore, shall found 
always transactions government, 
nothing omitted part make residence 
capital agreeable satisfactory government. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT AUTHORIZING MARTIAL LAW SAINT LOUIS. 
 
St. Louis, November 20, 1861. (Received Nov. 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN, 
 
President United States. 
 
written authority found declare enforce martial law 
department. Please send written authority telegraph 
sent mail. 
 
H. W. HALLECK, 
 
[Indorsement.] November 21, 1861. 
 
General McClellan General Halleck deem necessary declare 
maintain martial law Saint Louis, hereby 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
OFFER GIVE SPECIAL LINE INFORMATION HORACE GREELEY 
 
GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, November 21, 1861 
 
DEAR thought interview Mr. Gilmore 
Mr. Greeley, proposal Greeley made 
namely, shall communicate 
administration, return 
giving aid new 
allowing time time use 
desirable feel of, public opinion important 
subjects. arrangement meets approval, shall 
extent ability, opening 
policy present views future 
formed, giving permission communicate 
Gilmore case go Europe give 
things direct must express explicit 
understanding fact communications coming shall 
absolutely Greeley nearest 
friend, be, effect, 
must known 
 
need tell highest confidence Mr. Greeley. 
great power. firmly behind 
army one hundred thousand men. 
 
severely Greeley became 
cause, compromise promoted 
McClellan Democratic candidate Presidency. 
 
ever kicked owing fully 
Tell Gilmore say that, ever objects 
policy, shall glad state views frankly 
fully. shall adopt can. cannot, least tell 
why. stand together, let minor differences come 
us; seek one end, saving 
country. Now, Governor, longer letter written 
would written man Horace 
Greeley. 
 
friend, truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
P. sooner Gilmore sees Greeley better, may long 
think wise policy affair. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER AUTHORIZING GENERAL HALLECK SUSPEND WRIT HABEAS CORPUS, 
 
DECEMBER 2, 1861. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL H. W. HALLECK, Commanding Department Missouri. 
 
insurrection exists United States, arms 
State Missouri, hereby authorized empowered 
suspend writ habeas corpus within limits military 
division command, exercise martial law find 
necessary discretion secure public safety authority 
United States. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States Washington, second day December, 
A.D. 1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
ANNUAL MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 3, 1861 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE midst 
unprecedented political troubles cause great gratitude 
God unusual good health abundant 
 
surprised learn peculiar exigencies 
times intercourse foreign nations attended profound 
chiefly turning upon domestic affairs. 
 
disloyal portion American people whole year 
engaged attempt divide destroy Union. nation 
domestic division exposed abroad, 
one party, both, sure sooner later invoke foreign 

 
Nations thus tempted interfere always able resist 
counsels seeming expediency ungenerous ambition, although measures 
adopted influences seldom fail unfortunate injurious 
adopting them. 
 
disloyal citizens United States offered ruin 
country return aid comfort 
abroad received less patronage encouragement probably 
expected. suppose, insurgents seemed 
assume, foreign nations case, discarding moral, social, 
treaty would act solely speedy 
restoration commerce, including especially acquisition cotton, 
nations appear yet seen way object 
directly clearly destruction 
preservation Union. could dare believe foreign 
nations actuated higher principle this, quite sure 
sound argument could made show reach aim 
readily easily aiding crush rebellion giving 
encouragement it. 
 
principal lever relied insurgents exciting foreign 
nations hostility us, already 
embarrassment commerce. nations, however, saw 
first Union made well foreign 
domestic commerce. scarcely failed perceive 
effort disunion produces existing difficulty, one strong 
nation promises durable peace valuable, 
reliable commerce nation broken hostile 
 
purpose review discussions foreign states, 
because, whatever might wishes integrity 
country government mainly depend upon 
them, patriotism, intelligence 
American people. correspondence itself, usual reservations, 
herewith 
 
venture hope appear practiced prudence 
toward foreign powers, causes irritation 
firmness maintaining rights 
 
Since, however, apparent here, every state, 
foreign dangers necessarily attend domestic difficulties, recommend 
adequate ample measures adopted maintaining public 
every side. general recommendation provision 
defending line readily occurs mind, also 
connection ask attention Congress great rivers. 
believed arms 
harbor navigation improvements, points 
upon these, would great importance national defense 
preservation ask attention views Secretary War, 
expressed report, upon general subject. 
 
deem importance loyal regions east Tennessee 
western North Carolina connected Kentucky 
faithful parts Union therefore 
military measure, Congress provide construction 
speedily possible. Kentucky doubt 
Legislature make judicious selection line. 
northern must connect existing railroad, whether 
route shall Cumberland 
Tennessee line, direction Knoxville, 
still different line, easily Kentucky 
General Government work completed short 
time, done vast present usefulness 
also valuable permanent worth cost future. 
 
designed chiefly interests commerce, 
grave political importance, negotiated, submitted 
Senate consideration. 
 
Although failed induce commercial powers adopt 
desirable maritime war, removed 
way humane except merely 
temporary accidental 
 
invite attention correspondence Britannic 
Majesty's minister accredited government Secretary 
State relative detention British ship June 
last United States steamer Massachusetts supposed breach 
blockade. detention occasioned obvious 
misapprehension facts, justice requires 
commit belligerent act founded strict right sanctioned 
public law, recommend appropriation made satisfy 
reasonable demand owners vessel 
 
repeat recommendation annual message 
Congress December last regard disposition surplus 
probably remain satisfying claims American 
citizens China, pursuant commissioners 
act 3d March, 1859. If, however, deemed 
advisable carry recommendation effect, would suggest 
authority given proceeds 
surplus referred to, good view satisfaction 
claims citizens China 
unlikely arise hereafter course extensive trade 
empire. 
 
act 5th August last Congress authorized President 
instruct commanders suitable vessels defend 
capture authority exercised single 
instance only. effectual protection extensive 
valuable commerce Eastern seems 
would also advisable authorize commanders vessels 
may make United States vessels 
consular courts established law Eastern 
countries cases event 
objected local authorities. 
 
good reason exists longer withholding 
recognition independence sovereignty Liberia, 
unable discern it. however, inaugurate novel 
policy regard without approbation Congress, submit 
consideration expediency appropriation maintaining 
charge near new States. admit 
doubt important commercial advantages might secured favorable 
treaties them. 
 
operations treasury period elapsed since 
adjournment conducted signal success. patriotism 
people placed disposal government large means 
demanded public Much national loan 
taken citizens industrial classes, whose confidence 
country's faith zeal country's deliverance present 
peril induced contribute support government 
whole limited fact peculiar 
obligations economy energy action. 
 
revenue sources, including loans, financial year 
ending 30th June, 1861, expenditures 
period, including payments account public debt, 
leaving balance treasury 1st July 
first quarter financial year ending 
30th September, 1861, receipts sources, including 
balance 1st July, expenses 
leaving balance 1st October, 1861, 

 
Estimates remaining three quarters year 
financial year 1863, together views ways means meeting 
demands contemplated them, submitted Congress 
Secretary Treasury. gratifying know expenditures 
made necessary rebellion beyond resources 
loyal people, believe patriotism thus far 
sustained government continue sustain till peace union 
shall bless land. 
 
respectfully refer report Secretary War information 
respecting strength army recommendations 
view increase efficiency well-being 
various branches service intrusted care. gratifying 
know patriotism people proved equal occasion, 
number troops tendered greatly force 
Congress authorized call field. 
 
refer pleasure portions report make allusion 
degree discipline already attained troops 
excellent sanitary condition entire army. 
 
recommendation Secretary organization militia 
upon uniform basis subject vital importance future safety 
country, serious attention Congress. 
 
large addition regular army, connection 
considerably diminished number officers, gives 
peculiar importance recommendation increasing corps 
greatest capacity Military 
 
mere presume, Congress failed provide chaplains 
occupied volunteers. subject brought notice, 
induced draw form letter, one copy which, 
properly delivered persons, 
respectively named stated containing also 
form letter, marked A, herewith transmitted. 
 
gentlemen, understand, entered upon duties designated 
times respectively stated labored faithfully 
therein ever since. therefore recommend compensated 
rate chaplains army. suggest general 
provision made chaplains serve well 
regiments. 
 
report Secretary Navy presents detail operations 
branch service, activity energy 
characterized administration, results measures increase 
efficiency power construction 
purchase, may almost said navy created brought 
service since difficulties commenced. 
 
Besides blockading extensive squadrons larger ever 
assembled flag put performed deeds 
increased naval 
 
would invite special attention recommendation Secretary 
perfect organization navy introducing additional 
service. 
 
present organization 
suggestions submitted department will, believed, adopted, 
difficulties alluded to, promote harmony, increase 
efficiency navy. 
 
three vacancies bench Supreme 
Daniel McLean one resignation 
Justice Campbell. far forborne making nominations fill 
vacancies reasons state. Two outgoing judges 
resided within States overrun successors 
appointed localities could serve upon 
many competent men probably would take 
personal hazard accepting even here, upon Supreme 
unwilling throw appointments 
thus justice South return 
although may remark transfer North one 
heretofore South would not, reference territory 
population, 
 
long brilliant judicial career Judge McLean circuit 
grew large one judge give 
courts therein nominal population 
1860. 
 
Besides this, country generally present judicial 
system. uniformity intended, system requires 
States shall accommodated circuit courts, attended Supreme 
judges, while, fact, Wisconsin, Minnesota, Iowa, Kansas, Florida, 
Texas, California, never courts. 
well without change system, adding 
judges Supreme Court, enough parts 
country circuit courts, would create court altogether 
numerous judicial body sort. evil, one, 
increase new States come Union. Circuit courts useful 
useful, State denied them; 
useful, State them. Let provided 
abolished all. 
 
Three modifications occur me, either which, think, would 
improvement upon present system. Let Supreme Court 
convenient number every then, first, let whole country 
divided convenient size, Supreme judges serve 
number corresponding number, independent circuit 
judges provided or, secondly, let Supreme judges 
relieved circuit duties circuit judges provided 
or, thirdly, dispense circuit courts leaving 
judicial functions wholly district courts independent 
Supreme Court. 
 
respectfully recommend consideration Congress present 
condition statute laws, hope Congress able 
find easy remedy many evils 
constantly embarrass engaged practical administration 
them. Since Organization government, Congress enacted 
acts joint resolutions, fill closely printed 
pages scattered many Many acts 
drawn haste without sufficient caution, provisions 
often obscure conflict other, 
least doubtful render difficult even 
persons ascertain precisely statute law really 
is. 
 
seems important statute laws made 
plain intelligible possible, reduced small 
may consist precision 
Legislature language. well done would, 
think, greatly facilitate labors whose duty assist 
administration laws, would lasting benefit 
people, placing accessible intelligible form 
laws deeply concern interests duties. 
 
informed whose opinions respect acts 
Congress force permanent general nature might 
revised embraced one volume (or two 
ordinary convenient respectfully recommend 
Congress consider subject, suggestion approved 
plan wisdom shall seem proper 
end proposed. 
 
One unavoidable consequences present insurrection 
entire suppression many places ordinary means 
administering civil justice officers forms existing 
law. case, whole part, insurgent States; 
armies advance upon take possession parts 
States practical evil becomes apparent. courts 
officers citizens States may apply 
enforcement lawful claims citizens insurgent 
States, vast amount debt constituting 
estimated high due large part 
insurgents open rebellion loyal citizens even making 
great sacrifices discharge patriotic duty support 
government. 
 
circumstances 
military power, courts administer summary justice cases. 
thus far declined it, doubt end 
collection right itself, 
unwilling go beyond pressure necessity 
unusual exercise power. powers Congress, suppose, 
equal occasion, therefore refer whole matter 
Congress, hope plan maybe devised administration 
justice parts insurgent States Territories 
may control government, whether voluntary return 
allegiance order power this, however, 
permanent institution, temporary cease 
soon ordinary courts peace. 
 
important convenient means provided, 
possible, adjustment claims government, especially 
view increased number reason war. much 
duty government render prompt justice favor 
citizens administer private individuals. 
investigation adjudication claims nature belong 
judicial department. Besides, apparent attention 
Congress usually engaged time come 
great national questions. intended organization 
Court Claims mainly remove branch business halls 
Congress; but, court proved effective valuable 
means investigation, great degree fails effect object 
creation want power make judgments 
 
Fully aware say danger subject, 
commend careful consideration whether power making 
judgments final may properly given court, 
right appeal questions law Supreme Court, 
provisions experience may shown necessary. 
 
ask attention report Postmaster general, following 
summary statement condition 
 
revenue sources fiscal year ending June 30, 
1861, including annual permanent appropriation 
transportation "free mail 2 per 
cent. less revenue 1860. 
 
expenditures showing decrease 
8 per cent. compared previous year leaving 
excess expenditure revenue last fiscal year 

 
gross revenue year ending June 30, 1863, estimated 
increase 4 per cent. 1861, making 
added department carrying free matter, 
making 
 
total expenditures 1863 estimated leaving 
estimated deficiency supplied treasury 
addition permanent 
 
present insurrection shows, think, extension 
District across Potomac River time establishing capital 
eminently wise, consequently 
portion lies within State Virginia unwise 
dangerous. submit consideration expediency 
part District restoration original boundaries 
thereof State Virginia. 
 
report Secretary Interior, accompanying 
documents, exhibits condition several branches public 
business pertaining department. influences 
insurrection specially felt operations Patent 
General Land Offices. cash receipts sales public lands 
past year expenses land system 
sales entirely suspended Southern 
States, business country 
large numbers men labor military service 
settlements new States Territories 
 
receipts Patent Office declined nine months 
rendering large reduction force employed necessary 
make 
 
demands upon Pension Office largely increased 
insurrection. Numerous applications pensions, based upon 
casualties existing war, already made. reason 
believe many upon pension rolls receipt 
bounty government ranks insurgent army 
giving aid Secretary Interior directed 
suspension payment pensions persons upon proof 
recommend Congress authorize officer 
cause names persons stricken pension 
 
relations government Indian tribes greatly 
disturbed insurrection, especially southern 
New Mexico. Indian country south Kansas 
possession insurgents Texas Arkansas. agents United 
States appointed since 4th March 
unable reach office 
time insurrectionary cause, assume 
exercise powers agents virtue commissions 
stated public press portion 
Indians organized military force attached 
army insurgents. Although government official 
information upon subject, letters written 
Commissioner Indian Affairs several prominent giving 
assurance loyalty United States expressing wish 
presence Federal troops protect them. believed upon 
country Federal forces Indians 
readily cease hostile demonstrations resume former relations 
government. 
 
Agriculture, largest interest nation, 
department only, assigned 
government. fortunate great interest 
independent nature demanded 
government, respectfully ask Congress consider whether something 
cannot given voluntarily general advantage. 
 
Annual reports exhibiting condition agriculture, commerce, 
manufactures would present fund information great practical value 
country. make suggestion venture 
opinion agricultural statistical bureau might profitably 
organized. 
 
execution laws suppression African slave trade 
confided Department Interior. subject 
efforts made suppression 
traffic recently attended unusual success. 
Five vessels fitted slave trade seized 
Two vessels engaged trade one person 
vessel convicted subjected 
penalty fine one taken cargo 
board vessel, convicted highest grade 
offense laws, punishment death. 
 
Territories Colorado, Nevada, created last 
Congress, organized, civil administration 
inaugurated therein especially gratifying 
considered treason found existing 
new countries Federal officers arrived there. 
 
abundant natural resources Territories, security 
protection afforded organized government, doubtless invite 
large peace shall restore business country 
accustomed submit resolutions Legislature 
Colorado, evidence patriotic spirit people 
Territory. far authority United States upheld 
Territories, hoped future. commend 
interests defense enlightened generous care 
Congress. 
 
recommend favorable consideration Congress interests 
District Columbia. insurrection cause 
much suffering sacrifice inhabitants, 
representative Congress body overlook claims 
upon government. 
 
late session joint resolution adopted authorizing 
President take measures proper representation 
industrial interests United States exhibition 
industry nations London year 1862. regret 
say unable give personal attention 
subject interesting intimately 
connected material prosperity world. 
Secretaries State Interior plan system devised 
partly matured, laid you. 
 
virtue act Congress entitled "An act confiscate 
property used insurrectionary purposes," approved August 6, 1861, 
legal claims certain persons labor service certain 
persons become numbers latter thus liberated 
already dependent United States, must provided 
way. Besides this, impossible States 
pass similar enactments benefit respectively, 
operation persons class thrown upon 
case recommend Congress provide accepting 
persons States, according mode 
pro direct upon plan agreed 
States persons, acceptance 
General Government, deemed free, event 
steps taken colonizing classes (or one first mentioned 
shall brought place places 
climate congenial them. might well consider, too, whether 
free colored people already United States could not, far 
individuals may desire, included 
 
carry plan colonization may involve acquiring 
territory, also appropriation money beyond expended 
territorial practised acquisition 
territory nearly sixty years, question constitutional power 
longer open one us. power questioned first 
Mr. Jefferson, who, however, purchase Louisiana, yielded 
plea great expediency. said 
object acquiring territory furnish homes white 
men, measure effects object, emigration colored men 
leaves additional room white men remaining coming here. Mr. 
Jefferson, however, placed importance Louisiana 
political commercial grounds providing room 
 
whole proposition, including appropriation money 
acquisition territory, expediency amount absolute 
without government cannot 
 
war considering policy adopted suppressing 
insurrection anxious careful inevitable 
conflict purpose shall violent 
revolutionary struggle. therefore every case thought 
proper keep integrity Union prominent primary 
object contest part, leaving questions 
vital military importance deliberate action 
Legislature. 
 
exercise best discretion adhered blockade 
ports held insurgents, instead putting force 
proclamation law Congress enacted late session closing 

 
also, obeying well obligations 
law, instead adhered act Congress 
confiscate property used insurrectionary purposes. new law upon 
subject shall proposed, propriety duly considered. 
Union must preserved, hence indispensable means must 
haste determine radical 
extreme measures, may reach loyal well 
indispensable. 
 
inaugural address beginning Administration 
message Congress late special session mainly 
devoted topics domestic controversy insurrection 
consequent war Nothing occurs add 
principles general purposes stated expressed 

 
last ray hope preserving Union peaceably 
assault upon Fort Sumter, general review occurred since 
may painfully uncertain much better 
defined distinct now, progress events plainly 
right direction. insurgents confidently claimed strong support 
north Mason line, friends Union 
free apprehension point. This, however, soon settled 
right side. South line noble little 
led right first. Maryland made seem Union. 
soldiers bridges railroads torn 
within limits, many days one time without ability 
bring single regiment soil capital. bridges 
railroads repaired open government; already gives 
seven regiments cause Union, none enemy; 
people, regular election, sustained Union larger 
majority larger aggregate vote ever gave 
candidate question. Kentucky, too, time doubt, 
decidedly and, think, ranged side Union. 
Missouri comparatively quiet, and, believe, can, overrun 
three States Maryland, Kentucky, 
Missouri, neither would promise single soldier first, 
aggregate less forty thousand field 
Union, citizens certainly third 
number, doubtful doubtful existence, 
arms us. somewhat bloody struggle months, winter 
Union people western Virginia, leaving masters 
country. 
 
insurgent force fifteen hundred, months 
narrow region constituting counties 
known Eastern Virginia, together 
parts Maryland, laid arms, people 
renewed allegiance accepted protection 
old flag. leaves armed north Potomac 
east 
 
Also obtained footing isolated points 
southern coast Port Royal, Island 
Ship likewise general accounts popular 
movements behalf Union North Carolina Tennessee. 
 
things demonstrate cause Union advancing steadily 
certainly 
 
Since last adjournment Lieutenant-General Scott retired 
head army. long life nation 
yet calling mind 
served country, time far back history, 
living born, thenceforward 
cannot think still therefore, 
consideration mark recognition due him, 
grateful people. 
 
General Scott came Executive duty 
appointing general-in-chief army. fortunate 
circumstance neither council country there, far 
know, difference opinion proper person 
retiring chief repeatedly expressed judgment favor General 
McClellan position, nation seemed give 
unanimous General McClellan therefore 
considerable degree selection country well 
Executive, hence better reason hope given 
confidence cordial support thus fair promised, 
without cannot full efficiency serve country. 
 
said one bad general better two good ones, 
saying true taken mean army better 
directed single mind, though inferior, two superior ones 
variance other. 
 
true joint operations wherein engaged 
none common end view differ choice 
means. storm sea one wish ship 
yet go together many direct 
single mind allowed control. 
 
continues develop insurrection 
exclusively, war upon first principle popular 
rights people. Conclusive evidence found 
grave maturely considered public documents, well general 
tone insurgents. documents find 
existing right suffrage denial people right 
selection public officers except legislative 
boldly labored arguments prove large control 
people government source political evil. 
sometimes hinted possible refuge power 
people. 
 
present position could scarcely justified omit 
raising warning voice approach returning despotism. 
needed fitting general argument made 
favor popular institutions, one point, 
others, ask brief 
attention. effort place capital equal footing with, 
above, labor structure government. assumed labor 
available connection capital; nobody labors unless 
somebody else, owning capital, somehow use induces 
labor. assumed, next considered whether best capital 
shall hire laborers, thus induce work consent, 
buy drive without consent. proceeded 
far, naturally concluded laborers either hired laborers 
call slaves. further, assumed whoever 
hired laborer fixed condition life. 
 
relation capital labor assumed, 
thing free man fixed life condition 
hired assumptions false, inferences 
groundless. 
 
Labor prior independent capital. Capital fruit 
labor, could never existed labor first existed. Labor 
superior capital, deserves much higher consideration. 
Capital rights, worthy protection 
rights. denied is, probably always be, 
relation labor capital producing mutual error 
assuming whole labor community exists within relation. 
men capital, avoid labor themselves, 
capital hire buy another labor them. large majority belong 
neither work others others working 
them. Southern States majority whole people 
colors neither slaves masters, Northern large 
majority neither Men, 
sons, houses, 
shops, taking whole product themselves, asking 
favors capital one hand hired laborers slaves 
other. forgotten considerable number persons mingle 
labor capital; is, labor hands 
also buy hire others labor them; mixed 
distinct class. principle stated disturbed existence 
mixed class. 
 
Again, already said, necessity thing 
free hired laborer fixed condition life. Many 
independent men everywhere States years back lives 
hired laborers. prudent, penniless beginner world labors 
wages saves surplus buy tools land 
himself, labors account another while, length 
another new beginner help him. generous 
prosperous system way all, gives hope all, 
consequent energy progress improvement condition all. men 
living worthy trusted toil 
none less inclined take touch aught honestly 
Let beware surrendering political power 
already possess, surrendered surely used close 
door advancement fix new 
burdens upon till liberty shall lost. 
 
first taking national census last seventy 
years, find population end period eight times 
great beginning. increase things 
men deem desirable even thus one view 
popular principle, applied government machinery 
States Union, produced given time, also 
firmly maintained promises future. already among 
us Union preserved live see contain 
struggle to-day altogether 
vast future also. reliance Providence firm 
earnest, let us proceed great task events devolved 
upon us. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, December 20, 1861. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
transmit Congress letter secretary executive 
committee commission appointed represent interests 
American citizens may desire become industrial 
exhibition held London 1862, memorial 
commission, report executive committee thereof copies 
announcing decisions Majesty's commissioners 
London, giving directions observed regard articles intended 
also circular forms demands 
space, etc., according rules prescribed British 

 
papers fully set forth requirements necessary enable 
citizens United States may wish become avail 
privileges commend 
early consideration, especially view near approach time 
exhibition begin. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
LETTER GENERAL HUNTER 
 
GENERAL HUNTER. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
1861 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Yours 23d received, constrained say 
difficult answer ugly letter good temper. am, 
losing much great confidence placed you, 
act omission touching public service, time 
sent flood despatches 
letters seen since. knew ordered 
time done; aver tender 
regard honor own, never 
occurred 
I, day, heard intimation 
coming one yourself. one blamed 
movement Springfield, information gave 
General could readily understand, 
assumption ordering must 
necessarily done punishment thought then, 
think yet, position assigned responsible, 
assigned know General McClellan 
expected important results it. impression 
time assigned new Western Department, 
determined replace General Sherman 
certain, idea command Kentucky desirable, 
one farther West never occurred me. 
constantly speak placed command Now, tell me, 
mere known 
command four five times 
 
been, sincerely friend; if, such, dare make 
suggestion, would say adopting best possible way ruin 
yourself. "Act well part, honor 
something head one regiment, eclipse nothing 
head 
 
friend, ever, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
WASHINGTON, D.C., December 31, 1861 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
General McClellan General Buell 
moves Bowling Green, reinforced 
simultaneous movement Columbus might prevent it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
despatch Buell 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1862 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. C. BUELL. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, January 1, 1862 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL 
 
General McClellan yet disturbed business. think 
better get concert General Halleck once. write to-night. 
also telegraph write Halleck. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, January 1, 1862 
 
DEAR GENERAL HALLECK: 
 
General McClellan dangerously ill, hope, would better 
disturbed business. anxious that, case General 
moving toward Nashville, enemy shall greatly 
think danger seems 
real attack upon Columbus river 
time would either prevent compensate throwing 
Columbus hands. wrote General Buell letter similar this, 
meaning shall communicate act unless 
judgment necessity it. 
understand much better it. Please lose time 
matter. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PEOPLE MARYLAND, 
 
view recent declaration people Maryland 
adhesion Union, distinctly made recent election, 
President directs prisoners heretofore 
arrested State detained military custody 
President's authority, imprisonment 
following conditions, namely: holding civil 
military offices arrested, terms 
shall resume reclaim office; secondly, persons 
proclamation shall engage oath 
honor maintain Union Constitution United States, 
way aid arms, conversation, information 
kind existing insurrection Government United 
States. 
 
guard misapprehension proper state 
proclamation apply prisoners war. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 2, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES 
 
transmit Congress copy letter Secretary State 
James R. secretary executive committee 
exhibition held London course present year, copy 
correspond relative vessel taking 
articles persons country may wish exhibit 
occasion. appears naval vessel spared purpose, 
recommend authority given charter suitable vessel, 
order facilities similar afforded government 
exhibition 1851 may also extended citizens United States 
may desire contribute exhibition year. 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGES DISAPPOINTMENT GENERALS 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL D. C. BUELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 4, 1862. 
 
GENERAL 
 
arms gone forward East Please tell progress 
condition movement direction. Answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL D. C. BUELL. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
January 6, 1862. 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL BUELL. 
 
DEAR SIR:--Your despatch yesterday received, 
me. shown General McClellan, 
says write to-day. competent views, 
therefore offer justification myself. two, 
would rather point railroad south Cumberland Gap 
First, great enemy's 
communication, Nashville not; secondly, 
midst loyal people would rally around it, Nashville 
not. Again, cannot see movement East Tennessee would 
favor rather assuming 
movement toward Nashville main object. distress 
friends East Tennessee hanged driven even 
now, fear, thinking taking rebel arms sake personal 
protection. lose valuable stake South. 
despatch, answer, sent knowledge 
Senator Johnson Representative East Tennessee, 
upon know answer, cannot safely show them. 
would possibly resign go save families somehow, 
die them. intend order sense, 
merely, intimated before, show grounds anxiety. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL BUELL. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 7, 1862. 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL D.C. 
 
Please name early day safely 
ready move concert Major-General Halleck. Delay 
us, indispensable something 
send like despatch Major-General Halleck. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 10, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
transmit Congress translation instruction minister 
Majesty accredited government, 
copy note minister Secretary State relative 
questions involved taking British steamer 
certain citizens United States order Captain 
United States Navy. correspondence may considered 
previously communicated Congress relating subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT LETTER GENERAL HALLECK, 
 
JANUARY 10, 1862. 
 
HEADQUARTERS DEPARTMENT MISSOURI ST. Louis, January 6, 1862. 
 
EXCELLENCY PRESIDENT: 
 
reply letter 1st instant, state 
receiving telegram immediately communicated General 
Buell since sent information could obtain 
enemy's movements Columbus Camp considerable 
force sent places Bowling 
men Columbus, place strongly 
Port which, leaving 
places, would give little 10,000 men 
assist General Buell. would madness attempt anything 
serious force, cannot present time withdraw 
Missouri without loss State. troops recently 
raised States department have, without knowledge, 
sent Kentucky Kansas. 
 
satisfied authorities Washington appreciate 
difficulties contend here. operations Lane, 
others people Missouri 
estimated majority government. 
virtually enemy's country. Price others considerable 
army operating available 
force. 
 
city middle northern counties 
destroying telegraph lines, 
kept presence troops. large portion 
foreign troops organized General Fremont indeed, many 
already 
made believe get demand Fremont's 
return government forced restore duty here. 
believed high officers plot already 
obliged several daily expecting 
serious Another grave difficulty want proper 
general officers command troops enforce order 
especially protect public property 
assigned department entirely 
ignorant duties command. assure you, Mr. 
President, difficult accomplish much means. 
condition required build bridge 
dull broken saw, rotten true 
good green answer purpose soon get 
shape season little. 
 
know nothing General intended operations, never 
received information regard general plan campaign. 
intended column shall move Bowling Green another 
moves Columbus Camp 
repetition error produced disaster Bull 
Run. operate lines enemy occupying central 
position fail, always failed, cases 
condemned every military authority ever read. 
 
General army forces occupy precisely 
position relation enemy armies 
McDowell battle Bull Run. 
 
respectfully, obedient servant, 
 
H. W. HALLECK, Major-General 
 

 
within copy letter received General Halleck. 
exceedingly everywhere else, nothing done. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GOVERNOR 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., January 11, 1862 
 
GOVERNOR JOHN A. 
 
greatly obliged somehow General Butler 
officer two regiments. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL D. C. BUELL. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 13, 1861 
 
BRIGADIER-GENERAL BUELL. 
 
DEAR despatch yesterday received, say, "I 
received letter General devote 
efforts views midst many cares 
seen, asked see, General McClellan's letter you. 
views, offered offer 
glad respectfully considered, would blame follow 
contrary clear judgment, unless put 
form orders. General McClellan's views, understand duty 
regard better do. 
 
preliminary state general idea war be, 
greater numbers enemy greater facility 
forces upon points must fail unless 
find way making advantage his; 
done menacing superior forces different 
points time, safely attack one 
makes one strengthen other, forbear 
attack strengthened one, seize hold one, gaining 
much. 
 
Suppose last summer, Winchester ran away reinforce 
Manassas, forborne attack Manassas, seized held 
mention illustrate 
lose confidence McDowell, think less 
others seem Applying principle case, idea 
Halleck shall menace Columbus generally, 
menace Bowling Green East Tennessee. enemy shall concentrate 
Bowling Green, retire front, yet fight 
either, seize Columbus East Tennessee, one both, left exposed 
Bowling matter small anxiety 
me, sure East Tennessee 
line long bad road. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 

 
to-day written General Buell letter, occurs send 
General Halleck copy it. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 1, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The Germans true patriotic far 
got cross Missouri upon mistake Without 
knowledge Governor Illinois, hand 
letter. educated German gentleman, true 
man lives. assistance set everything right 
clear judgment that, reference German 
element command, Governor you; 
agreeable him, make 
afford give time. wish command field, 
though military knowledge do. goes 
place, simply 
assistant you. say upon intimate personal acquaintance 
Governor 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON, January 17, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
transmit Congress translation instruction minister 
Majesty King accredited government, copy 
note minister Secretary State relating 
capture detention certain citizens United States, passengers 
board British steamer order Captain 
United States Navy. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
DEPARTMENT STATE, WASHINGTON. 
 
January 20, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. McCLELLAN, 
 
Commanding Armies United States: 
 
officer may designate discretion suspend 
writ habeas corpus far may relate Major Chase, lately 
Corps Army United States, alleged guilty 
treasonable practices government. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT'S GENERAL WAR ORDER NO. 1 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 27, 1862. 
 
Ordered, 22d day February, 1862, day general 
movement land naval forces United States 
insurgent forces. 
 
especially army Fortress Monroe, Army 
Potomac, Army Western Virginia, army near 
Kentucky, army naval force Gulf 
Mexico, ready movement day. 
 
forces, land naval, respective 
obey existing orders time, ready obey 
additional orders duly given. 
 
heads departments, especially Secretaries War 
Navy, 
commanders land naval forces, 
severally held strict full responsibilities prompt 
execution order. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, January 31, 1862 
 
HON. SECRETARY WAR. 
 
DEAR SIR:--It wish expedition commonly called 
shall be, much promised 
office, supervision General McClellan, 
more. intended, shall 
great, affair, sober column 10,000 
General Lane told many times command 
General Hunter, assented often 
distinct agreement me, appointed him, 
Hunter. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT'S SPECIAL WAR ORDER NO. 1. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, January 31, 1862. 
 
Ordered, force Army Potomac, 
providing safely defence Washington, formed 
expedition immediate object seizing occupying point upon 
railroad known Manassas Junction, 
details discretion 
expedition move 22d day February next. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
OPPOSITION McCLELLAN'S PLANS 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN, 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 3, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL MCCLELLAN. 
 
DEAR distinct different plans movement 
Army 
Rappahannock across land railroad 
York River; mine move directly point railroad southwest 

 
give satisfactory answers following questions, 
shall gladly yield plan yours. 
 
First. plan involve greatly larger expenditure time 
money mine? 
 
Second. Wherein victory certain plan mine? 
 
Third. Wherein victory valuable plan mine? 
 
Fourth. fact, would less valuable this, would 
break great line enemy's communications, mine 
 
case disaster, would retreat difficult 
plan mine? 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
Memorandum accompanying Letter President Lincoln General McClellan, 
 
dated February 
 
First. Suppose enemy attack us force reach 
what? 
 
Second. Suppose enemy force shall dispute crossing 
what? view this, might us cross 
rather village 
would cost enemy two miles travel meet us, would, 
contrary, leave us two miles farther ultimate 
 
Third. Suppose reach Valley without 
attacked force enemy marching several roads 
so, what? 
 
 
 
 
WM. H. HERNDON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, February 3, 1862. 
 
DEAR January 30th received. say 
money matter. 
 
well know, time write letter respectable length. 
God bless you, says 
 
friend, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
NATHANIEL 
 
February 4, 1862 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA, 
 
Presents shall come, 
 
Whereas appears term Circuit Court United 
States America Southern District New York held month 
November, A.D. 1861, Nathaniel convicted 
engaged slave trade, said court sentenced 
put death hanging neck, Friday 7th day February, 

 
whereas large number respectable citizens earnestly 
said sentence said Nathaniel term 
imprisonment life, application felt duty 

 
whereas seemed probable unsuccessful application 
made sentence may prevented said 
Nathaniel making necessary preparation awful 
change him; 
 
Now, therefore, known, I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States America, granted hereby grant unto him, 
said Nathaniel sentence, 
Friday day February, A.D. 1862, hours 
twelve o'clock three o'clock afternoon said day, 
said sentence shall executed. 
 
granting becomes painful duty 
prisoner that, expectation pardon human authority, 
refer alone mercy common God Father 
men. 
 
testimony whereof hereunto signed name caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done City Washington, fourth day February, A.D. 1862, 
independence United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President: WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, February 4. 1862 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
third section "Act promote efficiency 
approved December 21, 1862, 
 
"That President United States, advice 
consent Senate, shall authority detail retired 
list navy command squadrons single ships 
officers may believe good service requires 
thus placed officers may, upon recommendation 
President United States shall receive vote thanks 
Congress services gallantry action enemy, 
restored active list, 
 
conformity law, Captain Samuel F. Du navy, 
nominated Senate continuance flag-officer command 
squadron recently rendered important service Union 
expedition coast South Carolina. 
 
Believing occasion could arise would fully correspond 
intention law, pregnant happy influence 
example, cordially recommend Captain Samuel F. Du receive 
vote thanks Congress services gallantry displayed 
capture Forts commanding entrance Port 
Royal Harbor, 7th November, 1861. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERALS D. HUNTER J. H. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION WASHINGTON, FEBRUARY 4, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HUNTER BRIGADIER-GENERAL LANE, 
 
wish avail government services 
General Hunter General Lane, and, far possible, personally 
oblige both. General Hunter officer, must command 
serve though far consistently 
public service honor oblige General Lane, also oblige 
me. cannot come amicable understanding, General Lane must 
report General Hunter duty, according decline 
service. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 1, RELATING POLITICAL PRISONERS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON, February 
 
breaking formidable insurrection based conflict 
political ideas, event without precedent United States, 
necessarily attended great confusion public 
mind. suddenly became treason 
astonished world bringing field military forces 
superior number standing army United States. 
 
Every department government 
appeared Senate, House Representatives, Cabinet, 
Federal courts; ministers consuls returned foreign 
countries enter insurrectionary councils land naval 
commanding officers army navy betrayed 
councils deserted posts commands insurgent forces. 
Treason flagrant revenue post-office service, 
well Territorial governments Indian 
 
judges, officers 
States, even whole States rushed one another apparent 
unanimity rebellion. capital connection 
States cut off. Even portions country 
loyal, political combinations secret societies formed 
work while, motives 
excited passions individuals 
found furnishing men, money, materials war supplies 
military naval forces. Armies, 
navy military one another 
betrayed abandoned insurgents. 
 
Congress provided for, emergency. 
municipal authorities powerless judicial 
machinery seemed sustain 
government, embarrass it. 
 
Foreign openly invited industriously 
insurrection, became prevented 
practice strict impartial justice, perfect 
intercourse nations. 
 
public mind alarmed though fortunately 
distracted seemed doubtful whether Federal 
Government, one year thought model worthy 
universal acceptance, indeed ability defend maintain 
itself. 
 
which, perhaps, suffered newly levied 
forces, loyal gave new hopes 
insurgents. Voluntary seemed cease 
commenced. Parties upon question whether 
become necessary fill armies United States. 
 
President felt duty employ energy 
extraordinary powers Constitution cases 
insurrection. called field military naval forces, 
existing laws, seemed necessary. directed 
measures prevent use post-office treasonable 
subjected passengers foreign countries 
new regulations, instituted blockade, suspended 
writ habeas corpus various places, caused persons 
represented engage disloyal treasonable 
practices arrested special civil well military 
detained military custody necessary prevent deter 
others cases 
persons arrested discharged time time 
circumstances upon conditions thought, 
public safety. 
 
Meantime favorable change public opinion line 
loyalty plainly whole structure 
government firm Apprehension public danger 
facilities treasonable practices diminished passions 
prompted persons adopt them. insurrection 
believed 
 
President, view facts, anxious favor return 
normal course administration far regard public 
welfare directs political prisoners state 
prisoners held military custody 
render aid comfort enemies 
hostility United States. 
 
Secretary War will, however, discretion, except 
effect order persons detained service 
insurgents, others whose release present moment may deemed 
incompatible public safety. 
 
persons shall shall keep 
President grants amnesty past offences treason 
may 
 
Extraordinary arrests hereafter made direction 
military authorities alone. 
 
order President EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. WASHINGTON CITY, February 15, 1862 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES UNITED STATES: 
 
third section "Act promote efficiency 
approved December 21, 1861, provides 
 
"That President United States, advice 
consent Senate, shall authority detail retired 
list navy command squadrons single ships 
officers may believe good service requires 
thus placed officers may, upon recommendation 
President United States shall receive vote thanks 
Congress services gallantry action enemy, 
restored active list, 
 
conformity law, Captain Louis M. navy, 
nominated Senate continuance flag-officer command 
North Atlantic Blockading recently rendered 
important service Union expedition coast North 
Carolina. 
 
Believing occasion could arise would fully correspond 
intention law pregnant happy influence 
example, cordially recommend Captain Louis M. 
receive vote thanks Congress services gallantry 
displayed combined attack forces commanded 
Brigadier-General Burnside capture Island 
destruction rebel gunboats 10th February, 1862. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FIRST WRITTEN NOTICE GRANT 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, 
 
February 16, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, St. Louis, Missouri: 
 
Fort safe, unless Grant shall overwhelmed 
prevent latter will, think, require vigilance, 
energy, skill acting full 
Columbus get Grant, force Bowling Green will. 
hold railroad Bowling Green within miles Fort 
bridge 
rely dare Nashville Buell. small part 
force retire slowly toward Nashville, breaking railroad 
go, keep Buell city twenty days. Meanwhile 
Nashville abundantly defended forces South perhaps 
Could cavalry force General Thomas 
upper Cumberland dash almost cut railroad 
near Knoxville, midst Fort 
could run destroy bridge 
success failure Fort vastly important, 
beg put soul effort. send copy 
Buell. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. RELATION STATE PRISONERS. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, WASHINGTON CITY, FEBRUARY 27, 1862 
 
ordered: 
 
First. special commission two persons, one military rank 
civil life, appointed examine cases state 
prisoners remaining military custody United States, 
determine whether view public Safety existing rebellion 
discharged, remain military 
civil trial. 
 
Second. Major-General John A. Dix, commanding Baltimore, 
HON. Edwards New York, be, appointed 
commissioners purpose mentioned; authorized 
determine cases aforesaid summary 
manner, times places discretion may 
make full report War Department. 
 
order President EDWIN M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
ORDER RELATING COMMERCIAL INTERCOURSE. 
 
Considering existing circumstances country allow partial 
restoration commercial intercourse inhabitants 
parts United States heretofore declared insurrection 
citizens loyal States Union, exercising 
authority discretion confided act Congress, approved 
July 13, 1861, entitled "An act provide collection 
duties imports, purposes," hereby license permit 
commercial intercourse cases within rules regulations 
may prescribed Secretary Treasury 
conducting carrying inland waters ways 
United States. 
 
WASHINGTON, February 28, 1862. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH 
 
WASHINGTON, D. C., MARCH 4, 1862 
 
United States 
interests conflict safety, rights interests 
nation. prosperity, 
sought safely preservation 
peace part, peace among nations. 
United States thus friend nations, 
seek conceal fact cherish especial sentiments 
friendship for, sympathies with, who, like themselves, 
founded institutions principle equal rights men; 
nations neighbors United States, 
latter co-operating establishing civilization 
culture American general principles 
govern United States foreign relations, may 
sir, things government deal and, 
possible, even liberally Peru, whose liberal sentiments toward 
us kindly 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS RECOMMENDING COMPENSATED EMANCIPATION. 
 
March 6, 1862 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE recommend 
adoption joint resolution honorable bodies shall 
substantially follows: 
 
"Resolved, United States ought co-operate State 
may adopt gradual abolishment slavery, giving State pecuniary 
aid, used State, discretion, compensate 
public private, produced change 
 
proposition contained resolution meet approval 
Congress country, command 
approval, deem importance States people immediately 
interested distinctly notified fact, 
may begin consider whether accept reject it. Federal 
Government would find highest interest measure, one 
efficient means leaders existing 
insurrection entertain hope government ultimately 
forced acknowledge independence part 
region, slave States north part say, 
"The Union struggled already gone, 
choose go Southern deprive hope 
substantially ends rebellion, emancipation 
completely States it. 
point States slavery would soon, 
all, that, offer equally made 
all, northern shall make certain 
southern event former ever join latter 
proposed say because, judgment, 
gradual sudden emancipation better all. mere 
financial pecuniary view, member Congress census 
treasury reports readily see soon 
current expenditures war would purchase, fair 
slaves named State. proposition part 
General Government sets claim right Federal authority 
interfere slavery within State limits, does, 
absolute control subject case State people 
immediately interested. proposed matter perfectly free 
choice them. 
 
annual message last December, thought fit say, "The Union must 
preserved, hence indispensable means must said 
War made continues 
indispensable means end. practical 
national authority would render war would 
cease. If, however, resistance war must also 
impossible incidents may attend 
ruin may follow it. may seem indispensable may obviously 
promise great efficiency toward ending struggle must come. 
 
proposition made offer hope may esteemed 
offense ask whether pecuniary consideration tendered would 
value States private persons concerned 
institution property present aspect affairs. 
 
true adoption proposed resolution would 
merely within practical measure, 
recommended hope would soon lead important practical 
results. full view great responsibility God 
country, earnestly beg attention Congress people 
subject. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INDORSEMENT LETTER GOVERNOR 
 
STATE ILLINOIS, EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT, SPRINGFIELD, ILL., March 1, 1862 
 
HON. EDWIN M. STANTON, SECRETARY WAR, Washington, D. C. 
 
SIR:--The government special request months since contracted 
fourteen batteries James 
limited quantity James weighing fourteen pounds 
each. reports showing superiority gun 
regards accuracy, execution, field service 
others battle Fort leads request 
furnished State Illinois shortest time practicable 
seven batteries James guns, 
etc., complete ready field service, together 
following fixed 
solid weighing pounds each, 
also solid 
guns fourteen batteries named above, weighing 14 pounds each, 
James 
 
respectfully, 
 
RICHARD YATES, Governor Illinois. 
 
[Indorsement.] 
 
March 8, 1862. 
 
within Governor Illinois. understand seven 
additional batteries sought object 
mix fourteen batteries already make 
consist four two shall 
glad filled without detriment 
service. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT'S GENERAL WAR ORDER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON 
 
March 8, 1862. 
 
Ordered: 1. major-general commanding Army Potomac 
proceed forthwith organize part said army destined enter 
upon active operations excluding troops 
left four army corps, 
commanded according follows: 
 
First Corps consist four commanded 
Major-General I. McDowell. Second Corps consist three 
commanded Brigadier-General E. V. Third Corps consist 
three commanded Brigadier-General S. P. 
Fourth Corps consist three 
commanded Brigadier-General E. D. 
 
2. divisions commanded officers assigned 
commands army corps shall embraced form part 
respective 
 
3. forces left defense Washington placed command 
Brigadier-General James S. shall also military 
governor District Columbia. 
 
4. order executed promptness dispatch 
delay commencement operations already directed 
Army Potomac. 
 
5. fifth army corps, commanded Major general N. P. Banks, 
formed General General 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT'S GENERAL WAR ORDER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, MARCH 
 
Ordered: change base operations Army 
Potomac shall made without leaving Washington force 
opinion general-in-chief commanders 
army corps shall leave said city entirely 
 
two army corps 50,000 said Army 
Potomac shall moved en route new base operations 
navigation Potomac Washington Bay shall 
freed enemy's batteries 
President shall hereafter give express 
 
movements aforesaid en route new base operations 
may ordered may intended 
move upon Bay, shall begin move upon bay early 
18th day March instant, general-in-chief shall 
responsible move early day. 
 
Ordered, army navy co-operate immediate effort 
capture enemy's batteries upon Potomac Washington 

 
 
A. LINCOLN 
 
 
 
 
INTERVIEW PRESIDENT BORDER SLAVE STATE 
 
REPRESENTATIVES, HON. J. W. 
 
MEMORANDUM 
 
"DEAR SIR:--I called, request President, ask come 
White House morning, nine o'clock, bring 

 
WASHINGTON, March 10, 1862. 
 
Yesterday, return church, found Mr. Postmaster-General Blair 
room, writing note, immediately suspended, 
verbally communicated President's stated 
President's purpose conversation 
Kentucky, Missouri, Maryland, Virginia, Delaware, explanation 
message 6th instant. 
 
morning town, assembled 
White House appointed time, little delay 
admitted Mr. members 
Maryland present, and, think, members delegation 
time city. know Mr. Senate, Messrs. 
Webster House, 
 
usual seated, President said, 
substance, invited us meet conversation 
us explanation message since sent 
several gentlemen present visited him, 
avoided allusion message, therefore inferred 
message regarded inimical 
interests resolved would talk 
us, minds erroneous opinion. 
 
President intent injure interests wound 
slave States. contrary, purpose 
protect one respect other; engaged 
tedious war; immense armies field, must 
continue field long war armies must, 
necessity, brought contact slaves States 
represented States slaves would come 
continual irritation kept up; constantly 
conflicting one side 
certain class complained slave protected 
persons frequently found who, views, acted 
way unfriendly hand, 
complained rights with, slaves induced 
protected within complaints 
loud serious annoyance embarrassing 
progress war; kept alive spirit hostile government 
States strengthened hopes 
day border States would unite them, thus tend 
war; opinion, resolution 
adopted Congress accepted States, causes irritation 
hopes would removed, would accomplished toward 
war could hoped greatest victory achieved 
Union made proposition good faith, desired 
accepted, all, patriotic 
spirit made; emancipation subject exclusively 
control States, must adopted rejected 
itself; claim government right 
purpose; part purpose 
making proposition, wished clearly 
expect us prepared give answer, 
hoped would take subject serious consideration, confer 
one another, take course felt duty 
interests constituents required us. 
 
Mr. Missouri, said State slavery considered 
permanent institution; natural causes operation 
would distant day it, think 
proposition necessary that; and, besides that, 
friends felt message account different 
constructions resolution message received. New York 
it, understood mean must accept gradual 
emancipation according plan get something worse. 
 
President replied must expected quarrel New 
York right time; hoped never it; 
would anticipate events. respect emancipation Missouri, 
said observed Mr. probably true, 
operation natural causes prevented conduct 
destroyed hopes 
Missouri would time alongside them, which, 
judgment, passage resolution Congress acceptance 
Missouri would 
 
Mr. Maryland, asked would effect refusal 
State accept desired know 
President looked policy beyond acceptance 

 
President replied designs beyond actions 
States particular subject. lament refusal 
accept it, designs beyond refusal it. 
 
Mr. Kentucky, inquired President thought 
power except States carry scheme 
emancipation. 
 
President replied thought could be. went 
course remarks foregoing declaration 
material repeated understanding meaning. 
 
Mr. said think people Maryland looked upon 
slavery permanent institution; know would 
give provision made meet loss 
could rid like 
emancipation, either direct action government 
emancipation slaves District, 
confiscation Southern property thought 
would consent consider proposition would require 
informed points. President replied that, unless 
act God Confederate armies occupy 
house three years; long remained Maryland 
nothing fear either institutions interests points 
referred to. 
 
Mr. immediately "Mr. President, say could 
heard people Maryland, would consider proposition 
much better feeling fear without inclined 
do." 
 
President: "That publication 
do; would force quarrel proper time and, 
done, quarrel 
said wish encounter 
proper time, could avoided. 
 
[The faction wanted immediate Emancipation Proclamation. D.W.] 
 
Governor Kentucky, asked respecting 
constitutionality 
 
President replied: "As may suppose, considered that; 
proposition submitted encounter constitutional 
difficulty. proposes simply co-operate State giving 
State pecuniary thought resolution, proposed 
him, would considered rather expression sentiment 
involving constitutional question. 
 
Mr. Hall, Missouri, thought proposition adopted 
votes free States, come proposition 
slave States, affording put aside 
subject ought expected members 
representing slaveholding declare once, 
advance proposition them, emancipation slavery. 
 
President said saw felt force 
fearful responsibility, every gentleman must thought 
know scheme received members 
free States; spoken received 
part reserved been, 
could tell would vote. reply expression Mr. 
Hall opinion regarding slavery, said pretend 
disguise anti-slavery thought wrong, 
continue think so; question deal 
now. Slavery existed, that, too, well act North 
scheme get rid North well 
South morally bound full equal thought 
institution wrong ought never yet recognized 
rights property grown it, would respect 
rights fully similar rights property; property 
exist legally exist. thought law wrong, rights 
property resulting must would get rid odious 
law, violating rights, encouraging proposition 
offering give up. 
 
far subject concerned, 
Mr. President that, whatever might final 
action, thought solely moved high patriotism sincere 
devotion happiness glory country; 
conviction consider respectfully important suggestions 
made. 
 
conversation current war news, 
immediately proceeded room wrote paper. J. W. 

 
present interview described foregoing paper 
Mr. substance passed 
occasion paper faithfully fully given. 
 
J. W. J. J. R. 
 
March 10, 1862. 
 
 
 
 
PRESIDENT'S SPECIAL WAR ORDER 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, March 11, 1862. 
 
Major-General McClellan personally taken field head 
Army Potomac, otherwise ordered relieved 
command military departments, command 
Department Potomac. 
 
Ordered further, departments respective commands 
Generals Halleck Hunter, together much General 
Buell lies west north south line indefinitely drawn 
Knoxville, consolidated designated Department 
Mississippi, otherwise ordered Major General Halleck 
command said department. 
 
Ordered also, country west Department Potomac 
east Department Mississippi military department, 
called Mountain Department, commanded 
Major-General Fremont. 
 
commanders departments, receipt order 
them, respectively report severally directly Secretary War, 
full, frequent reports expected 
them. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
SECRETARY STANTON GENERAL MCCLELLAN. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, March 13, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL GEORGE B. MCCLELLAN: 
 
President, considered plan operations agreed upon 
commanders army corps, makes objection 
gives following directions 
 
1. Leave force Manassas Junction shall make entirely certain 
enemy shall position line 
communication. 
 
2. Leave Washington entirely 
 
3. Move remainder force Potomac, choosing new base 
Fortress Monroe anywhere there, or, events, 
move remainder army pursuit enemy 
route. 
 
EDWARD M. STANTON, Secretary War. 
 
 
 
 
SPEECH PARTY MASSACHUSETTS GENTLEMAN 
 
WASHINGTON, MARCH 13, 1862 
 
thank you, Mr. Train, kindness presenting truly 
elegant highly specimen mechanics 
State Massachusetts, beg express hearty 
thanks perfection 
really wish time acknowledge fitting words, might 
follow idea evidently expected 
good deal whipping done. meet socially 
let us think whipping rebels, seem think 
whipping negroes, pleasant days, 
hoped store us, seated behind good pair horses 
drive peaceful, happy, prosperous land. 
idea, gentlemen, must leave business duties. 
likely D.W.] 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. 
 
WASHINGTON CITY, March 20, 1862. 
 
SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: 
 
third section "Act promote efficiency 
approved December 21, 1861, 
 
"That President United States, advice 
consent Senate, shall authority detail retired 
list navy command squadrons single ships 
officers may believe good service requires thus 
placed officers may, upon recommendation 
President United States shall receive vote thanks 
Congress services gallantry action enemy, 
restored active list, 
 
conformity law, Captain Samuel F. Du navy, 
nominated Senate continuance flag-officer command 
squadron recently rendered important service Union 
expedition South Carolina, Georgia, 
 
Believing occasion could arise would fully correspond 
intention law pregnant happy influence 
example, cordially recommend Captain Samuel F. Du receive 
vote thanks Congress service gallantry displayed 
capture since 21st December, 1861, various ports 
Georgia Florida, particularly Cumberland Island Sound, 
Island, towns St. St. 

 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, MARCH 31, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
DEAR morning felt constrained order division 
Fremont, write assure great pain, 
understanding would wish otherwise. could know 
full pressure case, confident would justify it, even 
beyond mere acknowledgment commander-in-chief may order 

 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GIFT 
 
MICHAEL N. Fourth Philadelphia. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 2, 1862. 
 
DEAR thank behalf little son 
present white much pleased them. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
INSTRUCTION SECRETARY STANTON. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, April 3, 1862. 
 
Secretary War order one corps 
General McDowell General Sumner remain front Washington 
orders department, operate direction 
Manassas Junction, otherwise, occasion may 
Corps ordered remain go forward General McClellan speedily 
General McClellan commence forward movements 
new base once, incidental modifications 
foregoing may render proper also made. A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 6, 1862. 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN: 
 
11 A. M. today received. Secretary War informs 
transportation, ammunition, 
orders, not, be, with. 
one hundred thousand troops you, independent General 
command. think better break enemy's line 
River once. probably use time 
can. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, President 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 9, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN. 
 
DEAR complaining properly 
me, pain much. 
 
division withdrawn left here, 
knew pressure it, and, thought, acquiesced 
certainly without 
 
left ascertained less 20,000 men, 
without single field designed left 
defense Washington Manassas Junction, part even go 
General old position; General corps, designed 
Manassas Junction, divided tied line Winchester 
could leave without upper Potomac 
Baltimore Ohio Railroad. presented (or would present 
McDowell Sumner great temptation enemy 
turn back Rappahannock Washington. explicit order 
Washington should, judgment Commanders corps, 
left entirely precisely drove 
detain McDowell. 
 
forget satisfied arrangement leave Banks 
Manassas arrangement broken nothing 
substituted it, course satisfied. constrained 
substitute something myself. 
 
allow ask, really think permit line 
Richmond Junction city entirely open, except 
resistance could presented less 20,000 
question country allow 
 
curious mystery number troops you. 
telegraphed saying 100,000 you, 
obtained Secretary War statement, taken said 
making en route you. 
say shall 
reached you. accounted for? 
 
General command, understand precisely 
like number would command away. 
suppose whole force gone forward 
time; so, think precise time strike 
blow. delay enemy relatively gain upon is, 
gain faster reinforcements 
reinforcements alone. 
 
let tell indispensable strike 
blow. powerless help this. justice remember 
always insisted going bay search field, instead 
fighting near Manassas, shifting 
difficulty; would find enemy equal 
either place. country fail 
present hesitation move upon enemy 
story Manassas repeated. 
 
beg assure never written spoken 
greater kindness feeling now, fuller purpose sustain 
you, far anxious judgment consistently can; 
must act. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 9, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Saint Louis, Mo.: 
endangering life, 
health, wish far 
consistently safe 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
Please send above, order President. JOHN 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION RECOMMENDING THANKSGIVING 
 
APRIL 10, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation 
 
pleased Almighty God signal victories land 
naval forces engaged internal rebellion, 
time avert country dangers foreign intervention 

 
therefore recommended people United States 
next accustomed places public worship 
shall occur notice proclamation shall 
received, especially acknowledge render thanks Heavenly 
Father inestimable implore 
spiritual consolation behalf brought 
affliction casualties civil war, 
invoke divine national 
end may speedily result restoration peace, 
harmony, throughout borders establishment 
fraternal relations among countries earth. 
 
witness whereof hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, tenth day April, A.D. 1862, 
independence United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
ABOLISHING SLAVERY WASHINGTON, D.C. 
 
MESSAGE CONGRESS. April 16, 1862. 
 
FELLOW-CITIZENS SENATE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVES: act 
entitled "An act relief certain persons held service 
labor District day approved 
 
never doubted constitutional authority Congress abolish 
slavery District, ever desired see national 
capital freed institution satisfactory way. Hence 
never mind question subject except one 
expediency, arising view circumstances. matters 
within act might taken course shape 
satisfactory judgment, attempt specify them. 
gratified two principles compensation colonization 
recognized practically applied act. 
 
matter provided claims may presented 
within ninety days passage act, "but 
saving insane absent persons. 
presume omission mere recommend 
supplied amendatory act. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 21, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
despatch 19th received day. Fredericksburg 
bridges destroyed enemy, small part 
McDowell's command side opposite 
town. purposes moving whole force point. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
POSTMASTER-GENERAL 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, April 24, 1862. 
 
Hon. POSTMASTER-GENERAL. 
 
DEAR SIR:--The member Congress district including 
calls postmaster place. believe turned 
despatch persons there, asking 
heard, something sort. nothing, nothing 
amounting anything, done, think suspension might 
suspended, commission go forward. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
WASHINGTON, April 29, 1862. 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
Would embarrass operations appoint Captain 
Charles brigadier-general Please answer. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
MESSAGE SENATE, MAY 1, 1862. 
 
SENATE UNITED STATES: 
 
answer resolution Senate April relation 
Brigadier-General Stone, honor state arrested 
general authority, upon evidence whether 
guilty innocent, required, appears me, proceedings 
public safety. deem incompatible 
public interest, also, perhaps, unjust General Stone, make 
particular statement evidence. 
 
tried because, state military operations 
time arrest since, officers constitute court martial 
witnesses could withdrawn duty without serious injury 
service. allowed trial without unnecessary 
charges furnished due 
every facility defense afforded War Department. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN, 
 
WASHINGTON, MAY 1, 1862 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL McCLELLAN 
 
EXECUTIVE MANSION, WASHINGTON, MAY 1, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
call guns Washington me, chiefly 
argues indefinite anything 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM GENERAL H. W. HALLECK. 
 
WAR DEPARTMENT, MAY 1, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL HALLECK, Tennessee: 
 
pressed Missouri members Congress give General Schofield 
independent command Missouri. insist want 
local troubles gradually grow worse. far, fear 
interfering embarrassing operations. Please answer telling 
whether anything, what, without injuriously 
interfering you. 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
RESPONSE MAY 6, 1862 
 
GENTLEMEN:--I welcome representatives 
United States. accept gratitude 
sympathy support loyal 
class fellow citizens important crisis 
judgment, civil religious liberties dear land, 
large degree civil religious liberties mankind many 
countries many ages. well know, gentlemen, world 
knows, accepted issue battle forced upon 
place internal enemies country. 
know, world knows, forces resources public agents 
brought employment sustain government 
brought one complaint real injury committed society 
home abroad. may recollect taking sword thus 
forced hands government appealed prayers 
good, declared placed whole dependence 
favor God. presence, reiterate 
acknowledgment doubting that, shall please 
Divine determines nations, shall 
remain united people, will, seeking divine 
make prolonged national existence source new benefits 
classes conditions 
mankind. 
 
 
 
 
TELEGRAM FLAG-OFFICER L. M. 
 
FORT MONROE, VIRGINIA, MAY 7, 1862 
 
FLAG-OFFICER 
 
McClellan telegraphs ascertained 
abandoned, 
requests gunboats may sent James River. 
 
tolerable confidence successfully contend 
without help two accompanying 
send two gunboats James River once. Please report 
action once. shall found either General 
headquarters board 
 
obedient servant, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
McCLELLAN 
 
GENERAL G. B. McCLELLAN. 
 
FORT MONROE, VIRGINIA, May 9, 1862 
 
MAJOR-GENERAL McCLELLAN: 
 
DEAR SIR:--I assisted Secretary War framing part 
despatch relating army corps, despatch, course, 
reached long will. wish say words 
privately subject. ordered army corps organization 
unanimous opinion twelve generals selected 
assigned generals also unanimous opinion 
every military man could get opinion from, every modern military 
book, course, judgment 
pretend understand subject. think indispensable 
know struggle received quarters cannot 
entirely looked upon merely effort one 
two degrade supposed 
word Sumner, commanders corps 
are, course, three highest officers you; constantly 
told consultation communication them; 
consult communicate nobody General John Porter, 
perhaps General say complaints true 
events, proper know existence. 
commanders corps orders anything? 
 
relieved General command day, 
thereby lost confidence least one best friends 
Senate. let say, applicable personally, 
Senators Representatives speak places without question, 
officers army must cease addressing letters 
taking greater liberty them. 
 
return. strong strong enough even 
set foot upon necks Sumner, 
practical serious question you? 
 
success army cause country same, and, 
course, desire good cause. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
FLAG-OFFICER L. M. 
 
FORT MONROE, VIRGINIA, May 10, 1862 
 
FLAG-OFFICER 
 
DEAR SIR:--I send copy report yesterday 
purpose saying writing quite right supposing 
movement made therein reported made accordance 
wishes verbally expressed advance. avail 
occasion thank far 
known me, brief visit here. 
 
truly, 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
 
 
 
PROCLAMATION RAISING BLOCKADE CERTAIN 
 
May 12, 1862. 
 
PRESIDENT UNITED STATES AMERICA: 
 
Proclamation. 
 
Whereas, proclamation 19th April, one thousand eight 
hundred sixty-one, declared ports certain States, 
including State North Carolina, Port 
Royal, State South Carolina, New Orleans, State 
Louisiana, were, reasons therein set forth, intended placed 
whereas said ports Port Royal, 
New Orleans since blockade 
ports may safely relaxed advantage interests 

 
Now, therefore, known I, Abraham Lincoln, President 
United States, pursuant authority vested fifth section 
act Congress approved 13th July last, entitled "An act 
provide collection duties imports, 
purposes," hereby declare blockade said ports 
Port Royal, New Orleans shall far cease determine, 
first day June next, commercial intercourse 
ports, except persons, things, information contraband 
war, may time carried on, subject laws 
United States, limitations pursuance regulations 
prescribed Secretary Treasury order 
date, appended proclamation. 
 
witness whereof, hereunto set hand caused seal 
United States affixed. 
 
Done city Washington, twelfth day May, year 
Lord one thousand eight hundred sixty-two, independence 
United States 
 
 
A. LINCOLN. 
 
President:  WILLIAM H. SEWARD, Secretary State. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Lincoln's Gettysburg Address, given November 19, 1863 
battlefield near Gettysburg, Pennsylvania, 
 
 
Four score seven years ago, fathers brought forth 
upon continent new  conceived liberty, 
dedicated proposition men created equal. 
 
engaged great civil war. . whether 
nation, nation conceived . . 
long endure.  met great battlefield war. 
 
come portion field final resting place 
gave lives nation might live. 
altogether fitting proper this. 
 
But, larger sense, cannot . cannot . . 
cannot ground.  brave men, living dead, 
struggled consecrated it, far poor power 
add  world little note, long remember, 
say here, never forget here. 
 
us living, rather, dedicated unfinished 
work fought thus far nobly advanced. 
rather us dedicated great task remaining 
us. . honored dead take increased devotion 
cause gave last full measure . . 
highly resolve dead shall died vain. . . 
nation, God, shall new birth freedom. . . 
government people. . people. . people. . . 
shall perish earth. 
 
 
